fun: Sport; merriment; frolicsome amusement. "Oddity, frolic, and fun." Goldsmith. To make fan of, to hold up to, or turn into, ridicule.
cell: 1. A very small and close apartment, as in a prison or in a monastery or convent; the hut of a hermit. The heroic confessor in his cell. Macaulay. 2. A small religious house attached to a monastery or convent. "Cells or dependent priories." Milman. 3. Any small cavity, or hollow place. 4. (Arch.) (a) The space between the ribs of a vaulted roof. (b) Same as Cella. 5. (Elec.)  A jar of vessel, or a division of a compound vessel, for holding the exciting fluid of a battery. 6. (Biol.)  One of the minute elementary structures, of which the greater part of the various tissues and organs of animals and plants are composed. Note: All cells have their origin in the primary cell from which the organism was developed. In the lowest animal and vegetable forms, one single cell constitutes the complete individual, such being called unicelluter orgamisms. A typical cell is composed of a semifluid mass of protoplasm, more or less granular, generally containing in its center a nucleus which in turn frequently contains one or more nucleoli, the whole being surrounded by a thin membrane, the cell wall. In some cells, as in those of blood, in the amoeba, and in embryonic cells (both vegetable and animal), there is no restricting cell wall, while in some of the unicelluliar organisms the nucleus is wholly wanting. See Illust. of Bipolar. Air cell. See Air cell. -- Cell development (called also cell genesis, cell formation, and cytogenesis), the multiplication, of cells by a process of reproduction under the following common forms; segmentation or fission, gemmation or budding, karyokinesis, and endogenous multiplication. See Segmentation, Gemmation, etc. -- Cell theory. (Biol.) See Cellular theory, under Cellular.  To place or inclosed in a cell. "Celled under ground." [R.] Warner.
store: 1. That which is accumulated, or massed together; a source from which supplies may be drawn; hence, an abundance; a great quantity, or a great number. The ships are fraught with store of victuals. Bacon. With store of ladies, whose bright eyes Rain influence, and give the prize. Milton. 2. A place of deposit for goods, esp. for large quantities; a storehouse; a warehouse; a magazine. 3. Any place where goods are sold, whether by wholesale or retail; a shop. [U.S. & British Colonies] 4. pl.  Articles, especially of food, accumulated for some specific object; supplies, as of provisions, arms, ammunition, and the like; as, the stores of an army, of a ship, of a family. His swine, his horse, his stoor, and his poultry. Chaucer. In store, in a state of accumulation; in keeping; hence, in a state of readiness. "I have better news in store for thee." Shak. -- Store clothes, clothing purchased at a shop or store; -- in distinction from that which is home-made. [Colloq. U.S.] -- Store pay, payment for goods or work in articles from a shop or store, instead of money. [U.S.] -- To set store by, to value greatly; to have a high appreciation of. -- To tell no store of, to make no account of; to consider of no importance. Syn. -- Fund; supply; abundance; plenty; accumulation; provision. -- Store, Shop. The English call the place where goods are sold (however large or splendid it may be) a shop, and confine the word store to its original meaning; viz., a warehouse, or place where goods are stored. In America the word store is applied to all places, except the smallest, where goods are sold. In some British colonies the word store is used as in the United States. In his needy shop a tortoise hung, An alligator stuffed, and other skins Of ill-shaped fishes; and about his shelves A beggarly account of empty boxes. Shak. Sulphurous and nitrous foam, . . . Concocted and adjusted, they reduced To blackest grain, and into store conveyed. Milton.  Accumulated; hoarded. Bacon.  1. To collect as a reserved supply; to accumulate; to lay away. Dora stored what little she could save. Tennyson. 2. To furnish; to supply; to replenish; esp., to stock or furnish against a future time. Her mind with thousand virtues stored. Prior. Wise Plato said the world with men was stored. Denham. Having stored a pond of four acres with carps, tench, and other fish. Sir M. Hale. 3. To deposit in a store, warehouse, or other building, for preservation; to warehouse; as, to store goods.
gone: p. p. of Go.
noun: A word used as the designation or appellation of a creature or thing, existing in fact or in thought; a substantive. Note: By some grammarians the term noun is so used as to include adjectives, as being descriptive; but in general it is limited to substantives.
ready: 1. Prepared for what one is about to do or experience; equipped or supplied with what is needed for some act or event; prepared for immediate movement or action; as, the troops are ready to march; ready for the journey. "When she redy was." Chaucer. 2. Fitted or arranged for immediate use; causing no delay for lack of being prepared or furnished. "Dinner was ready." Fielding. My oxen and my fatlings are killed, and all things are ready: come unto the marriage. Matt. xxii. 4. 3. Prepared in mind or disposition; not reluctant; willing; free; inclined; disposed. I am ready not to be bound only, but also to die at Jerusalem, for the name of the Lord Jesus. Acts xxi. 13. If need be, I am ready to forego And quit. Milton. 4. Not slow or hesitating; quick in action or perception of any kind; dexterous; prompt; easy; expert; as, a ready apprehension; ready wit; a ready writer or workman. "Ready in devising expedients." Macaulay. Gurth, whose temper was ready, through surly. Sir W. Scott. 5. Offering itself at once; at hand; opportune; convenient; near; easy. "The readiest way." Milton. A sapling pine he wrenched from out the ground, The readiest weapon that his fury found. Dryden. 6. On the point; about; on the brink; near; -- with a following infinitive. My heart is ready to crack. Shak. 7. (Mil.)  A word of command, or a position, in the manual of arms, at which the piece is cocked and held in position to execute promptly the next command, which is, aim. All ready, ready in every particular; wholly equipped or prepared. "[I] am all redy at your hest." Chaucer. -- Ready money, means of immediate payment; cash. "'Tis all the ready money fate can give." Cowley. -- Ready reckoner, a book of tables for facilitating computations, as of interest, prices, etc. -- To make ready, to make preparation; to get in readiness. Syn. -- Prompt; expeditious; speedy; unhesitating; dexterous; apt; skilful; handy; expert; facile; easy; opportune; fitted; prepared; disposed; willing; free; cheerful. See Prompt.  In a state of preparation for immediate action; so as to need no delay. We ourselves will go ready armed. Num. xxxii. 17.  Ready money; cash; -- commonly with the; as, he was supplied with the ready. [Slang] Lord Strut was not flush in ready, either to go to law, or to clear old debts. Arbuthnot.  To dispose in order. [Obs.] Heywood.
main: 1. A hand or match at dice. Prior. Thackeray. 2. A stake played for at dice. [Obs.] Shak. 3. The largest throw in a match at dice; a throw at dice within given limits, as in the game of hazard. 4. A match at cockfighting. "My lord would ride twenty miles . . . to see a main fought." Thackeray. 5. A main-hamper. [Obs.] Ainsworth.  1. Strength; force; might; violent effort. [Obs., except in certain phrases.] There were in this battle of most might and main. R. of Gl. He 'gan advance, With huge force, and with importable main. Spenser. 2. The chief or principal part; the main or most important thing. [Obs., except in special uses.] Resolved to rest upon the title of Lancaster as the main, and to use the other two . . . but as supporters. Bacon. 3. Specifically: (a) The great sea, as distinguished from an arm, bay, etc. ; the high sea; the ocean. "Struggling in the main." Dryden. (b) The continent, as distinguished from an island; the mainland. "Invaded the main of Spain." Bacon. (c) principal duct or pipe, as distinguished from lesser ones; esp. (Engin.), a principal pipe leading to or from a reservoir; as, a fire main. Forcing main, the delivery pipe of a pump. -- For the main, or In the main, for the most part; in the greatest part. -- With might and main, or With all one's might and main, with all one's strength; with violent effort. With might and main they chased the murderous fox. Dryden.  1. Very or extremely strong. [Obs.] That current with main fury ran. Daniel. 2. Vast; huge. [Obs.] "The main abyss." Milton. 3. Unqualified; absolute; entire; sheer. [Obs.] "It's a man untruth." Sir W. Scott. 4. Principal; chief; first in size, rank, importance, etc. Our main interest is to be happy as we can. Tillotson. 5. Important; necessary. [Obs.] That which thou aright Believest so main to our success, I bring. Milton. By main force, by mere force or sheer force; by violent effort; as, to subdue insurrection by main force. That Maine which by main force Warwick did win. Shak. -- By main strength, by sheer strength; as, to lift a heavy weight by main strength. -- Main beam (Steam Engine), working beam. -- Main boom (Naut.), the boom which extends the foot of the mainsail in a fore and aft vessel. -- Main brace. (a) (Mech.) The brace which resists the chief strain. Cf. Counter brace. (b) (Naut.) The brace attached to the main yard. -- Main center (Steam Engine), a shaft upon which a working beam or side lever swings. -- Main chance. See under Chance. -- Main couple (Arch.), the principal truss in a roof. -- Main deck (Naut.), the deck next below the spar deck; the principal deck. -- Main keel (Naut.), the principal or true keel of a vessel, as distinguished from the false keel. Syn. -- Principal; chief; leading; cardinal; capital.  Very extremely; as, main heavy. "I'm main dry." Foote. [Obs. or Low]
saw: imp. of See.  1. Something said; speech; discourse. [Obs.] "To hearken all his sawe." Chaucer. 2. A saying; a proverb; a maxim. His champions are the prophets and apostles, His weapons holy saws of sacred writ. Shak. 3. Dictate; command; decree. [Obs.] [Love] rules the creatures by his powerful saw. Spenser.  An instrument for cutting or dividing substances, as wood, iron, etc., consisting of a thin blade, or plate, of steel, with a series of sharp teeth on the edge, which remove successive portions of the material by cutting and tearing. Note: Saw is frequently used adjectively, or as the first part of a compound. Band saw, Crosscut saw, etc. See under Band, Crosscut, etc. -- Circular saw, a disk of steel with saw teeth upon its periphery, and revolved on an arbor. -- Saw bench, a bench or table with a flat top for for sawing, especially with a circular saw which projects above the table. -- Saw file, a three-cornered file, such as is used for sharpening saw teeth. -- Saw frame, the frame or sash in a sawmill, in which the saw, or gang of saws, is held. -- Saw gate, a saw frame. -- Saw gin, the form of cotton gin invented by Eli Whitney, in which the cotton fibers are drawn, by the teeth, of a set of revolving circular saws, through a wire grating which is too fine for the seeds to pass. -- Saw grass (Bot.), any one of certain cyperaceous plants having the edges of the leaves set with minute sharp teeth, especially the Cladium effusum of the Southern United States. Cf. Razor grass, under Razor. -- Saw log, a log of suitable size for sawing into lumber. -- Saw mandrel, a mandrel on which a circular saw is fastened for running. -- Saw pit, a pit over which timbor is sawed by two men, one standing below the timber and the other above. Mortimer. -- Saw sharpener (Zoöl.), the great titmouse; -- so named from its harsh call note. [Prov. Eng.] -- Saw whetter (Zoöl.), the marsh titmouse (Parus palustris); -- so named from its call note. [Prov. Eng.] -- Scroll saw, a ribbon of steel with saw teeth upon one edge, stretched in a frame and adapted for sawing curved outlines; also, a machine in which such a saw is worked by foot or power.  1. To cut with a saw; to separate with a saw; as, to saw timber or marble. 2. To form by cutting with a saw; as, to saw boards or planks, that is, to saw logs or timber into boards or planks; to saw shingles; to saw out a panel. 3. Also used figuratively; as, to saw the air.  1. To use a saw; to practice sawing; as, a man saws well. 2. To cut, as a saw; as, the saw or mill saws fast. 3. To be cut with a saw; as, the timber saws smoothly.
seem: To appear, or to appear to be; to have a show or semblance; to present an appearance; to look; to strike one's apprehension or fancy as being; to be taken as. "It now seemed probable." Macaulay. Thou picture of what thou seem'st. Shak. All seemed well pleased; all seemed, but were not all. Milton. There is a way which seemeth right unto a man; but the end thereof are the ways of death. Prov. xiv. 12. It seems, it appears; it is understood as true; it is said. A prince of Italy, it seems, entertained his misstress on a great lake. Addison. Syn. -- To appear; look. -- Seem, Appear. To appear has reference to a thing's being presented to our view; as, the sun appears; to seem is connected with the idea of semblance, and usually implies an inference of our mind as to the probability of a thing's being so; as, a storm seems to be coming. "The story appears to be true," means that the facts, as presented, go to show its truth; "the story seems to be true," means that it has the semblance of being so, and we infer that it is true. "His first and principal care being to appear unto his people such as he would have them be, and to be such as he appeared." Sir P. Sidney. Ham. Ay, madam, it is common. Queen. If it be, Why seems it so particular with thee Ham. Seems, madam! Nay, it is; I know not "seems." Shak.  To befit; to beseem. [Obs.] Spenser.
favor: 1. Kind regard; propitious aspect; countenance; friendly disposition; kindness; good will. Hath crawled into the favor of the king. Shak. 2. The act of countenancing, or the condition of being countenanced, or regarded propitiously; support; promotion; befriending. But found no favor in his lady's eyes. Dryden. And Jesus increased in wisdom and stature, and in favor with God and man. Luke ii. 52. 3. A kind act or office; kindness done or granted; benevolence shown by word or deed; an act of grace or good will, as distinct from justice or remuneration. Beg one favor at thy gracious hand. Shak. 4. Mildness or mitigation of punishment; lenity. I could not discover the lenity and fabor of this sentence. Swift. 5. The object of regard; person or thing favored. All these his wondrous works, but chiefly man, His chief delight and favor. Milton. 6. A gift or represent; something bestowed as an evidence of good will; a token of love; a knot of ribbons; something worn as a token of affection; as, a marriage favor is a bunch or knot of white ribbons or white flowers worn at a wedding. Wear thou this favor for me, and stick it in thy cap. Shak. 7. Appearance; look; countenance; face. [Obs.] This boy is fair, of female favor. Shak. 8. (Law)  Partiality; bias. Bouvier. 9. A letter or epistle; -- so called in civility or compliment; as, your favor of yesterday is received. 10. pl.  Love locks. [Obs.] Wright. Challenge to the favor or for favor (Law), the challenge of a juror on grounds not sufficient to constitute a principal challenge, but sufficient to give rise to a probable suspicion of favor or bias, such as acquaintance, business relation, etc. See Principal challenge, under Challenge. -- In favor of, upon the side of; favorable to; for the advantage of. -- In favor with, favored, countenanced, or encouraged by. -- To curry favor Etym: [see the etymology of Favor, above], to seek to gain favor by flattery, caresses, kindness, or officious civilities. -- With one's favor, or By one's favor, with leave; by kind permission. But, with your favor, I will treat it here. Dryden. Syn. -- Kindness; countenance; patronage; support; lenity; grace; gift; present; benefit.  1. To regard with kindness; to support; to aid, or to have the disposition to aid, or to wish success to; to be propitious to; to countenance; to treat with consideration or tenderness; to show partiality or unfair bias towards. O happy youth! and favored of the skies. Pope. He that favoreth Joab, . . . let him go after Joab. 2 Sam. xx. 11. [The painter] has favored her squint admirably. Swift. 2. To afford advantages for success to; to facilitate; as, a weak place favored the entrance of the enemy. 3. To resemble in features; to have the aspect or looks of; as, the child favors his father. The porter owned that the gentleman favored his master. Spectator.
dear: 1. Bearing a high price; high-priced; costly; expensive. The cheapest of us is ten groats too dear. Shak. 2. Marked by scarcity or dearth, and exorbitance of price; as, a dear year. 3. Highly valued; greatly beloved; cherished; precious. "Hear me, dear lady." Shak. Neither count I my life dear unto myself. Acts xx. 24. And the last joy was dearer than the rest. Pope. Dear as remember'd kisses after death. Tennyson. 4. Hence, close to the heart; heartfelt; present in mind; engaging the attention. (a) Of agreeable things and interests. [I'll] leave you to attend him: some dear cause Will in concealment wrap me up awhile. Shak. His dearest wish was to escape from the bustle and glitter of Whitehall. Macaulay. (b) Of disagreeable things and antipathies. In our dear peril. Shak. Would I had met my dearest foe in heaven Or ever I had seen that day. Shak.  A dear one; lover; sweetheart. That kiss I carried from thee, dear. Shak.  Dearly; at a high price. If thou attempt it, it will cost thee dear. Shak.  To endear. [Obs.] Shelton.
among: 1. Mixed or mingled; surrounded by. They heard, And from his presence hid themselves among The thickest trees. Milton. 2. Conjoined, or associated with, or making part of the number of; in the number or class of. Blessed art thou among women. Luke i. 28. 3. Expressing a relation of dispersion, distribution, etc.; also, a relation of reciprocal action. What news among the merchants Shak. Human sacrifices were practiced among them. Hume. Divide that gold amongst you. Marlowe. Whether they quarreled among themselves, or with their neighbors. Addison. Syn. -- Amidst; between. See Amidst, Between.
room: 1. Unobstructed spase; space which may be occupied by or devoted to any object; compass; extent of place, great or small; as, there is not room for a house; the table takes up too much room. Lord, it is done as thou hast commanded, and yet there is room. Luke xiv. 22. There was no room for them in the inn. Luke ii. 7. 2. A particular portion of space appropriated for occupancy; a place to sit, stand, or lie; a seat. If he have but twelve pence in his purse, he will give it for the best room in a playhouse. Overbury. When thou art bidden of any man to a wedding, sit not down in the highest room. Luke xiv. 8. 3. Especially, space in a building or ship inclosed or set apart by a partition; an apartment or chamber. I found the prince in the next room. Shak. 4. Place or position in society; office; rank; post; station; also, a place or station once belonging to, or occupied by, another, and vacated. [Obs.] When he heard that Archelaus did reign in Judea in the room of his father Herod. Matt. ii. 22. Neither that I look for a higher room in heaven. Tyndale. Let Bianca take her sister's room. Shak. 5. Possibility of admission; ability to admit; opportunity to act; fit occasion; as, to leave room for hope. There was no prince in the empire who had room for such an alliance. Addison. Room and space (Shipbuilding), the distance from one side of a rib to the corresponding side of the next rib; space being the distance between two ribs, in the clear, and room the width of a rib. -- To give room, to withdraw; to leave or provide space unoccupied for others to pass or to be seated. -- To make room, to open a space, way, or passage; to remove obstructions; to give room. Make room, and let him stand before our face. Shak. Syn. -- Space; compass; scope; latitude.  To occupy a room or rooms; to lodge; as, they arranged to room together.  Spacious; roomy. [Obs.] No roomer harbour in the place. Chaucer.
basic: 1. (Chem.) (a) Relating to a base; performing the office of a base in a salt. (b) Having the base in excess, or the amount of the base atomically greater than that of the acid, or exceeding in proportion that of the related neutral salt. (c) Apparently alkaline, as certain normal salts which exhibit alkaline reactions with test paper. 2. (Min.)  Said of crystalline rocks which contain a relatively low percentage of silica, as basalt. Basic salt (Chem.), a salt formed from a base or hydroxide by the partial replacement of its hydrogen by a negative or acid element or radical.
shine: 1. To emit rays of light; to give light; to beam with steady radiance; to exhibit brightness or splendor; as, the sun shines by day; the moon shines by night. Hyperion's quickening fire doth shine. Shak. God, who commanded the light to shine out of darkness, hath shined in our hearts, to give the light of the knowledge of the glory of God in the face of Jesus Cghrist. 2 Cor. iv. 6. Let thine eyes shine forth in their full luster. Denham. 2. To be bright by reflection of light; to gleam; to be glossy; as, to shine like polished silver. 3. To be effulgent in splendor or beauty. "So proud she shined in her princely state." Spenser. Once brightest shined this child of heat and air. Pope. 4. To be eminent, conspicuous, or distinguished; to exhibit brilliant intellectual powers; as, to shine in courts; to shine in conversation. Few are qualified to shine in company; but it in most men's power to be agreeable. Swift. To make, or cause, the face to shine upon, to be propitious to; to be gracious to. Num. vi. 25.  1. To cause to shine, as a light. [Obs.] He [God] doth not rain wealth, nor shine honor and virtues, upon men equally. Bacon. 2. To make bright; to cause to shine by reflected light; as, in hunting, to shine the eyes of a deer at night by throwing a light on them. [U. S.] Bartlett.  1. The quality or state of shining; brightness; luster, gloss; polish; sheen. Now sits not girt with taper's holy shine. Milton. Fair opening to some court's propitious shine. Pope. The distant shine of the celestial city. Hawthorne. 2. Sunshine; fair weather. Be it fair or foul, or rain or shine. Dryden. 3. A liking for a person; a fancy. [Slang, U.S.] 4. Caper; antic; row. [Slang] To cut up shines, to play pranks. [Slang, U.S.]  Shining; sheen. [Obs.] Spenser.
since: 1. From a definite past time until now; as, he went a month ago, and I have not seen him since. We since become the slaves to one man's lust. B. Jonson. 2. In the time past, counting backward from the present; before this or now; ago. w many ages since has Virgil writ Roscommon. About two years since, it so fell out, that he was brought to a great lady's house. Sir P. Sidney. 3. When or that. [Obs.] Do you remember since we lay all night in the windmill in St. George's field Shak.  From the time of; in or during the time subsequent to; subsequently to; after; -- usually with a past event or time for the object. The Lord hath blessed thee, since my coming. Gen. xxx. 30. I have a model by which he build a nobler poem than any extant since the ancients. Dryden.  Seeing that; because; considering; -- formerly followed by that. Since that my penitence comes after all, Imploring pardon. Shak. Since truth and constancy are vain, Since neither love, nor sense of pain, Nor force of reason, can persuade, Then let example be obeyed. Granville. Syn. -- Because; for; as; inasmuch as; considering. See Because.
better: 1. Having good qualities in a greater degree than another; as, a better man; a better physician; a better house; a better air. Could make the worse appear The better reason. Milton. 2. Preferable in regard to rank, value, use, fitness, acceptableness, safety, or in any other respect. To obey is better than sacrifice. 1 Sam. xv. 22. It is better to trust in the Lord than to put confidence in princes. Ps. cxviii. 9. 3. Greater in amount; larger; more. 4. Improved in health; less affected with disease; as, the patient is better. 5. More advanced; more perfect; as, upon better acquaintance; a better knowledge of the subject. All the better. See under All, adv. -- Better half, an expression used to designate one's wife. My dear, my better half (said he), I find I must now leave thee. Sir P. Sidney. -- To be better off, to be in a better condition. -- Had better. (See under Had). Note: The phrase had better, followed by an infinitive without to, is idiomatic. The earliest form of construction was "were better" with a dative; as, "Him were better go beside." (Gower.) i. e., It would be better for him, etc. At length the nominative (I, he, they, etc.) supplanted the dative and had took the place of were. Thus we have the construction now used. By all that's holy, he had better starve Than but once think this place becomes thee not. Shak.  1. Advantage, superiority, or victory; -- usually with of; as, to get the better of an enemy. 2. One who has a claim to precedence; a superior, as in merit, social standing, etc.; -- usually in the plural. Their betters would hardly be found. Hooker. For the better, in the way of improvement; so as to produce improvement. "If I have altered him anywhere for the better." Dryden.  1. In a superior or more excellent manner; with more skill and wisdom, courage, virtue, advantage, or success; as, Henry writes better than John; veterans fight better than recruits. I could have better spared a better man. Shak. 2. More correctly or thoroughly. The better to understand the extent of our knowledge. Locke. 3. In a higher or greater degree; more; as, to love one better than another. Never was monarch better feared, and loved. Shak. 4. More, in reference to value, distance, time, etc.; as, ten miles and better. [Colloq.] To think better of (any one), to have a more favorable opinion of any one. -- To think better of (an opinion, resolution, etc.), to reconsider and alter one's decision.  1. To improve or ameliorate; to increase the good qualities of. Love betters what is best. Wordsworth. He thought to better his circumstances. Thackeray. 2. To improve the condition of, morally, physically, financially, socially, or otherwise. The constant effort of every man to better himself. Macaulay. 3. To surpass in excellence; to exceed; to excel. The works of nature do always aim at that which can not be bettered. Hooker. 4. To give advantage to; to support; to advance the interest of. [Obs.] Weapons more violent, when next we meet, May serve to better us and worse our foes. Milton. Syn. -- To improve; meliorate; ameliorate; mend; amend; correct; emend; reform; advance; promote.  To become better; to improve. Carlyle.  One who bets or lays a wager.
class: 1. A group of individuals ranked together as possessing common characteristics; as, the different classes of society; the educated class; the lower classes. 2. A number of students in a school or college, of the same standing, or pursuing the same studies. 3. A comprehensive division of animate or inanimate objects, grouped together on account of their common characteristics, in any classification in natural science, and subdivided into orders, families, tribes, gemera, etc. 4. A set; a kind or description, species or variety. She had lost one class energies. Macaulay. 5. (Methodist Church)  One of the sections into which a church or congregation is divided, and which is under the supervision of a class leader. Class of a curve (Math.), the kind of a curve as expressed by the number of tangents that can be drawn from any point to the curve. A circle is of the second class. -- Class meeting (Methodist Church), a meeting of a class under the charge of a class leader, for counsel and relegious instruction.  1. To arrange in classes; to classify or refer to some class; as, to class words or passages. Note: In scientific arrangement, to classify is used instead of to class. Dana. 2. To divide into classes, as students; to form into, or place in, a class or classes.  To grouped or classed. The genus or famiky under which it classes. Tatham.
temperature: 1. Constitution; state; degree of any quality. The best composition and temperature is, to have openness in fame and opinion, secrecy in habit, dissimulation in seasonable use, and a power to feign, if there be no remedy. Bacon. Memory depends upon the consistence and the temperature of the brain. I. Watts. 2. Freedom from passion; moderation. [Obs.] In that proud port, which her so goodly graceth, Most goodly temperature you may descry. Spenser. 3. (Physics)  Condition with respect to heat or cold, especially as indicated by the sensation produced, or by the thermometer or pyrometer; degree of heat or cold; as, the temperature of the air; high temperature; low temperature; temperature of freezing or of boiling. 4. Mixture; compound. [Obs.] Made a temperature of brass and iron together. Holland. Absolute temperature. (Physics) See under Absolute. -- Animal temperature (Physiol.), the nearly constant temperature maintained in the bodies of warm-blooded (homoiothermal) animals during life. The ultimate source of the heat is to be found in the potential energy of the food and the oxygen which is absorbed from the air during respiration. See Homoiothermal. -- Temperature sense (Physiol.), the faculty of perceiving cold and warmth, and so of perceiving differences of temperature in external objects. H. N. Martin.
property: 1. That which is proper to anything; a peculiar quality of a thing; that which is inherent in a subject, or naturally essential to it; an attribute; as, sweetness is a property of sugar. Property is correctly a synonym for peculiar quality; but it is frequently used as coextensive with quality in general. Sir W. Hamilton. Note: In physical science, the properties of matter are distinguished to the three following classes: 1. Physical properties, or those which result from the relations of bodies to the physical agents, light, heat, electricity, gravitation, cohesion, adhesion, etc., and which are exhibited without a change in the composition or kind of matter acted on. They are color, luster, opacity, transparency, hardness, sonorousness, density, crystalline form, solubility, capability of osmotic diffusion, vaporization, boiling, fusion, etc. 2. Chemical properties, or those which are conditioned by affinity and composition; thus, combustion, explosion, and certain solutions are reactions occasioned by chemical properties. Chemical properties are identical when there is identity of composition and structure, and change according as the composition changes. 3. Organoleptic properties, or those forming a class which can not be included in either of the other two divisions. They manifest themselves in the contact of substances with the organs of taste, touch, and smell, or otherwise affect the living organism, as in the manner of medicines and poisons. 2. An acquired or artificial quality; that which is given by art, or bestowed by man; as, the poem has the properties which constitute excellence. 3. The exclusive right of possessing, enjoying, and disposing of a thing; ownership; title. Here I disclaim all my paternal care, Propinquity and property of blood. Shak. Shall man assume a property in man Wordsworth. 4. That to which a person has a legal title, whether in his possession or not; thing owned; an estate, whether in lands, goods, or money; as, a man of large property, or small property. 5. pl.  All the adjuncts of a play except the scenery and the dresses of the actors; stage requisites. I will draw a bill of properties. Shak. 6. Propriety; correctness. [Obs.] Camden. Literary property. (Law) See under Literary. -- Property man, one who has charge of the "properties" of a theater.  1. To invest which properties, or qualities. [Obs.] Shak. 2. To make a property of; to appropriate. [Obs.] They have here propertied me. Shak.
molecule: 1. One of the very small invisible particles of which all matter is supposed to consist. 2. (Physics)  The smallest part of any substance which possesses the characteristic properties and qualities of that substance, and which can exist alone in a free state. 3. (Chem.)  A group of atoms so united and combined by chemical affinity that they form a complete, integrated whole, being the smallest portion of any particular compound that can exist in a free state; as, a molecule of water consists of two atoms of hydrogen and one of oxygen. Cf. Atom.
row: Rough; stern; angry. [Obs.] "Lock he never so row." Chaucer.  A noisy, turbulent quarrel or disturbance; a brawl. [Colloq.] Byron.  A series of persons or things arranged in a continued line; a line; a rank; a file; as, a row of trees; a row of houses or columns. And there were windows in three rows. 1 Kings vii. 4. The bright seraphim in burning row. Milton. Row culture (Agric.), the practice of cultivating crops in drills. -- Row of points (Geom.), the points on a line, infinite in number, as the points in which a pencil of rays is intersected by a line.  1. To propel with oars, as a boat or vessel, along the surface of water; as, to row a boat. 2. To transport in a boat propelled with oars; as, to row the captain ashore in his barge.  1. To use the oar; as, to row well. 2. To be moved by oars; as, the boat rows easily.  The act of rowing; excursion in a rowboat.
thing: 1. Whatever exists, or is conceived to exist, as a separate entity, whether animate or inanimate; any separable or distinguishable object of thought. God made . . . every thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind. Gen. i. 25. He sent after this manner; ten asses laden with the good things of Egypt. Gen. xiv. 23. A thing of beauty is a joy forever. Keats. 2. An inanimate object, in distinction from a living being; any lifeless material. Ye meads and groves, unsonscious things! Cowper. 3. A transaction or occurrence; an event; a deed. [And Jacob said] All these things are against me. Gen. xlii. 36. Which if ye tell me, I in like wise will tell you by what authority I do these things. Matt. xxi. 24. 4. A portion or part; something. Wieked men who understand any thing of wisdom. Tillotson. 5. A diminutive or slighted object; any object viewed as merely existing; -- often used in pity or contempt. See, sons, what things you are! Shak. The poor thing sighed, and . . . turned from me. Addison. I'll be this abject thing no more. Granville. I have a thing in prose. Swift. 6. pl.  Clothes; furniture; appurtenances; luggage; as, to pack or store one's things. [Colloq.] Note: Formerly, the singular was sometimes used in a plural or collective sense. And them she gave her moebles and her thing. Chaucer. Note: Thing was used in a very general sense in Old English, and is still heard colloquially where some more definite term would be used in careful composition. In the garden [he] walketh to and fro, And hath his things [i. e., prayers, devotions] said full courteously. Chaucer. Hearkening his minstrels their things play. Chaucer. 7. (Law)  Whatever may be possessed or owned; a property; -- distinguished from person. 8. [In this sense pronounced tîng.]  In Scandinavian countries, a legislative or judicial assembly. Longfellow. Things personal. (Law) Same as Personal property, under Personal. -- Things real. Same as Real property, under Real.
check: 1. (Chess)  A word of warning denoting that the king is in danger; such a menace of a player's king by an adversary's move as would, if it were any other piece, expose it to immediate capture. A king so menaced is said to be in check, and must be made safe at the next move. 2. A condition of interrupted or impeded progress; arrest; stop; delay; as, to hold an enemy in check. Which gave a remarkable check to the first progress of Christianity. Addison. No check, no stay, this streamlet fears. Wordsworth. 3. Whatever arrests progress, or limits action; an obstacle, guard, restraint, or rebuff. Useful check upon the administration of government. Washington. A man whom no check could abash. Macaulay. 4. A mark, certificate, or token, by which, errors may be prevented, or a thing or person may be identified; as, checks placed against items in an account; a check given for baggage; a return check on a railroad. 5. A written order directing a bank or banker to pay money as therein stated. See Bank check, below. 6. A woven or painted design in squares resembling the patten of a checkerboard; one of the squares of such a design; also, cloth having such a figure. 7. (Falconry)  The forsaking by a hawk of its proper game to follow other birds. 8. Small chick or crack. Bank check, a written order on a banker or broker to pay money in his keeping belonging to the signer. -- Check book, a book containing blank forms for checks upon a bank. -- Check hook, a hook on the saddle of a harness, over which a checkrein is looped. -- Check list, a list or catalogue by which things may be verified, or on which they may be checked. -- Check nut (Mech.), a secondary nut, screwing down upon the primary nut to secure it. Knight. -- Check valve (Mech.), a valve in the feed pipe of a boiler to prevent the return of the feed water. -- To take check, to take offense. [Obs.] Dryden. Syn. -- Hindrance; setback; interruption; obstruction; reprimand; censure; rebuke; reproof; repulse; rebuff; tally; counterfoil; counterbalance; ticket; draft.  1. (Chess)  To make a move which puts an adversary's piece, esp. his king, in check; to put in check. 2. To put a sudden restraint upon; to stop temporarily; to hinder; to repress; to curb. So many clogs to check and retard the headlong course of violence and oppression. Burke. 3. To verify, to guard, to make secure, by means of a mark, token, or other check; to distinguish by a check; to put a mark against (an item) after comparing with an original or a counterpart in order to secure accuracy; as, to check an account; to check baggage. 4. To chide, rebuke, or reprove. The good king, his master, will check him for it. Shak. 5. (Naut.)  To slack or ease off, as a brace which is too stiffly extended. 6. To make checks or chinks in; to cause to crack; as, the sun checks timber. Syn. -- To restrain; curb; bridle; repress; control; hinder; impede; obstruct; interrupt; tally; rebuke; reprove; rebuff.  To make a stop; to pause; -- with at. The mind, once jaded by an attempt above its power, either is disabled for the future, or else checks at any vigorous undertaking ever after. Locke. 2. To clash or interfere. [R.] Bacon. 3. To act as a curb or restraint. It [his presence] checks too strong upon me. Dryden. 4. To crack or gape open, as wood in drying; or to crack in small checks, as varnish, paint, etc. 5. (Falconry)  To turn, when in pursuit of proper game, and fly after other birds. And like the haggard, check at every feather That comes before his eye. Shak.  Checkered; designed in checks.
else: Other; one or something beside; as, Who else is coming What else shall I give Do you expect anything else "Bastards and else." Shak. Note: This word always follows its noun. It is usual to give the possessive form to else rather than to the substantive; as, somebody else's; no one else's. "A boy who is fond of somebody else's pencil case." G. Eliot. "A suit of clothes like everybody else's." Thackeray.  1. Besides; except that mentioned; in addition; as, nowhere else; no one else. 2. Otherwise; in the other, or the contrary, case; if the facts were different. For thou desirest not sacrifice; else would I give it. Ps. li. 16. Note: After `or', else is sometimes used expletively, as simply noting an alternative. "Will you give thanks, . . . or else shall I" Shak.
noon: No. See the Note under No. [Obs.]  1. The middle of the day; midday; the time when the sun is in the meridian; twelve o'clock in the daytime. 2. Hence, the highest point; culmination. In the very noon of that brilliant life which was destined to be so soon, and so fatally, overshadowed. Motley. High noon, the exact meridian; midday. -- Noon of night, midnight. [Poetic] Dryden.  Belonging to midday; occurring at midday; meridional. Young.  To take rest and refreshment at noon.
supply: 1. To fill up, or keep full; to furnish with what is wanted; to afford, or furnish with, a sufficiency; as, rivers are supplied by smaller streams; an aqueduct supplies an artificial lake; -- often followed by with before the thing furnished; as, to supply a furnace with fuel; to supply soldiers with ammunition. 2. To serve instead of; to take the place of. Burning ships the banished sun supply. Waller. The sun was set, and Vesper, to supply His absent beams, had lighted up the sky. Dryden. 3. To fill temporarily; to serve as substitute for another in, as a vacant place or office; to occupy; to have possession of; as, to supply a pulpit. 4. To give; to bring or furnish; to provide; as, to supply money for the war. Prior. Syn. -- To furnish; provide; administer; minister; contribute; yield; accommodate.  1. The act of supplying; supplial. A. Tucker. 2. That which supplies a want; sufficiency of things for use or want. Specifically: -- (a) Auxiliary troops or reënforcements. "My promised supply of horsemen." Shak. (b) The food, and the like, which meets the daily necessities of an army or other large body of men; store; -- used chiefly in the plural; as, the army was discontented for lack of supplies. (c) An amount of money provided, as by Parliament or Congress, to meet the annual national expenditures; generally in the plural; as, to vote supplies. (d) A person who fills a place for a time; one who supplies the place of another; a substitute; esp., a clergyman who supplies a vacant pulpit. Stated supply (Eccl.), a clergyman employed to supply a pulpit for a definite time, but not settled as a pastor. [U.S.] -- Supply and demand. (Polit. Econ.) "Demand means the quantity of a given article which would be taken at a given price. Supply means the quantity of that article which could be had at that price." F. A. Walker.  Serving to contain, deliver, or regulate a supply of anything; as, a supply tank or valve. Supply system (Zoöl.), the system of tubes and canals in sponges by means of which food and water are absorbed. See Illust. of Spongiæ.
country: 1. A tract of land; a region; the territory of an independent nation; (as distinguished from any other region, and with a personal pronoun) the region of one's birth, permanent residence, or citizenship. Return unto thy country, and to thy kindred. Gen. xxxxii. 9. I might have learned this by my last exile, that change of countries cannot change my state. Stirling. Many a famous realm And country, whereof here needs no account Milton. 2. Rural regions, as opposed to a city or town. As they walked, on their way into the country. Mark xvi. 12 (Rev. Ver. ). God made the covatry, and man made the town. Cowper. Only very great men were in the habit of dividing the year between town and country. Macualay. 3. The inhabitants or people of a state or a region; the populace; the public. Hence: (a) One's constituents. (b) The whole body of the electors of state; as, to dissolve Parliament and appeal to the country. All the country in a general voice Cried hate upon him. Shak. 4. (Law) (a) A jury, as representing the citizens of a country. (b) The inhabitants of the district from which a jury is drawn. 5. (Mining.)  The rock through which a vein runs. Conclusion to the country. See under Conclusion. -- To put, or throw, one's self upon the country, to appeal to one's constituents; to stand trial before a jury.  1. Pertaining to the regions remote from a city; rural; rustic; as, a country life; a country town; the country party, as opposed to city. 2. Destitute of refinement; rude; unpolished; rustic; not urbane; as, country manners. 3. Pertaining, or peculiar, to one's own country. She, bowing herself towards him, laughing the cruel tyrant to scorn, spake in her country language. 2 Macc. vii. 27.
electric: 1. Pertaining to electricity; consisting of, containing, derived from, or produced by, electricity; as, electric power or virtue; an electric jar; electric effects; an electric spark. 2. Capable of occasioning the phenomena of electricity; as, an electric or electrical machine or substance. 3. Electrifying; thrilling; magnetic. "Electric Pindar." Mrs. Browning. Electric atmosphere, or Electric aura. See under Aura. -- Electrical battery. See Battery. -- Electrical brush. See under Brush. -- Electric cable. See Telegraph cable, under Telegraph. -- Electric candle. See under Candle. -- Electric cat (Zoöl.), one of three or more large species of African catfish of the genus Malapterurus (esp. M. electricus of the Nile). They have a large electrical organ and are able to give powerful shocks; -- called also sheathfish. -- Electric clock. See under Clock, and see Electro-chronograph. -- Electric current, a current or stream of electricity traversing a closed circuit formed of conducting substances, or passing by means of conductors from one body to another which is in a different electrical state. -- Electric, or Electrical, eel (Zoöl.), a South American eel-like fresh-water fish of the genus Gymnotus (G. electricus), from two to five feet in length, capable of giving a violent electric shock. See Gymnotus. -- Electrical fish (Zoöl.), any fish which has an electrical organ by means of which it can give an electrical shock. The best known kinds are the torpedo, the gymnotus, or electrical eel, and the electric cat. See Torpedo, and Gymnotus. -- Electric fluid, the supposed matter of electricity; lightning. -- Electrical image (Elec.), a collection of electrical points regarded as forming, by an analogy with optical phenomena, an image of certain other electrical points, and used in the solution of electrical problems. Sir W. Thomson. -- Electrical light, the light produced by a current of electricity which in passing through a resisting medium heats it to incandescence or burns it. See under Carbon. -- Electric, or Electrical, machine, an apparatus for generating, collecting, or exciting, electricity, as by friction. -- Electric motor. See Electro-motor, 2. -- Electric osmose. (Physics) See under Osmose. -- Electric pen, a hand pen for making perforated stencils for multiplying writings. It has a puncturing needle driven at great speed by a very small magneto-electric engine on the penhandle. -- Electric railway, a railway in which the machinery for moving the cars is driven by an electric current. -- Electric ray (Zoöl.), the torpedo. -- Electric telegraph. See Telegraph.  A nonconductor of electricity, as amber, glass, resin, etc., employed to excite or accumulate electricity.
continent: 1. Serving to restrain or limit; restraining; opposing. [Obs.] Shak. 2. Exercising restraint as to the indulgence of desires or passions; temperate; moderate. Have a continent forbearance till the speed of his rage goes slower. Shak. 3. Abstaining from sexual intercourse; exercising restraint upon the sexual appetite; esp., abstaining from illicit sexual intercourse; chaste. My past life Hath been as continent, as chaste, as true, As I am now unhappy. Shak. 4. Not interrupted; connected; continuous; as, a continent fever. [Obs.] The northeast part of Asia is, if not continent with the west side of America, yet certainly it is the least disoined by sea of all that coast. Berrewood.  1. That which contains anything; a receptacle. [Obs.] The smaller continent which we call a pipkin. Bp. Kennet. 2. One of the grand divisions of land on the globe; the main land; specifically (Phys. Geog.), a large body of land differing from an island, not merely in its size, but in its structure, which is that of a large basin bordered by mountain chains; as, the continent of North America. Note: The continents are now usually regarded as six in number: North America, South America, Europe, Asia, Africa, and Australia. But other large bodies of land are also reffered to as continents; as, the Antarctic continent; the continent of Greenland. Europe, Asia, and Africa are often grouped together as the Eastern Continent, and North and South America as the Western Continent. The Continent, the main land of Europe, as distinguished from the islands, especially from England.
feel: 1. To perceive by the touch; to take cognizance of by means of the nerves of sensation distributed all over the body, especially by those of the skin; to have sensation excited by contact of (a thing) with the body or limbs. Who feel Those rods of scorpions and those whips of steel. Creecn. 2. To touch; to handle; to examine by touching; as, feel this piece of silk; hence, to make trial of; to test; often with out. Come near, . . . that I may feel thee, my son. Gen. xxvii. 21. He hath this to feel my affection to your honor. Shak. 3. To perceive by the mind; to have a sense of; to experience; to be affected by; to be sensible of, or sensetive to; as, to feel pleasure; to feel pain. Teach me to feel another's woe. Pope. Whoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no evil thing. Eccl. viii. 5. He best can paint them who shall feel them most. Pope. Mankind have felt their strength and made it felt. Byron. 4. To take internal cognizance of; to be conscious of; to have an inward persuasion of. For then, and not till then, he felt himself. Shak. 5. To perceive; to observe. [Obs.] Chaucer. To feel the helm (Naut.), to obey it.  1. To have perception by the touch, or by contact of anything with the nerves of sensation, especially those upon the surface of the body. 2. To have the sensibilities moved or affected. [She] feels with the dignity of a Roman matron. Burke. And mine as man, who feel for all mankind. Pope. 3. To be conscious of an inward impression, state of mind, persuasion, physical condition, etc.; to perceive one's self to be; - - followed by an adjective describing the state, etc.; as, to feel assured, grieved, persuaded. I then did feel full sick. Shak. 4. To know with feeling; to be conscious; hence, to know certainly or without misgiving. Garlands . . . which I feel I am not worthy yet to wear. Shak. 5. To appear to the touch; to give a perception; to produce an impression by the nerves of sensation; -- followed by an adjective describing the kind of sensation. Blind men say black feels rough, and white feels smooth. Dryden. To feel after, to search for; to seek to find; to seek as a person groping in the dark. "If haply they might feel after him, and find him." Acts xvii. 27. - To feel of, to examine by touching.  1. Feeling; perception. [R.] To intercept and have a more kindly feel of its genial warmth. Hazlitt. 2. A sensation communicated by touching; impression made upon one who touches or handles; as, this leather has a greasy feel. The difference between these two tumors will be distinguished by the feel. S. Sharp.
govern: 1. To direct and control, as the actions or conduct of men, either by established laws or by arbitrary will; to regulate by authority. "Fit to govern and rule multitudes." Shak. 2. To regulate; to influence; to direct; to restrain; to manage; as, to govern the life; to govern a horse. Govern well thy appetite. Milton. 3. (Gram.)  To require to be in a particular case; as, a transitive verb governs a noun in the objective case; or to require (a particular case); as, a transitive verb governs the objective case.  To exercise authority; to administer the laws; to have the control. Dryden.
heard: imp. & p. p. of Hear.
protect: To cover or shield from danger or injury; to defend; to guard; to preserve in safety; as, a father protects his children. The gods of Greece protect you! Shak. Syn. -- To guard; shield; preserve. See Defend.
block: 1. A piece of wood more or less bulky; a solid mass of wood, stone, etc., usually with one or more plane, or approximately plane, faces; as, a block on which a butcher chops his meat; a block by which to mount a horse; children's playing blocks, etc. Now all our neighbors' chimneys smoke, And Christmas blocks are burning. Wither. All her labor was but as a block Left in the quarry. Tennyson. 2. The solid piece of wood on which condemned persons lay their necks when they are beheaded. Noble heads which have been brought to the block. E. Everett. 3. The wooden mold on which hats, bonnets, etc., are shaped. Hence: The pattern on shape of a hat. He wears his faith but as the fashion of his hat; it ever changes with the next block. Shak. 4. A large or long building divided into separate houses or shops, or a number of houses or shops built in contact with each other so as to form one building; a row of houses or shops. 5. A square, or portion of a city inclosed by streets, whether occupied by buildings or not. The new city was laid out in rectangular blocks, each block containing thirty building lots. Such an average block, comprising 282 houses and covering nine acres of ground, exists in Oxford Street. Lond. Quart. Rev. 6. A grooved pulley or sheave incased in a frame or shell which is provided with a hook, eye, or strap, by which it may be attached to an object. It is used to change the direction of motion, as in raising a heavy object that can not be conveniently reached, and also, when two or more such sheaves are compounded, to change the rate of motion, or to exert increased force; -- used especially in the rigging of ships, and in tackles. 7. (Falconry)  The perch on which a bird of prey is kept. 8. Any obstruction, or cause of obstruction; a stop; a hindrance; an obstacle; as, a block in the way. 9. A piece of box or other wood for engravers' work. 10. (Print.)  A piece of hard wood (as mahogany or cherry) on which a stereotype or electrotype plate is mounted to make it type high. 11. A blockhead; a stupid fellow; a dolt. [Obs.] What a block art thou ! Shak. 12. A section of a railroad where the block system is used. See Block system, below. A block of shares (Stock Exchange), a large number of shares in a stock company, sold in a lump. Bartlett. -- Block printing. (a) A mode of printing (common in China and Japan) from engraved boards by means of a sheet of paper laid on the linked surface and rubbed with a brush. S. W. Williams. (b) A method of printing cotton cloth and paper hangings with colors, by pressing them upon an engraved surface coated with coloring matter. -- Block system on railways, a system by which the track is divided into sections of three or four miles, and trains are so run by the guidance of electric signals that no train enters a section or block before the preceding train has left it.  1. To obstruct so as to prevent passage or progress; to prevent passage from, through, or into, by obstructing the way; -- used both of persons and things; -- often followed by up; as, to block up a road or harbor. With moles . . . would block the port. Rowe. A city . . . besieged and blocked about. Milton. 2. To secure or support by means of blocks; to secure, as two boards at their angles of intersection, by pieces of wood glued to each. 3. To shape on, or stamp with, a block; as, to block a hat. To block out, to begin to reduce to shape; to mark out roughly; to lay out; as, to block out a plan.
pick: 1. To throw; to pitch. [Obs.] As high as I could pick my lance. Shak. 2. To peck at, as a bird with its beak; to strike at with anything pointed; to act upon with a pointed instrument; to pierce; to prick, as with a pin. 3. To separate or open by means of a sharp point or points; as, to pick matted wool, cotton, oakum, etc. 4. To open (a lock) as by a wire. 5. To pull apart or away, especially with the fingers; to pluck; to gather, as fruit from a tree, flowers from the stalk, feathers from a fowl, etc. 6. To remove something from with a pointed instrument, with the fingers, or with the teeth; as, to pick the teeth; to pick a bone; to pick a goose; to pick a pocket. Did you pick Master Slender's purse Shak. He picks clean teeth, and, busy as he seems With an old tavern quill, is hungry yet. Cowper. 7. To choose; to select; to separate as choice or desirable; to cull; as, to pick one's company; to pick one's way; -- often with out. "One man picked out of ten thousand." Shak. 8. To take up; esp., to gather from here and there; to collect; to bring together; as, to pick rags; -- often with up; as, to pick up a ball or stones; to pick up information. 9. To trim. [Obs.] Chaucer. To pick at, to tease or vex by pertinacious annoyance. -- To pick a bone with. See under Bone. -- To pick a thank, to curry favor. [Obs.] Robynson (More's Utopia). -- To pick off. (a) To pluck; to remove by picking. (b) To shoot or bring down, one by one; as, sharpshooters pick off the enemy. -- To pick out. (a) To mark out; to variegate; as, to pick out any dark stuff with lines or spots of bright colors. (b) To select from a number or quantity. -- To pick to pieces, to pull apart piece by piece; hence [Colloq.], to analyze; esp., to criticize in detail. -- To pick a quarrel, to give occasion of quarrel intentionally. -- To pick up. (a) To take up, as with the fingers. (b) To get by repeated efforts; to gather here and there; as, to pick up a livelihood; to pick up news.(c) to acquire (an infectious disease); as, to pick up a cold on the airplane. (d) To meet (a person) and induce to accompany one; as, to pick up a date at the mall. [See several other defs in MW10]  1. To eat slowly, sparingly, or by morsels; to nibble. Why stand'st thou picking Is thy palate sore Dryden. 2. To do anything nicely or carefully, or by attending to small things; to select something with care. 3. To steal; to pilfer. "To keep my hands from picking and stealing." Book of Com. Prayer. To pick up, to improve by degrees; as, he is picking up in health or business. [Colloq. U.S.]  1. A sharp-pointed tool for picking; -- often used in composition; as, a toothpick; a picklock. 2. (Mining & Mech.)  A heavy iron tool, curved and sometimes pointed at both ends, wielded by means of a wooden handle inserted in the middle, -- used by quarrymen, roadmakers, etc.; also, a pointed hammer used for dressing millstones. 3. A pike or spike; the sharp point fixed in the center of a buckler. [Obs.] "Take down my buckler . . . and grind the pick on 't." Beau. & Fl. 4. Choice; right of selection; as, to have one's pick. France and Russia have the pick of our stables. Ld. Lytton. 5. That which would be picked or chosen first; the best; as, the pick of the flock. 6. (Print.)  A particle of ink or paper imbedded in the hollow of a letter, filling up its face, and occasioning a spot on a printed sheet. MacKellar. 7. (Painting)  That which is picked in, as with a pointed pencil, to correct an unevenness in a picture. 8. (Weawing)  The blow which drives the shuttle, -- the rate of speed of a loom being reckoned as so many picks per minute; hence, in describing the fineness of a fabric, a weft thread; as, so many picks to an inch. Pick dressing (Arch.), in cut stonework, a facing made by a pointed tool, leaving the surface in little pits or depressions. -- Pick hammer, a pick with one end sharp and the other blunt, used by miners.
poor: 1. Destitute of property; wanting in material riches or goods; needy; indigent. Note: It is often synonymous with indigent and with necessitous denoting extreme want. It is also applied to persons who are not entirely destitute of property, but who are not rich; as, a poor man or woman; poor people. 2. (Law)  So completely destitute of property as to be entitled to maintenance from the public. 3. Hence, in very various applications:  Destitute of such qualities as are desirable, or might naturally be expected; as: (a) Wanting in fat, plumpness, or fleshiness; lean; emaciated; meager; as, a poor horse, ox, dog, etc. "Seven other kine came up after them, poor and very ill-favored and lean-fleshed." Gen. xli. 19. (b) Wanting in strength or vigor; feeble; dejected; as, poor health; poor spirits. "His genius . . . poor and cowardly." Bacon. (c) Of little value or worth; not good; inferior; shabby; mean; as, poor clothes; poor lodgings. "A poor vessel." Clarendon. (d) Destitute of fertility; exhausted; barren; sterile; -- said of land; as, poor soil. (e) Destitute of beauty, fitness, or merit; as, a poor discourse; a poor picture. (f) Without prosperous conditions or good results; unfavorable; unfortunate; unconformable; as, a poor business; the sick man had a poor night. (g) Inadequate; insufficient; insignificant; as, a poor excuse. That I have wronged no man will be a poor plea or apology at the last day. Calamy. 4. Worthy of pity or sympathy; -- used also sometimes as a term of endearment, or as an expression of modesty, and sometimes as a word of contempt. And for mine own poor part, Look you, I'll go pray. Shak. Poor, little, pretty, fluttering thing. Prior. 5. Free from self-assertion; not proud or arrogant; meek. "Blessed are the poor in spirit." Matt. v. 3. Poor law, a law providing for, or regulating, the relief or support of the poor. -- Poor man's treacle (Bot.), garlic; -- so called because it was thought to be an antidote to animal poison. [Eng] Dr. Prior. -- Poor man's weatherglass (Bot.), the red-flowered pimpernel (Anagallis arvensis), which opens its blossoms only in fair weather. -- Poor rate, an assessment or tax, as in an English parish, for the relief or support of the poor. -- Poor soldier (Zoöl.), the friar bird. -- The poor, those who are destitute of property; the indigent; the needy. In a legal sense, those who depend on charity or maintenance by the public. "I have observed the more public provisions are made for the poor, the less they provide for themselves." Franklin.  A small European codfish (Gadus minutus); -- called also power cod.
house: 1. A structure intended or used as a habitation or shelter for animals of any kind; but especially, a building or edifice for the habitation of man; a dwelling place, a mansion. Houses are built to live in; not to look on. Bacon. Bees with smoke and doves with noisome stench Are from their hives and houses driven away. Shak. 2. Household affairs; domestic concerns; particularly in the phrase to keep house. See below. 3. Those who dwell in the same house; a household. One that feared God with all his house. Acts x. 2. 4. A family of ancestors, descendants, and kindred; a race of persons from the same stock; a tribe; especially, a noble family or an illustrious race; as, the house of Austria; the house of Hanover; the house of Israel. The last remaining pillar of their house, The one transmitter of their ancient name. Tennyson. 5. One of the estates of a kingdom or other government assembled in parliament or legislature; a body of men united in a legislative capacity; as, the House of Lords; the House of Commons; the House of Representatives; also, a quorum of such a body. See Congress, and Parliament. 6. (Com.)  A firm, or commercial establishment. 7. A public house; an inn; a hotel. 8. (Astrol.)  A twelfth part of the heavens, as divided by six circles intersecting at the north and south points of the horizon, used by astrologers in noting the positions of the heavenly bodies, and casting horoscopes or nativities. The houses were regarded as fixed in respect to the horizon, and numbered from the one at the eastern horizon, called the ascendant, first house, or house of life, downward, or in the direction of the earth's revolution, the stars and planets passing through them in the reverse order every twenty- four hours. 9. A square on a chessboard, regarded as the proper place of a piece. 10. An audience; an assembly of hearers, as at a lecture, a theater, etc.; as, a thin or a full house. 11. The body, as the habitation of the soul. This mortal house I'll ruin, Do Cæsar what he can. Shak. 12. [With an adj., as narrow, dark, etc.]  The grave. "The narrow house." Bryant. Note: House is much used adjectively and as the first element of compounds. The sense is usually obvious; as, house cricket, housemaid, house painter, housework. House ant (Zoöl.), a very small, yellowish brown ant (Myrmica molesta), which often infests houses, and sometimes becomes a great pest. -- House of bishops (Prot. Epis. Ch.), one of the two bodies composing a general convertion, the other being House of Clerical and Lay Deputies. -- House boat, a covered boat used as a dwelling. -- House of call, a place, usually a public house, where journeymen connected with a particular trade assemble when out of work, ready for the call of employers. [Eng.] Simonds. -- House car (Railroad), a freight car with inclosing sides and a roof; a box car. -- House of correction. See Correction. -- House cricket (Zoöl.), a European cricket (Gryllus domesticus), which frequently lives in houses, between the bricks of chimneys and fireplaces. It is noted for the loud chirping or stridulation of the males. -- House dog, a dog kept in or about a dwelling house. -- House finch (Zoöl.), the burion. -- House flag, a flag denoting the commercial house to which a merchant vessel belongs. -- House fly (Zoöl.), a common fly (esp. Musca domestica), which infests houses both in Europe and America. Its larva is a maggot which lives in decaying substances or excrement, about sink drains, etc. -- House of God, a temple or church. -- House of ill fame. See Ill fame under Ill, a. -- House martin (Zoöl.), a common European swallow (Hirundo urbica). It has feathered feet, and builds its nests of mud against the walls of buildings. Called also house swallow, and window martin. -- House mouse (Zoöl.), the common mouse (Mus musculus). -- House physician, the resident medical adviser of a hospital or other public institution. -- House snake (Zoöl.), the milk snake. -- House sparrow (Zoöl.), the common European sparrow (Passer domesticus). It has recently been introduced into America, where it has become very abundant, esp. in cities. Called also thatch sparrow. -- House spider (Zoöl.), any spider which habitually lives in houses. Among the most common species are Theridium tepidariorum and Tegenaria domestica. -- House surgeon, the resident surgeon of a hospital. -- House wren (Zoöl.), the common wren of the Eastern United States (Troglodytes aëdon). It is common about houses and in gardens, and is noted for its vivacity, and loud musical notes. See Wren. -- Religious house, a monastery or convent. -- The White House, the official residence of the President of the United States; -- hence, colloquially, the office of President. -- To bring down the house. See under Bring. -- To keep house, to maintain an independent domestic establishment. -- To keep open house, to entertain friends at all times. Syn. -- Dwelling; residence; abode. See Tenement.  1. To take or put into a house; to shelter under a roof; to cover from the inclemencies of the weather; to protect by covering; as, to house one's family in a comfortable home; to house farming utensils; to house cattle. At length have housed me in a humble shed. Young. House your choicest carnations, or rather set them under a penthouse. Evelyn. 2. To drive to a shelter. Shak. 3. To admit to residence; to harbor. Palladius wished him to house all the Helots. Sir P. Sidney. 4. To deposit and cover, as in the grave. Sandys. 5. (Naut.)  To stow in a safe place; to take down and make safe; as, to house the upper spars.  1. To take shelter or lodging; to abide to dwell; to lodge. You shall not house with me. Shak. 2. (Astrol.)  To have a position in one of the houses. See House, n., 8. "Where Saturn houses." Dryden.
learn: 1. To gain knowledge or information of; to ascertain by inquiry, study, or investigation; to receive instruction concerning; to fix in the mind; to acquire understanding of, or skill; as, to learn the way; to learn a lesson; to learn dancing; to learn to skate; to learn the violin; to learn the truth about something. "Learn to do well." Is. i. 17. Now learn a parable of the fig tree. Matt. xxiv. 32. 2. To communicate knowledge to; to teach. [Obs.] Hast thou not learned me how To make perfumes Shak. Note: Learn formerly had also the sense of teach, in accordance with the analogy of the French and other languages, and hence we find it with this sense in Shakespeare, Spenser, and other old writers. This usage has now passed away. To learn is to receive instruction, and to teach is to give instruction. He who is taught learns, not he who teaches.  To acquire knowledge or skill; to make progress in acquiring knowledge or skill; to receive information or instruction; as, this child learns quickly. Take my yoke upon you and learn of me. Matt. xi. 29. To learn by heart. See By heart, under Heart. -- To learn by rote, to memorize by repetition without exercise of the understanding.
machine: 1. In general, any combination of bodies so connected that their relative motions are constrained, and by means of which force and motion may be transmitted and modified, as a screw and its nut, or a lever arranged to turn about a fulcrum or a pulley about its pivot, etc.; especially, a construction, more or less complex, consisting of a combination of moving parts, or simple mechanical elements, as wheels, levers, cams, etc., with their supports and connecting framework, calculated to constitute a prime mover, or to receive force and motion from a prime mover or from another machine, and transmit, modify, and apply them to the production of some desired mechanical effect or work, as weaving by a loom, or the excitation of electricity by an electrical machine. Note: The term machine is most commonly applied to such pieces of mechanism as are used in the industrial arts, for mechanically shaping, dressing, and combining materials for various purposes, as in the manufacture of cloth, etc. Where the effect is chemical, or other than mechanical, the contrivance is usually denominated an apparatus, not a machine; as, a bleaching apparatus. Many large, powerful, or specially important pieces of mechanism are called engines; as, a steam engine, fire engine, graduating engine, etc. Although there is no well-settled distinction between the terms engine and machine among practical men, there is a tendency to restrict the application of the former to contrivances in which the operating part is not distinct from the motor. 2. Any mechanical contrivance, as the wooden horse with which the Greeks entered Troy; a coach; a bicycle. Dryden. Southey. Thackeray. 3. A person who acts mechanically or at will of another. 4. A combination of persons acting together for a common purpose, with the agencies which they use; as, the social machine. The whole machine of government ought not to bear upon the people with a weight so heavy and oppressive. Landor. 5. A political organization arranged and controlled by one or more leaders for selfish, private or partisan ends. [Political Cant] 6. Supernatural agency in a poem, or a superhuman being introduced to perform some exploit. Addison. Elementary machine, a name sometimes given to one of the simple mechanical powers. See under Mechanical. -- Infernal machine. See under Infernal. -- Machine gun.See under Gun. -- Machine screw, a screw or bolt adapted for screwing into metal, in distinction from one which is designed especially to be screwed into wood. -- Machine shop, a workshop where machines are made, or where metal is shaped by cutting, filing, turning, etc. -- Machine tool, a machine for cutting or shaping wood, metal, etc., by means of a tool; especially, a machine, as a lathe, planer, drilling machine, etc., designed for a more or less general use in a machine shop, in distinction from a machine for producing a special article as in manufacturing. -- Machine twist, silken thread especially adapted for use in a sewing machine. -- Machine work, work done by a machine, in contradistinction to that done by hand labor.  To subject to the action of machinery; to effect by aid of machinery; to print with a printing machine.
prepare: 1. To fit, adapt, or qualify for a particular purpose or condition; to make ready; to put into a state for use or application; as, to prepare ground for seed; to prepare a lesson. Our souls, not yet prepared for upper light. Dryden. 2. To procure as suitable or necessary; to get ready; to provide; as, to prepare ammunition and provisions for troops; to prepare ships for defence; to prepare an entertainment. Milton. That they may prepare a city for habitation. Ps. cvii. 36 Syn. -- To fit; adjust; adapt; qualify; equip; provide; form; make; make; ready.  1. To make all things ready; to put things in order; as, to prepare for a hostile invasion. "Bid them prepare for dinner." Shak. 2. To make one's self ready; to get ready; to take the necessary previous measures; as, to prepare for death.  Preparation. [Obs.] Shak.
solution: 1. The act of separating the parts of any body, or the condition of undergoing a separation of parts; disruption; breach. In all bodies there is an appetite of union and evitation of solution of continuity. Bacon. 2. The act of solving, or the state of being solved; the disentanglement of any intricate problem or difficult question; explanation; clearing up; -- used especially in mathematics, either of the process of solving an equation or problem, or the result of the process. 3. The state of being dissolved or disintegrated; resolution; disintegration. It is unquestionably an enterprise of more promise to assail the nations in their hour of faintness and solution, than at a time when magnificent and seductive systems of worship were at their height of energy and splendor. I. Taylor. 4. (Chem.Phys.)  The act or process by which a body (whether solid, liquid, or gaseous) is absorbed into a liquid, and, remaining or becoming fluid, is diffused throughout the solvent; also, the product reulting from such absorption. Note: When a solvent will not take in any more of a substance the solution is said to be saturated. Solution is two kinds; viz.: (a) Mechanical solution, in which no marked chemical change takes place, and in which, in the case of solids, teh dissolved body can be regained by evaporation, as in the solution of salt or sugar in water. (b) Chemical solution, in which there is involved a decided chemical change, as when limestone or zinc undergoes solution in hydrochloric acid. Mechanical solution is regarded as a form of molecular or atomic attraction, and is probably occasioned by the formation of certain very weak and unstable compounds which are easily dissociated and pass into new and similar compounds. Note: This word is not used in chemistry or mineralogy for fusion, or the melting of bodies by the heat of fire. 5. release; deliverance; disharge. [Obs.] Barrow. 6. (Med.) (a) The termination of a disease; resolution. (b) A crisis. (c) A liquid medicine or preparation (usually aqueous) in which the solid ingredients are wholly soluble. U. S. Disp. Fehling's solution (Chem.), a standardized solution of cupric hydrate in sodium potassium tartrate, used as a means of determining the reducing power of certain sugars and sirups by the amount of red cuprous oxide thrown down. -- Heavy solution (Min.), a liquid of high density, as a solution of mercuric iodide in potassium iodide (called the Sonstadt or Thoulet solution) having a maximum specific gravity of 3.2, or of borotungstate of cadium (Klein solution, specific gravity 3.6), and the like. Such solutions are much used in determining the specific gravities of minerals, and in separating them when mechanically mixed as in a pulverized rock. -- Nessler's solution. See Nesslerize. -- Solution of continuity, the separation of connection, or of connected substances or parts; -- applied, in surgery, to a facture, laceration, or the like. "As in the natural body a wound, or solution of continuity, is worse than a corrupt humor, so in the spiritual." Bacon. -- Standardized solution (Chem.), a solution which is used as a reagent, and is of a known and standard strength; specifically, a normal solution, containing in each cubic centimeter as many milligrams of the element in question as the number representing its atomic weight; thus, a normal solution of silver nitrate would contain 107.7 mgr. of silver nitrate in each cubic centimeter.
way: Away. [Obs. or Archaic] Chaucer. To do way, to take away; to remove. [Obs.] "Do way your hands." Chaucer. -- To make way with, to make away with. See under Away. [Archaic]  1. That by, upon, or along, which one passes or processes; opportunity or room to pass; place of passing; passage; road, street, track, or path of any kind; as, they built a way to the mine. "To find the way to heaven." Shak. I shall him seek by way and eke by street. Chaucer. The way seems difficult, and steep to scale. Milton. The season and ways were very improper for his majesty's forces to march so great a distance. Evelyn. 2. Length of space; distance; interval; as, a great way; a long way. And whenever the way seemed long, Or his heart began to fail. Longfellow. 3. A moving; passage; procession; journey. I prythee, now, lead the way. Shak. 4. Course or direction of motion or process; tendency of action; advance. If that way be your walk, you have not far. Milton. And let eternal justice take the way. Dryden. 5. The means by which anything is reached, or anything is accomplished; scheme; device; plan. My best way is to creep under his gaberdine. Shak. By noble ways we conquest will prepare. Dryden. What impious ways my wishes took! Prior. 6. Manner; method; mode; fashion; style; as, the way of expressing one's ideas. 7. Regular course; habitual method of life or action; plan of conduct; mode of dealing. "Having lost the way of nobleness." Sir. P. Sidney. Her ways are ways of pleasantness, and all her paths are peace. Prov. iii. 17. When men lived in a grander way. Longfellow. 8. Sphere or scope of observation. Jer. Taylor. The public ministers that fell in my way. Sir W. Temple. 9. Determined course; resolved mode of action or conduct; as, to have one's way. 10. (Naut.) (a) Progress; as, a ship has way. (b) pl.  The timbers on which a ship is launched. 11. pl. (Mach.)  The longitudinal guides, or guiding surfaces, on the bed of a planer, lathe, or the like, along which a table or carriage moves. 12. (Law)  Right of way. See below. By the way, in passing; apropos; aside; apart from, though connected with, the main object or subject of discourse. -- By way of, for the purpose of; as being; in character of. -- Covert way. (Fort.) See Covered way, under Covered. -- In the family way. See under Family. -- In the way, so as to meet, fall in with, obstruct, hinder, etc. -- In the way with, traveling or going with; meeting or being with; in the presence of. -- Milky way. (Astron.) See Galaxy, 1. -- No way, No ways. See Noway, Noways, in the Vocabulary. -- On the way, traveling or going; hence, in process; advancing toward completion; as, on the way to this country; on the way to success. -- Out of the way. See under Out. -- Right of way (Law), a right of private passage over another's ground. It may arise either by grant or prescription. It may be attached to a house, entry, gate, well, or city lot, as well as to a country farm. Kent. -- To be under way, or To have way (Naut.), to be in motion, as when a ship begins to move. -- To give way. See under Give. -- To go one's way, or To come one's way, to go or come; to depart or come along. Shak. -- To go the way of all the earth, to die. -- To make one's way, to advance in life by one's personal efforts. -- To make way. See under Make, v. t. -- Ways and means. (a) Methods; resources; facilities. (b) (Legislation) Means for raising money; resources for revenue. -- Way leave, permission to cross, or a right of way across, land; also, rent paid for such right. [Eng] -- Way of the cross (Eccl.), the course taken in visiting in rotation the stations of the cross. See Station, n., 7 (c). -- Way of the rounds (Fort.), a space left for the passage of the rounds between a rampart and the wall of a fortified town. -- Way pane, a pane for cartage in irrigated land. See Pane, n., 4. [Prov. Eng.] -- Way passenger, a passenger taken up, or set down, at some intermediate place between the principal stations on a line of travel. -- Ways of God, his providential government, or his works. -- Way station, an intermediate station between principal stations on a line of travel, especially on a railroad. -- Way train, a train which stops at the intermediate, or way, stations; an accommodation train. -- Way warden, the surveyor of a road. Syn. -- Street; highway; road. -- Way, Street, Highway, Road. Way is generic, denoting any line for passage or conveyance; a highway is literally one raised for the sake of dryness and convenience in traveling; a road is, strictly, a way for horses and carriages; a street is, etymologically, a paved way, as early made in towns and cities; and, hence, the word is distinctively applied to roads or highways in compact settlements. All keep the broad highway, and take delight With many rather for to go astray. Spenser. There is but one road by which to climb up. Addison. When night Darkens the streets, then wander forth the sons Of Belial, flown with insolence and wine. Milton.  To go or travel to; to go in, as a way or path. [Obs.] "In land not wayed." Wyclif.  To move; to progress; to go. [R.] On a time as they together wayed. Spenser.
blow: To flower; to blossom; to bloom. How blows the citron grove. Milton.  To cause to blossom; to put forth (blossoms or flowers). The odorous banks, that blow Flowers of more mingled hue. Milton.  A blossom; a flower; also, a state of blossoming; a mass of blossoms. "Such a blow of tulips." Tatler.  1. A forcible stroke with the hand, fist, or some instrument, as a rod, a club, an ax, or a sword. Well struck ! there was blow for blow. Shak. 2. A sudden or forcible act or effort; an assault. A vigorous blow might win [Hanno's camp]. T. Arnold. 3. The infliction of evil; a sudden calamity; something which produces mental, physical, or financial suffering or loss (esp. when sudden); a buffet. A most poor man, made tame to fortune's blows. Shak. At a blow, suddenly; at one effort; by a single vigorous act. "They lose a province at a blow." Dryden. -- To come to blows, to engage in combat; to fight; -- said of individuals, armies, and nations. Syn. -- Stroke; knock; shock; misfortune.  1. To produce a current of air; to move, as air, esp. to move rapidly or with power; as, the wind blows. Hark how it rains and blows ! Walton. 2. To send forth a forcible current of air, as from the mouth or from a pair of bellows. 3. To breathe hard or quick; to pant; to puff. Here is Mistress Page at the door, sweating and blowing. Shak. 4. To sound on being blown into, as a trumpet. There let the pealing organ blow. Milton. 5. To spout water, etc., from the blowholes, as a whale. 6. To be carried or moved by the wind; as, the dust blows in from the street. The grass blows from their graves to thy own. M. Arnold. 7. To talk loudly; to boast; to storm. [Colloq.] You blow behind my back, but dare not say anything to my face. Bartlett. To blow hot and cold Etym: (a saying derived from a fable of , to favor a thing at one time and treat it coldly at another; or to appear both to favor and to oppose. -- To blow off, to let steam escape through a passage provided for the purpose; as, the engine or steamer is blowing off. -- To blow out. (a) To be driven out by the expansive force of a gas or vapor; as, a steam cock or valve sometimes blows out. (b) To talk violently or abusively. [Low] -- To blow over, to pass away without effect; to cease, or be dissipated; as, the storm and the clouds have blown over. -- To blow up, to be torn to pieces and thrown into the air as by an explosion of powder or gas or the expansive force of steam; to burst; to explode; as, a powder mill or steam boiler blows up. "The enemy's magazines blew up." Tatler.  1. To force a current of air upon with the mouth, or by other means; as, to blow the fire. 2. To drive by a current air; to impel; as, the tempest blew the ship ashore. Off at sea northeast winds blow Sabean odors from the spicy shore. Milton. 3. To cause air to pass through by the action of the mouth, or otherwise; to cause to sound, as a wind instrument; as, to blow a trumpet; to blow an organ. Hath she no husband That will take pains to blow a horn before her Shak. Boy, blow the pipe until the bubble rise, Then cast it off to float upon the skies. Parnell. 4. To clear of contents by forcing air through; as, to blow an egg; to blow one's nose. 5. To burst, shatter, or destroy by an explosion; -- usually with up, down, open, or similar adverb; as, to blow up a building. 6. To spread by report; to publish; to disclose. Through the court his courtesy was blown. Dryden. His language does his knowledge blow. Whiting. 7. To form by inflation; to swell by injecting air; as, to blow bubbles; to blow glass. 8. To inflate, as with pride; to puff up. Look how imagination blows him. Shak. 9. To put out of breath; to cause to blow from fatigue; as, to blow a horse. Sir W. Scott. 10. To deposit eggs or larvæ upon, or in (meat, etc.). To suffer The flesh fly blow my mouth. Shak. To blow great guns, to blow furiously and with roaring blasts; -- said of the wind at sea or along the coast. -- To blow off, to empty (a boiler) of water through the blow-off pipe, while under steam pressure; also, to eject (steam, water, sediment, etc.) from a boiler. -- To blow one's own trumpet, to vaunt one's own exploits, or sound one's own praises. -- To blow out, to extinguish by a current of air, as a candle. -- To blow up. (a) To fill with air; to swell; as, to blow up a bladder or bubble. (b) To inflate, as with pride, self-conceit, etc.; to puff up; as, to blow one up with flattery. "Blown up with high conceits engendering pride." Milton. (c) To excite; as, to blow up a contention.(d) To burst, to raise into the air, or to scatter, by an explosion; as, to blow up a fort. (e) To scold violently; as, to blow up a person for some offense. [Colloq.] I have blown him up well -- nobody can say I wink at what he does. G. Eliot. To blow upon. (a) To blast; to taint; to bring into discredit; to render stale, unsavory, or worthless. (b) To inform against. [Colloq.] How far the very custom of hearing anything spouted withers and blows upon a fine passage, may be seen in those speeches from [Shakespeare's] Henry V. which are current in the mouths of schoolboys. C. Lamb. A lady's maid whose character had been blown upon. Macaulay.  1. A blowing, esp., a violent blowing of the wind; a gale; as, a heavy blow came on, and the ship put back to port. 2. The act of forcing air from the mouth, or through or from some instrument; as, to give a hard blow on a whistle or horn; to give the fire a blow with the bellows. 3. The spouting of a whale. 4. (Metal.)  A single heat or operation of the Bessemer converter. Raymond. 5. An egg, or a larva, deposited by a fly on or in flesh, or the act of depositing it. Chapman.
neck: 1. The part of an animal which connects the head and the trunk, and which, in man and many other animals, is more slender than the trunk. 2. Any part of an inanimate object corresponding to or resembling the neck of an animal; as: (a) The long slender part of a vessel, as a retort, or of a fruit, as a gourd. (b) A long narrow tract of land projecting from the main body, or a narrow tract connecting two larger tracts. (c) (Mus.) That part of a violin, guitar, or similar instrument, which extends from the head to the body, and on which is the finger board or fret board. 3. (Mech.)  A reduction in size near the end of an object, formed by a groove around it; as, a neck forming the journal of a shaft. 4. (Bot.)  the point where the base of the stem of a plant arises from the root. Neck and crop, completely; wholly; altogether; roughly and at once. [Colloq.] -- Neck and neck (Racing), so nearly equal that one cannot be said to be before the other; very close; even; side by side. -- Neck of a capital. (Arch.) See Gorgerin. -- Neck of a cascabel (Gun.), the part joining the knob to the base of the breech. -- Neck of a gun, the small part of the piece between the chase and the swell of the muzzle. -- Neck of a tooth (Anat.), the constriction between the root and the crown. -- Neck or nothing (Fig.), at all risks. -- Neck verse. (a) The verse formerly read to entitle a party to the benefit of clergy, said to be the first verse of the fifty-first Psalm, "Miserere mei," etc. Sir W. Scott. (b) Hence, a verse or saying, the utterance of which decides one's fate; a shibboleth. These words, "bread and cheese," were their neck verse or shibboleth to distinguish them; all pronouncing "broad and cause," being presently put to death. Fuller. -- Neck yoke. (a) A bar by which the end of the tongue of a wagon or carriage is suspended from the collars of the harnesses. (b) A device with projecting arms for carrying things (as buckets of water or sap) suspended from one's shoulders. -- On the neck of, immediately after; following closely. "Commiting one sin on the neck of another." W. Perkins. -- Stiff neck, obstinacy in evil or wrong; inflexible obstinacy; contumacy. "I know thy rebellion, and thy stiff neck." Deut. xxxi. 27. -- To break the neck of, to destroy the main force of. "What they presume to borrow from her sage and virtuous rules... breaks the neck of their own cause." Milton. -- To harden the neck, to grow obstinate; to be more and more perverse and rebellious. Neh. ix. 17. -- To tread on the neck of, to oppress; to tyrannize over.  To reduce the diameter of (an object) near its end, by making a groove around it; -- used with down; as, to neck down a shaft. v. t. & i. To kiss and caress amorously. n. necking
here: Of them; their. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. On here bare knees adown they fall. Chaucer.  Hair. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. See Her, their. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. Her; hers. See Her. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. In this place; in the place where the speaker is; -- opposed to Ant: there. He is not here, for he is risen. Matt. xxviii. 6. 2. In the present life or state. Happy here, and more happy hereafter. Bacon. 3. To or into this place; hither. [Colloq.] See Thither. Here comes Virgil. B. Jonson. Thou led'st me here. Byron. 4. At this point of time, or of an argument; now. The prisoner here made violent efforts to rise. Warren. Note: Here, in the last sense, is sometimes used before a verb without subject; as, Here goes, for Now (something or somebody) goes; -- especially occurring thus in drinking healths. "Here's [a health] to thee, Dick." Cowley. Here and there, in one place and another; in a dispersed manner; irregularly. "Footsteps here and there." Longfellow. -- It is neither, here nor there, it is neither in this place nor in that, neither in one place nor in another; hence, it is to no purpose, irrelevant, nonsense. Shak.
problem: 1. A question proposed for solution; a matter stated for examination or proof; hence, a matter difficult of solution or settlement; a doubtful case; a question involving doubt. Bacon. 2. (Math.)  Anything which is required to be done; as, in geometry, to bisect a line, to draw a perpendicular; or, in algebra, to find an unknown quantity. Note: Problem differs from theorem in this, that a problem is something to be done, as to bisect a triangle, to describe a circle, etc.; a theorem is something to be proved, as that all the angles of a triangle are equal to two right angles. Plane problem (Geom.), a problem that can be solved by the use of the rule and compass. -- Solid problem (Geom.), a problem requiring in its geometric solution the use of a conic section or higher curve.
equate: To make equal; to reduce to an average; to make such an allowance or correction in as will reduce to a common standard of comparison; to reduce to mean time or motion; as, to equate payments; to equate lines of railroad for grades or curves; equated distances. Palgrave gives both scrolle and scrowe and equates both to F[rench] rolle. Skeat (Etymol. Dict. ). Equating for grades (Railroad Engin.), adding to the measured distance one mile for each twenty feet of ascent. -- Equating for curves, adding half a mile for each 360 degrees of curvature.
father: 1. One who has begotten a child, whether son or daughter; a generator; a male parent. A wise son maketh a glad father. Prov. x. 1. 2. A male ancestor more remote than a parent; a progenitor; especially, a first ancestor; a founder of a race or family; -- in the plural, fathers, ancestors. David slept with his fathers. 1 Kings ii. 10. Abraham, who is the father of us all. Rom. iv. 16. 3. One who performs the offices of a parent by maintenance, affetionate care, counsel, or protection. I was a father to the poor. Job xxix. 16. He hath made me a father to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house. Gen. xiv. 8. 4. A respectful mode of address to an old man. And Joash the king og Israel came down unto him [Elisha], . . . and said, O my father, my father! 2 Kings xiii. 14. 5. A senator of ancient Rome. 6. A dignitary of the church, a superior of a convent, a confessor (called also father confessor), or a priest; also, the eldest member of a profession, or of a legislative assembly, etc. Bless you, good father friar ! Shak. 7. One of the chief esslesiastical authorities of the first centuries after Christ; -- often spoken of collectively as the Fathers; as, the Latin, Greek, or apostolic Fathers. 8. One who, or that which, gives origin; an originator; a producer, author, or contriver; the first to practice any art, profession, or occupation; a distinguished example or teacher. The father of all such as handle the harp and organ. Gen. iv. 21. Might be the father, Harry, to that thought. Shak. The father of good news. Shak. 9. The Supreme Being and Creator; God; in theology, the first person in the Trinity. Our Father, which art in heaven. Matt. vi. 9. Now had the almighty Father from above . . . Bent down his eye. Milton. Adoptive father, one who adopts the child of another, treating it as his own. -- Apostolic father, Conscript fathers, etc. See under Apostolic, Conscript, etc. -- Father in God, a title given to bishops. -- Father of lies, the Devil. -- Father of the bar, the oldest practitioner at the bar. -- Fathers of the city, the aldermen. -- Father of the Faithful. (a) Abraham. Rom. iv. Gal. iii. 6-9. (b) Mohammed, or one of the sultans, his successors. -- Father of the house, the member of a legislative body who has had the longest continuous service. -- Most Reverend Father in God, a title given to archbishops and metropolitans, as to the archbishops of Canterbury and York. -- Natural father, the father of an illegitimate child. -- Putative father, one who is presumed to be the father of an illegitimate child; the supposed father. -- Spiritual father. (a) A religious teacher or guide, esp. one instrumental in leading a soul to God. (b) (R. C. Ch.) A priest who hears confession in the sacrament of penance. -- The Holy Father (R. C. Ch.), the pope.  1. To make one's self the father of; to beget. Cowards father cowards, and base things sire base. Shak. 2. To take as one's own child; to adopt; hence, to assume as one's own work; to acknowledge one's self author of or responsible for (a statement, policy, etc.). Men of wit Often fathered what he writ. Swift. 3. To provide with a father. [R.] Think you I am no stronger than my sex, Being so fathered and so husbanded Shak. To father on or upon, to ascribe to, or charge upon, as one's offspring or work; to put or lay upon as being responsible. "Nothing can be so uncouth or extravagant, which may not be fathered on some fetch of wit, or some caprice of humor." Barrow.
plane: Any tree of the genus Platanus. Note: The Oriental plane (Platanus orientalis) is a native of Asia. It rises with a straight, smooth, branching stem to a great height, with palmated leaves, and long pendulous peduncles, sustaining several heads of small close-sitting flowers. The seeds are downy, and collected into round, rough, hard balls. The Occidental plane (Platanus occidentalis), which grows to a great height, is a native of North America, where it is popularly called sycamore, buttonwood, and buttonball, names also applied to the California species (Platanus racemosa).  Without elevations or depressions; even; level; flat; lying in, or constituting, a plane; as, a plane surface. Note: In science, this word (instead of plain) is almost exclusively used to designate a flat or level surface. Plane angle, the angle included between two straight lines in a plane. -- Plane chart, Plane curve. See under Chart and Curve. -- Plane figure, a figure all points of which lie in the same plane. If bounded by straight lines it is a rectilinear plane figure, if by curved lines it is a curvilinear plane figure. -- Plane geometry, that part of geometry which treats of the relations and properties of plane figures. -- Plane problem, a problem which can be solved geometrically by the aid of the right line and circle only. -- Plane sailing (Naut.), the method of computing a ship's place and course on the supposition that the earth's surface is a plane. -- Plane scale (Naut.), a scale for the use of navigators, on which are graduated chords, sines, tangents, secants, rhumbs, geographical miles, etc. -- Plane surveying, surveying in which the curvature of the earth is disregarded; ordinary field and topographical surveying of tracts of moderate extent. -- Plane table, an instrument used for plotting the lines of a survey on paper in the field. -- Plane trigonometry, the branch of trigonometry in which its principles are applied to plane triangles.  1. (Geom.)  A surface, real or imaginary, in which, if any two points are taken, the straight line which joins them lies wholly in that surface; or a surface, any section of which by a like surface is a straight line; a surface without curvature. 2. (Astron.)  An ideal surface, conceived as coinciding with, or containing, some designated astronomical line, circle, or other curve; as, the plane of an orbit; the plane of the ecliptic, or of the equator. 3. (Mech.)  A block or plate having a perfectly flat surface, used as a standard of flatness; a surface plate. 4. (Joinery)  A tool for smoothing boards or other surfaces of wood, for forming moldings, etc. It consists of a smooth-soled stock, usually of wood, from the under side or face of which projects slightly the steel cutting edge of a chisel, called the iron, which inclines backward, with an apperture in front for the escape of shavings; as, the jack plane; the smoothing plane; the molding plane, etc. Objective plane (Surv.), the horizontal plane upon which the object which is to be delineated, or whose place is to be determined, is supposed to stand. -- Perspective plane. See Perspective. -- Plane at infinity (Geom.), a plane in which points infinitely distant are conceived as situated. -- Plane iron, the cutting chisel of a joiner's plane. -- Plane of polarization. (Opt.) See Polarization. -- Plane of projection. (a) The plane on which the projection is made, corresponding to the perspective plane in perspective; -- called also principal plane. (b) (Descriptive Geom.) One of the planes to which points are referred for the purpose of determining their relative position in space. -- Plane of refraction or reflection (Opt.), the plane in which lie both the incident ray and the refracted or reflected ray.  1. To make smooth; to level; to pare off the inequalities of the surface of, as of a board or other piece of wood, by the use of a plane; as, to plane a plank. 2. To efface or remove. He planed away the names . . . written on his tables. Chaucer. 3. Figuratively, to make plain or smooth. [R.] What student came but that you planed her path. Tennyson.
these: The plural of this. See This.
over: 1. Above, or higher than, in place or position, with the idea of covering; -- opposed to Ant: under; as, clouds are over our heads; the smoke rises over the city. The mercy seat that is over the testimony. Ex. xxx. 6. Over them gleamed far off the crimson banners of morning. Longfellow. 2. Across; from side to side of; -- implying a passing or moving, either above the substance or thing, or on the surface of it; as, a dog leaps over a stream or a table. Certain lakes . . . poison birds which fly over them. Bacon. 3. Upon the surface of, or the whole surface of; hither and thither upon; throughout the whole extent of; as, to wander over the earth; to walk over a field, or over a city. 4. Above; -- implying superiority in excellence, dignity, condition, or value; as, the advantages which the Christian world has over the heathen. Swift. 5. Above in authority or station; -- implying government, direction, care, attention, guard, responsibility, etc.; -- opposed to Ant: under. Thou shalt be over my house. Gen. xli. 40. I will make thee rules over many things. Matt. xxv. 23. Dost thou not watch over my sin Job xiv. 16. His tender mercies are over all his works. Ps. cxlv. 9. 6. Across or during the time of; from beginning to end of; as, to keep anything over night; to keep corn over winter. 7. Above the perpendicular height or length of, with an idea of measurement; as, the water, or the depth of water, was over his head, over his shoes. 8. Beyond; in excess of; in addition to; more than; as, it cost over five dollars. "Over all this." Chaucer. 9. Above, implying superiority after a contest; in spite of; notwithstanding; as, he triumphed over difficulties; the bill was passed over the veto. Note: Over, in poetry, is often contracted into o'er. Note: Over his signature (or name) is a substitute for the idiomatic English form, under his signature (name, hand and seal, etc.), the reference in the latter form being to the authority under which the writing is made, executed, or published, and not the place of the autograph, etc. Over all (Her.), placed over or upon other bearings, and therefore hinding them in part; -- said of a charge. -- Over head and ears, beyond one's depth; completely; wholly; hopelessly; as, over head and ears in debt. [Colloq.] -- Over the left. See under Left. -- To run over (Mach.), to have rotation in such direction that the crank pin traverses the upper, or front, half of its path in the forward, or outward, stroke; -- said of a crank which drives, or is driven by, a reciprocating piece.  1. From one side to another; from side to side; across; crosswise; as, a board, or a tree, a foot over, i. e., a foot in diameter. 2. From one person or place to another regarded as on the opposite side of a space or barrier; -- used with verbs of motion; as, to sail over to England; to hand over the money; to go over to the enemy. "We will pass over to Gibeah." Judges xix. 12. Also, with verbs of being: At, or on, the opposite side; as, the boat is over. 3. From beginning to end; throughout the course, extent, or expanse of anything; as, to look over accounts, or a stock of goods; a dress covered over with jewels. 4. From inside to outside, above or across the brim. Good measure, pressed down . . . and running over. Luke vi. 38. 5. Beyond a limit; hence, in excessive degree or quantity; superfluously; with repetition; as, to do the whole work over. "So over violent." Dryden. He that gathered much had nothing over. Ex. xvi. 18. 6. In a manner to bring the under side to or towards the top; as, to turn (one's self) over; to roll a stone over; to turn over the leaves; to tip over a cart. 7. At an end; beyond the limit of continuance; completed; finished. "Their distress was over." Macaulay. "The feast was over." Sir W. Scott. Note: Over, out, off, and similar adverbs, are often used in the predicate with the sense and force of adjectives, agreeing in this respect with the adverbs of place, here, there, everywhere, nowhere; as, the games were over; the play is over; the master was out; his hat is off. Note: Over is much used in composition, with the same significations that it has as a separate word; as in overcast, overflow, to cast or flow so as to spread over or cover; overhang, to hang above; overturn, to turn so as to bring the underside towards the top; overact, overreach, to act or reach beyond, implying excess or superiority. All over. (a) Over the whole; upon all parts; completely; as, he is spatterd with mud all over. (b) Wholly over; at an end; as, it is all over with him. -- Over again, once more; with repetition; afresh; anew. Dryden. -- Over against, opposite; in front. Addison. -- Over and above, in a manner, or degree, beyond what is supposed, defined, or usual; besides; in addition; as, not over and above well. "He . . . gained, over and above, the good will of all people." L' Estrange. -- Over and over, repeatedly; again and again. -- To boil over. See under Boil, v. i. -- To come it over, To do over, To give over, etc. See under Come, Do, Give, etc. -- To throw over, to abandon; to betray. Cf. To throw overboard, under Overboard.  Upper; covering; higher; superior; also, excessive; too much or too great; -- chiefly used in composition; as, overshoes, overcoat, over-garment, overlord, overwork, overhaste.  A certain number of balls (usually four) delivered successively from behind ine wicket, after which the ball is bowled from behing the other wicket as many times, the fielders changing places.
scale: 1. The dish of a balance; hence, the balance itself; an instrument or machine for weighing; as, to turn the scale; -- chiefly used in the plural when applied to the whole instrument or apparatus for weighing. Also used figuratively. Long time in even scale The battle hung. Milton. The scales are turned; her kindness weighs no more Now than my vows. Waller. 2. (Astron.)  The sign or constellation Libra. Platform scale. See under Platform. tip the scales, influence an action so as to change an outcome from one likely result to another.  To weigh or measure according to a scale; to measure; also, to grade or vary according to a scale or system. Scaling his present bearing with his past. Shak. To scale, or scale down, a debt, wages, etc., to reduce a debt, etc., according to a fixed ratio or scale. [U.S.]  1. (Anat.)  One of the small, thin, membranous, bony or horny pieces which form the covering of many fishes and reptiles, and some mammals, belonging to the dermal part of the skeleton, or dermoskeleton. See Cycloid, Ctenoid, and Ganoid. Fish that, with their fins and shining scales, Glide under the green wave. Milton. 2. Hence, any layer or leaf of metal or other material, resembling in size and thinness the scale of a fish; as, a scale of iron, of bone, etc. 3. (Zoöl.)  One of the small scalelike structures covering parts of some invertebrates, as those on the wings of Lepidoptera and on the body of Thysanura; the elytra of certain annelids. See Lepidoptera. 4. (Zoöl.)  A scale insect. (See below.) 5. (Bot.)  A small appendage like a rudimentary leaf, resembling the scales of a fish in form, and often in arrangement; as, the scale of a bud, of a pine cone, and the like. The name is also given to the chaff on the stems of ferns. 6. The thin metallic side plate of the handle of a pocketknife. See Illust. of Pocketknife. 7. An incrustation deposit on the inside of a vessel in which water is heated, as a steam boiler. 8. (Metal.)  The thin oxide which forms on the surface of iron forgings. It consists esentially of the magnetic oxide, Fe3O4. Also, a similar coating upon other metals. Covering scale (Zoöl.), a hydrophyllium. -- Ganoid scale (Zoöl.) See under Ganoid. -- Scale armor (Mil.), armor made of small metallic scales overlapping, and fastened upon leather or cloth. -- Scale beetle (Zoöl.), the tiger beetle. -- Scale carp (Zoöl.), a carp having normal scales. -- Scale insect (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of small hemipterous insects belonging to the family Coccidæ, in which the females, when adult, become more or less scalelike in form. They are found upon the leaves and twigs of various trees and shrubs, and often do great damage to fruit trees. See Orange scale,under Orange. -- Scale moss (Bot.), any leafy-stemmed moss of the order Hepaticæ; -- so called from the small imbricated scalelike leaves of most of the species. See Hepatica, 2, and Jungermannia.  1. To strip or clear of scale or scales; as, to scale a fish; to scale the inside of a boiler. 2. To take off in thin layers or scales, as tartar from the teeth; to pare off, as a surface. "If all the mountaines were scaled, and the earth made even." T. Burnet. 3. To scatter; to spread. [Scot. & Prov. Eng.] 4. (Gun.)  To clean, as the inside of a cannon, by the explosion of a small quantity of powder. Totten.  1. To separate and come off in thin layers or laminæ; as, some sandstone scales by exposure. Those that cast their shell are the lobster and crab; the old skins are found, but the old shells never; so it is likely that they scale off. Bacon. 2. To separate; to scatter. [Scot. & Prov. Eng.]  1. A ladder; a series of steps; a means of ascending. [Obs.] 2. Hence, anything graduated, especially when employed as a measure or rule, or marked by lines at regular intervals. Specifically: (a) A mathematical instrument, consisting of a slip of wood, ivory, or metal, with one or more sets of spaces graduated and numbered on its surface, for measuring or laying off distances, etc., as in drawing, plotting, and the like. See Gunter's scale. (b) A series of spaces marked by lines, and representing proportionately larger distances; as, a scale of miles, yards, feet, etc., for a map or plan. (c) A basis for a numeral system; as, the decimal scale; the binary scale, etc. (d) (Mus.) The graduated series of all the tones, ascending or descending, from the keynote to its octave; -- called also the gamut. It may be repeated through any number of octaves. See Chromatic scale, Diatonic scale, Major scale, and Minor scale, under Chromatic, Diatonic, Major, and Minor. 3. Gradation; succession of ascending and descending steps and degrees; progressive series; scheme of comparative rank or order; as, a scale of being. There is a certain scale of duties . . . which for want of studying in right order, all the world is in confusion. Milton. 4. Relative dimensions, without difference in proportion of parts; size or degree of the parts or components in any complex thing, compared with other like things; especially, the relative proportion of the linear dimensions of the parts of a drawing, map, model, etc., to the dimensions of the corresponding parts of the object that is represented; as, a map on a scale of an inch to a mile. Scale of chords, a graduated scale on which are given the lengths of the chords of arcs from 0º to 90º in a circle of given radius, -- used in measuring given angles and in plotting angles of given numbers of degrees.  To climb by a ladder, or as if by a ladder; to ascend by steps or by climbing; to clamber up; as, to scale the wall of a fort. Oft have I scaled the craggy oak. Spenser.  To lead up by steps; to ascend. [Obs.] Satan from hence, now on the lower stair, That scaled by steps of gold to heaven-gate, Looks down with wonder. Milton.
station: 1. The act of standing; also, attitude or pose in standing; posture. [R.] A station like the herald, Mercury. Shak. Their manner was to stand at prayer, whereupon their meetings unto that purpose . . . had the names of stations given them. Hooker. 2. A state of standing or rest; equilibrium. [Obs.] All progression is performed by drawing on or impelling forward some part which was before in station, or at quiet. Sir T. Browne. 3. The spot or place where anything stands, especially where a person or thing habitually stands, or is appointed to remain for a time; as, the station of a sentinel. Specifically: (a) A regular stopping place in a stage road or route; a place where railroad trains regularly come to a stand, for the convenience of passengers, taking in fuel, moving freight, etc. (b) The headquarters of the police force of any precinct. (c) The place at which an instrument is planted, or observations are made, as in surveying. (d) (Biol.)  The particular place, or kind of situation, in which a species naturally occurs; a habitat. (e) (Naut.)  A place to which ships may resort, and where they may anchor safely. (f) A place or region to which a government ship or fleet is assigned for duty. (g) (Mil.) A place calculated for the rendezvous of troops, or for the distribution of them; also, a spot well adapted for offensive measures. Wilhelm (Mil. Dict.). (h) (Mining) An enlargement in a shaft or galley, used as a landing, or passing place, or for the accomodation of a pump, tank, etc. 4. Post assigned; office; the part or department of public duty which a person is appointed to perform; sphere of duty or occupation; employment. By spending this day [Sunday] in religious exercises, we acquire new strength and resolution to perform God's will in our several stations the week following. R. Nelson. 5. Situation; position; location. The fig and date -- why love they to remain In middle station, and an even plain Prior. 6. State; rank; condition of life; social status. The greater part have kept, I see, Their station. Milton. They in France of the best rank and station. Shak. 7. (Eccl.) (a) The fast of the fourth and sixth days of the week, Wednesday and Friday, in memory of the council which condemned Christ, and of his passion. (b) (R. C. Ch.) A church in which the procession of the clergy halts on stated days to say stated prayers. Addis & Arnold. (c) One of the places at which ecclesiastical processions pause for the performance of an act of devotion; formerly, the tomb of a martyr, or some similarly consecrated spot; now, especially, one of those representations of the successive stages of our Lord's passion which are often placed round the naves of large churches and by the side of the way leading to sacred edifices or shrines, and which are visited in rotation, stated services being performed at each; -- called also Station of the cross. Fairholt. Station bill. (Naut.) Same as Quarter bill, under Quarter. -- Station house. (a) The house serving for the headquarters of the police assigned to a certain district, and as a place of temporary confinement. (b) The house used as a shelter at a railway station. -- Station master, one who has charge of a station, esp. of a railway station. -- Station pointer (Surv.), an instrument for locating on a chart the position of a place from which the angles subtended by three distant objects, whose positions are known, have been observed. -- Station staff (Surv.), an instrument for taking angles in surveying. Craig. Syn. -- Station, Depot. In the United States, a stopping place on a railway for passengers and freight is commonly called a depot: but to a considerable extent in official use, and in common speech, the more appropriate name, station, has been adopted.  To place; to set; to appoint or assign to the occupation of a post, place, or office; as, to station troops on the right of an army; to station a sentinel on a rampart; to station ships on the coasts of Africa. He gained the brow of the hill, where the English phalanx was stationed. Lyttelton.
mother: 1. A female parent; especially, one of the human race; a woman who has borne a child. 2. That which has produced or nurtured anything; source of birth or origin; generatrix. Alas! poor country! ... it can not Be called our mother, but our grave. Shak. I behold ... the solitary majesty of Crete, mother of a religion, it is said, that lived two thousand years. Landor. 3. An old woman or matron. [Familiar] 4. The female superior or head of a religious house, as an abbess, etc. 5. Hysterical passion; hysteria. [Obs.] Shak. Mother Carey's chicken (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small petrels, as the stormy petrel (Procellaria pelagica), and Leach's petrel (Oceanodroma leucorhoa), both of the Atlantic, and O. furcata of the North Pacific. -- Mother Carey's goose (Zoöl.), the giant fulmar of the Pacific. See Fulmar. -- Mother's mark (Med.), a congenital mark upon the body; a nævus.  Received by birth or from ancestors; native, natural; as, mother language; also acting the part, or having the place of a mother; producing others; originating. It is the mother falsehood from which all idolatry is derived. T. Arnold. Mother cell (Biol.), a cell which, by endogenous divisions, gives rise to other cells (daughter cells); a parent cell. -- Mother church, the original church; a church from which other churches have sprung; as, the mother church of a diocese. -- Mother country, the country of one's parents or ancestors; the country from which the people of a colony derive their origin. -- Mother liquor (Chem.), the impure or complex residual solution which remains after the salts readily or regularly crystallizing have been removed. -- Mother queen, the mother of a reigning sovereign; a queen mother. -- Mother tongue. (a) A language from which another language has had its origin. (b) The language of one's native land; native tongue. -- Mother water. See Mother liquor (above). -- Mother wit, natural or native wit or intelligence.  To adopt as a son or daughter; to perform the duties of a mother to. The queen, to have put lady Elizabeth besides the crown, would have mothered another body's child. Howell.  A film or membrane which is developed on the surface of fermented alcoholic liquids, such as vinegar, wine, etc., and acts as a means of conveying the oxygen of the air to the alcohol and other combustible principles of the liquid, thus leading to their oxidation. Note: The film is composed of a mass of rapidly developing microörganisms of the genus Mycoderma, and in the mother of vinegar the microörganisms (Mycoderma aceti) composing the film are the active agents in the Conversion of the alcohol into vinegar. When thickened by growth, the film may settle to the bottom of the fluid. See Acetous fermentation, under Fermentation.  To become like, or full of, mother, or thick matter, as vinegar.
effect: 1. Execution; performance; realization; operation; as, the law goes into effect in May. That no compunctious visitings of nature Shake my fell purpose, nor keep peace between The effect and it. Shak. 2. Manifestation; expression; sign. All the large effects That troop with majesty. Shak. 3. In general: That which is produced by an agent or cause; the event which follows immediately from an antecedent, called the cause; result; consequence; outcome; fruit; as, the effect of luxury. The effect is the unfailing index of the amount of the cause. Whewell. 4. Impression left on the mind; sensation produced. Patchwork . . . introduced for oratorical effect. J. C. Shairp. The effect was heightened by the wild and lonely nature of the place. W. Irving. 5. Power to produce results; efficiency; force; importance; account; as, to speak with effect. 6. Consequence intended; purpose; meaning; general intent; -- with to. They spake to her to that effect. 2 Chron. xxxiv. 22. 7. The purport; the sum and substance. "The effect of his intent." Chaucer. 8. Reality; actual meaning; fact, as distinguished from mere appearance. No other in effect than what it seems. Denham. 9. pl.  Goods; movables; personal estate; -- sometimes used to embrace real as well as personal property; as, the people escaped from the town with their effects. For effect, for an exaggerated impression or excitement. -- In effect, in fact; in substance. See 8, above. -- Of no effect, Of none effect, To no effect, or Without effect, destitute of results, validity, force, and the like; vain; fruitless. "Making the word of God of none effect through your tradition." Mark vii. 13. "All my study be to no effect." Shak. -- To give effect to, to make valid; to carry out in practice; to push to its results. -- To take effect, to become operative, to accomplish aims. Shak. Syn. -- Effect, Consequence, Result. These words indicate things which arise out of some antecedent, or follow as a consequent. Effect, which may be regarded as the generic term, denotes that which springs directly from something which can properly be termed a cause. A consequence is more remote, not being strictly caused, nor yet a mere sequence, but following out of and following indirectly, or in the train of events, something on which it truly depends. A result is still more remote and variable, like the rebound of an elastic body which falls in very different directions. We may foresee the effects of a measure, may conjecture its consequences, but can rarely discover its final results. Resolving all events, with their effects And manifold results, into the will And arbitration wise of the Supreme. Cowper. Shun the bitter consequence, for know, The day thou eatest thereof, . . . thou shalt die. Milton.  1. To produce, as a cause or agent; to cause to be. So great a body such exploits to effect. Daniel. 2. To bring to pass; to execute; to enforce; to achieve; to accomplish. To effect that which the divine counsels had decreed. Bp. Hurd. They sailed away without effecting their purpose. Jowett (Th. ). Syn. -- To accomplish; fulfill; achieve; complete; execute; perform; attain. See Accomplish.
come: 1. To move hitherward; to draw near; to approach the speaker, or some place or person indicated; -- opposed to go. Look, who comes yonder Shak. I did not come to curse thee. Tennyson. 2. To complete a movement toward a place; to arrive. When we came to Rome. Acts xxviii. 16. Lately come from Italy. Acts vviii. 2. 3. To approach or arrive, as if by a journey or form a distance. "Thy kingdom come." Matt. vi. 10. The hour is comming, and now is. John. v. 25. So quik bright things come to confusion. Shak. 4. To approach or arrive, as the result of a cause, or of the act of another. From whence come wars James iv. 1. Both riches and honor come of thee! Chron. xxix. 12. 5. To arrive in sight; to be manifest; to appear. Then butter does refuse to come. Hudibras. 6. To get to be, as the result of change or progress; -- with a predicate; as, to come united. How come you thus estranged Shak. How come her eyes so bright Shak. Note: Am come, is come, etc., are frequently used instead of have come, has come, etc., esp. in poetry. The verb to be gives adjectival significance to the participle as expressing a state or condition of the subject, while the auxiliary have expresses simply the completion of the action signified by the verb. Think not that I am come to destroy. Matt. v. 17. We are come off like Romans. Shak. The melancholy days are come, the saddest of the year. Bryant. Note: Come may properly be used (instead of go) in speaking of a movement hence, or away, when there is reference to an approach to the person addressed; as, I shall come home next week; he will come to your house to-day. It is used with other verbs almost as an auxiliary, indicative of approach to the action or state expressed by the verb; as, how came you to do it Come is used colloquially, with reference to a definite future time approaching, without an auxilliary; as, it will be two years, come next Christmas; i. e., when Christmas shall come. They were cried In meeting, come next Sunday. Lowell. Come, in the imperative, is used to excite attention, or to invite to motion or joint action; come, let us go. "This is the heir; come, let us kill him." Matt. xxi. 38. When repeated, it sometimes expresses haste, or impatience, and sometimes rebuke. "Come, come, no time for lamentation now." Milton. To come, yet to arrive, future. "In times to come." Dryden. "There's pippins and cheese to come." Shak. -- To come about. (a) To come to pass; to arrive; to happen; to result; as, how did these things come about (b) To change; to come round; as, the ship comes about. "The wind is come about." Shak. On better thoughts, and my urged reasons, They are come about, and won to the true side. B. Jonson. -- To come abroad. (a) To move or be away from one's home or country. "Am come abroad to see the world." Shak. (b) To become public or known. [Obs.] "Neither was anything kept secret, but that it should come abroad." Mark. iv. 22. -- To come across, to meet; to find, esp. by chance or suddenly. "We come across more than one incidental mention of those wars." E. A. Freeman. "Wagner's was certainly one of the strongest and most independent natures I ever came across." H. R. Heweis. -- To come after. (a) To follow. (b) To come to take or to obtain; as, to come after a book. -- To come again, to return. "His spirit came again and he revived." Judges. xv. 19. -- To come and go. (a) To appear and disappear; to change; to alternate. "The color of the king doth come and go." Shak. (b) (Mech.) To play backward and forward. -- To come at. (a) To reach; to arrive within reach of; to gain; as, to come at a true knowledge of ourselves. (b) To come toward; to attack; as, he came at me with fury. -- To come away, to part or depart. -- To come between, to interverne; to separate; hence, to cause estrangement. -- To come by. (a) To obtain, gain, acquire. "Examine how you came by all your state." Dryden. (b) To pass near or by way of. -- To come down. (a) To descend. (b) To be humbled. -- To come down upon, to call to account, to reprimand. [Colloq.] Dickens. -- To come home. (a) To retuen to one's house or family. (b) To come close; to press closely; to touch the feelings, interest, or reason. (b) (Naut.) To be loosened from the ground; -- said of an anchor. -- To come in. (a) To enter, as a town, house, etc. "The thief cometh in." Hos. vii. 1. (b) To arrive; as, when my ship comes in. (c) To assume official station or duties; as, when Lincoln came in. (d) To comply; to yield; to surrender. "We need not fear his coming in" Massinger. (e) To be brought into use. "Silken garments did not come in till late." Arbuthnot. (f) To be added or inserted; to be or become a part of. (g) To accrue as gain from any business or investment. (h) To mature and yield a harvest; as, the crops come in well. (i) To have sexual intercourse; -- with to or unto. Gen. xxxviii. 16. (j) To have young; to bring forth; as, the cow will come in next May. [U. S.] -- To come in for, to claim or receive. "The rest came in for subsidies." Swift. -- To come into, to join with; to take part in; to agree to; to comply with; as, to come into a party or scheme. -- To come it ever, to hoodwink; to get the advantage of. [Colloq.] -- To come near or nigh, to approach in place or quality to be equal to. "Nothing ancient or modern seems to come near it." Sir W. Temple. -- To come of. (a) To descend or spring from. "Of Priam's royal race my mother came." Dryden. (b) To result or follow from. "This comes of judging by the eye." L'Estrange. -- To come off. (a) To depart or pass off from. (b) To get free; to get away; to escape. (c) To be carried through; to pass off; as, it came off well. (d) To acquit one's self; to issue from (a contest, etc.); as, he came off with honor; hence, substantively, a come off, an escape; an excuse; an evasion. [Colloq.] (e) To pay over; to give. [Obs.] (f) To take place; to happen; as, when does the race come off (g) To be or become after some delay; as, the weather came off very fine. (h) To slip off or be taken off, as a garment; to separate. (i) To hurry away; to get through. Chaucer. -- To come off by, to suffer. [Obs.] "To come off by the worst." Calamy. -- To come off from, to leave. "To come off from these grave disquisitions." Felton. -- To come on. (a) To advance; to make progress; to thrive. (b) To move forward; to approach; to supervene. -- To come out. (a) To pass out or depart, as from a country, room, company, etc. "They shall come out with great substance." Gen. xv. 14. (b) To become public; to appear; to be published. "It is indeed come out at last." Bp. Stillingfleet. (c) To end; to result; to turn out; as, how will this affair come out he has come out well at last. (d) To be introduced into society; as, she came out two seasons ago. (e) To appear; to show itself; as, the sun came out. (f) To take sides; to take a stand; as, he came out against the tariff.(g) To publicly admit oneself to be homosexual. -- To come out with, to give publicity to; to disclose. -- To come over. (a) To pass from one side or place to another. "Perpetually teasing their friends to come over to them." Addison. (b) To rise and pass over, in distillation. -- To come over to, to join. -- To come round. (a) To recur in regular course. (b) To recover. [Colloq.] (c) To change, as the wind. (d) To relent. J. H. Newman. (e) To circumvent; to wheedle. [Colloq.] -- To come short, to be deficient; to fail of attaining. "All have sinned and come short of the glory of God." Rom. iii. 23. -- To come to. (a) To consent or yield. Swift. (b) (Naut.) (with the accent on to) To luff; to brin the ship's head nearer the wind; to anchor. (c) (with the accent on to) To recover, as from a swoon. (d) To arrive at; to reach. (e) To amount to; as, the taxes come to a large sum. (f) To fall to; to be received by, as an inheritance. Shak. -- To come to blows. See under Blow. -- To come to grief. See under Grief. -- To come to a head. (a) To suppurate, as a boil. (b) To mature; to culminate; as a plot. -- To come to one's self, to recover one's senses. -- To come to pass, to happen; to fall out. -- To come to the scratch. (a) (Prize Fighting) To step up to the scratch or mark made in the ring to be toed by the combatants in beginning a contest; hence: (b) To meet an antagonist or a difficulty bravely. [Colloq.] -- To come to time. (a) (Prize Fighting) To come forward in order to resume the contest when the interval allowed for rest is over and "time" is called; hence: (b) To keep an appointment; to meet expectations. [Colloq.] -- To come together. (a) To meet for business, worship, etc.; to assemble. Acts i. 6. (b) To live together as man and wife. Matt. i. 18. -- To come true, to happen as predicated or expected. -- To come under, to belong to, as an individual to a class. -- To come up (a) to ascend; to rise. (b) To be brought up; to arise, as a question. (c) To spring; to shoot or rise above the earth, as a plant. (d) To come into use, as a fashion. -- To come up the capstan (Naut.), to turn it the contrary way, so as to slacken the rope about it. -- To come up the tackle fall (Naut.), to slacken the tackle gently. Totten. -- To come up to, to rise to; to equal. -- To come up with, to overtake or reach by pursuit. -- To come upon. (a) To befall. (b) To attack or invade. (c) To have a claim upon; to become dependent upon for support; as, to come upon the town. (d) To light or chance upon; to find; as, to come upon hid treasure.  To carry through; to succeed in; as, you can't come any tricks here. [Slang] To come it, to succeed in a trick of any sort. [Slang]  Coming. Chaucer.
common: 1. Belonging or relating equally, or similary, to more than one; as, you and I have a common interest in the property. Though life and sense be common to men and brutes. Sir M. Hale. 2. Belonging to or shared by, affecting or serving, all the members of a class, consired together; general; public; as, propertis common to all plants; the common schools; the Book of Common Prayer. Such actions as the common good requereth. Hocker. The common enemy of man. Shak. 3. Often met with; usual; frequent; customary. Grief more than common grief. Shak. 4. Not distinguished or exceptional; inconspicuous; ordinary; plebeian; -- often in a depreciatory sense. The honest, heart-felt enjoyment of common life. W. Irving. This fact was infamous And ill beseeming any common man, Much more a knight, a captain and a leader. Shak. Above the vulgar flight of common souls. A. Murpphy. 5. Profane; polluted. [Obs.] What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common. Acts x. 15. 6. Given to habits of lewdness; prostitute. A dame who herself was common. L'Estrange. Common bar (Law) Same as Blank bar, under Blank. -- Common barrator (Law), one who makes a business of instigating litigation. -- Common Bench, a name sometimes given to the English Court of Common Pleas. -- Common brawler (Law), one addicted to public brawling and quarreling. See Brawler. -- Common carrier (Law), one who undertakes the office of carrying (goods or persons) for hire. Such a carrier is bound to carry in all cases when he has accommodation, and when his fixed price is tendered, and he is liable for all losses and injuries to the goods, except those which happen in consequence of the act of God, or of the enemies of the country, or of the owner of the property himself. -- Common chord (Mus.), a chord consisting of the fundamental tone, with its third and fifth. -- Common council, the representative (legislative) body, or the lower branch of the representative body, of a city or other munisipal corporation. -- Common crier, the crier of a town or city. -- Common divisor (Math.), a number or quantity that divides two or more numbers or quantities without a remainder; a common measure. -- Common gender (Gram.), the gender comprising words that may be of either the masculine or the feminine gender. -- Common law, a system of jurisprudence developing under the guidance of the courts so as to apply a consistent and reasonable rule to each litigated case. It may be superseded by statute, but unless superseded it controls. Wharton. Note: It is by others defined as the unwritten law (especially of England), the law that receives its binding force from immemorial usage and universal reception, as ascertained and expressed in the judgments of the courts. This term is often used in contradistinction from statute law. Many use it to designate a law common to the whole country. It is also used to designate the whole body of English (or other) law, as distinguished from its subdivisions, local, civil, admiralty, equity, etc. See Law. -- Common lawyer, one versed in common law. -- Common lewdness (Law), the habitual performance of lewd acts in public. -- Common multiple (Arith.) See under Multiple. -- Common noun (Gram.), the name of any one of a class of objects, as distinguished from a proper noun (the name of a particular person or thing). -- Common nuisance (Law), that which is deleterious to the health or comfort or sense of decency of the community at large. -- Common pleas, one of the three superior courts of common law at Westminster, presided over by a chief justice and four puisne judges. Its jurisdiction is confined to civil matters. Courts bearing this title exist in several of the United States, having, however, in some cases, botth civil and criminal jurisdiction extending over the whole State. In other States the jurisdiction of the common pleas is limited to a county, and it is sometimes called a county court. Its powers are generally defined by statute. -- Common prayer, the liturgy of the Church of England, or of the Protestant Episcopal church of the United States, which all its clergy are enjoined use. It is contained in the Book of Common Prayer. -- Common school, a school maintained at the public expense, and open to all. -- Common scold (Law), a woman addicted to scolding indiscriminately, in public. -- Common seal, a seal adopted and used by a corporation. -- Common sense. (a) A supposed sense which was held to be the common bond of all the others. [Obs.] Trench. (b) Sound judgment. See under Sense. -- Common time (Mus.), that variety of time in which the measure consists of two or of four equal portions. -- In common, equally with another, or with others; owned, shared, or used, in community with others; affecting or affected equally. -- Out of the common, uncommon; extraordinary. -- Tenant in common, one holding real or personal property in common with others, having distinct but undivided interests. See Joint tenant, under Joint. -- To make common cause with, to join or ally one's self with. Syn. -- General; public; popular; universal; frequent; ordinary; customary; usual; familiar; habitual; vulgar; mean; trite; stale; threadbare; commonplace. See Mutual, Ordinary, General.  1. The people; the community. [Obs.] "The weal o' the common." Shak. 2. An inclosed or uninclosed tract of ground for pleasure, for pasturage, etc., the use of which belongs to the public; or to a number of persons. 3. (Law)  The right of taking a profit in the land of another, in common either with the owner or with other persons; -- so called from the community of interest which arises between the claimant of the right and the owner of the soil, or between the claimants and other commoners entitled to the same right. Common appendant, a right belonging to the owners or occupiers of arable land to put commonable beasts upon the waste land in the manor where they dwell. -- Common appurtenant, a similar right applying to lands in other manors, or extending to other beasts, besides those which are generally commonable, as hogs. -- Common because of vicinage or neighborhood, the right of the inhabitants of each of two townships, lying contiguous to each other, which have usually intercommoned with one another, to let their beasts stray into the other's fields. -- Common in gross or at large, a common annexed to a man's person, being granted to him and his heirs by deed; or it may be claimed by prescriptive right, as by a parson of a church or other corporation sole. Blackstone. -- Common of estovers, the right of taking wood from another's estate. -- Common of pasture, the right of feeding beasts on the land of another. Burill. -- Common of piscary, the right of fishing in waters belonging to another. -- Common of turbary, the right of digging turf upon the ground of another.  1. To converse together; to discourse; to confer. [Obs.] Embassadors were sent upon both parts, and divers means of entreaty were commoned of. Grafton. 2. To participate. [Obs.] Sir T. More. 3. To have a joint right with others in common ground. Johnson. 4. To board together; to eat at a table in common.
same: 1. Not different or other; not another or others; identical; unchanged. Thou art the same, and thy years shall have no end. Ps. cii. 27. 2. Of like kind, species, sort, dimensions, or the like; not differing in character or in the quality or qualities compared; corresponding; not discordant; similar; like. The ethereal vigor is in all the same. Dryden. 3. Just mentioned, or just about to be mentioned. What ye know, the same do I know. Job. xiii. 2. Do but think how well the same he spends, Who spends his blood his country to relieve. Daniel. Note: Same is commonly preceded by the, this, or that and is often used substantively as in the citations above. In a comparative use it is followed by as or with. Bees like the same odors as we do. Lubbock. [He] held the same political opinions with his illustrious friend. Macaulay.
blood: 1. The fluid which circulates in the principal vascular system of animals, carrying nourishment to all parts of the body, and bringing away waste products to be excreted. See under Arterial. Note: The blood consists of a liquid, the plasma, containing minute particles, the blood corpuscles. In the invertebrate animals it is usually nearly colorless, and contains only one kind of corpuscles; but in all vertebrates, except Amphioxus, it contains some colorless corpuscles, with many more which are red and give the blood its uniformly red color. See Corpuscle, Plasma. 2. Relationship by descent from a common ancestor; consanguinity; kinship. To share the blood of Saxon royalty. Sir W. Scott. A friend of our own blood. Waller. Half blood (Law), relationship through only one parent. -- Whole blood, relationship through both father and mother. In American Law, blood includes both half blood, and whole blood. Bouvier. Peters. 3. Descent; lineage; especially, honorable birth; the highest royal lineage. Give us a prince of blood, a son of Priam. Shak. I am a gentleman of blood and breeding. Shak. 4. (Stock Breeding)  Descent from parents of recognized breed; excellence or purity of breed. Note: In stock breeding half blood is descent showing one half only of pure breed. Blue blood, full blood, or warm blood, is the same as blood. 5. The fleshy nature of man. Nor gives it satisfaction to our blood. Shak. 6. The shedding of blood; the taking of life, murder; manslaughter; destruction. So wills the fierce, avenging sprite, Till blood for blood atones. Hood. 7. A bloodthirsty or murderous disposition. [R.] He was a thing of blood, whose every motion Was timed with dying cries. Shak. 8. Temper of mind; disposition; state of the passions; -- as if the blood were the seat of emotions. When you perceive his blood inclined to mirth. Shak. Note: Often, in this sense, accompanied with bad, cold, warm, or other qualifying word. Thus, to commit an act in cold blood, is to do it deliberately, and without sudden passion; to do it in bad blood, is to do it in anger. Warm blood denotes a temper inflamed or irritated. To warm or heat the blood is to excite the passions. Qualified by up, excited feeling or passion is signified; as, my blood was up. 9. A man of fire or spirit; a fiery spark; a gay, showy man; a rake. Seest thou not . . . how giddily 'a turns about all the hot bloods between fourteen and five and thirty Shak. It was the morning costume of a dandy or blood. Thackeray. 10. The juice of anything, especially if red. He washed . . . his clothes in the blood of grapes. Gen. xiix. 11. Note: Blood is often used as an adjective, and as the first part of self-explaining compound words; as, blood-bespotted, blood-bought, blood-curdling, blood-dyed, blood-red, blood-spilling, blood-stained, blood-warm, blood-won. Blood baptism (Eccl. Hist.), the martyrdom of those who had not been baptized. They were considered as baptized in blood, and this was regarded as a full substitute for literal baptism. -- Blood blister, a blister or bleb containing blood or bloody serum, usually caused by an injury. -- Blood brother, brother by blood or birth. -- Blood clam (Zoöl.), a bivalve mollusk of the genus Arca and allied genera, esp. Argina pexata of the American coast. So named from the color of its flesh. -- Blood corpuscle. See Corpuscle. -- Blood crystal (Physiol.), one of the crystals formed by the separation in a crystalline form of the hæmoglobin of the red blood corpuscles; hæmatocrystallin. All blood does not yield blood crystals. -- Blood heat, heat equal to the temperature of human blood, or about 98½ º Fahr. -- Blood horse, a horse whose blood or lineage is derived from the purest and most highly prized origin or stock. -- Blood money. See in the Vocabulary. -- Blood orange, an orange with dark red pulp. -- Blood poisoning (Med.), a morbid state of the blood caused by the introduction of poisonous or infective matters from without, or the absorption or retention of such as are produced in the body itself; toxæmia. -- Blood pudding, a pudding made of blood and other materials. -- Blood relation, one connected by blood or descent. -- Blood spavin. See under Spavin. -- Blood vessel. See in the Vocabulary. -- Blue blood, the blood of noble or aristocratic families, which, according to a Spanish prover , has in it a tinge of blue; -- hence, a member of an old and aristocratic family. -- Flesh and blood. (a) A blood relation, esp. a child. (b) Human nature. -- In blood (Hunting), in a state of perfect health and vigor. Shak. -- To let blood. See under Let. -- Prince of the blood, the son of a sovereign, or the issue of a royal family. The sons, brothers, and uncles of the sovereign are styled princes of the blood royal; and the daughters, sisters, and aunts are princesses of the blood royal.  1. To bleed. [Obs.] Cowper. 2. To stain, smear or wet, with blood. [Archaic] Reach out their spears afar, And blood their points. Dryden. 3. To give (hounds or soldiers) a first taste or sight of blood, as in hunting or war. It was most important too that his troops should be blooded. Macaulay. 4. To heat the blood of; to exasperate. [Obs.] The auxiliary forces of the French and English were much blooded one against another. Bacon.
suit: 1. The act of following or pursuing, as game; pursuit. [Obs.] 2. The act of suing; the process by which one endeavors to gain an end or an object; an attempt to attain a certain result; pursuit; endeavor. Thenceforth the suit of earthly conquest shone. Spenser. 3. The act of wooing in love; the solicitation of a woman in marriage; courtship. Rebate your loves, each rival suit suspend, Till this funereal web my labors end. Pope. 4. (Law)  The attempt to gain an end by legal process; an action or process for the recovery of a right or claim; legal application to a court for justice; prosecution of right before any tribunal; as, a civil suit; a criminal suit; a suit in chancery. I arrest thee at the suit of Count Orsino. Shak. In England the several suits, or remedial instruments of justice, are distinguished into three kinds -- actions personal, real, and mixed. Blackstone. 5. That which follows as a retinue; a company of attendants or followers; the assembly of persons who attend upon a prince, magistrate, or other person of distinction; -- often written suite, and pronounced swet. 6. Things that follow in a series or succession; the individual objects, collectively considered, which constitute a series, as of rooms, buildings, compositions, etc.; -- often written suite, and pronounced swet. 7. A number of things used together, and generally necessary to be united in order to answer their purpose; a number of things ordinarily classed or used together; a set; as, a suit of curtains; a suit of armor; a suit of clothes. "Two rogues in buckram suits." Shak. 8. (Playing Cards)  One of the four sets of cards which constitute a pack; -- each set consisting of thirteen cards bearing a particular emblem, as hearts, spades, cubs, or diamonds. To deal and shuffle, to divide and sort Her mingled suits and sequences. Cowper. 9. Regular order; succession. [Obs.] Every five and thirty years the same kind and suit of weather comes again. Bacon. Out of suits, having no correspondence. [Obs.] Shak. -- Suit and service (Feudal Law), the duty of feudatories to attend the courts of their lords or superiors in time of peace, and in war to follow them and do military service; -- called also suit service. Blackstone. -- Suit broker, one who made a trade of obtaining the suits of petitioners at court. [Obs.] -- Suit court (O. Eng. Law), the court in which tenants owe attendance to their lord. -- Suit covenant (O. Eng. Law), a covenant to sue at a certain court. -- Suit custom (Law), a service which is owed from time immemorial. -- Suit service. (Feudal Law) See Suit and service, above. -- To bring suit. (Law) (a) To bring secta, followers or witnesses, to prove the plaintiff's demand. [Obs.] (b) In modern usage, to institute an action. -- To follow suit. (Card Playing) See under Follow, v. t.  1. To fit; to adapt; to make proper or suitable; as, to suit the action to the word. Shak. 2. To be fitted to; to accord with; to become; to befit. Ill suits his cloth the praise of railing well. Dryden. Raise her notes to that sublime degree Which suits song of piety and thee. Prior. 3. To dress; to clothe. [Obs.] So went he suited to his watery tomb. Shak. 4. To please; to make content; as, he is well suited with his place; to suit one's taste.  To agree; to accord; to be fitted; to correspond; -- usually followed by with or to. The place itself was suiting to his care. Dryden. Give me not an office That suits with me so ill. Addison. Syn. -- To agree; accord; comport; tally; correspond; match; answer.
desert: That which is deserved; the reward or the punishment justly due; claim to recompense, usually in a good sense; right to reward; merit. According to their deserts will I judge them. Ezek. vii. 27. Andronicus, surnamed Pius For many good and great deserts to Rome. Shak. His reputation falls far below his desert. A. Hamilton. Syn. -- Merit; worth; excellence; due.  1. A deserted or forsaken region; a barren tract incapable of supporting population, as the vast sand plains of Asia and Africa are destitute and vegetation. A dreary desert and a gloomy waste. Pope. 2. A tract, which may be capable of sustaining a population, but has been left unoccupied and uncultivated; a wilderness; a solitary place. He will make her wilderness like Eden, and her desert like the garden of the Lord. Is. li. 3. Note: Also figuratively. Before her extended Dreary and vast and silent, the desert of life. Longfellow.  Of or pertaining to a desert; forsaken; without life or cultivation; unproductive; waste; barren; wild; desolate; solitary; as, they landed on a desert island. He . . . went aside privately into a desert place. Luke ix. 10. Full many a flower is born to blush unseen, And waste its sweetness on the desert air. Gray. Desert flora (Bot.), the assemblage of plants growing naturally in a desert, or in a dry and apparently unproductive place. -- Desert hare (Zoöl.), a small hare (Lepus sylvaticus, var. Arizonæ) inhabiting the deserts of the Western United States. -- Desert mouse (Zoöl.), an American mouse (Hesperomys eremicus), living in the Western deserts.  1. To leave (especially something which one should stay by and support); to leave in the lurch; to abandon; to forsake; -- implying blame, except sometimes when used of localities; as, to desert a friend, a principle, a cause, one's country. "The deserted fortress." Prescott. 2. (Mil.)  To abandon (the service) without leave; to forsake in violation of duty; to abscond from; as, to desert the army; to desert one's colors.  To abandon a service without leave; to quit military service without permission, before the expiration of one's term; to abscond. The soldiers . . . deserted in numbers. Bancroft. Syn. -- To abandon; forsake; leave; relinquish; renounce; quit; depart from; abdicate. See Abandon.
him: Them. See Hem. [Obs.] Chaucer.  The objective case of he. See He. Him that is weak in the faith receive. Rom. xiv. 1. Friends who have given him the most sympathy. Thackeray. Note: In old English his and him were respectively the genitive and dative forms of it as well as of he. This use is now obsolete. Poetically, him is sometimes used with the reflexive sense of himself. I never saw but Humphrey, duke of Gloster, Did bear him like a noble gentleman. Shak.
line: 1. Flax; linen. [Obs.] "Garments made of line." Spenser. 2. The longer and fiber of flax.  1. To cover the inner surface of; as, to line a cloak with silk or fur; to line a box with paper or tin. The inside lined with rich carnation silk. W. Browne. 2. To put something in the inside of; to fill; to supply, as a purse with money. The charge amounteth very high for any one man's purse, except lined beyond ordinary, to reach unto. Carew. Till coffee has her stomach lined. Swift. 3. To place persons or things along the side of for security or defense; to strengthen by adding; to fortify; as, to line works with soldiers. Line and new repair our towns of war With men of courage and with means defendant. Shak. 4. To impregnate; -- applied to brute animals. Creech. Lined gold, gold foil having a lining of another metal.  1. linen thread or string; a slender, strong cord; also, a cord of any thickness; a rope; a hawser; as, a fishing line; a line for snaring birds; a clothesline; a towline. Who so layeth lines for to latch fowls. Piers Plowman. 2. A more or less threadlike mark of pen, pencil, or graver; any long mark; as, a chalk line. 3. The course followed by anything in motion; hence, a road or route; as, the arrow descended in a curved line; the place is remote from lines of travel. 4. Direction; as, the line sight or vision. 5. A row of letters, words, etc., written or printed; esp., a row of words extending across a page or column. 6. A short letter; a note; as, a line from a friend. 7. (Poet.)  A verse, or the words which form a certain number of feet, according to the measure. In the preceding line Ulysses speaks of Nausicaa. Broome. 8. Course of conduct, thought, occupation, or policy; method of argument; department of industry, trade, or intellectual activity. He is uncommonly powerful in his own line, but it is not the line of a first-rate man. Coleridge. 9. (Math.)  That which has length, but not breadth or thickness. 10. The exterior limit of a figure, plat, or territory; boundary; contour; outline. Eden stretched her line From Auran eastward to the royal towers Of great Seleucia. Milton. 11. A threadlike crease marking the face or the hand; hence, characteristic mark. Though on his brow were graven lines austere. Byron. He tipples palmistry, and dines On all her fortune-telling lines. Cleveland. 12. Lineament; feature; figure. "The lines of my boy's face." Shak. 13. A straight row; a continued series or rank; as, a line of houses, or of soldiers; a line of barriers. Unite thy forces and attack their lines. Dryden. 14. A series or succession of ancestors or descand ants of a given person; a family or race; as, the ascending or descending line; the line of descent; the male line; a line of kings. Of his lineage am I, and his offspring By very line, as of the stock real. Chaucer. 15. A connected series of public conveyances, and hence, an established arrangement for forwarding merchandise, etc. ; as, a line of stages; an express line. 16. (Geog.) (a) A circle of latitude or of longitude, as represented on a map. (b) The equator; -- usually called the line, or equinoctial line; as, to cross the line. 17. A long tape, or a narrow ribbon of steel, etc., marked with subdivisions, as feet and inches, for measuring; a tapeline. 18. (Script.) (a) A measuring line or cord. He marketh it out with a line. Is. xliv. 13. (b) That which was measured by a line, as a field or any piece of land set apart; hence, allotted place of abode. The lines are fallen unto me in pleasant places; yes. I have a goodly heritage. Ps. xvi. 6. (c) Instruction; doctrine. Their line is gone out through all the earth. Ps. xix. 4. 19. (Mach.)  The proper relative position or adjustment of parts, not as to design or proportion, but with reference to smooth working; as, the engine is in line or out of line or out of line. 20. The track and roadbed of a railway; railroad. 21. (Mil.) (a) A row of men who are abreast of one another, whether side by side or some distance apart; -- opposed to column. (b) The regular infantry of an army, as distinguished from militia, guards, volunteer corps, cavalry, artillery, etc. 22. (Fort.) (a) A trench or rampart. (b) pl.  Dispositions made to cover extended positions, and presenting a front in but one direction to an enemy. 23. pl. (Shipbuilding)  form of a vessel as shown by the outlines of vertical, horizontal, and obique sections. 24. (Mus.)  One of the straight horizontal and parallel prolonged strokes on and between which the notes are placed. 25. (Stock Exchange)  A number of shares taken by a jobber. 26. (Trade)  A series of various qualities and values of the same general class of articles; as, a full line of hosiery; a line of merinos, etc. McElrath. 27. The wire connecting one telegraphic station with another, or the whole of a system of telegraph wires under one management and name. 28. pl.  The reins with which a horse is guided by his driver. [U. S.] 29. A measure of length; one twelfth of an inch. Hard lines, hard lot. C. Kingsley. [See Def. 18.] -- Line breeding (Stockbreeding), breeding by a certain family line of descent, especially in the selection of the dam or mother. -- Line conch (Zoöl.), a spiral marine shell (Fasciolaria distans), of Florida and the West Indies. It is marked by narrow, dark, revolving lines. -- Line engraving. (a) Engraving in which the effects are produced by lines of different width and closeness, cut with the burin upon copper or similar material; also, a plate so engraved. (b) A picture produced by printing from such an engraving. -- Line of battle. (a) (Mil Tactics) The position of troops drawn up in their usual order without any determined maneuver. (b) (Naval) The line or arrangement formed by vessels of war in an engagement. -- Line of battle ship. See Ship of the line, below. -- Line of beauty (Fine Arts),an abstract line supposed to be beautiful in itself and absolutely; -- differently represented by different authors, often as a kind of elongated S (like the one drawn by Hogarth). -- Line of centers. (Mach.) (a) A line joining two centers, or fulcra, as of wheels or levers. (b) A line which determines a dead center. See Dead center, under Dead. -- Line of dip (Geol.), a line in the plane of a stratum, or part of a stratum, perpendicular to its intersection with a horizontal plane; the line of greatest inclination of a stratum to the horizon. -- Line of fire (Mil.), the direction of fire. -- Line of force (Physics), any line in a space in which forces are acting, so drawn that at every point of the line its tangent is the direction of the resultant of all the forces. It cuts at right angles every equipotential surface which it meets. Specifically (Magnetism), a line in proximity to a magnet so drawn that any point in it is tangential with the direction of a short compass needle held at that point. Faraday. -- Line of life (Palmistry), a line on the inside of the hand, curving about the base of the thumb, supposed to indicate, by its form or position, the length of a person's life. -- Line of lines. See Gunter's line. -- Line of march. (Mil.) (a) Arrangement of troops for marching. (b) Course or direction taken by an army or body of troops in marching. -- Line of operations, that portion of a theater of war which an army passes over in attaining its object. H. W. Halleck. -- Line of sight (Firearms), the line which passes through the front and rear sight, at any elevation, when they are sighted at an object. -- Line tub (Naut.), a tub in which the line carried by a whaleboat is coiled. -- Mason and Dixon's line, the boundary line between Pennsylvania and Maryland, as run before the Revolution (1764-1767) by two English astronomers named Charles Mason and Jeremiah Dixon. In an extended sense, the line between the free and the slave States. -- On the line, on a level with the eye of the spectator; -- said of a picture, as hung in an exhibition of pictures. -- Right line a picture, as hung in an exhibition of pictures. -- Right line, a straight line; the shortest line that can be drawn between two points. -- Ship of the line, formerly, a ship of war large enough to have a place in the line of battle; a vessel superior to a frigate; usually, a seventy-four, or three-decker; -- called also line of battle ship. Totten. -- To cross the line, to cross the equator, as a vessel at sea. -- To give a person line, to allow him more or less liberty until it is convenient to stop or check him, like a hooked fish that swims away with the line. -- Water line (Shipbuilding), the outline of a horizontal section of a vessel, as when floating in the water.  1. To mark with a line or lines; to cover with lines; as, to line a copy book. He had a healthy color in his cheeks, and his face, though lined, bore few traces of anxiety. Dickens. 2. To represent by lines; to delineate; to portray. [R.] "Pictures fairest lined." Shak. 3. To read or repeat line by line; as, to line out a hymn. This custom of reading or lining, or, as it was frequently called "deaconing' the hymn or psalm in the churches, was brought about partly from necessity. N. D. Gould. 4. To form into a line; to align; as, to line troops. To line bees, to track wild bees to their nest by following their line of flight. -- To line up (Mach.), to put in alignment; to put in correct adjustment for smooth running. See 3d Line, 19.
appear: 1. To come or be in sight; to be in view; to become visible. And God . . . said, Let . . . the dry land appear. Gen. i. 9. 2. To come before the public; as, a great writer appeared at that time. 3. To stand in presence of some authority, tribunal, or superior person, to answer a charge, plead a cause, or the like; to present one's self as a party or advocate before a court, or as a person to be tried. We must all appear before the judgment seat. * Cor. v. 10. One ruffian escaped because no prosecutor dared to appear. Macaulay. 4. To become visible to the apprehension of the mind; to be known as a subject of observation or comprehension, or as a thing proved; to be obvious or manifest. It doth not yet appear what we shall be. 1 John iii. 2. Of their vain contest appeared no end. Milton. 5. To seem; to have a certain semblance; to look. They disfigure their faces, that they may appear unto men to fast. Matt. vi. 16. Syn. -- To seem; look. See Seem.  Appearance. [Obs.] J. Fletcher.
spend: 1. To weigh or lay out; to dispose of; to part with; as, to spend money for clothing. Spend thou that in the town. Shak. Wherefore do ye spend money for that which is not bread Isa. lv. 2. 2. To bestow; to employ; -- often with on or upon. I . . . am never loath To spend my judgment. Herbert. 3. To consume; to waste; to squander; to exhaust; as, to spend an estate in gaming or other vices. 4. To pass, as time; to suffer to pass away; as, to spend a day idly; to spend winter abroad. We spend our years as a tale that is told. Ps. xc. 9. 5. To exhaust of force or strength; to waste; to wear away; as, the violence of the waves was spent. Their bodies spent with long labor and thirst. Knolles.  1. To expend money or any other possession; to consume, use, waste, or part with, anything; as, he who gets easily spends freely. He spends as a person who knows that he must come to a reckoning. South. 2. To waste or wear away; to be consumed; to lose force or strength; to vanish; as, energy spends in the using of it. The sound spendeth and is dissipated in the open air. Bacon. 3. To be diffused; to spread. The vines that they use for wine are so often cut, that their sap spendeth into the grapes. Bacon. 4. (Mining)  To break ground; to continue working.
new: 1. Having existed, or having been made, but a short time; having originated or occured lately; having recently come into existence, or into one's possession; not early or long in being; of late origin; recent; fresh; modern; -- opposed to old, as, a new coat; a new house; a new book; a new fashion. "Your new wife." Chaucer. 2. Not before seen or known, although existing before; lately manifested; recently discovered; as, a new metal; a new planet; new scenes. 3. Newly beginning or recurring; starting anew; now commencing; different from has been; as, a new year; a new course or direction. 4. As if lately begun or made; having the state or quality of original freshness; also, changed for the better; renovated; unworn; untried; unspent; as, rest and travel made him a new man. Steadfasty purposing to lead a new life. Bk. of Com. Prayer. Men after long emaciating diets, fat, and almost new. Bacon. 5. Not of ancient extraction, or of a family of ancient descent; not previously kniwn or famous. Addison. 6. Not habituated; not familiar; unaccustomed. New to the plow, unpracticed in the trace. Pope. 7. Fresh from anything; newly come. New from her sickness to that northern air. Dryden. New birth. See under Birth. -- New Church, or New Jerusalem Church, the church holding the doctrines taught by Emanuel Swedenborg. See Swedenborgian. -- New heart (Theol.), a heart or character changed by the power of God, so as to be governed by new and holy motives. -- New land, land ckeared and cultivated for the first time. -- New light. (Zoöl.) See Crappie. -- New moon. (a) The moon in its first quarter, or when it first appears after being invisible. (b) The day when the new moon is first seen; the first day of the lunar month, which was a holy day among the Jews. 2 Kings iv. 23. -- New Red Sandstone (Geol.), an old name for the formation immediately above the coal measures or strata, now divided into the Permian and Trias. See Sandstone. -- New style. See Style. -- New testament. See under Testament. -- New world, the land of the Western Hemisphere; -- so called because not known to the inhabitants of the Eastern Hemisphere until recent times. Syn. -- Novel; recent; fresh; modern. See Novel.  Newly; recently. Chaucer. Note: New is much used in composition, adverbially, in the sense of newly, recently, to quality other words, as in new-born, new-formed, new-found, new-mown. Of new, anew. [Obs.] Chaucer.  To make new; to renew. [Obs.]
safe: 1. Free from harm, injury, or risk; untouched or unthreatened by danger or injury; unharmed; unhurt; secure; whole; as, safe from disease; safe from storms; safe from foes. "And ye dwelled safe." 1 Sam. xii. 11. They escaped all safe all safe to land. Acts xxvii. 44. Established in a safe, unenvied throne. Milton. 2. Conferring safety; securing from harm; not exposing to danger; confining securely; to be relied upon; not dangerous; as, a safe harbor; a safe bridge, etc. "The man of safe discretion." Shak. The King of heaven hath doomed This place our dungeon, not our safe retreat. Milton. 3. Incapable of doing harm; no longer dangerous; in secure care or custody; as, the prisoner is safe. But Banquo's safe Ay, my good lord, safe in a ditch he bides. Shak. Safe hit (Baseball), a hit which enables the batter to get to first base even if no error is made by the other side. Syn. -- Secure; unendangered; sure.  A place for keeping things in safety. Specifically: (a) A strong and fireproof receptacle (as a movable chest of steel, etc., or a closet or vault of brickwork) for money, valuable papers, or the like. (b) A ventilated or refrigerated chest or closet for securing provisions from noxious animals or insects.  To render safe; to make right. [Obs.] Shak.
bear: 1. To support or sustain; to hold up. 2. To support and remove or carry; to convey. I 'll bear your logs the while. Shak. 3. To conduct; to bring; -- said of persons. [Obs.] Bear them to my house. Shak. 4. To possess and use, as power; to exercise. Every man should bear rule in his own house. Esther i. 22. 5. To sustain; to have on (written or inscribed, or as a mark), as, the tablet bears this inscription. 6. To possess or carry, as a mark of authority or distinction; to wear; as, to bear a sword, badge, or name. 7. To possess mentally; to carry or hold in the mind; to entertain; to harbor Dryden. The ancient grudge I bear him. Shak. 8. To endure; to tolerate; to undergo; to suffer. Should such a man, too fond to rule alone, Bear, like the Turk, no brother near the throne. Pope. I cannot bear The murmur of this lake to hear. Shelley. My punishment is greater than I can bear. Gen. iv. 13. 9. To gain or win. [Obs.] Some think to bear it by speaking a great word. Bacon. She was . . . found not guilty, through bearing of friends and bribing of the judge. Latimer. 10. To sustain, or be answerable for, as blame, expense, responsibility, etc. He shall bear their iniquities. Is. liii. 11. Somewhat that will bear your charges. Dryden. 11. To render or give; to bring forward. "Your testimony bear" Dryden. 12. To carry on, or maintain; to have. "The credit of bearing a part in the conversation." Locke. 13. To admit or be capable of; that is, to suffer or sustain without violence, injury, or change. In all criminal cases the most favorable interpretation should be put on words that they can possibly bear. Swift. 14. To manage, wield, or direct. "Thus must thou thy body bear." Shak. Hence: To behave; to conduct. Hath he borne himself penitently in prison Shak. 15. To afford; to be to ; to supply with. bear him company. Pope. 16. To bring forth or produce; to yield; as, to bear apples; to bear children; to bear interest. Here dwelt the man divine whom Samos bore. Dryden. Note: In the passive form of this verb, the best modern usage restricts the past participle born to the sense of brought forth, while borne is used in the other senses of the word. In the active form, borne alone is used as the past participle. To bear down. (a) To force into a lower place; to carry down; to depress or sink. "His nose, . . . large as were the others, bore them down into insignificance." Marryat. (b) To overthrow or crush by force; as, to bear down an enemy. -- To bear a hand. (a) To help; to give assistance. (b) (Naut.) To make haste; to be quick. -- To bear in hand, to keep (one) up in expectation, usually by promises never to be realized; to amuse by false pretenses; to delude. [Obs.] "How you were borne in hand, how crossed." Shak. -- To bear in mind, to remember. -- To bear off. (a) To restrain; to keep from approach. (b) (Naut.) To remove to a distance; to keep clear from rubbing against anything; as, to bear off a blow; to bear off a boat. (c) To gain; to carry off, as a prize. -- To bear one hard, to owe one a grudge. [Obs.] "Cæsar doth bear me hard." Shak. -- To bear out. (a) To maintain and support to the end; to defend to the last. "Company only can bear a man out in an ill thing." South. (b) To corroborate; to confirm. -- To bear up, to support; to keep from falling or sinking. "Religious hope bears up the mind under sufferings." Addison. Syn. -- To uphold; sustain; maintain; support; undergo; suffer; endure; tolerate; carry; convey; transport; waft.  1. To produce, as fruit; to be fruitful, in opposition to barrenness. This age to blossom, and the next to bear. Dryden. 2. To suffer, as in carrying a burden. But man is born to bear. Pope. 3. To endure with patience; to be patient. I can not, can not bear. Dryden. 4. To press; -- with on or upon, or against. These men bear hard on the suspected party. Addison. 5. To take effect; to have influence or force; as, to bring matters to bear. 6. To relate or refer; -- with on or upon; as, how does this bear on the question 7. To have a certain meaning, intent, or effect. Her sentence bore that she should stand a certain time upon the platform. Hawthorne. 8. To be situated, as to the point of compass, with respect to something else; as, the land bears N. by E. To bear against, to approach for attack or seizure; as, a lion bears against his prey. [Obs.] -- To bear away (Naut.), to change the course of a ship, and make her run before the wind. -- To bear back, to retreat. "Bearing back from the blows of their sable antagonist." Sir W. Scott. -- To bear down upon (Naut.), to approach from the windward side; as, the fleet bore down upon the enemy. -- To bear in with (Naut.), to run or tend toward; as, a ship bears in with the land. -- To bear off (Naut.), to steer away, as from land. -- To bear up. (a) To be supported; to have fortitude; to be firm; not to sink; as, to bear up under afflictions. (b) (Naut.) To put the helm up (or to windward) and so put the ship before the wind; to bear away. Hamersly. -- To bear upon (Mil.), to be pointed or situated so as to affect; to be pointed directly against, or so as to hit (the object); as, to bring or plant guns so as to bear upon a fort or a ship; the artillery bore upon the center. -- To bear up to, to tend or move toward; as, to bear up to one another. -- To bear with, to endure; to be indulgent to; to forbear to resent, oppose, or punish.  A bier. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. (Zoöl.)  Any species of the genus Ursus, and of the closely allied genera. Bears are plantigrade Carnivora, but they live largely on fruit and insects. Note: The European brown bear (U. arctos), the white polar bear (U. maritimus), the grizzly bear (U. horribilis), the American black bear, and its variety the cinnamon bear (U. Americanus), the Syrian bear (Ursus Syriacus), and the sloth bear, are among the notable species. 2. (Zoöl.)  An animal which has some resemblance to a bear in form or habits, but no real affinity; as, the woolly bear; ant bear; water bear; sea bear. 3. (Astron.)  One of two constellations in the northern hemisphere, called respectively the Great Bear and the Lesser Bear, or Ursa Major and Ursa Minor. 4. Metaphorically: A brutal, coarse, or morose person. 5. (Stock Exchange)  A person who sells stocks or securities for future delivery in expectation of a fall in the market. Note: The bears and bulls of the Stock Exchange, whose interest it is, the one to depress, and the other to raise, stocks, are said to be so called in allusion to the bear's habit of pulling down, and the bull's of tossing up. 6. (Mach.)  A portable punching machine. 7. (Naut.)  A block covered with coarse matting; -- used to scour the deck. Australian bear. (Zoöl.) See Koala. -- Bear baiting, the sport of baiting bears with dogs. -- Bear caterpillar (Zoöl.), the hairy larva of a moth, esp. of the genus Euprepia. -- Bear garden. (a) A place where bears are kept for diversion or fighting. (b) Any place where riotous conduct is common or permitted. M. Arnold. -- Bear leader, one who leads about a performing bear for money; hence, a facetious term for one who takes charge of a young man on his travels.  To endeavor to depress the price of, or prices in; as, to bear a railroad stock; to bear the market.  Barley; the six-rowed barley or the four-rowed barley, commonly the former (Hord. vulgare). [Obs. except in North of Eng. and Scot.]
bread: To spread. [Obs.] Ray.  1. An article of food made from flour or meal by moistening, kneading, and baking. Note: Raised bread is made with yeast, salt, and sometimes a little butter or lard, and is mixed with warm milk or water to form the dough, which, after kneading, is given time to rise before baking. -- Cream of tartar bread is raised by the action of an alkaline carbonate or bicarbonate (as saleratus or ammonium bicarbonate) and cream of tartar (acid tartrate of potassium) or some acid. -- Unleavened bread is usually mixed with water and salt only. Aërated bread. See under Aërated. Bread and butter (fig.), means of living. -- Brown bread, Indian bread, Graham bread, Rye and Indian bread. See Brown bread, under Brown. -- Bread tree. See Breadfruit. 2. Food; sustenance; support of life, in general. Give us this day our daily bread. Matt. vi. 11  To cover with bread crumbs, preparatory to cooking; as, breaded cutlets.
high: To hie. [Obs.] Men must high them apace, and make haste. Holland.  1. Elevated above any starting point of measurement, as a line, or surface; having altitude; lifted up; raised or extended in the direction of the zenith; lofty; tall; as, a high mountain, tower, tree; the sun is high. 2. Regarded as raised up or elevated; distinguished; remarkable; conspicuous; superior; -- used indefinitely or relatively, and often in figurative senses, which are understood from the connection; as - (a) Elevated in character or quality, whether moral or intellectual; preëminent; honorable; as, high aims, or motives. "The highest faculty of the soul." Baxter. (b) Exalted in social standing or general estimation, or in rank, reputation, office, and the like; dignified; as, she was welcomed in the highest circles. He was a wight of high renown. Shak. (c) Of noble birth; illustrious; as, of high family. (d) Of great strength, force, importance, and the like; strong; mighty; powerful; violent; sometimes, triumphant; victorious; majestic, etc.; as, a high wind; high passions. "With rather a high manner." Thackeray. Strong is thy hand, and high is thy right hand. Ps. lxxxix. 13. Can heavenly minds such high resentment show Dryden. (e) Very abstract; difficult to comprehend or surmount; grand; noble. Both meet to hear and answer such high things. Shak. Plain living and high thinking are no more. Wordsworth. (f) Costly; dear in price; extravagant; as, to hold goods at a high price. If they must be good at so high a rate, they know they may be safe at a cheaper. South. (g) Arrogant; lofty; boastful; proud; ostentatious; -- used in a bad sense. An high look and a proud heart . . . is sin. Prov. xxi. 4. His forces, after all the high discourses, amounted really but to eighteen hundred foot. Clarendon. 3. Possessing a characteristic quality in a supreme or superior degree; as, high (i. e., intense) heat; high (i. e., full or quite) noon; high (i. e., rich or spicy) seasoning; high (i. e., complete) pleasure; high (i. e., deep or vivid) color; high (i. e., extensive, thorough) scholarship, etc. High time it is this war now ended were. Spenser. High sauces and spices are fetched from the Indies. Baker. 4. (Cookery)  Strong-scented; slightly tainted; as, epicures do not cook game before it is high. 5. (Mus.)  Acute or sharp; -- opposed to grave or low; as, a high note. 6. (Phon.)  Made with a high position of some part of the tongue in relation to the palate, as e (eve), oo (food). See Guide to Pronunciation, §§ 10, 11. High admiral, the chief admiral. -- High altar, the principal altar in a church. -- High and dry, out of water; out of reach of the current or tide; -- said of a vessel, aground or beached. -- High and mighty arrogant; overbearing. [Colloq.] -- High art, art which deals with lofty and dignified subjects and is characterized by an elevated style avoiding all meretricious display. -- High bailiff, the chief bailiff. -- High Church, and Low Church, two ecclesiastical parties in the Church of England and the Protestant Episcopal Church. The high- churchmen emphasize the doctrine of the apostolic succession, and hold, in general, to a sacramental presence in the Eucharist, to baptismal regeneration, and to the sole validity of Episcopal ordination. They attach much importance to ceremonies and symbols in worship. Low-churchmen lay less stress on these points, and, in many instances, reject altogether the peculiar tenets of the high-church school. See Broad Church. -- High constable (Law), a chief of constabulary. See Constable, n., 2. -- High commission court,a court of ecclesiastical jurisdiction in England erected and united to the regal power by Queen Elizabeth in 1559. On account of the abuse of its powers it was abolished in 1641. -- High day (Script.), a holy or feast day. John xix. 31. -- High festival (Eccl.), a festival to be observed with full ceremonial. -- High German, or High Dutch. See under German. -- High jinks, an old Scottish pastime; hence, noisy revelry; wild sport. [Colloq.] "All the high jinks of the county, when the lad comes of age." F. Harrison. -- High latitude (Geog.), one designated by the higher figures; consequently, a latitude remote from the equator. -- High life, life among the aristocracy or the rich. -- High liver, one who indulges in a rich diet. -- High living, a feeding upon rich, pampering food. -- High Mass. (R. C. Ch.) See under Mass. -- High milling, a process of making flour from grain by several successive grindings and intermediate sorting, instead of by a single grinding. -- High noon, the time when the sun is in the meridian. -- High place (Script.), an eminence or mound on which sacrifices were offered. -- High priest. See in the Vocabulary. -- High relief. (Fine Arts) See Alto-rilievo. -- High school. See under School. High seas (Law), the open sea; the part of the ocean not in the territorial waters of any particular sovereignty, usually distant three miles or more from the coast line. Wharton. -- High steam, steam having a high pressure. -- High steward, the chief steward. -- High tea, tea with meats and extra relishes. -- High tide, the greatest flow of the tide; high water. -- High time. (a) Quite time; full time for the occasion. (b) A time of great excitement or enjoyment; a carousal. [Slang] -- High treason, treason against the sovereign or the state, the highest civil offense. See Treason. Note: It is now sufficient to speak of high treason as treason simply, seeing that petty treason, as a distinct offense, has been abolished. Mozley & W. -- High water, the utmost flow or greatest elevation of the tide; also, the time of such elevation. -- High-water mark. (a) That line of the seashore to which the waters ordinarily reach at high water. (b) A mark showing the highest level reached by water in a river or other body of fresh water, as in time of freshet. -- High-water shrub (Bot.), a composite shrub (Iva frutescens), growing in salt marshes along the Atlantic coast of the United States. -- High wine, distilled spirits containing a high percentage of alcohol; -- usually in the plural. -- To be on a high horse, to be on one's dignity; to bear one's self loftily. [Colloq.] -- With a high hand. (a) With power; in force; triumphantly. "The children of Israel went out with a high hand." Ex. xiv. 8.(b) In an overbearing manner, arbitrarily. "They governed the city with a high hand." Jowett (Thucyd. ). Syn. -- Tall; lofty; elevated; noble; exalted; supercilious; proud; violent; full; dear. See Tall.  In a high manner; in a high place; to a great altitude; to a great degree; largely; in a superior manner; eminently; powerfully. "And reasoned high." Milton. "I can not reach so high." Shak. Note: High is extensively used in the formation of compound words, most of which are of very obvious signification; as, high-aimed, high-arched, high-aspiring, high-bearing, high-boasting, high-browed, high-crested, high-crowned, high-designing, high-engendered, high- feeding, high-flaming, high-flavored, high-gazing, high-heaped, high- heeled, high-priced, high-reared, high-resolved, high-rigged, high- seated, high-shouldered, high-soaring, high-towering, high-voiced, and the like. High and low, everywhere; in all supposable places; as, I hunted high and low. [Colloq.]  1. An elevated place; a superior region; a height; the sky; heaven. 2. People of rank or high station; as, high and low. 3. (Card Playing)  The highest card dealt or drawn. High, low, jack, and the game, a game at cards; -- also called all fours, old sledge, and seven up. -- In high and low, utterly; completely; in every respect. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- On high, aloft; above. The dayspring from on high hath visited us. Luke i. 78. -- The Most High, the Supreme Being; God.  To rise; as, the sun higheth. [Obs.]
point: To appoint. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. That which pricks or pierces; the sharp end of anything, esp. the sharp end of a piercing instrument, as a needle or a pin. 2. An instrument which pricks or pierces, as a sort of needle used by engravers, etchers, lace workers, and others; also, a pointed cutting tool, as a stone cutter's point; -- called also pointer. 3. Anything which tapers to a sharp, well-defined termination. Specifically: A small promontory or cape; a tract of land extending into the water beyond the common shore line. 4. The mark made by the end of a sharp, piercing instrument, as a needle; a prick. 5. An indefinitely small space; a mere spot indicated or supposed. Specifically: (Geom.) That which has neither parts nor magnitude; that which has position, but has neither length, breadth, nor thickness, -- sometimes conceived of as the limit of a line; that by the motion of which a line is conceived to be produced. 6. An indivisible portion of time; a moment; an instant; hence, the verge. When time's first point begun Made he all souls. Sir J. Davies. 7. A mark of punctuation; a character used to mark the divisions of a composition, or the pauses to be observed in reading, or to point off groups of figures, etc.; a stop, as a comma, a semicolon, and esp. a period; hence, figuratively, an end, or conclusion. And there a point, for ended is my tale. Chaucer. Commas and points they set exactly right. Pope. 8. Whatever serves to mark progress, rank, or relative position, or to indicate a transition from one state or position to another, degree; step; stage; hence, position or condition attained; as, a point of elevation, or of depression; the stock fell off five points; he won by tenpoints. "A point of precedence." Selden. "Creeping on from point to point." Tennyson. A lord full fat and in good point. Chaucer. 9. That which arrests attention, or indicates qualities or character; a salient feature; a characteristic; a peculiarity; hence, a particular; an item; a detail; as, the good or bad points of a man, a horse, a book, a story, etc. He told him, point for point, in short and plain. Chaucer. In point of religion and in point of honor. Bacon. Shalt thou dispute With Him the points of liberty Milton. 10. Hence, the most prominent or important feature, as of an argument, discourse, etc.; the essential matter; esp., the proposition to be established; as, the point of an anecdote. "Here lies the point." Shak. They will hardly prove his point. Arbuthnot. 11. A small matter; a trifle; a least consideration; a punctilio. This fellow doth not stand upon points. Shak. [He] cared not for God or man a point. Spenser. 12. (Mus.)  A dot or mark used to designate certain tones or time; as: (a) (Anc. Mus.) A dot or mark distinguishing or characterizing certain tones or styles; as, points of perfection, of augmentation, etc.; hence, a note; a tune. "Sound the trumpet -- not a levant, or a flourish, but a point of war." Sir W. Scott. (b) (Mod. Mus.) A dot placed at the right hand of a note, to raise its value, or prolong its time, by one half, as to make a whole note equal to three half notes, a half note equal to three quarter notes. 13. (Astron.)  A fixed conventional place for reference, or zero of reckoning, in the heavens, usually the intersection of two or more great circles of the sphere, and named specifically in each case according to the position intended; as, the equinoctial points; the solstitial points; the nodal points; vertical points, etc. See Equinoctial Nodal. 14. (Her.)  One of the several different parts of the escutcheon. See Escutcheon. 15. (Naut.) (a) One of the points of the compass (see Points of the compass, below); also, the difference between two points of the compass; as, to fall off a point. (b) A short piece of cordage used in reefing sails. See Reef point, under Reef. 16. (Anc. Costume)  A a string or lace used to tie together certain parts of the dress. Sir W. Scott. 17. Lace wrought the needle; as, point de Venise; Brussels point. See Point lace, below. 18. pl. (Railways)  A switch. [Eng.] 19. An item of private information; a hint; a tip; a pointer. [Cant, U. S.] 20. (Cricket)  A fielder who is stationed on the off side, about twelve or fifteen yards from, and a little in advance of, the batsman. 21. The attitude assumed by a pointer dog when he finds game; as, the dog came to a point. See Pointer. 22. (Type Making)  A standard unit of measure for the size of type bodies, being one twelfth of the thickness of pica type. See Point system of type, under Type. 23. A tyne or snag of an antler. 24. One of the spaces on a backgammon board. 25. (Fencing)  A movement executed with the saber or foil; as, tierce point. Note: The word point is a general term, much used in the sciences, particularly in mathematics, mechanics, perspective, and physics, but generally either in the geometrical sense, or in that of degree, or condition of change, and with some accompanying descriptive or qualifying term, under which, in the vocabulary, the specific uses are explained; as, boiling point, carbon point, dry point, freezing point, melting point, vanishing point, etc. At all points, in every particular, completely; perfectly. Shak. -- At point, In point, At, In, or On, the point, as near as can be; on the verge; about (see About, prep., 6); as, at the point of death; he was on the point of speaking. "In point to fall down." Chaucer. "Caius Sidius Geta, at point to have been taken, recovered himself so valiantly as brought day on his side." Milton. -- Dead point. (Mach.) Same as Dead center, under Dead. -- Far point (Med.), in ophthalmology, the farthest point at which objects are seen distinctly. In normal eyes the nearest point at which objects are seen distinctly; either with the two eyes together (binocular near point), or with each eye separately (monocular near point). -- Nine points of the law, all but the tenth point; the greater weight of authority. -- On the point. See At point, above. -- Point lace, lace wrought with the needle, as distinguished from that made on the pillow. -- Point net, a machine-made lace imitating a kind of Brussels lace (Brussels ground). -- Point of concurrence (Geom.), a point common to two lines, but not a point of tangency or of intersection, as, for instance, that in which a cycloid meets its base. -- Point of contrary flexure, a point at which a curve changes its direction of curvature, or at which its convexity and concavity change sides. -- Point of order, in parliamentary practice, a question of order or propriety under the rules. -- Point of sight (Persp.), in a perspective drawing, the point assumed as that occupied by the eye of the spectator. -- Point of view, the relative position from which anything is seen or any subject is considered. -- Points of the compass (Naut.), the thirty-two points of division of the compass card in the mariner's compass; the corresponding points by which the circle of the horizon is supposed to be divided, of which the four marking the directions of east, west, north, and south, are called cardinal points, and the rest are named from their respective directions, as N. by E., N. N. E., N. E. by N., N. E., etc. See Illust. under Compass. -- Point paper, paper pricked through so as to form a stencil for transferring a design. -- Point system of type. See under Type. -- Singular point (Geom.), a point of a curve which possesses some property not possessed by points in general on the curve, as a cusp, a point of inflection, a node, etc. -- To carry one's point, to accomplish one's object, as in a controversy. -- To make a point of, to attach special importance to. -- To make, or gain, a point, accomplish that which was proposed; also, to make advance by a step, grade, or position. -- To mark, or score, a point, as in billiards, cricket, etc., to note down, or to make, a successful hit, run, etc. -- To strain a point, to go beyond the proper limit or rule; to stretch one's authority or conscience. -- Vowel point, in Hebrew, and certain other Eastern and ancient languages, a mark placed above or below the consonant, or attached to it, representing the vowel, or vocal sound, which precedes or follows the consonant.  1. To give a point to; to sharpen; to cut, forge, grind, or file to an acute end; as, to point a dart, or a pencil. Used also figuratively; as, to point a moral. 2. To direct toward an abject; to aim; as, to point a gun at a wolf, or a cannon at a fort. 3. Hence, to direct the attention or notice of. Whosoever should be guided through his battles by Minerva, and pointed to every scene of them. Pope. 4. To supply with punctuation marks; to punctuate; as, to point a composition. 5. To mark (as Hebrew) with vowel points. 6. To give particular prominence to; to designate in a special manner; to indicate, as if by pointing; as, the error was pointed out. Pope. He points it, however, by no deviation from his straightforward manner of speech. Dickens. 7. To indicate or discover by a fixed look, as game. 8. (Masonry)  To fill up and finish the joints of (a wall), by introducing additional cement or mortar, and bringing it to a smooth surface. 9. (Stone Cutting)  To cut, as a surface, with a pointed tool. To point a rope (Naut.), to taper and neatly finish off the end by interweaving the nettles. -- To point a sail (Naut.), to affix points through the eyelet holes of the reefs. -- To point off, to divide into periods or groups, or to separate, by pointing, as figures. -- To point the yards (of a vessel) (Naut.), to brace them so that the wind shall strike the sails obliquely. Totten.  1. To direct the point of something, as of a finger, for the purpose of designating an object, and attracting attention to it; -- with at. Now must the world point at poor Katharine. Shak. Point at the tattered coat and ragged shoe. Dryden. 2. To indicate the presence of game by fixed and steady look, as certain hunting dogs do. He treads with caution, and he points with fear. Gay. 3. (Med.)  To approximate to the surface; to head; -- said of an abscess. To point at, to treat with scorn or contempt by pointing or directing attention to. -- To point well (Naut.), to sail close to the wind; -- said of a vessel.
broad: 1. Wide; extend in breadth, or from side to side; -- opposed to narrow; as, a broad street, a broad table; an inch broad. 2. Extending far and wide; extensive; vast; as, the broad expanse of ocean. 3. Extended, in the sense of diffused; open; clear; full. "Broad and open day." Bp. Porteus. 4. Fig.: Having a large measure of any thing or quality; not limited; not restrained; -- applied to any subject, and retaining the literal idea more or less clearly, the precise meaning depending largely on the substantive. A broad mixture of falsehood. Locke. Note: Hence: - 5. Comprehensive; liberal; enlarged. The words in the Constitution are broad enough to include the case. D. Daggett. In a broad, statesmanlike, and masterly way. E. Everett. 6. Plain; evident; as, a broad hint. 7. Free; unrestrained; unconfined. As broad and general as the casing air. Shak. 8. (Fine Arts)  Characterized by breadth. See Breadth. 9. Cross; coarse; indelicate; as, a broad compliment; a broad joke; broad humor. 10. Strongly marked; as, a broad Scotch accent. Note: Broad is often used in compounds to signify wide, large, etc.; as, broad-chested, broad-shouldered, broad-spreading, broad-winged. Broad acres. See under Acre. -- Broad arrow, originally a pheon. See Pheon, and Broad arrow under Arrow. -- As broad as long, having the length equal to the breadth; hence, the same one way as another; coming to the same result by different ways or processes. It is as broad as long, whether they rise to others, or bring others down to them. L'Estrange. Broad pennant. See under Pennant. Syn. -- Wide; large; ample; expanded; spacious; roomy; extensive; vast; comprehensive; liberal.  1. The broad part of anything; as, the broad of an oar. 2. The spread of a river into a sheet of water; a flooded fen. [Local, Eng.] Southey. 3. A lathe tool for turning down the insides and bottoms of cylinders. Knight.
thank: A expression of gratitude; an acknowledgment expressive of a sense of favor or kindness received; obligation, claim, or desert, or gratitude; -- now generally used in the plural. "This ceremonial thanks." Massinger. If ye do good to them which do good to you, what thank have ye for sinners also do even the same. Luke vi. 33. What great thank, then, if any man, reputed wise and constant, will neither do, nor permit others under his charge to do, that which he approves not, especially in matter of sin Milton. Thanks, thanks to thee, most worthy friend, For the lesson thou hast taught. Longfellow. His thanks, Her thanks, etc., of his or her own accord; with his or her good will; voluntary. [Obs.] Full sooth is said that love ne lordship, Will not, his thanks, have no fellowship. Chaucer. -- In thank, with thanks or thankfulness. [Obs.] -- Thank offering, an offering made as an expression of thanks.  To express gratitude to (anyone) for a favor; to make acknowledgments to (anyone) for kindness bestowed; -- used also ironically for blame. "Graunt mercy, lord, that thank I you," quod she. Chaucer. I thank thee for thine honest care. Shak. Weigh the danger with the doubtful bliss, And thank yourself if aught should fall amiss. Dryden.
oxygen: 1. (Chem.)  A colorless, tasteless, odorless, gaseous element occurring in the free state in the atmosphere, of which it forms about 23 per cent by weight and about 21 per cent by volume, being slightly heavier than nitrogen. Symbol O. Atomic weight 15.96. Note: It occurs combined in immense quantities, forming eight ninths by weight of water, and probably one half by weight of the entire solid crust of the globe, being an ingredient of silica, the silicates, sulphates, carbonates, nitrates, etc. Oxygen combines with all elements (except fluorine), forming oxides, bases, oxyacid anhydrides, etc., the process in general being called oxidation, of which combustion is only an intense modification. At ordinary temperatures with most substances it is moderately active, but at higher temperatures it is one of the most violent and powerful chemical agents known. It is indispensable in respiration, and in general is the most universally active and efficient element. It may be prepared in the pure state by heating potassium chlorate. This element (called dephlogisticated air by Priestley) was named oxygen by Lavoisier because he supposed it to be a constituent of all acids. This is not so in the case of a very few acids (as hydrochloric, hydrobromic, hydric sulphide, etc.), but these do contain elements analogous to oxygen in property and action. Moreover, the fact that most elements approach the nearer to acid qualities in proportion as they are combined with more oxygen, shows the great accuracy and breadth of Lavoisier's conception of its nature. 2. Chlorine used in bleaching. [Manufacturing name]
age: 1. The whole duration of a being, whether animal, vegetable, or other kind; lifetime. Mine age is as nothing before thee. Ps. xxxix. 5. 2. That part of the duration of a being or a thing which is between its beginning and any given time; as, what is the present age of a man, or of the earth 3. The latter part of life; an advanced period of life; seniority; state of being old. Nor wrong mine age with this indignity. Shak. 4. One of the stages of life; as, the age of infancy, of youth, etc. Shak. 5. Mature age; especially, the time of life at which one attains full personal rights and capacities; as, to come of age; he (or she) is of age. Abbott. Note: In the United States, both males and females are of age when twenty-one years old. 6. The time of life at which some particular power or capacity is understood to become vested; as, the age of consent; the age of discretion. Abbott. 7. A particular period of time in history, as distinguished from others; as, the golden age, the age of Pericles. "The spirit of the age." Prescott. Truth, in some age or other, will find her witness. Milton. Archeological ages are designated as three: The Stone age (the early and the later stone age, called paleolithic and neolithic), the Bronze age, and the Iron age. During the Age of Stone man is supposed to have employed stone for weapons and implements. See Augustan, Brazen, Golden, Heroic, Middle. 8. A great period in the history of the Earth. Note: The geologic ages are as follows: 1. The Archæan, including the time when was no life and the time of the earliest and simplest forms of life. 2. The age of Invertebrates, or the Silurian, when the life on the globe consisted distinctively of invertebrates. 3. The age of Fishes, or the Devonian, when fishes were the dominant race. 4. The age of Coal Plants, or Acrogens, or the Carboniferous age. 5. The Mesozoic or Secondary age, or age of Reptiles, when reptiles prevailed in great numbers and of vast size. 6. The Tertiary age, or age of Mammals, when the mammalia, or quadrupeds, abounded, and were the dominant race. 7. The Quaternary age, or age of Man, or the modern era. Dana. 9. A century; the period of one hundred years. Fleury . . . apologizes for these five ages. Hallam. 10. The people who live at a particular period; hence, a generation. "Ages yet unborn." Pope. The way which the age follows. J. H. Newman. Lo! where the stage, the poor, degraded stage, Holds its warped mirror to a gaping age. C. Sprague. 11. A long time. [Colloq.] "He made minutes an age." Tennyson. Age of a tide, the time from the origin of a tide in the South Pacific Ocean to its arrival at a given place. -- Moon's age, the time that has elapsed since the last preceding conjunction of the sun and moon. Note: Age is used to form the first part of many compounds; as, agelasting, age-adorning, age-worn, age-enfeebled, agelong. Syn. -- Time; period; generation; date; era; epoch.  To grow aged; to become old; to show marks of age; as, he grew fat as he aged. They live one hundred and thirty years, and never age for all that. Holland. I am aging; that is, I have a whitish, or rather a light-colored, hair here and there. Landor.  To cause to grow old; to impart the characteristics of age to; as, grief ages us.
often: Frequently; many times; not seldom.  Frequent; common; repeated. [R.] "Thine often infirmities." 1 Tim. v. 23. And weary thee with often welcomes. Beau. & Fl.
dry: 1. Free from moisture; having little humidity or none; arid; not wet or moist; deficient in the natural or normal supply of moisture, as rain or fluid of any kind; -- said especially: (a) Of the weather: Free from rain or mist. The weather, we agreed, was too dry for the season. Addison. (b) Of vegetable matter: Free from juices or sap; not succulent; not green; as, dry wood or hay. (c) Of animals: Not giving milk; as, the cow is dry. (d) Of persons: Thirsty; needing drink. Give the dry fool drink. Shak (e) Of the eyes: Not shedding tears. Not a dry eye was to be seen in the assembly. Prescott. (f) (Med.)  Of certain morbid conditions, in which there is entire or comparative absence of moisture; as, dry gangrene; dry catarrh. 2. Destitute of that which interests or amuses; barren; unembellished; jejune; plain. These epistles will become less dry, more susceptible of ornament. Pope. 3. Characterized by a quality somewhat severe, grave, or hard; hence, sharp; keen; shrewd; quaint; as, a dry tone or manner; dry wit. He was rather a dry, shrewd kind of body. W. Irving. 4. (Fine Arts)  Exhibiting a sharp, frigid preciseness of execution, or the want of a delicate contour in form, and of easy transition in coloring. Dry area (Arch.), a small open space reserved outside the foundation of a building to guard it from damp. -- Dry blow. (a) (Med.) A blow which inflicts no wound, and causes no effusion of blood. (b) A quick, sharp blow. -- Dry bone (Min.), Smithsonite, or carbonate of zinc; -- a miner's term. -- Dry castor (Zoöl.) a kind of beaver; -- called also parchment beaver. -- Dry cupping. (Med.) See under Cupping. -- Dry dock. See under Dock. -- Dry fat. See Dry vat (below). -- Dry light, pure unobstructed light; hence, a clear, impartial view. Bacon. The scientific man must keep his feelings under stern control, lest they obtrude into his researches, and color the dry light in which alone science desires to see its objects. J. C. Shairp. -- Dry masonry. See Masonry. -- Dry measure, a system of measures of volume for dry or coarse articles, by the bushel, peck, etc. -- Dry pile (Physics), a form of the Voltaic pile, constructed without the use of a liquid, affording a feeble current, and chiefly useful in the construction of electroscopes of great delicacy; -- called also Zamboni's , from the names of the two earliest constructors of it. -- Dry pipe (Steam Engine), a pipe which conducts dry steam from a boiler. -- Dry plate (Photog.), a glass plate having a dry coating sensitive to light, upon which photographic negatives or pictures can be made, without moistening. -- Dry-plate process, the process of photographing with dry plates. -- Dry point. (Fine Arts) (a) An engraving made with the needle instead of the burin, in which the work is done nearly as in etching, but is finished without the use acid. (b) A print from such an engraving, usually upon paper. (c) Hence: The needle with which such an engraving is made. -- Dry rent (Eng. Law), a rent reserved by deed, without a clause of distress. Bouvier. -- Dry rot, a decay of timber, reducing its fibers to the condition of a dry powdery dust, often accompanied by the presence of a peculiar fungus (Merulius lacrymans), which is sometimes considered the cause of the decay; but it is more probable that the real cause is the decomposition of the wood itself. D. C. Eaton. Called also sap rot, and, in the United States, powder post. Hebert. -- Dry stove, a hothouse adapted to preserving the plants of arid climates. Brande & C. -- Dry vat, a vat, basket, or other receptacle for dry articles. -- Dry wine, that in which the saccharine matter and fermentation were so exactly balanced, that they have wholly neutralized each other, and no sweetness is perceptible; -- opposed to sweet wine, in which the saccharine matter is in excess.  To make dry; to free from water, or from moisture of any kind, and by any means; to exsiccate; as, to dry the eyes; to dry one's tears; the wind dries the earth; to dry a wet cloth; to dry hay. To dry up. (a) To scorch or parch with thirst; to deprive utterly of water; to consume. Their honorable men are famished, and their multitude dried up with thirst. Is. v. 13. The water of the sea, which formerly covered it, was in time exhaled and dried up by the sun. Woodward. (b) To make to cease, as a stream of talk. Their sources of revenue were dried up. Jowett (Thucyd. ) -- To dry, or dry up, a cow, to cause a cow to cease secreting milk. Tylor.  1. To grow dry; to become free from wetness, moisture, or juice; as, the road dries rapidly. 2. To evaporate wholly; to be exhaled; -- said of moisture, or a liquid; -- sometimes with up; as, the stream dries, or dries up. 3. To shrivel or wither; to lose vitality. And his hand, which he put forth against him, dried up, so that he could not pull it in again to him. I Kings xiii. 4.
been: The past participle of Be. In old authors it is also the pr. tense plural of Be. See 1st Bee. Assembled been a senate grave and stout. Fairfax.
present: 1. Being at hand, within reach or call, within certain contemplated limits; -- opposed to absent. These things have I spoken unto you, being yet present with you. John xiv. 25. 2. Now existing, or in process; begun but not ended; now in view, or under consideration; being at this time; not past or future; as, the present session of Congress; the present state of affairs; the present instance. I'll bring thee to the present business Shak. 3. Not delayed; immediate; instant; coincident. "A present recompense." "A present pardon." Shak. An ambassador . . . desires a present audience. Massinger. 4. Ready; quick in emergency; as a present wit. [R.] 5. Favorably attentive; propitious. [Archaic] To find a god so present to my prayer. Dryden. Present tense (Gram.), the tense or form of a verb which expresses action or being in the present time; as, I am writing, I write, or I do write.  1. Present time; the time being; time in progress now, or at the moment contemplated; as, at this present. Past and present, wound in one. Tennyson. 2. pl. (Law)  Present letters or instrument, as a deed of conveyance, a lease, letter of attorney, or other writing; as in the phrase, " Know all men by these presents," that is, by the writing itself, " per has literas praesentes; " -- in this sense, rarely used in the singular. 3. (Gram.)  A present tense, or the form of the verb denoting the present tense. At present, at the present time; now. -- For the present, for the tine being; temporarily. -- In present, at once, without delay. [Obs.] "With them, in present, half his kingdom; the rest to follow at his death." Milton.  1. To bring or introduce into the presence of some one, especially of a superior; to introduce formally; to offer for acquaintance; as, to present an envoy to the king; (with the reciprocal pronoun) to come into the presence of a superior. Now there was a day when the sons of God came to present themselves before the lord. Job i. 6 2. To exhibit or offer to view or notice; to lay before one's perception or cognizance; to set forth; to present a fine appearance. Lectorides's memory is ever . . . presenting him with the thoughts of other persons. I. Watts. 3. To pass over, esp. in a ceremonious manner; to give in charge or possession; to deliver; to make over. So ladies in romance assist their knight, Present the spear, and arm him for the fight. Pope. 4. To make a gift of; to bestow; to give, generally in a formal or ceremonious manner; to grant; to confer. My last, least offering, I present thee now. Cowper. 5. Hence: To endow; to bestow a gift upon; to favor, as with a donation; also, to court by gifts. Octavia presented the poet for him admirable elegy on her son Marcellus. Dryden. 6. To present; to personate. [Obs.] Shak. 7. In specific uses; (a) To nominate to an ecclesiastical benefice; to offer to the bishop or ordinary as a candidate for institution. The patron of a church may present his clerk to a parsonage or vicarage; that is, may offer him to the bishop of the diocese to be instituted. Blackstone. (b) To nominate for support at a public school or other institution . Lamb. (c) To lay before a public body, or an official, for consideration, as before a legislature, a court of judicature, a corporation, etc.; as, to present a memorial, petition, remonstrance, or indictment. (d) To lay before a court as an object of inquiry; to give notice officially of, as a crime of offence; to find or represent judicially; as, a grand jury present certain offenses or nuisances, or whatever they think to be public injuries. (e) To bring an indictment against . [U.S] (f) To aim, point, or direct, as a weapon; as, to present a pistol or the point of a sword to the breast of another. Pesent arms (Mil.), the command in response to which the gun is carried perpendicularly in front of the center of the body, and held there with the left hand grasping it at the lower band, and the right hand grasping the small of the stock, in token of respect, as in saluting a superior officer; also, the position taken at such a command.  To appear at the mouth of the uterus so as to be perceptible to the finger in vaginal examination; -- said of a part of an infant during labor.  Anything presented or given; a gift; a donative; as, a Christmas present. Syn. -- Gift; donation; donative; benefaction. See Gift.  The position of a soldier in presenting arms; as, to stand at present.
support: 1. To bear by being under; to keep from falling; to uphold; to sustain, in a literal or physical sense; to prop up; to bear the weight of; as, a pillar supports a structure; an abutment supports an arch; the trunk of a tree supports the branches. 2. To endure without being overcome, exhausted, or changed in character; to sustain; as, to support pain, distress, or misfortunes. This fierce demeanor and his insolence The patience of a god could not support. Dryden. 3. To keep from failing or sinking; to solace under affictive circumstances; to assist; to encourage; to defend; as, to support the courage or spirits. 4. To assume and carry successfully, as the part of an actor; to represent or act; to sustain; as, to support the character of King Lear. 5. To furnish with the means of sustenance or livelihood; to maintain; to provide for; as, to support a family; to support the ministers of the gospel. 6. To carry on; to enable to continue; to maintain; as, to support a war or a contest; to support an argument or a debate. 7. To verify; to make good; to substantiate; to establish; to sustain; as, the testimony is not sufficient to support the charges; the evidence will not support the statements or allegations. To urge such arguments, as though they were sufficient to support and demonstrate a whole scheme of moral philosophy. J. Edwards. 8. To vindicate; to maintain; to defend successfully; as, to be able to support one's own cause. 9. To uphold by aid or countenance; to aid; to help; to back up; as, to support a friend or a party; to support the present administration. Wherefore, bold pleasant, Darest thou support a published traitor Shak. 10. A attend as an honorary assistant; as, a chairman supported by a vice chairman; O'Connell left the prison, supported by his two sons. Support arms (Mil.), a command in the manual of arms in responce to which the piece is held vertically at the shoulder, with the hammer resting on the left forearm, which is passed horizontally across the body in front; also, the position assumed in response to this command. Syn. -- To maintain; endure; verify; substantiate; countenance; patronize; help; back; second; succor; relieve; uphold; encourage; favor; nurture; nourish; cherish; shield; defend; protect; stay; assist; forward.  1. The act, state, or operation of supporting, upholding, or sustaining. 2. That which upholds, sustains, or keeps from falling, as a prop, a pillar, or a foundation of any kind. 3. That which maintains or preserves from being overcome, falling, yielding, sinking, giving way, or the like; subsistence; maintenance; assistance; reënforcement; as, he gave his family a good support, the support of national credit; the assaulting column had the support of a battery. Points of support (Arch.), the horizontal area of the solids of a building, walls, piers, and the like, as compared with the open or vacant spaces. -- Right of support (Law), an easement or servitude by which the owner of a house has a right to rest his timber on the walls of his neighbor's house. Kent. Syn. -- Stay; prop; maintenance; subsistence; assistance; favor; countenance; encouragement; patronage; aid; help; succor; nutriment; sustenance; food.
cover: 1. To overspread the surface of (one thing) with another; as, to cover wood with paint or lacquer; to cover a table with a cloth. 2. To envelop; to clothe, as with a mantle or cloak. And with the majesty of darkness round Covers his throune. Milton. All that beauty than doth cover thee. Shak. 3. To invest (one's self with something); to bring upon (one's self); as, he covered himself with glory. The powers that covered themselves with everlasting infamy by the partition of Poland. Brougham. 4. To hide sight; to conceal; to cloak; as, the snemy were covered from our sight by the woods. A cloud covered the mount. Exod. xxiv. 15. In vain shou striv'st to cover shame with shame. Milton. 5. To brood or sit on; to incubate. While the hen is covering her eggs, the male . . . diverts her with his songs. Addison. 6. To overwhelm; to spread over. The waters returned and covered the chariots and the horsemen. Ex. xiv. 28. 7. To shelter, as from evil or danger; to protect; to defend; as, the cavalry covered the retreat. His calm and blameless life Does with substantial blessedness abound, And the soft wings of peace cover him round. Cowley. 8. To remove from remembrance; to put away; to remit."Blessed is he whose is covered." Ps. xxxii. 1. 9. To extend over; to be sufficient for; to comprehend, include, or embrace; to account for or solve; to counterbalance; as, a mortgage which fully covers a sum loaned on it; a law which covers all possible cases of a crime; receipts than do not cover expenses. 10. To put the usual covering or headdress on. Cover thy head . . . ; nay, prithee, be covered. Shak. 11. To copulate with (a female); to serve; as. a horse covers a mare; -- said of the male. To cover ground or distance, to pass over; as, the rider covered the ground in an hour. -- To cover one's short contracts (Stock Exchange), to buy stock when the market rises, as a dealer who has sold short does in order to protect himself. -- Covering party (Mil.), a detachment of troops sent for the protection of another detachment, as of men working in the trenches. -- To cover into, to transfer to; as, to cover into the treasury. Syn. -- To shelter; screen; shield; hide; overspread.  1. Anything which is laid, set, or spread, upon, about, or over, another thing; an envelope; a lid; as, the cover of a book. 2. Anything which weils or conceals; a screen; disguise; a cloack. "Under cover of the night." Macualay. A hendsome cover for imperfections. Collier. 3. Shelter; protection; as, the troops fought under cover of the batteries; the woods afforded a good cover. Being compelled to lodge in the field . . . whilst his army was under cover, they might be forced to retire. Clarendon. 4. (Huntig)  The woods, underbrush, etc., which shelter and conceal game; covert; as, to beat a cover; to ride to cover. 5. That portion of a slate, tile, or shingle, which is hidden by the overlap of the course above. Knight. 6. (Steam Engine)  The lap of a slide valve. 7. Etym: [Cf. F. couvert.]  A tablecloth, and the other table furniture; esp., the table furniture for the use of one person at a meal; as, covers were laid for fifty guests. To break cover, to start from a covert or lair; -- said of game. -- Under cover, in an envelope, or within a letter; -- said of a written message. Letters . . . dispatched under cover to her ladyship. Thackeray.  To spread a table for a meal; to prepare a banquet. [Obs.] Shak.
just: 1. Conforming or conformable to rectitude or justice; not doing wrong to any; violating no right or obligation; upright; righteous; honest; true; -- said both of persons and things. "O just but severe law!" Shak. There is not a just man upon earth, that doeth good, and sinneth not. Eccl. vii. 20. Just balances, just weights, . . . shall ye have. Lev. xix. 36. How should man be just with God Job ix. 2. We know your grace to be a man. Just and upright. Shak. 2. Not transgressing the requirement of truth and propriety; conformed to the truth of things, to reason, or to a proper standard; exact; normal; reasonable; regular; due; as, a just statement; a just inference. Just of thy word, in every thought sincere. Pope. The prince is here at hand: pleaseth your lordship To meet his grace just distance 'tween our armies. Shak. He was a comely personage, a little above just stature. Bacon. Fire fitted with just materials casts a constant heat. Jer. Taylor. When all The war shall stand ranged in its just array. Addison. Their named alone would make a just volume. Burton. 3. Rendering or disposed to render to each one his due; equitable; fair; impartial; as, just judge. Men are commonly so just to virtue and goodness as to praise it in others, even when they do not practice it themselves. Tillotson. Just intonation. (Mus.) (a) The correct sounding of notes or intervals; true pitch. (b) The giving all chords and intervals in their purity or their exact mathematical ratio, or without temperament; a process in which the number of notes and intervals required in the various keys is much greater than the twelve to the octave used in systems of temperament. H. W. Poole. Syn. -- Equitable; upright; honest; true; fair; impartial; proper; exact; normal; orderly; regular.  1. Precisely; exactly; -- in place, time, or degree; neither more nor less than is stated. And having just enough, not covet more. Dryden. The god Pan guided my hand just to the heart of the beast. Sir P. Sidney. To-night, at Herne's oak, just 'twixt twelve and one. Shak. 2. Closely; nearly; almost. Just at the point of death. Sir W. Temple. 3. Barely; merely; scarcely; only; by a very small space or time; as, he just missed the train; just too late. A soft Etesian gale But just inspired and gently swelled the sail. Dryden. Just now, the least possible time since; a moment ago.  To joust. Fairfax.  A joust. Dryden.
side: 1. The margin, edge, verge, or border of a surface; especially (when the thing spoken of is somewhat oblong in shape), one of the longer edges as distinguished from the shorter edges, called ends; a bounding line of a geometrical figure; as, the side of a field, of a square or triangle, of a river, of a road, etc. 3. Any outer portion of a thing considered apart from, and yet in relation to, the rest; as, the upper side of a sphere; also, any part or position viewed as opposite to or contrasted with another; as, this or that side. Looking round on every side beheld A pathless desert. Milton. 4. (a) One of the halves of the body, of an animals or man, on either side of the mesial plane; or that which pertains to such a half; as, a side of beef; a side of sole leather. (b) The right or left part of the wall or trunk of the body; as, a pain in the side. One of the soldiers with a spear pierced his side. John xix. 34. 5. A slope or declivity, as of a hill, considered as opposed to another slope over the ridge. Along the side of yon small hill. Milton. 6. The position of a person or party regarded as opposed to another person or party, whether as a rival or a foe; a body of advocates or partisans; a party; hence, the interest or cause which one maintains against another; a doctrine or view opposed to another. God on our side, doubt not of victory. Shak. We have not always been of the . . . same side in politics. Landor. Sets the passions on the side of truth. Pope. 7. A line of descent traced through one parent as distinguished from that traced through another. To sit upon thy father David's throne, By mother's side thy father. Milton. 8. Fig.: Aspect or part regarded as contrasted with some other; as, the bright side of poverty. By the side of, close at hand; near to. -- Exterior side. (Fort.) See Exterior, and Illust. of Ravelin. -- Interior side (Fort.), the line drawn from the center of one bastion to that of the next, or the line curtain produced to the two oblique radii in front. H. L. Scott. -- Side by side, close together and abreast; in company or along with. -- To choose sides, to select those who shall compete, as in a game, on either side. -- To take sides, to attach one's self to, or give assistance to, one of two opposing sides or parties.  1. Of or pertaining to a side, or the sides; being on the side, or toward the side; lateral. One mighty squadron with a side wind sped. Dryden. 2. Hence, indirect; oblique; collateral; incidental; as, a side issue; a side view or remark. The law hath no side respect to their persons. Hooker. 3. Etym: [AS. sid. Cf Side, n.]  Long; large; extensive. [Obs. or Scot.] Shak. His gown had side sleeves down to mid leg. Laneham. Side action, in breech-loading firearms, a mechanism for operating the breech block, which is moved by a lever that turns sidewise. -- Side arms, weapons worn at the side, as sword, bayonet, pistols, etc. -- Side ax, an ax of which the handle is bent to one side. -- Side-bar rule (Eng. Law.), a rule authorized by the courts to be granted by their officers as a matter of course, without formal application being made to them in open court; -- so called because anciently moved for by the attorneys at side bar, that is, informally. Burril. -- Side box, a box or inclosed seat on the side of a theater. To insure a side-box station at half price. Cowper. -- Side chain, one of two safety chains connecting a tender with a locomotive, at the sides. -- Side cut, a canal or road branching out from the main one. [U.S.] -- Side dish, one of the dishes subordinate to the main course. -- Side glance, a glance or brief look to one side. -- Side hook (Carp.), a notched piece of wood for clamping a board to something, as a bench. -- Side lever, a working beam of a side-lever engine. -- Side-lever engine, a marine steam engine having a working beam of each side of the cylinder, near the bottom of the engine, communicating motion to a crank that is above them. -- Side pipe (Steam Engine), a steam or exhaust pipe connecting the upper and lower steam chests of the cylinder of a beam engine. -- Side plane, a plane in which the cutting edge of the iron is at the side of the stock. -- Side posts (Carp.), posts in a truss, usually placed in pairs, each post set at the same distance from the middle of the truss, for supporting the principal rafters, hanging the tiebeam, etc. -- Side rod. (a) One of the rods which connect the piston-rod crosshead with the side levers, in a side-lever engine. (b) See Parallel rod, under Parallel. -- Side screw (Firearms), one of the screws by which the lock is secured to the side of a firearm stock. -- Side table, a table placed either against the wall or aside from the principal table. -- Side tool (Mach.), a cutting tool, used in a lathe or planer, having the cutting edge at the side instead of at the point. -- Side wind, a wind from one side; hence, an indirect attack, or indirect means. Wright.  1. To lean on one side. [Obs.] Bacon. 2. To embrace the opinions of one party, or engage in its interest, in opposition to another party; to take sides; as, to side with the ministerial party. All side in parties, and begin the attack. Pope.  1. To be or stand at the side of; to be on the side toward. [Obs.] His blind eye that sided Paridell. Spenser. 2. To suit; to pair; to match. [Obs.] Clarendon. 3. (Shipbuilding)  To work (a timber or rib) to a certain thickness by trimming the sides. 4. To furnish with a siding; as, to side a house.
had: See Have. Had as lief, Had rather, Had better, Had as soon, etc., with a nominative and followed by the infinitive without to, are well established idiomatic forms. The original construction was that of the dative with forms of be, followed by the infinitive. See Had better, under Better. And lever me is be pore and trewe. [And more agreeable to me it is to be poor and true.] C. Mundi (Trans. ). Him had been lever to be syke. [To him it had been preferable to be sick.] Fabian. For him was lever have at his bed's head Twenty bookes, clad in black or red, . . . Than robes rich, or fithel, or gay sawtrie. Chaucer. Note: Gradually the nominative was substituted for the dative, and had for the forms of be. During the process of transition, the nominative with was or were, and the dative with had, are found. Poor lady, she were better love a dream. Shak. You were best hang yourself. Beau. & Fl. Me rather had my heart might feel your love Than my unpleased eye see your courtesy. Shak. I hadde levere than my scherte, That ye hadde rad his legende, as have I. Chaucer. I had as lief not be as live to be In awe of such a thing as I myself. Shak. I had rather be a dog and bay the moon, Than such a Roman. Shak. I had rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. Ps. lxxxiv.10.
current: 1. Running or moving rapidly. [Archaic] Like the current fire, that renneth Upon a cord. Gower. To chase a creature that was current then In these wild woods, the hart with golden horns. Tennyson. 2. Now passing, as time; as, the current month. 3. Passing from person to person, or from hand to hand; circulating through the community; generally received; common; as, a current coin; a current report; current history. That there was current money in Abraham's time is past doubt. Arbuthnot. Your fire-new stamp of honor is scarce current. Shak. His current value, which is less or more as men have occasion for him. Grew. 4. Commonly estimated or acknowledged. 5. Fitted for general acceptance or circulation; authentic; passable. O Buckingham, now do I play the touch To try if thou be current gold indeed. Shak. Account current. See under Account. -- Current money, lawful money. Abbott.  1. A flowing or passing; onward motion. Hence: A body of fluid moving continuously in a certain direction; a stream; esp., the swiftest part of it; as, a current of water or of air; that which resembles a stream in motion; as, a current of electricity. Two such silver currents, when they join, Do glorify the banks that bound them in. Shak. The surface of the ocean is furrowed by currents, whose direction . . . the navigator should know. Nichol. 2. General course; ordinary procedure; progressive and connected movement; as, the current of time, of events, of opinion, etc. Current meter, an instrument for measuring the velocity, force, etc., of currents. -- Current mill, a mill driven by a current wheel. -- Current wheel, a wheel dipping into the water and driven by the current of a stream or by the ebb and flow of the tide. Syn. -- Stream; course. See Stream.
turn: 1. To cause to move upon a center, or as if upon a center; to give circular motion to; to cause to revolve; to cause to move round, either partially, wholly, or repeatedly; to make to change position so as to present other sides in given directions; to make to face otherwise; as, to turn a wheel or a spindle; to turn the body or the head. Turn the adamantine spindle round. Milton. The monarch turns him to his royal guest. Pope. 2. To cause to present a different side uppermost or outmost; to make the upper side the lower, or the inside to be the outside of; to reverse the position of; as, to turn a box or a board; to turn a coat. 3. To give another direction, tendency, or inclination to; to direct otherwise; to deflect; to incline differently; -- used both literally and figuratively; as, to turn the eyes to the heavens; to turn a horse from the road, or a ship from her course; to turn the attention to or from something. "Expert when to advance, or stand, or, turn the sway of battle." Milton. Thrice I deluded her, and turned to sport Her importunity. Milton. My thoughts are turned on peace. Addison. 4. To change from a given use or office; to divert, as to another purpose or end; to transfer; to use or employ; to apply; to devote. Therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom unto David. 1 Chron. x. 14. God will make these evils the occasion of a greater good, by turning them to advantage in this world. Tillotson. When the passage is open, land will be turned most to cattle; when shut, to sheep. Sir W. Temple. 5. To change the form, quality, aspect, or effect of; to alter; to metamorphose; to convert; to transform; -- often with to or into before the word denoting the effect or product of the change; as, to turn a worm into a winged insect; to turn green to blue; to turn prose into verse; to turn a Whig to a Tory, or a Hindoo to a Christian; to turn good to evil, and the like. The Lord thy God will turn thy captivity, and have compassion upon thee. Deut. xxx. 3. And David said, O Lord, I pray thee, turn the counsel of Ahithophel into foolishness. 2 Sam. xv. 31. Impatience turns an ague into a fever. Jer. Taylor. 6. To form in a lathe; to shape or fashion (anything) by applying a cutting tool to it while revolving; as, to turn the legs of stools or tables; to turn ivory or metal. I had rather hear a brazen canstick turned. Shak. 7. Hence, to give form to; to shape; to mold; to put in proper condition; to adapt. "The poet's pen turns them to shapes." Shak. His limbs how turned, how broad his shoulders spread ! Pope. He was perfectly well turned for trade. Addison. 8. Specifically: -- (a) To translate; to construe; as, to turn the Iliad. Who turns a Persian tale for half a crown. Pope. (b) To make acid or sour; to ferment; to curdle, etc.: as, to turn cider or wine; electricity turns milk quickly. (c) To sicken; to nauseate; as, an emetic turns one's stomach. To be turned of, be advanced beyond; as, to be turned of sixty-six. -- To turn a cold shoulder to, to treat with neglect or indifference. -- To turn a corner, to go round a corner. -- To turn adrift, to cast off, to cease to care for. -- To turn a flange (Mech.), to form a flange on, as around a metal sheet or boiler plate, by stretching, bending, and hammering, or rolling the metal. -- To turn against. (a) To direct against; as, to turn one's arguments against himself. (b) To make unfavorable or hostile to; as, to turn one's friends against him. -- To turn a hostile army, To turn the enemy's flank, or the like (Mil.), to pass round it, and take a position behind it or upon its side. -- To turn a penny, or To turn an honest penny, to make a small profit by trade, or the like. -- To turn around one's finger, to have complete control of the will and actions of; to be able to influence at pleasure. -- To turn aside, to avert. -- To turn away. (a) To dismiss from service; to discard; as, to turn away a servant. (b) To avert; as, to turn away wrath or evil. -- To turn back. (a) To give back; to return. We turn not back the silks upon the merchants, When we have soiled them. Shak. (b) To cause to return or retrace one's steps; hence, to drive away; to repel. Shak. -- To turn down. (a) To fold or double down. (b) To turn over so as to conceal the face of; as, to turn down cards. (c) To lower, or reduce in size, by turning a valve, stopcock, or the like; as, turn down the lights. -- To turn in. (a) To fold or double under; as, to turn in the edge of cloth. (b) To direct inwards; as, to turn the toes in when walking. (c) To contribute; to deliver up; as, he turned in a large amount. [Colloq.] -- To turn in the mind, to revolve, ponder, or meditate upon; -- with about, over, etc. " Turn these ideas about in your mind." I. Watts. -- To turn off. (a) To dismiss contemptuously; as, to turn off a sycophant or a parasite. (b) To give over; to reduce. (c) To divert; to deflect; as, to turn off the thoughts from serious subjects; to turn off a joke. (d) To accomplish; to perform, as work. (e) (Mech.) To remove, as a surface, by the process of turning; to reduce in size by turning. (f) To shut off, as a fluid, by means of a valve, stopcock, or other device; to stop the passage of; as, to turn off the water or the gas. -- To turn on, to cause to flow by turning a valve, stopcock, or the like; to give passage to; as, to turn on steam. -- To turn one's coat, to change one's uniform or colors; to go over to the opposite party. -- To turn one's goods or money, and the like, to exchange in the course of trade; to keep in lively exchange or circulation; to gain or increase in trade. -- To turn one's hand to, to adapt or apply one's self to; to engage in. -- To turn out. (a) To drive out; to expel; as, to turn a family out of doors; to turn a man out of office. I'll turn you out of my kingdom. Shak. (b) to put to pasture, as cattle or horses. (c) To produce, as the result of labor, or any process of manufacture; to furnish in a completed state. (d) To reverse, as a pocket, bag, etc., so as to bring the inside to the outside; hence, to produce. (e) To cause to cease, or to put out, by turning a stopcock, valve, or the like; as, to turn out the lights. -- To turn over. (a) To change or reverse the position of; to overset; to overturn; to cause to roll over. (b) To transfer; as, to turn over business to another hand. (c) To read or examine, as a book, while, turning the leaves. "We turned o'er many books together." Shak. (d) To handle in business; to do business to the amount of; as, he turns over millions a year. [Colloq.] -- To turn over a new leaf. See under Leaf. -- To turn tail, to run away; to retreat ignominiously. -- To turn the back, to flee; to retreat. -- To turn the back on or upon, to treat with contempt; to reject or refuse unceremoniously. -- To turn the corner, to pass the critical stage; to get by the worst point; hence, to begin to improve, or to succeed. -- To turn the die or dice, to change fortune. -- To turn the edge or point of, to bend over the edge or point of so as to make dull; to blunt. -- To turn the head or brain of, to make giddy, wild, insane, or the like; to infatuate; to overthrow the reason or judgment of; as, a little success turned his head. -- To turn the scale or balance, to change the preponderance; to decide or determine something doubtful. -- To turn the stomach of, to nauseate; to sicken. -- To turn the tables, to reverse the chances or conditions of success or superiority; to give the advantage to the person or side previously at a disadvantage. -- To turn tippet, to make a change. [Obs.] B. Jonson. -- To turn to profit, advantage, etc., to make profitable or advantageous. -- To turn up. (a) To turn so as to bring the bottom side on top; as, to turn up the trump. (b) To bring from beneath to the surface, as in plowing, digging, etc. (c) To give an upward curve to; to tilt; as, to turn up the nose. -- To turn upon, to retort; to throw back; as, to turn the arguments of an opponent upon himself. -- To turn upside down, to confuse by putting things awry; to throw into disorder. This house is turned upside down since Robin Ostler died. Shak.  1. To move round; to have a circular motion; to revolve entirely, repeatedly, or partially; to change position, so as to face differently; to whirl or wheel round; as, a wheel turns on its axis; a spindle turns on a pivot; a man turns on his heel. The gate . . . on golden hinges turning. Milton. 2. Hence, to revolve as if upon a point of support; to hinge; to depend; as, the decision turns on a single fact. Conditions of peace certainly turn upon events of war. Swift. 3. To result or terminate; to come about; to eventuate; to issue. If we repent seriously, submit contentedly, and serve him faithfully, afflictions shall turn to our advantage. Wake. 4. To be deflected; to take a different direction or tendency; to be directed otherwise; to be differently applied; to be transferred; as, to turn from the road. Turn from thy fierce wrath. Ex. xxxii. 12. Turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways. Ezek. xxxiii. 11. The understanding turns inward on itself, and reflects on its own operations. Locke. 5. To be changed, altered, or transformed; to become transmuted; also, to become by a change or changes; to grow; as, wood turns to stone; water turns to ice; one color turns to another; to turn Mohammedan. I hope you have no intent to turn husband. Shak. Cygnets from gray turn white. Bacon. 6. To undergo the process of turning on a lathe; as, ivory turns well. 7. Specifically: -- (a) To become acid; to sour; -- said of milk, ale, etc. (b) To become giddy; -- said of the head or brain. I'll look no more; Lest my brain turn. Shak. (c) To be nauseated; -- said of the stomach. (d) To become inclined in the other direction; -- said of scales. (e) To change from ebb to flow, or from flow to ebb; -- said of the tide. (f) (Obstetrics) To bring down the feet of a child in the womb, in order to facilitate delivery. 8. (Print.)  To invert a type of the same thickness, as temporary substitute for any sort which is exhausted. To turn about, to face to another quarter; to turn around. -- To turn again, to come back after going; to return. Shak. -- To turn against, to become unfriendly or hostile to. -- To turn aside or away. (a) To turn from the direct course; to withdraw from a company; to deviate. (b) To depart; to remove. (c) To avert one's face. -- To turn back, to turn so as to go in an opposite direction; to retrace one's steps. -- To turn in. (a) To bend inward. (b) To enter for lodgings or entertainment. (c) To go to bed. [Colloq.] -- To turn into, to enter by making a turn; as, to turn into a side street. -- To turn off, to be diverted; to deviate from a course; as, the road turns off to the left. -- To turn on or upon. (a) To turn against; to confront in hostility or anger. (b) To reply to or retort. (c) To depend on; as, the result turns on one condition. -- To turn out. (a) To move from its place, as a bone. (b) To bend or point outward; as, his toes turn out. (c) To rise from bed. [Colloq.] (d) To come abroad; to appear; as, not many turned out to the fire. (e) To prove in the result; to issue; to result; as, the cropsturned out poorly. -- To turn over, to turn from side to side; to roll; to tumble. -- To turn round. (a) To change position so as to face in another direction. (b) To change one's opinion; to change from one view or party to another. -- To turn to, to apply one's self to; have recourse to; to refer to. "Helvicus's tables may be turned to on all occasions." Locke. -- To turn to account, profit, advantage, or the like, to be made profitable or advantageous; to become worth the while. -- To turn under, to bend, or be folded, downward or under. -- To turn up. (a) To bend, or be doubled, upward. (b) To appear; to come to light; to transpire; to occur; to happen.  1. The act of turning; movement or motion about, or as if about, a center or axis; revolution; as, the turn of a wheel. 2. Change of direction, course, or tendency; different order, position, or aspect of affairs; alteration; vicissitude; as, the turn of the tide. At length his complaint took a favorable turn. Macaulay. The turns and varieties of all passions. Hooker. Too well the turns of mortal chance I know. Pope. 3. One of the successive portions of a course, or of a series of occurrences, reckoning from change to change; hence, a winding; a bend; a meander. And all its [the river's] thousand turns disclose. Some fresher beauty varying round. Byron. 4. A circuitous walk, or a walk to and fro, ending where it began; a short walk; a stroll. Come, you and I must walk a turn together. Shak. I will take a turn in your garden. Dryden. 5. Successive course; opportunity enjoyed by alternation with another or with others, or in due order; due chance; alternate or incidental occasion; appropriate time. "Nobleness and bounty . . . had their turns in his [the king's] nature." His turn will come to laugh at you again. Denham . Every one has a fair turn to be as great as he pleases. Collier. 6. Incidental or opportune deed or office; occasional act of kindness or malice; as, to do one an ill turn. Had I not done a friendes turn to thee Chaucer. thanks are half lost when good turns are delayed. Fairfax. 7. Convenience; occasion; purpose; exigence; as, this will not serve his turn. I have enough to serve mine own turn. Shak. 8. Form; cast; shape; manner; fashion; -- used in a literal or figurative sense; hence, form of expression; mode of signifying; as, the turn of thought; a man of a sprightly turn in conversation. The turn of both his expressions and thoughts is unharmonious. Dryden. The Roman poets, in their description of a beautiful man, often mention the turn of his neck and arms. Addison. 9. A change of condition; especially, a sudden or recurring symptom of illness, as a nervous shock, or fainting spell; as, a bad turn. [Colloq.] 10. A fall off the ladder at the gallows; a hanging; -- so called from the practice of causing the criminal to stand on a ladder which was turned over, so throwing him off, when the signal was given. [Obs.] 11. A round of a rope or cord in order to secure it, as about a pin or a cleat. 12. (Mining)  A pit sunk in some part of a drift. 13. (Eng. Law)  A court of record, held by the sheriff twice a year in every hundred within his county. Blount. 14. pl. (Med.)  Monthly courses; menses. [Colloq.] 15. (Mus.)  An embellishment or grace (marked thus, By turns. (a) One after another; alternately; in succession. (b) At intervals. "[They] feel by turns the bitter change." Milton. -- In turn, in due order of succession. -- To a turn, exactly; perfectly; as, done to a turn; -- a phrase alluding to the practice of cooking on a revolving spit. -- To take turns, to alternate; to succeed one another in due order. -- Turn and turn about, by equal alternating periods of service or duty; by turns. -- Turn bench, a simple portable lathe, used on a bench by clock makers and watchmakers. -- Turn buckle. See Turnbuckle, in Vocabulary. -- Turn cap, a sort of chimney cap which turns round with the wind so as to present its opening to the leeward. G. Francis. -- Turn of life (Med.), change of life. See under Change. -- Turn screw, a screw driver.
island: 1. A tract of land surrounded by water, and smaller than a continent. Cf. Continent. 2. Anything regarded as resembling an island; as, an island of ice. 3. (Zoöl.)  See Isle, n., 2. Islands of the blessed (Myth.), islands supposed to lie in the Western Ocean, where the favorites of the gods are conveyed at death, and dwell in everlasting joy.  1. To cause to become or to resemble an island; to make an island or islands of; to isle. Shelley. 2. To furnish with an island or with islands; as, to island the deep. Southey.
can: an obs. form of began, imp. & p. p. of Begin, sometimes used in old poetry. Note: [See Gan.] With gentle words he can faile gree. Spenser.  1. A drinking cup; a vessel for holding liquids. [Shak. ] Fill the cup and fill can, Have a rouse before the morn. Tennyson. 2. A vessel or case of tinned iron or of sheet metal, of various forms, but usually cylindrical; as, a can of tomatoes; an oil can; a milk can. Note: A can may be a cylinder open at the top, as for receiving the sliver from a carding machine, or with a removable cover or stopper, as for holding tea, spices, milk, oysters, etc., or with handle and spout, as for holding oil, or hermetically sealed, in canning meats, fruits, etc. The name is also sometimes given to the small glass or earthenware jar used in canning.  To preserve by putting in sealed cans [U. S.] "Canned meats" W. D. Howells. Canned goods, a general name for fruit, vegetables, meat, or fish, preserved in hermetically sealed cans.  1. To know; to understand. [Obs.] I can rimes of Rodin Hood. Piers Plowman. I can no Latin, quod she. Piers Plowman. Let the priest in surplice white, That defunctive music can. Shak. 2. To be able to do; to have power or influence. [Obs.] The will of Him who all things can. Milton. For what, alas, can these my single arms Shak. Mæcænas and Agrippa, who can most with Cæsar. Beau. & Fl. 3. To be able; -- followed by an infinitive without to; as, I can go, but do not wish to. Syn. -- Can but, Can not but. It is an error to use the former of these phrases where the sens requires the latter. If we say, "I can but perish if I go," "But" means only, and denotes that this is all or the worst that can happen. When the apostle Peter said. "We can not but speak of the things which we have seen and heard." he referred to a moral constraint or necessety which rested upon him and his associates; and the meaning was, We cannot help speaking, We cannot refrain from speaking. This idea of a moral necessity or constraint is of frequent occurrence, and is also expressed in the phrase, "I can not help it." Thus we say. "I can not but hope," "I can not but believe," "I can not but think," "I can not but remark," etc., in cases in which it would be an error to use the phrase can but. Yet he could not but acknowledge to himself that there was something calculated to impress awe, . . . in the sudden appearances and vanishings . . . of the masque De Quincey. Tom felt that this was a rebuff for him, and could not but understand it as a left-handed hit at his employer. Dickens.
ten: One more than nine; twice five. With twice ten sail I crossed the Phrygian Sea. Dryden. Note: Ten is often used, indefinitely, for several, many, and other like words. There 's proud modesty in merit, Averse from begging, and resolved to pay Ten times the gift it asks. Dryden.  1. The number greater by one than nine; the sum of five and five; ten units of objects. I will not destroy it for ten's sake. Gen. xviii. 32. 2. A symbol representing ten units, as 10, x, or X.
mouth: 1. The opening through which an animal receives food; the aperture between the jaws or between the lips; also, the cavity, containing the tongue and teeth, between the lips and the pharynx; the buccal cavity. 2. Hence:  An opening affording entrance or exit; orifice; aperture; as: (a) The opening of a vessel by which it is filled or emptied, charged or discharged; as, the mouth of a jar or pitcher; the mouth of the lacteal vessels, etc. (b) The opening or entrance of any cavity, as a cave, pit, well, or den. (c) The opening of a piece of ordnance, through which it is discharged. (d) The opening through which the waters of a river or any stream are discharged. (e) The entrance into a harbor. 3. (Saddlery)  The crosspiece of a bridle bit, which enters the mouth of an animal. 4. A principal speaker; one who utters the common opinion; a mouthpiece. Every coffeehouse has some particular statesman belonging to it, who is the mouth of the street where he lives. Addison. 5. Cry; voice. [Obs.] Dryden. 6. Speech; language; testimony. That in the mouth of two or three witnesses every word may be established. Matt. xviii. 16. 7. A wry face; a grimace; a mow. Counterfeit sad looks, Make mouths upon me when I turn my back. Shak. Down in the mouth, chapfallen; of dejected countenance; depressed; discouraged. [Obs. or Colloq.] -- Mouth friend, one who professes friendship insincerely. Shak. -- Mouth glass, a small mirror for inspecting the mouth or teeth. -- Mouth honor, honor given in words, but not felt. Shak. -- Mouth organ. (Mus.) (a) Pan's pipes. See Pandean. (b) An harmonicon. -- Mouth pipe, an organ pipe with a lip or plate to cut the escaping air and make a sound. -- To stop the mouth, to silence or be silent; to put to shame; to confound. The mouth of them that speak lies shall be stopped. Ps. lxiii. 11. Whose mouths must be stopped. Titus i. 11.  1. To take into the mouth; to seize or grind with the mouth or teeth; to chew; to devour. Dryden. 2. To utter with a voice affectedly big or swelling; to speak in a strained or unnaturally sonorous manner. "Mouthing big phrases." Hare. Mouthing out his hollow oes and aes. Tennyson. 3. To form or cleanse with the mouth; to lick, as a bear her cub. Sir T. Browne. 4. To make mouths at. [R.] R. Blair.  1. To speak with a full, round, or loud, affected voice; to vociferate; to rant. I'll bellow out for Rome, and for my country, And mouth at Cæsar, till I shake the senate. Addison. 2. To put mouth to mouth; to kiss. [R.] Shak. 3. To make grimaces, esp. in ridicule or contempt. Well I know, when I am gone, How she mouths behind my back. Tennyson.
this: 1. As a demonstrative pronoun, this denotes something that is present or near in place or time, or something just mentioned, or that is just about to be mentioned. When they heard this, they were pricked in their heart. Acts ii. 37. But know this, that if the good man of the house had known in what watch the thief would come, he would have watched. Matt. xxiv. 43. 2. As an adjective, this has the same demonstrative force as the pronoun, but is followed by a noun; as, this book; this way to town. Note: This may be used as opposed or correlative to that, and sometimes as opposed to other or to a second this. See the Note under That, 1. This way and that wavering sails they bend. Pope. A body of this or that denomination is produced. Boyle. Their judgment in this we may not, and in that we need not, follow. Hooker. Consider the arguments which the author had to write this, or to design the other, before you arraign him. Dryden. Thy crimes . . . soon by this or this will end. Addison. Note: This, like a, every, that, etc., may refer to a number, as of years, persons, etc., taken collectively or as a whole. This twenty years have I been with thee.. Gen. xxxi. 38. I have not wept this years; but now My mother comes afresh into my eyes. Dryden.
throw: Pain; especially, pain of travail; throe. [Obs.] Spenser. Dryden.  Time; while; space of time; moment; trice. [Obs.] Shak. I will with Thomas speak a little throw. Chaucer.  1. To fling, cast, or hurl with a certain whirling motion of the arm, to throw a ball; -- distinguished from to toss, or to bowl. 2. To fling or cast in any manner; to drive to a distance from the hand or from an engine; to propel; to send; as, to throw stones or dust with the hand; a cannon throws a ball; a fire engine throws a stream of water to extinguish flames. 3. To drive by violence; as, a vessel or sailors may be thrown upon a rock. 4. (Mil.)  To cause to take a strategic position; as, he threw a detachment of his army across the river. 5. To overturn; to prostrate in wrestling; as, a man throws his antagonist. 6. To cast, as dice; to venture at dice. Set less than thou throwest. Shak. 7. To put on hastily; to spread carelessly. O'er his fair limbs a flowery vest he threw. Pope. 8. To divest or strip one's self of; to put off. There the snake throws her enameled skin. Shak. 9. (Pottery)  To form or shape roughly on a throwing engine, or potter's wheel, as earthen vessels. 10. To give forcible utterance to; to cast; to vent. I have thrown A brave defiance in King Henry's teeth. Shak. 11. To bring forth; to produce, as young; to bear; -- said especially of rabbits. 12. To twist two or more filaments of, as silk, so as to form one thread; to twist together, as singles, in a direction contrary to the twist of the singles themselves; -- sometimes applied to the whole class of operations by which silk is prepared for the weaver. Tomlinson. To throw away. (a) To lose by neglect or folly; to spend in vain; to bestow without a compensation; as, to throw away time; to throw away money. (b) To reject; as, to throw away a good book, or a good offer. -- To throw back. (a) To retort; to cast back, as a reply. (b) To reject; to refuse. (c) To reflect, as light. -- To throw by, to lay aside; to discard; to neglect as useless; as, to throw by a garment. -- To throw down, to subvert; to overthrow; to destroy; as, to throw down a fence or wall. -- To throw in. (a) To inject, as a fluid. (b) To put in; to deposit with others; to contribute; as, to throw in a few dollars to help make up a fund; to throw in an occasional comment. (c) To add without enumeration or valuation, as something extra to clinch a bargain. -- To throw off. (a) To expel; to free one's self from; as, to throw off a disease. (b) To reject; to discard; to abandon; as, to throw off all sense of shame; to throw off a dependent. (c) To make a start in a hunt or race. [Eng.](e) To disconcert or confuse. Same as to throw out (f). -- To throw on, to cast on; to load. -- To throw one's self down, to lie down neglectively or suddenly. -- To throw one's self on or upon. (a) To fall upon. (b) To resign one's self to the favor, clemency, or sustain power of (another); to repose upon. -- To throw out. (a) To cast out; to reject or discard; to expel. "The other two, whom they had thrown out, they were content should enjoy their exile." Swift. "The bill was thrown out." Swift. (b) To utter; to give utterance to; to speak; as, to throw out insinuation or observation. "She throws out thrilling shrieks." Spenser. (c) To distance; to leave behind. Addison. (d) To cause to project; as, to throw out a pier or an abutment. (e) To give forth; to emit; as, an electric lamp throws out a brilliant light. (f) To put out; to confuse; as, a sudden question often throws out an orator. -- To throw over, to abandon the cause of; to desert; to discard; as, to throw over a friend in difficulties. -- To throw up. (a) To resign; to give up; to demit; as, to throw up a commission. "Experienced gamesters throw up their cards when they know that the game is in the enemy's hand." Addison. (b) To reject from the stomach; to vomit. (c) To construct hastily; as, to throw up a breastwork of earth.  To perform the act of throwing or casting; to cast; specifically, to cast dice. To throw about, to cast about; to try expedients. [R.]  1. The act of hurling or flinging; a driving or propelling from the hand or an engine; a cast. He heaved a stone, and, rising to the throw, He sent it in a whirlwind at the foe. Addison. 2. A stroke; a blow. [Obs.] Nor shield defend the thunder of his throws. Spenser. 3. The distance which a missile is, or may be, thrown; as, a stone's throw. 4. A cast of dice; the manner in which dice fall when cast; as, a good throw. 5. An effort; a violent sally. [Obs.] Your youth admires The throws and swellings of a Roman soul. Addison. 6. (Mach.)  The extreme movement given to a sliding or vibrating reciprocating piece by a cam, crank, eccentric, or the like; travel; stroke; as, the throw of a slide valve. Also, frequently, the length of the radius of a crank, or the eccentricity of an eccentric; as, the throw of the crank of a steam engine is equal to half the stroke of the piston. 7. (Pottery)  A potter's wheel or table; a jigger. See 2d Jigger, 2 (a). 8. A turner's lathe; a throwe. [Prov. Eng.] 9. (Mining)  The amount of vertical displacement produced by a fault; -- according to the direction it is designated as an upthrow, or a downthrow.
eat: 1. To chew and swallow as food; to devour; -- said especially of food not liquid; as, to eat bread. "To eat grass as oxen." Dan. iv. 25. They . . . ate the sacrifices of the dead. Ps. cvi. 28. The lean . . . did eat up the first seven fat kine. Gen. xli. 20. The lion had not eaten the carcass. 1 Kings xiii. 28. With stories told of many a feat, How fairy Mab junkets eat. Milton. The island princes overbold Have eat our substance. Tennyson. His wretched estate is eaten up with mortgages. Thackeray. 2. To corrode, as metal, by rust; to consume the flesh, as a cancer; to waste or wear away; to destroy gradually; to cause to disappear. To eat humble pie. See under Humble. -- To eat of (partitive use). "Eat of the bread that can not waste." Keble. -- To eat one's words, to retract what one has said. (See the Citation under Blurt.) -- To eat out, to consume completely. "Eat out the heart and comfort of it." Tillotson. -- To eat the wind out of a vessel (Naut.), to gain slowly to windward of her. Syn. -- To consume; devour; gnaw; corrode.  1. To take food; to feed; especially, to take solid, in distinction from liquid, food; to board. He did eat continually at the king's table. 2 Sam. ix. 13. 2. To taste or relish; as, it eats like tender beef. 3. To make one's way slowly. To eat, To eat in or into, to make way by corrosion; to gnaw; to consume. "A sword laid by, which eats into itself." Byron. -- To eat to windward (Naut.), to keep the course when closehauled with but little steering; -- said of a vessel.
held: imp. & p. p. of Hold.
except: 1. To take or leave out (anything) from a number or a whole as not belonging to it; to exclude; to omit. Who never touched The excepted tree. Milton. Wherein (if we only except the unfitness of the judge) all other things concurred. Bp. Stillingfleet. 2. To object to; to protest against. [Obs.] Shak.  To take exception; to object; -- usually followed by to, sometimes by against; as, to except to a witness or his testimony. Except thou wilt except against my love. Shak.  With exclusion of; leaving or left out; excepting. God and his Son except, Created thing naught valued he nor . . . shunned. Milton. Syn. -- Except, Excepting, But, Save, Besides. Excepting, except, but, and save are exclusive. Except marks exclusion more pointedly. "I have finished all the letters except one," is more marked than "I have finished all the letters but one." Excepting is the same as except, but less used. Save is chiefly found in poetry. Besides (lit., by the side of) is in the nature of addition. "There is no one here except or but him," means, take him away and there is nobody present. "There is nobody here besides him," means, hi is present and by the side of, or in addition to, him is nobody. "Few ladies, except her Majesty, could have made themselves heard." In this example, besides should be used, not except.  Unless; if it be not so that. And he said, I will not let thee go, except thou bless me. Gen. xxxii. 26. But yesterday you never opened lip, Except, indeed, to drink. Tennyson. Note: As a conjunction unless has mostly taken the place of except.
village: A small assemblage of houses in the country, less than a town or city. Village cart, a kind of two-wheeled pleasure carriage without a top. Syn. -- Village, Hamlet, Town, City. In England, a hamlet denotes a collection of houses, too small to have a parish church. A village has a church, but no market. A town has both a market and a church or churches. A city is, in the legal sense, an incorporated borough town, which is, or has been, the place of a bishop's see. In the United States these distinctions do not hold.
separate: 1. To disunite; to divide; to disconnect; to sever; to part in any manner. From the fine gold I separate the alloy. Dryden. Separate thyself, I pray thee, from me. Gen. xiii. 9. Who shall separate us from the love of Christ Rom. viii. 35. 2. To come between; to keep apart by occupying the space between; to lie between; as, the Mediterranean Sea separates Europe and Africa. 3. To set apart; to select from among others, as for a special use or service. Separate me Barnabas and Saul for the work whereunto I have called thaem. Acts xiii. 2. Separated flowers (Bot.), flowers which have stamens and pistils in separate flowers; diclinous flowers. Gray.  To part; to become disunited; to be disconnected; to withdraw from one another; as, the family separated.  1. Divided from another or others; disjoined; disconnected; separated; -- said of things once connected. Him that was separate from his brethren. Gen. xlix. 26. 2. Unconnected; not united or associated; distinct; -- said of things that have not been connected. For such an high priest became us, who is holy, harmless, undefiled, separate from sinnere. Heb. vii. 26. 3. Disunited from the body; disembodied; as, a separate spirit; the separate state of souls. Separate estate (Law), an estate limited to a married woman independent of her husband. -- Separate maintenance (Law), an allowance made to a wife by her husband under deed of separation. -- Sep"a*rate*ly, adv. -- Sep"a*rate*ness, n.
fast: 1. To abstain from food; to omit to take nourishment in whole or in part; to go hungry. Fasting he went to sleep, and fasting waked. Milton. 2. To practice abstinence as a religious exercise or duty; to abstain from food voluntarily for a time, for the mortification of the body or appetites, or as a token of grief, or humiliation and penitence. Thou didst fast and weep for the child. 2 Sam. xii. 21. Fasting day, a fast day; a day of fasting.  1. Abstinence from food; omission to take nounrishment. Surfeit is the father of much fast. Shak. 2. Voluntary abstinence from food, for a space of time, as a spiritual discipline, or as a token of religious humiliation. 3. A time of fasting, whether a day, week, or longer time; a period of abstinence from food or certain kinds of food; as, an annual fast. Fast day, a day appointed for fasting, humiliation, and religious offices as a means of invoking the favor of God. -- To break one's fast, to put an end to a period of abstinence by taking food; especially, to take one's morning meal; to breakfast. Shak.  1. Firmly fixed; closely adhering; made firm; not loose, unstable, or easily moved; immovable; as, to make fast the door. There is an order that keeps things fast. Burke. 2. Firm against attack; fortified by nature or art; impregnable; strong. Outlaws . . . lurking in woods and fast places. Spenser. 3. Firm in adherence; steadfast; not easily separated or alienated; faithful; as, a fast friend. 4. Permanent; not liable to fade by exposure to air or by washing; durable; lasting; as, fast colors. 5. Tenacious; retentive. [Obs.] Roses, damask and red, are fast flowers of their smells. Bacon. 6. Not easily disturbed or broken; deep; sound. All this while in a most fast sleep. Shak. 7. Moving rapidly; quick in mition; rapid; swift; as, a fast horse. 8. Given to pleasure seeking; disregardful of restraint; reckless; wild; dissipated; dissolute; as, a fast man; a fast liver. Thackeray. Fast and loose, now cohering, now disjoined; inconstant, esp. in the phrases to play at fast and loose, to play fast and loose, to act with giddy or reckless inconstancy or in a tricky manner; to say one thing and do another "Play fast and loose with faith." Shak. Fast and loose pulleys (Mach.), two pulleys placed side by side on a revolving shaft, which is driven from another shaft by a band, and arranged to disengage and reëngage the machinery driven thereby. When the machinery is to be stopped, the band is transferred from the pulley fixed to the shaft to the pulley which revolves freely upon it, and vice versa. -- Hard and fast (Naut.), so completely aground as to be immovable. -- To make fast (Naut.), to make secure; to fasten firmly, as a vessel, a rope, or a door.  1. In a fast, fixed, or firmly established manner; fixedly; firmly; immovably. We will bind thee fast. Judg. xv. 13. 2. In a fast or rapid manner; quickly; swiftly; extravagantly; wildly; as, to run fast; to live fast. Fast by, or Fast beside, close or near to; near at hand. He, after Eve seduced, unminded slunk Into the wood fast by. Milton. Fast by the throne obsequious Fame resides. Pope.  That which fastens or holds; especially, (Naut.) a mooring rope, hawser, or chain; -- called, according to its position, a bow, head, quarter, breast, or stern fast; also, a post on a pier around which hawsers are passed in mooring.
base: 1. Of little, or less than the usual, height; of low growth; as, base shrubs. [Archaic] Shak. 2. Low in place or position. [Obs.] Shak. 3. Of humble birth; or low degree; lowly; mean. [Archaic] "A pleasant and base swain." Bacon. 4. Illegitimate by birth; bastard. [Archaic] Why bastard wherefore base Shak. 5. Of little comparative value, as metal inferior to gold and silver, the precious metals. 6. Alloyed with inferior metal; debased; as, base coin; base bullion. 7. Morally low. Hence: Low-minded; unworthy; without dignity of sentiment; ignoble; mean; illiberal; menial; as, a base fellow; base motives; base occupations. "A cruel act of a base and a cowardish mind." Robynson (More's Utopia). "Base ingratitude." Milton. 8. Not classical or correct. "Base Latin." Fuller. 9. Deep or grave in sound; as, the base tone of a violin. [In this sense, commonly written bass.] 10. (Law)  Not held by honorable service; as, a base estate, one held by services not honorable; held by villenage. Such a tenure is called base, or low, and the tenant, a base tenant. Base fee, formerly, an estate held at the will of the lord; now, a qualified fee. See note under Fee, n., 4. -- Base metal. See under Metal. Syn. -- Dishonorable; worthless; ignoble; low-minded; infamous; sordid; degraded. -- Base, Vile, Mean. These words, as expressing moral qualities, are here arranged in the order of their strength, the strongest being placed first. Base marks a high degree of moral turpitude; vile and mean denote, in different degrees, the want of what is valuable or worthy of esteem. What is base excites our abhorrence; what is vile provokes our disgust or indignation; what is mean awakens contempt. Base is opposed to high-minded; vile, to noble; mean, to liberal or generous. Ingratitude is base; sycophancy is vile; undue compliances are mean.  1. The bottom of anything, considered as its support, or that on which something rests for support; the foundation; as, the base of a statue. "The base of mighty mountains." Prescott. 2. Fig.: The fundamental or essential part of a thing; the essential principle; a groundwork. 3. (Arch.) (a) The lower part of a wall, pier, or column, when treated as a separate feature, usually in projection, or especially ornamented. (b) The lower part of a complete architectural design, as of a monument; also, the lower part of any elaborate piece of furniture or decoration. 4. (Bot.)  That extremity of a leaf, fruit, etc., at which it is attached to its support. 5. (Chem.)  The positive, or non-acid component of a salt; a substance which, combined with an acid, neutralizes the latter and forms a salt; -- applied also to the hydroxides of the positive elements or radicals, and to certain organic bodies resembling them in their property of forming salts with acids. 6. (Pharmacy)  The chief ingredient in a compound. 7. (Dyeing)  A substance used as a mordant. Ure. 8. (Fort.)  The exterior side of the polygon, or that imaginary line which connects the salient angles of two adjacent bastions. 9. (Geom.)  The line or surface constituting that part of a figure on which it is supposed to stand. 10. (Math.)  The number from which a mathematical table is constructed; as, the base of a system of logarithms. 11. Etym: [See Base low.]  A low, or deep, sound. (Mus.) (a) The lowest part; the deepest male voice. (b) One who sings, or the instrument which plays, base. [Now commonly written bass.] The trebles squeak for fear, the bases roar. Dryden. 12. (Mil.)  A place or tract of country, protected by fortifications, or by natural advantages, from which the operations of an army proceed, forward movements are made, supplies are furnished, etc. 13. (Mil.)  The smallest kind of cannon. [Obs.] 14. (Zoöl.)  That part of an organ by which it is attached to another more central organ. 15. (Crystallog.)  The basal plane of a crystal. 16. (Geol.)  The ground mass of a rock, especially if not distinctly crystalline. 17. (Her.)  The lower part of the field. See Escutcheon. 18. The housing of a horse. [Obs.] 19. pl.  A kind of skirt ( often of velvet or brocade, but sometimes of mailed armor) which hung from the middle to about the knees, or lower. [Obs.] 20. The lower part of a robe or petticoat. [Obs.] 21. An apron. [Obs.] "Bakers in their linen bases." Marston. 22. The point or line from which a start is made; a starting place or a goal in various games. To their appointed base they went. Dryden. 23. (Surv.)  A line in a survey which, being accurately determined in length and position, serves as the origin from which to compute the distances and positions of any points or objects connected with it by a system of triangles. Lyman. 24. A rustic play; -- called also prisoner's base, prison base, or bars. "To run the country base." Shak. 25. (Baseball)  Any one of the four bounds which mark the circuit of the infield. Altern base. See under Altern. -- Attic base. (Arch.) See under Attic. -- Base course. (Arch.) (a) The first or lower course of a foundation wall, made of large stones of a mass of concrete; -- called also foundation course. (b) The architectural member forming the transition between the basement and the wall above. -- Base hit (Baseball), a hit, by which the batsman, without any error on the part of his opponents, is able to reach the first base without being put out. -- Base line. (a) A main line taken as a base, as in surveying or in military operations. (b) A line traced round a cannon at the rear of the vent. -- Base plate, the foundation plate of heavy machinery, as of the steam engine; the bed plate. -- Base ring (Ordnance), a projecting band of metal around the breech, connected with the body of the gun by a concave molding. H. L. Scott.  To put on a base or basis; to lay the foundation of; to found, as an argument or conclusion; -- used with on or upon. Bacon.  1. To abase; to let, or cast, down; to lower. [Obs.] If any . . . based his pike. Sir T. North. 2. To reduce the value of; to debase. [Obs.] Metals which we can not base. Bacon.
measure: 1. A standard of dimension; a fixed unit of quantity or extent; an extent or quantity in the fractions or multiples of which anything is estimated and stated; hence, a rule by which anything is adjusted or judged. 2. An instrument by means of which size or quantity is measured, as a graduated line, rod, vessel, or the like. False ells and measures be brought all clean adown. R. of Gloucester. 3. The dimensions or capacity of anything, reckoned according to some standard; size or extent, determined and stated; estimated extent; as, to take one's measure for a coat. The measure thereof is longer than the earth, and broader than the sea. Job xi. 9. 4. The contents of a vessel by which quantity is measured; a quantity determined by a standard; a stated or limited quantity or amount. It is like leaven which a woman took and hid in three measures of meal. Luke xiii. 21. 5. Extent or degree not excessive or beyong bounds; moderation; due restraint; esp. in the phrases, in measure; with measure; without or beyond measure. Hell hath enlarged herself, and opened her mouth without measure. Is. v. 14. 6. Determined extent, not to be exceeded; limit; allotted share, as of action, influence, ability, or the like; due proportion. Lord, make me to know mine end, and the measure of my days. Ps. xxxix. 4. 7. The quantity determined by measuring, especially in buying and selling; as, to give good or full measure. 8. Undefined quantity; extent; degree. There is a great measure of discretion to be used in the performance of confession. Jer. Taylor. 9. Regulated division of movement: (a) (Dancing) A regulated movement corresponding to the time in which the accompanying music is performed; but, especially, a slow and stately dane, like the minuet. (b) (Mus.) (1) The group or grouping of beats, caused by the regular recurrence of accented beats. (2)  The space between two bars. See Beat, Triple, Quadruple, Sextuple, Compound time, under Compound, a., and Figure. (c) (Poetry) The manner of ordering and combining the quantities, or long and short syllables; meter; rhythm; hence, a foot; as, a poem in iambic measure. 10. (Arith.)  A number which is contained in a given number a number of times without a remainder; as in the phrases, the common measure, the greatest common measure, etc., of two or more numbers. 11. A step or definite part of a progressive course or policy; a means to an end; an act designed for the accomplishment of an object; as, political measures; prudent measures; an inefficient measure. His majesty found what wrong measures he had taken in the conferring that trust, and lamented his error. Clarendon. 12. The act of measuring; measurement. Shak. 13. pl. (Geol.)  Beds or strata; as, coal measures; lead measures. Lineal, or Long, measure, measure of length; the measure of lines or distances. -- Liquid measure, the measure of liquids. -- Square measure, the measure of superficial area of surfaces in square units, as inches, feet, miles, etc. -- To have hard measure, to have harsh treatment meted out to one; to be harshly or oppressively dealt with. -- To take measures, to make preparations; to provide means. -- To take one's measure, to measure one, as for a garment; hence, to form an opinion of one's disposition, character, ability, etc. -- To tread a measure, to dance in the style so called. See 9 (a). Say to her, we have measured many miles To tread a measure with her on this grass. Shak.  1. To ascertain by use of a measuring instrument; to compute or ascertain the extent, quantity, dimensions, or capacity of, by a certain rule or standard; to take the dimensions of; hence, to estimate; to judge of; to value; to appraise. Great are thy works, Jehovah, infinite Thy power! what thought can measure thee Milton. 2. To serve as the measure of; as, the thermometer measures changes of temperature. 3. To pass throught or over in journeying, as if laying off and determining the distance. A true devoted pilgrim is not weary To measure kingdoms with his feeble steps. Shak. 4. To adjust by a rule or standard. To secure a contented spirit, measure your desires by your fortunes, not your fortunes by your desires. Jer. Taylor. 5. To allot or distribute by measure; to set off or apart by measure; -- often with out or off. With what measure ye mete, it shall be measured to you again. Matt. vii. 2. That portion of eternity which is called time, measured out by the sun. Addison. To measure swords with one, to try another's skill in the use of the sword; hence, figuratively, to match one's abilities against an antagonist's.  1. To make a measurement or measurements. 2. To result, or turn out, on measuring; as, the grain measures well; the pieces measure unequally. 3. To be of a certain size or quantity, or to have a certain length, breadth, or thickness, or a certain capacity according to a standard measure; as, cloth measures three fourths of a yard; a tree measures three feet in diameter.
both: The one and the other; the two; the pair, without exception of either. Note: It is generally used adjectively with nouns; as, both horses ran away; but with pronouns, and often with nous, it is used substantively, and followed by of. Note: It frequently stands as a pronoun. She alone is heir to both of us. Shak. Abraham took sheep and oxen, and gave them unto Abimelech; and both of them made a covenant. Gen. xxi. 27. He will not bear the loss of his rank, because he can bear the loss of his estate; but he will bear both, because he is prepared for both. Bolingbroke. Note: It is often used in apposition with nouns or pronouns. Thy weal and woe are both of them extremes. Shak. This said, they both betook them several ways. Milton. Note: Both now always precedes any other attributive words; as, both their armies; both our eyes. Note: Both of is used before pronouns in the objective case; as, both of us, them, whom, etc.; but before substantives its used is colloquial, both (without of) being the preferred form; as, both the brothers.  As well; not only; equally. Note: Both precedes the first of two coördinate words or phrases, and is followed by and before the other, both . . . and . . . ; as well the one as the other; not only this, but also that; equally the former and the latter. It is also sometimes followed by more than two coördinate words, connected by and expressed or understood. To judge both quick and dead. Milton. A masterpiece both for argument and style. Goldsmith. To whom bothe heven and erthe and see is sene. Chaucer. Both mongrel, puppy, whelp, and hound. Goldsmith. He prayeth well who loveth well Both man and bird and beast. Coleridge.
inch: An island; -- often used in the names of small islands off the coast of Scotland, as in Inchcolm, Inchkeith, etc. [Scot.]  1. A measure of length, the twelfth part of a foot, commonly subdivided into halves, quarters, eights, sixteenths, etc., as among mechanics. It was also formerly divided into twelve parts, called lines, and originally into three parts, called barleycorns, its length supposed to have been determined from three grains of barley placed end to end lengthwise. It is also sometimes called a prime ('), composed of twelve seconds ('\'b7), as in the duodecimal system of arithmetic. 12 seconds ('\'b7) make 1 inch or prime. 12 inches or primes (') make 1 foot. B. Greenleaf. Note: The meter, the accepted scientific standard of length, equals 39.37 inches; the inch is equal to 2.54 centimeters. See Metric system, and Meter. 2. A small distance or degree, whether or time Beldame, I think we watched you at an inch. Shak. By inches, by slow degrees, gradually. -- Inch of candle. See under Candle. -- Inches of pressure, usually, the pressure indicated by so many inches of a mercury column, as on a steam gauge. -- Inch of water. See under Water. -- Miner's inch, (Hydraulic Mining), a unit for the measurement of water. See Inch of water, under Water.  1. To drive by inches, or small degrees. [R.] He gets too far into the soldier's grace And inches out my master. Dryden. 2. To deal out by inches; to give sparingly. [R.]  To advance or retire by inches or small degrees; to move slowly. With slow paces measures back the field, And inches to the walls. Dryden.  Measurement an inch in any dimension, whether length, breadth, or thickness; -- used in composition; as, a two-inch cable; a four- inch plank. Inch stuff, boards, etc., sawed one inch thick.
street: Originally, a paved way or road; a public highway; now commonly, a thoroughfare in a city or village, bordered by dwellings or business houses. He removed [the body of] Amasa from the street unto the field. Coverdale. At home or through the high street passing. Milton. Note: In an extended sense, street designates besides the roadway, the walks, houses, shops, etc., which border the thoroughfare. His deserted mansion in Duke Street. Macaulay. The street (Broker's Cant), that thoroughfare of a city where the leading bankers and brokers do business; also, figuratively, those who do business there; as, the street would not take the bonds. -- Street Arab, Street broker, etc. See under Arab, Broker, etc. -- Street door, a door which opens upon a street, or is nearest the street. Syn. -- See Way.
square: 1. (Geom.) (a) The corner, or angle, of a figure. [Obs.] (b) A parallelogram having four equal sides and four right angles. 2. Hence, anything which is square, or nearly so; as: (a) A square piece or fragment. He bolted his food down his capacious throat in squares of three inches. Sir W. Scott. (b) A pane of glass. (c) (Print.) A certain number of lines, forming a portion of a column, nearly square; -- used chiefly in reckoning the prices of advertisements in newspapers. (d) (Carp.) One hundred superficial feet. 3. An area of four sides, generally with houses on each side; sometimes, a solid block of houses; also, an open place or area for public use, as at the meeting or intersection of two or more streets. The statue of Alexander VII. stands in the large square of the town. Addison. 4. (Mech. & Joinery)  An instrument having at least one right angle and two or more straight edges, used to lay out or test square work. It is of several forms, as the T square, the carpenter's square, the try-square., etc. 5. Hence, a pattern or rule. [Obs.] 6. (Arith. & Alg.)  The product of a number or quantity multiplied by itself; thus, 64 is the square of 8, for 8 × 8 = 64; the square of a + b is a2 + 2ab + b2. 7. Exact proportion; justness of workmanship and conduct; regularity; rule. [Obs.] They of Galatia [were] much more out of square. Hooker. I have not kept my square. Shak. 8. (Mil.)  A body of troops formed in a square, esp. one formed to resist a charge of cavalry; a squadron. "The brave squares of war." Shak. 9. Fig.: The relation of harmony, or exact agreement; equality; level. We live not on the square with such as these. Dryden. 10. (Astrol.)  The position of planets distant ninety degrees from each other; a quadrate. [Obs.] 11. The act of squaring, or quarreling; a quarrel. [R.] 12. The front of a woman's dress over the bosom, usually worked or embroidered. [Obs.] Shak. Geometrical square. See Quadrat, n., 2. -- Hollow square (Mil.), a formation of troops in the shape of a square, each side consisting of four or five ranks, and the colors, officers, horses, etc., occupying the middle. -- Least square, Magic square, etc. See under Least, Magic, etc. -- On the square, or Upon the square, in an open, fair manner; honestly, or upon honor. [Obs. or Colloq.] -- On, or Upon, the square with, upon equality with; even with. Nares. -- To be all squares, to be all settled. [Colloq.] Dickens. -- To be at square, to be in a state of quarreling. [Obs.] Nares. -- To break no square, to give no offense; to make no difference. [Obs.] -- To break squares, to depart from an accustomed order. To see how the squares go, to see how the game proceeds; -- a phrase taken from the game of chess, the chessboard being formed with squares. [Obs.] L'Estrange.  1. (Geom.)  Having four equal sides and four right angles; as, a square figure. 2. Forming a right angle; as, a square corner. 3. Having a shape broad for the height, with rectilineal and angular rather than curving outlines; as, a man of a square frame. 4. Exactly suitable or correspondent; true; just. She's a most truimphant lady, if report be square to her. Shak. 5. Rendering equal justice; exact; fair; honest, as square dealing. 6. Even; leaving no balance; as, to make or leave the accounts square. 7. Leaving nothing; hearty; vigorous. By Heaven, square eaters. More meat, I say. Beau. & Fl. 8. (Naut.)  At right angles with the mast or the keel, and parallel to the horizon; -- said of the yards of a square-rigged vessel when they are so braced. Note: Square is often used in self-explaining compounds or combination, as in square-built, square-cornered, square-cut, square- nosed, etc. Square foot, an area equal to that of a square the sides of which are twelwe inches; 144 square inches. -- Square knot, a knot in which the terminal and standing parts are parallel to each other; a reef knot. See Illust. under Knot. -- Square measure, the measure of a superficies or surface which depends on the length and breadth taken conjointly. The units of square measure are squares whose sides are the linear measures; as, square inches, square feet, square meters, etc. -- Square number. See square, n., 6. -- Square root of a number or quantity (Math.), that number or quantity which, multiplied by itself produces the given number or quantity. -- Square sail (Naut.), a four-sided sail extended upon a yard suspended by the middle; sometimes, the foresail of a schooner set upon a yard; also, a cutter's or sloop's sail boomed out. See Illust of Sail. -- Square stern (Naut.), a stern having a transom and joining the counter timbers at an angle, as distinguished from a round stern, which has no transom. -- Three-square, Five-square, etc., having three, five, etc., equal sides; as, a three-square file. -- To get square with, to get even with; to pay off. [Colloq.]  1. To form with four sides and four right angles. Spenser. 2. To form with right angles and straight lines, or flat surfaces; as, to square mason's work. 3. To compare with, or reduce to, any given measure or standard. Shak. 4. To adjust; to regulate; to mold; to shape; to fit; as, to square our actions by the opinions of others. Square my trial To my proportioned strength. Milton. 5. To make even, so as leave no remainder of difference; to balance; as, to square accounts. 6. (Math.)  To multiply by itself; as, to square a number or a quantity. 7. (Astrol.)  To hold a quartile position respecting. The icy Goat and Crab that square the Scales. Creech. 8. (Naut.)  To place at right angles with the keel; as, to square the yards. To square one's shoulders, to raise the shoulders so as to give them a square appearance, -- a movement expressing contempt or dislike. Sir W. Scott. -- To square the circle (Math.), to determine the exact contents of a circle in square measure. The solution of this famous problem is now generally admitted to be impossible.  1. To accord or agree exactly; to be consistent with; to conform or agree; to suit; to fit. No works shall find acceptamce . . . That square not truly with the Scripture plan. Cowper. 2. To go to opposite sides; to take an attitude of offense or defense, or of defiance; to quarrel. [Obs.] Are you such fools To square for this Shak. 3. To take a boxing attitude; -- often with up, sometimes with off. [Colloq.] Dickens.
matter: 1. That of which anything is composed; constituent substance; material; the material or substantial part of anything; the constituent elements of conception; that into which a notion may be analyzed; the essence; the pith; the embodiment. He is the matter of virtue. B. Jonson. 2. That of which the sensible universe and all existent bodies are composed; anything which has extension, occupies space, or is perceptible by the senses; body; substance. Note: Matter is usually divided by philosophical writers into three kinds or classes: solid, liquid, and aëriform. Solid substances are those whose parts firmly cohere and resist impression, as wood or stone. Liquids have free motion among their parts, and easily yield to impression, as water and wine. Aëriform substances are elastic fluids, called vapors and gases, as air and oxygen gas. 3. That with regard to, or about which, anything takes place or is done; the thing aimed at, treated of, or treated; subject of action, discussion, consideration, feeling, complaint, legal action, or the like; theme. "If the matter should be tried by duel." Bacon. Son of God, Savior of men ! Thy name Shall be the copious matter of my song. Milton. Every great matter they shall bring unto thee, but every small matter they shall judge. Ex. xviii. 22. 4. That which one has to treat, or with which one has to do; concern; affair; business. To help the matter, the alchemists call in many vanities out of astrology. Bacon. Some young female seems to have carried matters so far, that she is ripe for asking advice. Spectator. 5. Affair worthy of account; thing of consequence; importance; significance; moment; -- chiefly in the phrases what matter no matter, and the like. A prophet some, and some a poet, cry; No matter which, so neither of them lie. Dryden. 6. Inducing cause or occasion, especially of anything disagreeable or distressing; difficulty; trouble. And this is the matter why interpreters upon that passage in Hosea will not consent it to be a true story, that the prophet took a harlot to wife. Milton. 7. Amount; quantity; portion; space; -- often indefinite. Away he goes, . . . a matter of seven miles. L' Estrange. I have thoughts to tarry a small matter. Congreve. No small matter of British forces were commanded over sea the year before. Mi lton. 8. Substance excreted from living animal bodies; that which is thrown out or discharged in a tumor, boil, or abscess; pus; purulent substance. 9. (Metaph.)  That which is permanent, or is supposed to be given, and in or upon which changes are effected by psychological or physical processes and relations; -- opposed to form. Mansel. 10. (Print.)  Written manuscript, or anything to be set in type; copy; also, type set up and ready to be used, or which has been used, in printing. Dead matter (Print.), type which has been used, or which is not to be used, in printing, and is ready for distribution. -- Live matter (Print.), type set up, but not yet printed from. -- Matter in bar, Matter of fact. See under Bar, and Fact. -- Matter of record, anything recorded. -- Upon the matter, or Upon the whole matter, considering the whole; taking all things into view. Waller, with Sir William Balfour, exceeded in horse, but were, upon the whole matter, equal in foot. Clarendon.  1. To be of importance; to import; to signify. It matters not how they were called. Locke. 2. To form pus or matter, as an abscess; to maturate. [R.] "Each slight sore mattereth." Sir P. Sidney.  To regard as important; to take account of; to care for. [Obs.] He did not matter cold nor hunger. H. Brooke.
weight: 1. The quality of being heavy; that property of bodies by which they tend toward the center of the earth; the effect of gravitative force, especially when expressed in certain units or standards, as pounds, grams, etc. Note: Weight differs from gravity in being the effect of gravity, or the downward pressure of a body under the influence of gravity; hence, it constitutes a measure of the force of gravity, and being the resultant of all the forces exerted by gravity upon the different particles of the body, it is proportional to the quantity of matter in the body. 2. The quantity of heaviness; comparative tendency to the center of the earth; the quantity of matter as estimated by the balance, or expressed numerically with reference to some standard unit; as, a mass of stone having the weight of five hundred pounds. For sorrow, like a heavy-hanging bell, Once set on ringing, with his own weight goes. Shak. 3. Hence, pressure; burden; as, the weight of care or business. "The weight of this said time." Shak. For the public all this weight he bears. Milton. [He] who singly bore the world's sad weight. Keble. 4. Importance; power; influence; efficacy; consequence; moment; impressiveness; as, a consideration of vast weight. In such a point of weight, so near mine honor. Shak. 5. A scale, or graduated standard, of heaviness; a mode of estimating weight; as, avoirdupois weight; troy weight; apothecaries' weight. 6. A ponderous mass; something heavy; as, a clock weight; a paper weight. A man leapeth better with weights in his hands. Bacon. 7. A definite mass of iron, lead, brass, or other metal, to be used for ascertaining the weight of other bodies; as, an ounce weight. 8. (Mech.)  The resistance against which a machine acts, as opposed to the power which moves it. [Obs.] Atomic weight. (Chem.) See under Atomic, and cf. Element. -- Dead weight, Feather weight, Heavy weight, Light weight, etc. See under Dead, Feather, etc. -- Weight of observation (Astron. & Physics), a number expressing the most probable relative value of each observation in determining the result of a series of observations of the same kind. Syn. -- Ponderousness; gravity; heaviness; pressure; burden; load; importance; power; influence; efficacy; consequence; moment; impressiveness.  1. To load with a weight or weights; to load down; to make heavy; to attach weights to; as, to weight a horse or a jockey at a race; to weight a whip handle. The arrows of satire, . . . weighted with sense. Coleridge. 2. (Astron. & Physics)  To assign a weight to; to express by a number the probable accuracy of, as an observation. See Weight of observations, under Weight.
copy: 1. An abundance or plenty of anything. [Obs.] She was blessed with no more copy of wit, but to serve his humor thus. B. Jonson. 2. An imitation, transcript, or reproduction of an original work; as, a copy of a letter, an engraving, a painting, or a statue. I have not the vanity to think my copy equal to the original. Denham. 3. An individual book, or a single set of books containing the works of an author; as, a copy of the Bible; a copy of the works of Addison. 4. That which is to be imitated, transcribed, or reproduced; a pattern, model, or example; as, his virtues are an excellent copy for imitation. Let him first learn to write, after a copy, all the letters. Holder. 5. (print.)  Manuscript or printed matter to be set up in type; as, the printers are calling for more copy. 6. A writing paper Bastard. See under Paper. 7. Copyhold; tenure; lease. [Obs.] Shak. Copy book, a book in which copies are written or printed for learners to imitate. -- Examined copies (Law), those which have been compared with the originals. -- Exemplified copies, those which are attested under seal of a court. -- Certified or Office copies, those which are made or attested by officers having charge of the originals, and authorized to give copies officially. Abbot. Syn. -- Imitation; transcript; duplicate; counterfeit.  1. To make a copy or copies of; to write; print, engrave, or paint after an original; to duplicate; to reproduce; to transcribe; as, to copy a manuscript, inscription, design, painting, etc.; -- often with out, sometimes with off. I like the work well; ere it be demanded (As like enough it will), I'd have it copied. Shak. Let this be copied out, And keep it safe for our remembrance. Shak. 2. To imitate; to attempt to resemble, as in manners or course of life. We copy instinctively the voices of our companions, their accents, and their modes of pronunciation. Stewart.  1. To make a copy or copies; to imitate. 2. To yield a duplicate or transcript; as, the letter did not copy well. Some . . . never fail, when they copy, to follow the bad as well as the good things. Dryden.
color: 1. A property depending on the relations of light to the eye, by which individual and specific differences in the hues and tints of objects are apprehended in vision; as, gay colors; sad colors, etc. Note: The sensation of color depends upon a peculiar function of the retina or optic nerve, in consequence of which rays of light produce different effects according to the length of their waves or undulations, waves of a certain length producing the sensation of red, shorter waves green, and those still shorter blue, etc. White, or ordinary, light consists of waves of various lengths so blended as to produce no effect of color, and the color of objects depends upon their power to absorb or reflect a greater or less proportion of the rays which fall upon them. 2. Any hue distinguished from white or black. 3. The hue or color characteristic of good health and spirits; ruddy complexion. Give color to my pale cheek. Shak. 4. That which is used to give color; a paint; a pigment; as, oil colors or water colors. 5. That which covers or hides the real character of anything; semblance; excuse; disguise; appearance. They had let down the boat into the sea, under color as though they would have cast anchors out of the foreship. Acts xxvii. 30. That he should die is worthy policy; But yet we want a color for his death. Shak. 6. Shade or variety of character; kind; species. Boys and women are for the most part cattle of this color. Shak. 7. A distinguishing badge, as a flag or similar symbol (usually in the plural); as, the colors or color of a ship or regiment; the colors of a race horse (that is, of the cap and jacket worn by the jockey). In the United States each regiment of infantry and artillery has two colors, one national and one regimental. Farrow. 8. (Law)  An apparent right; as where the defendant in trespass gave to the plaintiff an appearance of title, by stating his title specially, thus removing the cause from the jury to the court. Blackstone. Note: Color is express when it is asverred in the pleading, and implied when it is implied in the pleading. Body color. See under Body. -- Color blindness, total or partial inability to distinguish or recognize colors. See Daltonism. -- Complementary color, one of two colors so related to each other that when blended together they produce white light; -- so called because each color makes up to the other what it lacks to make it white. Artificial or pigment colors, when mixed, produce effects differing from those of the primary colors, in consequence of partial absorption. -- Of color (as persons, races, etc.), not of the white race; -- commonly meaning, esp. in the United States, of negro blood, pure or mixed. -- Primary colors, those developed from the solar beam by the prism, viz., red, orange, yellow, green, blue, indigo, and violet, which are reduced by some authors to three, -- red, green, and violet-blue. These three are sometimes called fundamental colors. -- Subjective or Accidental color, a false or spurious color seen in some instances, owing to the persistence of the luminous impression upon the retina, and a gradual change of its character, as where a wheel perfectly white, and with a circumference regulary subdiveded, is made to revolve rapidly over a dark object, the teeth, of the wheel appear to the eye of different shades of color varying with the rapidity of rotation. See Accidental colors, under Accidental.  1. To change or alter the bue or tint of, by dyeing, staining, painting, etc.; to dye; to tinge; to aint; to stain. The rays, to speak properly, are not colored; in them there is nothing else than a certain power and disposition to stir up a sensation of this or that color. Sir I. Newton. 2. To change or alter, as if by dyeing or painting; to give a false appearance to; usually, to give a specious appearance to; to cause to appear attractive; to make plausible; to palliate or excuse; as, the facts were colored by his prejudices. He colors the falsehood of Æneas by an express command from Jupiter to forsake the queen. Dryden. 3. To hide. [Obs.] That by his fellowship he color might Both his estate and love from skill of any wight. Spenser.  To acquire color; to turn red, especially in the face; to blush.
number: 1. That which admits of being counted or reckoned; a unit, or an aggregate of units; a numerable aggregate or collection of individuals; an assemblage made up of distinct things expressible by figures. 2. A collection of many individuals; a numerous assemblage; a multitude; many. Ladies are always of great use to the party they espouse, and never fail to win over numbers. Addison. 3. A numeral; a word or character denoting a number; as, to put a number on a door. 4. Numerousness; multitude. Number itself importeth not much in armies where the people are of weak courage. Bacon. 5. The state or quality of being numerable or countable. Of whom came nations, tribes, people, and kindreds out of number. 2 Esdras iii. 7. 6. Quantity, regarded as made up of an aggregate of separate things. 7. That which is regulated by count; poetic measure, as divisions of time or number of syllables; hence, poetry, verse; -- chiefly used in the plural. I lisped in numbers, for the numbers came. Pope. 8. (Gram.)  The distinction of objects, as one, or more than one (in some languages, as one, or two, or more than two), expressed (usually) by a difference in the form of a word; thus, the singular number and the plural number are the names of the forms of a word indicating the objects denoted or referred to by the word as one, or as more than one. 9. (Math.)  The measure of the relation between quantities or things of the same kind; that abstract species of quantity which is capable of being expressed by figures; numerical value. Abstract number, Abundant number, Cardinal number, etc. See under Abstract, Abundant, etc. -- In numbers, in numbered parts; as, a book published in numbers.  1. To count; to reckon; to ascertain the units of; to enumerate. If a man can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered. Gen. xiii. 16. 2. To reckon as one of a collection or multitude. He was numbered with the transgressors. Is. liii. 12. 3. To give or apply a number or numbers to; to assign the place of in a series by order of number; to designate the place of by a number or numeral; as, to number the houses in a street, or the apartments in a building. 4. To amount; to equal in number; to contain; to consist of; as, the army numbers fifty thousand. Thy tears can not number the dead. Campbell. Numbering machine, a machine for printing consecutive numbers, as on railway tickets, bank bills, etc. Syn. -- To count; enumerate; calculate; tell.
see: 1. A seat; a site; a place where sovereign power is exercised. [Obs.] Chaucer. Jove laughed on Venus from his sovereign see. Spenser. 2. Specifically: (a) The seat of episcopal power; a diocese; the jurisdiction of a bishop; as, the see of New York. (b) The seat of an archibishop; a province or jurisdiction of an archibishop; as, an archiepiscopal see. (c) The seat, place, or office of the pope, or Roman pontiff; as, the papal see. (d) The pope or his court at Rome; as, to appeal to the see of Rome. Apostolic see. See under Apostolic.  1. To perceive by the eye; to have knowledge of the existence and apparent qualities of by the organs of sight; to behold; to descry; to view. I will new turn aside, and see this great sight. Ex. iii. 3. 2. To perceive by mental vision; to form an idea or conception of; to note with the mind; to observe; to discern; to distinguish; to understand; to comprehend; to ascertain. Go, I pray thee, see whether it be well with thy brethren. Gen. xxxvii. 14. Jesus saw that he answered discreetly. Mark xii. 34. Who 's so gross That seeth not this palpable device Shak. 3. To follow with the eyes, or as with the eyes; to watch; to regard attentivelly; to look after. Shak. I had a mind to see him out, and therefore did not care for centradicting him. Addison. 4. To have an interview with; especially, to make a call upon; to visit; as, to go to see a friend. And Samuel came no more to see Saul untill the day of his death. 1 Sam. xv. 35. 5. To fall in with; to have intercourse or communication with; hence, to have knowledge or experience of; as, to see military service. Make us glad according to the days wherein thou hast afflicted us, and the years wherein we have seen evil. Ps. xc. 15. Verily, verily, I say unto you, if a man keep my saying, he shall never see death. John viii. 51. Improvement in visdom and prudence by seeing men. Locke. 6. To accompany in person; to escort; to wait upon; as, to see one home; to see one aboard the cars. God you (him, or me, etc.) see, God keep you (him, me, etc.) in his sight; God protect you. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To see (anything) out, to see (it) to the end; to be present at, or attend, to the end. -- To see stars, to see flashes of light, like stars; -- sometimes the result of concussion of the head. [Colloq.] -- To see (one) through, to help, watch, or guard (one) to the end of a course or an undertaking.  1. To have the power of sight, or of perceiving by the proper organs; to possess or employ the sense of vision; as, he sees distinctly. Whereas I was blind, now I see. John ix. 25. 2. Figuratively: To have intellectual apprehension; to perceive; to know; to understand; to discern; -- often followed by a preposition, as through, or into. For judgment I am come into this world, that they which see not might see; and that they which see might be made blind. John ix. 39. Many sagacious persons will find us out, . . . and see through all our fine pretensions. Tillotson. 3. To be attentive; to take care; to give heed; -- generally with to; as, to see to the house. See that ye fall not out by the way. Gen. xiv. 24. Note: Let me see, Let us see, are used to express consideration, or to introduce the particular consideration of a subject, or some scheme or calculation. Cassio's a proper man, let me see now, -To get his place. Shak. Note: See is sometimes used in the imperative for look, or behold. "See. see! upon the banks of Boyne he stands." Halifax. To see about a thing, to pay attention to it; to consider it. -- To see on, to look at. [Obs.] "She was full more blissful on to see." Chaucer. -- To see to. (a) To look at; to behold; to view. [Obs.] "An altar by Jordan, a great altar to see to" Josh. xxii. 10. (b) To take care about; to look after; as, to see to a fire.
figure: 1. The form of anything; shape; outline; appearance. Flowers have all exquisite figures. Bacon. 2. The representation of any form, as by drawing, painting, modeling, carving, embroidering, etc.; especially, a representation of the human body; as, a figure in bronze; a figure cut in marble. A coin that bears the figure of an angel. Shak. 3. A pattern in cloth, paper, or other manufactured article; a design wrought out in a fabric; as, the muslin was of a pretty figure. 4. (Geom.)  A diagram or drawing; made to represent a magnitude or the relation of two or more magnitudes; a surface or space inclosed on all sides; -- called superficial when inclosed by lines, and solid when inclosed by surface; any arrangement made up of points, lines, angles, surfaces, etc. 5. The appearance or impression made by the conduct or carrer of a person; as, a sorry figure. I made some figure there. Dryden. Gentlemen of the best figure in the county. Blackstone. 6. Distinguished appearance; magnificence; conspicuous representation; splendor; show. That he may live in figure and indulgence. Law. 7. A character or symbol representing a number; a numeral; a digit; as, 1, 2,3, etc. 8. Value, as expressed in numbers; price; as, the goods are estimated or sold at a low figure. [Colloq.] With nineteen thousand a year at the very lowest figure. Thackeray. 9. A person, thing, or action, conceived of as analogous to another person, thing, or action, of which it thus becomes a type or representative. Who is the figure of Him that was to come. Rom. v. 14. 10. (Rhet.)  A mode of expressing abstract or immaterial ideas by words which suggest pictures or images from the physical world; pictorial language; a trope; hence, any deviation from the plainest form of statement. To represent the imagination under the figure of a wing. Macaulay. 11. (Logic)  The form of a syllogism with respect to the relative position of the middle term. 12. (Dancing)  Any one of the several regular steps or movements made by a dancer. 13. (Astrol.)  A horoscope; the diagram of the aspects of the astrological houses. Johnson. 14. (Music) (a) Any short succession of notes, either as melody or as a group of chords, which produce a single complete and distinct impression. Grove. (b) A form of melody or accompaniment kept up through a strain or passage; a musical or motive; a florid embellishment. Note: Figures are often written upon the staff in music to denote the kind of measure. They are usually in the form of a fraction, the upper figure showing how many notes of the kind indicated by the lower are contained in one measure or bar. Thus, 2/4 signifies that the measure contains two quarter notes. The following are the principal figures used for this purpose: --2/22/42/8 4/22/44/8 3/23/43/8 6/46/46/8 Academy figure, Canceled figures, Lay figure, etc. See under Academy, Cancel, Lay, etc. -- Figure caster, or Figure flinger, an astrologer. This figure caster." Milton. -- Figure flinging, the practice of astrology. -- Figure-of-eight knot, a knot shaped like the figure 8. See Illust. under Knot. -- Figure painting, a picture of the human figure, or the act or art of depicting the human figure. -- Figure stone (Min.), agalmatolite. -- Figure weaving, the art or process of weaving figured fabrics. -- To cut a figure, to make a display. [Colloq.] Sir W. Scott.  1. To represent by a figure, as to form or mold; to make an image of, either palpable or ideal; also, to fashion into a determinate form; to shape. If love, alas! be pain I bear, No thought can figure, and no tongue declare.Prior. 2. To embellish with design; to adorn with figures. The vaulty top of heaven Figured quite o'er with burning meteors. Shak. 3. To indicate by numerals; also, to compute. As through a crystal glass the figured hours are seen. Dryden. 4. To represent by a metaphor; to signify or symbolize. Whose white vestments figure innocence. Shak. 5. To prefigure; to foreshow. In this the heaven figures some event. Shak. 6. (Mus.) (a) To write over or under the bass, as figures or other characters, in order to indicate the accompanying chords. (b) To embellish. To figure out, to solve; to compute or find the result of. -- To figure up, to add; to reckon; to compute the amount of.  1. To make a figure; to be distinguished or conspicious; as, the envoy figured at court. Sociable, hospitable, eloquent, admired, figuring away brilliantly. M. Arnold. 2. To calculate; to contrive; to scheme; as, he is figuring to secure the nomination. [Colloq.]
through: 1. From end to end of, or from side to side of; from one surface or limit of, to the opposite; into and out of at the opposite, or at another, point; as, to bore through a piece of timber, or through a board; a ball passes through the side of a ship. 2. Between the sides or walls of; within; as, to pass through a door; to go through an avenue. Through the gate of ivory he dismissed His valiant offspring. Dryden. 3. By means of; by the agency of. Through these hands this science has passed with great applause. Sir W. Temple. Material things are presented only through their senses. Cheyne. 4. Over the whole surface or extent of; as, to ride through the country; to look through an account. 5. Among or in the midst of; -- used to denote passage; as, a fish swims through the water; the light glimmers through a thicket. 6. From the beginning to the end of; to the end or conclusion of; as, through life; through the year.  1. From one end or side to the other; as, to pierce a thing through. 2. From beginning to end; as, to read a letter through. 3. To the end; to a conclusion; to the ultimate purpose; as, to carry a project through. Note: Through was formerly used to form compound adjectives where we now use thorough; as, through-bred; through-lighted; through-placed, etc. To drop through, to fall through; to come to naught; to fail. -- To fall through. See under Fall, v. i.  Going or extending through; going, extending, or serving from the beginning to the end; thorough; complete; as, a through line; a through ticket; a through train. Also, admitting of passage through; as, a through bridge. Through bolt, a bolt which passes through all the thickness or layers of that which it fastens, or in which it is fixed. -- Through bridge, a bridge in which the floor is supported by the lower chords of the tissues instead of the upper, so that travel is between the trusses and not over them. Cf. Deck bridge, under Deck. -- Through cold, a deep-seated cold. [Obs.] Holland. -- Through stone, a flat gravestone. [Scot.] [Written also through stane.] Sir W. Scott. -- Through ticket, a ticket for the whole journey. -- Through train, a train which goes the whole length of a railway, or of a long route.
difficult: 1. Hard to do or to make; beset with difficulty; attended with labor, trouble, or pains; not easy; arduous. Note: Difficult implies the notion that considerable mental effort or skill is required, or that obstacles are to be overcome which call for sagacity and skill in the agent; as, a difficult task; hard work is not always difficult work; a difficult operation in surgery; a difficult passage in an author. There is not the strength or courage left me to venture into the wide, strange, and difficult world, alone. Hawthorne. 2. Hard to manage or to please; not easily wrought upon; austere; stubborn; as, a difficult person. Syn. -- Arduous; painful; crabbed; perplexed; laborious; unaccommodating; troublesome. See Arduous.  To render difficult; to impede; to perplex. [R.] Sir W. Temple.
locate: 1. To place; to set in a particular spot or position. The captives and emigrants whom he brought with him were located in the trans-Tiberine quarter. B. F. Westcott. 2. To designate the site or place of; to define the limits of; as, to locate a public building; to locate a mining claim; to locate (the land granted by) a land warrant. That part of the body in which the sense of touch is located. H. Spencer.  To place one's self; to take up one's residence; to settle. [Colloq.]
king: A Chinese musical instrument, consisting of resonant stones or metal plates, arranged according to their tones in a frame of wood, and struck with a hammer.  1. A chief ruler; a sovereign; one invested with supreme authority over a nation, country, or tribe, usually by hereditary succession; a monarch; a prince. "Ay, every inch a king." Shak. Kings will be tyrants from policy, when subjects are rebels from principle. Burke. There was a State without king or nobles. R. Choate. But yonder comes the powerful King of Day, Rejoicing in the east Thomson. 2. One who, or that which, holds a supreme position or rank; a chief among competitors; as, a railroad king; a money king; the king of the lobby; the king of beasts. 3. A playing card having the picture of a king; as, the king of diamonds. 4. The chief piece in the game of chess. 5. A crowned man in the game of draughts. 6. pl.  The title of two historical books in the Old Testament. Note: King is often used adjectively, or in combination, to denote preëminence or superiority in some particular; as, kingbird; king crow; king vulture. Apostolic king.See Apostolic. -- King-at-arms, or King-of-arms, the chief heraldic officer of a country. In England the king-at-arms was formerly of great authority. His business is to direct the heralds, preside at their chapters, and have the jurisdiction of armory. There are three principal kings-at- arms, viz., Garter, Clarencieux, and Norroy. The latter (literally north roy or north king) officiates north of the Trent. -- King auk (Zoöl.), the little auk or sea dove. -- King bird of paradise. (Zoöl.), See Bird of paradise. -- King card, in whist, the best unplayed card of each suit; thus, if the ace and king of a suit have been played, the queen is the king card of the suit. -- King Cole , a legendary king of Britain, who is said to have reigned in the third century. -- King conch (Zoöl.), a large and handsome univalve shell (Cassis cameo), found in the West Indies. It is used for making cameos. See Helmet shell, under Helmet. -- King Cotton, a popular personification of the great staple production of the southern United States. -- King crab. (Zoöl.) (a) The limulus or horseshoe crab. See Limulus. (b) The large European spider crab or thornback (Maia sguinado). -- King crow. (Zoöl.) (a) A black drongo shrike (Buchanga atra) of India; -- so called because, while breeding, they attack and drive away hawks, crows, and other large birds. (b) The Dicrurus macrocercus of India, a crested bird with a long, forked tail. Its color is black, with green and blue reflections. Called also devil bird. -- King duck (Zoöl.), a large and handsome eider duck (Somateria spectabilis), inhabiting the arctic regions of both continents. -- King eagle (Zoöl.), an eagle (Aquila heliaca) found in Asia and Southeastern Europe. It is about as large as the golden eagle. Some writers believe it to be the imperial eagle of Rome. -- King hake (Zoöl.), an American hake (Phycis regius), fond in deep water along the Atlantic coast. -- King monkey (Zoöl.), an African monkey(Colobus polycomus), inhabiting Sierra Leone. -- King mullet (Zoöl.), a West Indian red mullet (Upeneus maculatus); -- so called on account of its great beauty. Called also goldfish. -- King of terrors, death. -- King parrakeet (Zoöl.), a handsome Australian parrakeet (Platycercys scapulatus), often kept in a cage. Its prevailing color is bright red, with the back and wings bright green, the rump blue, and tail black. -- King penguin (Zoöl.), any large species of penguin of the genus Aptenodytes; esp., A. longirostris, of the Falkland Islands and Kerguelen Land, and A. Patagonica , of Patagonia. -- King rail (Zoöl.), a small American rail (Rallus elegans), living in fresh-water marshes. The upper parts are fulvous brown, striped with black; the breast is deep cinnamon color. -- King salmon (Zoöl.), the quinnat. See Quinnat. -- King's, or Queen's, counsel (Eng. Law), barristers learned in the law, who have been called within the bar, and selected to be the king's or gueen's counsel. They answer in some measure to the advocates of the revenue (advocati fisci) among the Romans. They can not be employed against the crown without special license. Wharton's Law Dict. -- King's cushion, a temporary seat made by two persons crossing their hands. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell. -- The king's English, correct or current language of good speakers; pure English. Shak. -- King's or Queen's, evidence, testimony in favor of the Crown by a witness who confesses his guilt as an accomplice. See under Evidence. [Eng.] -- King's evil, scrofula; -- so called because formerly supposed to be healed by the touch of a king. -- King snake (Zoöl.), a large, nearly black, harmless snake (Ophiobolus getulus) of the Southern United States; -- so called because it kills and eats other kinds of snakes, including even the rattlesnake. -- King's spear (Bot.), the white asphodel (Asphodelus albus). -- King's yellow, a yellow pigment, consisting essentially of sulphide and oxide of arsenic; -- called also yellow orpiment. -- King tody (Zoöl.), a small fly-catching bird (Eurylaimus serilophus) of tropical America. The head is adorned with a large, spreading, fan-shaped crest, which is bright red, edged with black. -- King vulture (Zoöl.), a large species of vulture (Sarcorhamphus papa), ranging from Mexico to Paraguay, The general color is white. The wings and tail are black, and the naked carunculated head and the neck are briliantly colored with scarlet, yellow, orange, and blue. So called because it drives away other vultures while feeding. -- King wood, a wood from Brazil, called also violet wood, beautifully streaked in violet tints, used in turning and small cabinetwork. The tree is probably a species of Dalbergia. See Jacaranda.  To supply with a king; to make a king of; to raise to royalty. [R.] Shak. Those traitorous captains of Israel who kinged themselves by slaying their masters and reigning in their stead. South.
any: 1. One indifferently, out of an indefinite number; one indefinitely, whosoever or whatsoever it may be. Note: Any is often used in denying or asserting without limitation; as, this thing ought not be done at any time; I ask any one to answer my question. No man knoweth the Son, but the Father; neither knoweth any man the Father, save the Son. Matt. xi. 27. 2. Some, of whatever kind, quantity, or number; as, are there any witnesses present are there any other houses like it "Who will show us any good" Ps. iv. 6. Note: It is often used, either in the singular or the plural, as a pronoun, the person or thing being understood; anybody; anyone; (pl.) any persons. If any of you lack wisdom, let him ask of God, . . . and it shall be given him. Jas. i. 5. That if he found any of this way, whether they were men or women, he might bring them bound unto Jerusalem. Acts ix. 2. At any rate, In any case, whatever may be the state of affairs; anyhow.  To any extent; in any degree; at all. You are not to go loose any longer. Shak. Before you go any farther. Steele.
children: pl. of Child.
second: 1. Immediately following the first; next to the first in order of place or time; hence, occuring again; another; other. And he slept and dreamed the second time. Gen. xli. 5. 2. Next to the first in value, power, excellence, dignity, or rank; secondary; subordinate; inferior. May the day when we become the second people upon earth . . . be the day of our utter extirpation. Landor. 3. Being of the same kind as another that has preceded; another, like a protype; as, a second Cato; a second Troy; a second deluge. A Daniel, still say I, a second Daniel! Shak. Second Adventist. See Adventist. -- Second cousin, the child of a cousin. -- Second-cut file. See under File. -- Second distance (Art), that part of a picture between the foreground and the background; -- called also middle ground, or middle distance. [R.] -- Second estate (Eng.), the House of Peers. -- Second girl, a female house-servant who does the lighter work, as chamber work or waiting on table. -- Second intention. See under Intention. -- Second story, Story floor, in America, the second range of rooms from the street level. This, in England, is called the first floor, the one beneath being the ground floor. -- Second thought or thoughts, consideration of a matter following a first impulse or impression; reconsideration. On second thoughts, gentlemen, I don't wish you had known him. Dickens.  1. One who, or that which, follows, or comes after; one next and inferior in place, time, rank, importance, excellence, or power. Man an angel's second, nor his second long. Young. 2. One who follows or attends another for his support and aid; a backer; an assistant; specifically, one who acts as another's aid in a duel. Being sure enough of seconds after the first onset. Sir H. Wotton. 3. Aid; assistance; help. [Obs.] Give second, and my love Is everlasting thine. J. Fletcher. 4. pl.  An article of merchandise of a grade inferior to the best; esp., a coarse or inferior kind of flour. 5. Etym: [F. seconde. See Second, a.]  The sixtieth part of a minute of time or of a minute of space, that is, the second regular subdivision of the degree; as, sound moves about 1,140 English feet in a second; five minutes and ten seconds north of this place. 6. In the duodecimal system of mensuration, the twelfth part of an inch or prime; a line. See Inch, and Prime, n., 8. 7. (Mus.) (a) The interval between any tone and the tone which is represented on the degree of the staff next above it. (b) The second part in a concerted piece; -- often popularly applied to the alto. Second hand, the hand which marks the seconds on the dial of a watch or a clock.  1. To follow in the next place; to succeed; to alternate. [R.] In the method of nature, a low valley is immediately seconded with an ambitious hill. Fuller. Sin is seconded with sin. South. 2. To follow or attend for the purpose of assisting; to support; to back; to act as the second of; to assist; to forward; to encourage. We have supplies to second our attempt. Shak. In human works though labored on with pain, A thousand movements scarce one purpose gain; In God's, one single can its end produce, Yet serves to second too some other use. Pope. 3. Specifically, to support, as a motion or proposal, by adding one's voice to that of the mover or proposer.
hour: 1. The twenty-fourth part of a day; sixty minutes. 2. The time of the day, as expressed in hours and minutes, and indicated by a timepiece; as, what is the hour At what hour shall we meet 3. Fixed or appointed time; conjuncture; a particular time or occasion; as, the hour of greatest peril; the man for the hour. Woman, . . . mine hour is not yet come. John ii. 4. This is your hour, and the power of darkness. Luke xxii. 53. 4. pl. (R. C. Ch.)  Certain prayers to be repeated at stated times of the day, as matins and vespers. 5. A measure of distance traveled. Vilvoorden, three hours from Brussels. J. P. Peters. After hours, after the time appointed for one's regular labor. -- Canonical hours. See under Canonical. -- Hour angle (Astron.), the angle between the hour circle passing through a given body, and the meridian of a place. -- Hour circle. (Astron.) (a) Any circle of the sphere passing through the two poles of the equator; esp., one of the circles drawn on an artificial globe through the poles, and dividing the equator into spaces of 15º, or one hour, each. (b) A circle upon an equatorial telescope lying parallel to the plane of the earth's equator, and graduated in hours and subdivisions of hours of right ascension. (c) A small brass circle attached to the north pole of an artificial globe, and divided into twenty-four parts or hours. It is used to mark differences of time in working problems on the globe. -- Hour hand, the hand or index which shows the hour on a timepiece. -- Hour line. (a) (Astron.) A line indicating the hour. (b) (Dialing) A line on which the shadow falls at a given hour; the intersection of an hour circle which the face of the dial. -- Hour plate, the plate of a timepiece on which the hours are marked; the dial. Locke. -- Sidereal hour, the twenty-fourth part of a sidereal day. -- Solar hour, the twenty-fourth part of a solar day. -- The small hours, the early hours of the morning, as one o'clock, two o'clock, etc. -- To keep good hours, to be regular in going to bed early.
found: imp. & p. p. of Find.  To form by melting a metal, and pouring it into a mold; to cast. "Whereof to found their engines." Milton.  A thin, single-cut file for combmakers.  1. To lay the basis of; to set, or place, as on something solid, for support; to ground; to establish upon a basis, literal or figurative; to fix firmly. I had else been perfect, Whole as the marble, founded as the rock. Shak. A man that all his time Hath founded his good fortunes on your love. Shak. It fell not, for it was founded on a rock. Matt. vii. 25. 2. To take the ffirst steps or measures in erecting or building up; to furnish the materials for beginning; to begin to raise; to originate; as, to found a college; to found a family. There they shall found Their government, and their great senate choose. Milton. Syn. -- To base; ground; institute; establish; fix. See Predicate.
tube: 1. A hollow cylinder, of any material, used for the conveyance of fluids, and for various other purposes; a pipe. 2. A telescope. "Glazed optic tube." Milton. 3. A vessel in animal bodies or plants, which conveys a fluid or other substance. 4. (Bot.)  The narrow, hollow part of a gamopetalous corolla. 5. (Gun.)  A priming tube, or friction primer. See under Priming, and Friction. 6. (Steam Boilers)  A small pipe forming part of the boiler, containing water and surrounded by flame or hot gases, or else surrounded by water and forming a flue for the gases to pass through. 7. (Zoöl.) (a) A more or less cylindrical, and often spiral, case secreted or constructed by many annelids, crustaceans, insects, and other animals, for protection or concealment. See Illust. of Tubeworm. (b) One of the siphons of a bivalve mollusk. Capillary tube, a tube of very fine bore. See Capillary. -- Fire tube (Steam Boilers), a tube which forms a flue. -- Tube coral. (Zoöl.) Same as Tubipore. -- Tube foot (Zoöl.), one of the ambulacral suckers of an echinoderm. -- Tube plate, or Tube sheet (Steam Boilers), a flue plate. See under Flue. -- Tube pouch (Mil.), a pouch containing priming tubes. -- Tube spinner (Zoöl.), any one of various species of spiders that construct tubelike webs. They belong to Tegenaria, Agelena, and allied genera. -- Water tube (Steam Boilers), a tube containing water and surrounded by flame or hot gases.  To furnish with a tube; as, to tube a well.
snow: A square-rigged vessel, differing from a brig only in that she has a trysail mast close abaft the mainmast, on which a large trysail is hoisted.  1. Watery particles congealed into white or transparent crystals or flakes in the air, and falling to the earth, exhibiting a great variety of very beautiful and perfect forms. Note: Snow is often used to form compounds, most of which are of obvious meaning; as, snow-capped, snow-clad, snow-cold, snow-crowned, snow-crust, snow-fed, snow-haired, snowlike, snow-mantled, snow- nodding, snow-wrought, and the like. 2. Fig.: Something white like snow, as the white color (argent) in heraldry; something which falls in, or as in, flakes. The field of snow with eagle of black therein. Chaucer. Red snow. See under Red. Snow bunting. (Zoöl.) See Snowbird, 1. -- Snow cock (Zoöl.), the snow pheasant. -- Snow flea (Zoöl.), a small black leaping poduran (Achorutes nivicola) often found in winter on the snow in vast numbers. -- Snow flood, a flood from melted snow. -- Snow flower (Bot.), the fringe tree. -- Snow fly, or Snow insect (Zoöl.), any one of several species of neuropterous insects of the genus Boreus. The male has rudimentary wings; the female is wingless. These insects sometimes appear creeping and leaping on the snow in great numbers. -- Snow gnat (Zoöl.), any wingless dipterous insect of the genus Chionea found running on snow in winter. -- Snow goose (Zoöl.), any one of several species of arctic geese of the genus Chen. The common snow goose (Chen hyperborea), common in the Western United States in winter, is white, with the tips of the wings black and legs and bill red. Called also white brant, wavey, and Texas goose. The blue, or blue-winged, snow goose (C. coerulescens) is varied with grayish brown and bluish gray, with the wing quills black and the head and upper part of the neck white. Called also white head, white-headed goose, and bald brant. -- Snow leopard (Zool.), the ounce. -- Snow line, lowest limit of perpetual snow. In the Alps this is at an altitude of 9,000 feet, in the Andes, at the equator, 16,000 feet. -- Snow mouse (Zoöl.), a European vole (Arvicola nivalis) which inhabits the Alps and other high mountains. -- Snow pheasant (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large, handsome gallinaceous birds of the genus Tetraogallus, native of the lofty mountains of Asia. The Himalayn snow pheasant (T.Himalayensis) in the best-known species. Called also snow cock, and snow chukor. -- Snow partridge. (Zoöl.) See under Partridge. -- Snow pigeon (Zoöl.), a pigeon (Columba leuconota) native of the Himalaya mountains. Its back, neck, and rump are white, the top of the head and the ear coverts are black. -- Snow plant (Bot.), a fleshy parasitic herb (Sarcodes sanguinea) growing in the coniferous forests of California. It is all of a bright red color, and is fabled to grow from the snow, through which it sometimes shoots up.  To fall in or as snow; -- chiefly used impersonally; as, it snows; it snowed yesterday.  To scatter like snow; to cover with, or as with, snow. Donne. Shak.
such: 1. Of that kind; of the like kind; like; resembling; similar; as, we never saw such a day; -- followed by that or as introducing the word or proposition which defines the similarity, or the standard of comparison; as, the books are not such that I can recommend them, or, not such as I can recommend; these apples are not such as those we saw yesterday; give your children such precepts as tend to make them better. And in his time such a conqueror That greater was there none under the sun. Chaucer. His misery was such that none of the bystanders could refrain from weeping. Macaulay. Note: The indefinite article a or an never precedes such, but is placed between it and the noun to which it refers; as, such a man; such an honor. The indefinite adjective some, several, one, few, many, all, etc., precede such; as, one such book is enough; all such people ought to be avoided; few such ideas were then held. 2. Having the particular quality or character specified. That thou art happy, owe to God; That thou continuest such, owe to thyself. Milton. 3. The same that; -- with as; as, this was the state of the kingdom at such time as the enemy landed. "[It] hath such senses as we have." Shak. 4. Certain; -- representing the object as already particularized in terms which are not mentioned. In rushed one and tells him such a knight Is new arrived. Daniel. To-day or to-morrow we will go into such a city, and continue there a year. James iv. 13. Note: Such is used pronominally. "He was the father of such as dwell in tents." Gen. iv. 20. "Such as I are free in spirit when our limbs are chained." Sir W. Scott. Such is also used before adjectives joined to substantives; as, the fleet encountered such a terrible storm that it put back. "Everything was managed with so much care, and such excellent order was observed." De Foe. Temple sprung from a family which . . . long after his death produced so many eminent men, and formed such distinguished alliances, that, etc. Macaulay. Such is used emphatically, without the correlative. Now will he be mocking: I shall have such a life. Shak. Such was formerly used with numerals in the sense of times as much or as many; as, such ten, or ten times as many. Such and such, or Such or such, certain; some; -- used to represent the object indefinitely, as already particularized in one way or another, or as being of one kind or another. "In such and such a place shall be my camp." 2 Kings vi. 8. "Sovereign authority may enact a law commanding such and such an action." South. -- Such like or character, of the like kind. And many other such like things ye do. Mark vii. 8.
pay: To cover, as bottom of a vessel, a seam, a spar, etc., with tar or pitch, or waterproof composition of tallow, resin, etc.; to smear.  1. To satisfy, or content; specifically, to satisfy (another person) for service rendered, property delivered, etc.; to discharge one's obligation to; to make due return to; to compensate; to remunerate; to recompense; to requite; as, to pay workmen or servants. May no penny ale them pay [i. e., satisfy]. P. Plowman. [She] pays me with disdain. Dryden. 2. Hence, figuratively: To compensate justly; to requite according to merit; to reward; to punish; to retort or retaliate upon. For which, or pay me quickly, or I'll pay you. B. Jonson. 3. To discharge, as a debt, demand, or obligation, by giving or doing what is due or required; to deliver the amount or value of to the person to whom it is owing; to discharge a debt by delivering (money owed). "Pay me that thou owest." Matt. xviii. 28. Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. Matt. xviii. 26. If they pay this tax, they starve. Tennyson. 4. To discharge or fulfill, as a duy; to perform or render duty, as that which has been promised. This day have I paid my vows. Prov. vii. 14. 5. To give or offer, without an implied obligation; as, to pay attention; to pay a visit. Not paying me a welcome. Shak. To pay off. (a) To make compensation to and discharge; as, to pay off the crew of a ship. (b) To allow (a thread, cord, etc.) to run off; to unwind. -- To pay one's duty, to render homage, as to a sovereign or other superior. -- To pay out (Naut.), to pass out; hence, to slacken; to allow to run out; as, to pay out more cable. See under Cable. -- To pay the piper, to bear the cost, expense, or trouble. [Colloq.]  To give a recompense; to make payment, requital, or satisfaction; to discharge a debt. The wicked borroweth, and payeth not again. Ps. xxxvii. 21. 2. Hence, to make or secure suitable return for expense or trouble; to be remunerative or profitable; to be worth the effort or pains required; as, it will pay to ride; it will pay to wait; politeness always pays. To pay for. (a) To make amends for; to atone for; as, men often pay for their mistakes with loss of property or reputation, sometimes with life. (b) To give an equivalent for; to bear the expense of; to be mulcted on account of. 'T was I paid for your sleeps; I watched your wakings. Beau. & Fl. -- To pay off. Etym: [Etymol. uncertain.] (Naut.) To fall to leeward, as the head of a vessel under sail. -- To pay on. Etym: [Etymol. uncertain.] To beat with vigor; to redouble blows. [Colloq.] -- To pay round Etym: [Etymol. uncertain.] (Naut.) To turn the ship's head.  1. Satisfaction; content. Chaucer. 2. An equivalent or return for money due, goods purchased, or services performed; salary or wages for work or service; compensation; recompense; payment; hire; as, the pay of a clerk; the pay of a soldier. Where only merit constant pay receives. Pope. There is neither pay nor plunder to be got. L'Estrange. Full pay, the whole amount of wages or salary; maximum pay; especially, the highest pay or allowance to civil or military officers of a certain rank, without deductions. -- Half pay. See under Half. -- Pay day, the day of settlement of accounts. -- Pay dirt (Mining), earth which yields a profit to the miner. [Western U.S.] -- Pay office, a place where payment is made. -- Pay roll, a roll or list of persons entitled to payment, with the amounts due.
has: 3d pers. sing. pres. of Have.
tall: 1. High in stature; having a considerable, or an unusual, extension upward; long and comparatively slender; having the diameter or lateral extent small in proportion to the height; as, a tall person, tree, or mast. Two of far nobler shape, erect and tall. Milton. 2. Brave; bold; courageous. [Obs.] As tall a trencherman As e'er demolished a pye fortification. Massinger. His companions, being almost in despair of victory, were suddenly recomforted by Sir William Stanley, which came to succors with three thousand tall men. Grafton. 3. Fine; splendid; excellent; also, extravagant; excessive. [Obs. or Slang] B. Jonson. Syn. -- High; lofty. -- Tall, High, Lofty. High is the generic term, and is applied to anything which is elevated or raised above another thing. Tall specifically describes that which has a small diameter in proportion to its height; hence, we speak of a tall man, a tall steeple, a tall mast, etc., but not of a tall hill. Lofty has a special reference to the expanse above us, and denotes an imposing height; as, a lofty mountain; a lofty room. Tall is now properly applied only to physical objects; high and lofty have a moral acceptation; as, high thought, purpose, etc.; lofty aspirations; a lofty genius. Lofty is the stronger word, and is usually coupled with the grand or admirable.
object: 1. To set before or against; to bring into opposition; to oppose. [Obs.] Of less account some knight thereto object, Whose loss so great and harmful can not prove. Fairfax. Some strong impediment or other objecting itself. Hooker. Pallas to their eyes The mist objected, and condensed the skies. Pope. 2. To offer in opposition as a criminal charge or by way of accusation or reproach; to adduce as an objection or adverse reason. He gave to him to object his heinous crime. Spencer. Others object the poverty of the nation. Addison. The book ... giveth liberty to object any crime against such as are to be ordered. Whitgift.  To make opposition in words or argument; -- usually followed by to. Sir. T. More.  1. That which is put, or which may be regarded as put, in the way of some of the senses; something visible or tangible; as, he observed an object in the distance; all the objects in sight; he touched a strange object in the dark. 2. That which is set, or which may be regarded as set, before the mind so as to be apprehended or known; that of which the mind by any of its activities takes cognizance, whether a thing external in space or a conception formed by the mind itself; as, an object of knowledge, wonder, fear, thought, study, etc. Object is a term for that about which the knowing subject is conversant; what the schoolmen have styled the "materia circa quam." Sir. W. Hamilton. The object of their bitterest hatred. Macaulay. 3. That by which the mind, or any of its activities, is directed; that on which the purpose are fixed as the end of action or effort; that which is sought for; end; aim; motive; final cause. Object, beside its proper signification, came to be abusively applied to denote motive, end, final cause.... This innovation was probably borrowed from the French. Sir. W. Hamilton. Let our object be, our country, our whole country, and nothing but our country. D. Webster. 4. Sight; show; appearance; aspect. [Obs.] Shak. He, advancing close Up to the lake, past all the rest, arose In glorious object. Chapman. 5. (Gram.)  A word, phrase, or clause toward which an action is directed, or is considered to be directed; as, the object of a transitive verb. Object glass, the lens, or system of lenses, placed at the end of a telescope, microscope, etc., which is toward the object. Its office is to form an image of the object, which is then viewed by the eyepiece. Called also objective. See Illust. of Microscope. -- Object lesson, a lesson in which object teaching is made use of. -- Object staff. (Leveling) Same as Leveling staff. -- Object teaching, a method of instruction, in which illustrative objects are employed, each new word or idea being accompanied by a representation of that which it signifies; -- used especially in the kindergarten, for young children.  Opposed; presented in opposition; also, exposed. [Obs.]
charge: 1. To lay on or impose, as a load, tax, or burden; to load; to fill. A carte that charged was with hay. Chaucer. The charging of children's memories with rules. Locke. 2. To lay on or impose, as a task, duty, or trust; to command, instruct, or exhort with authority; to enjoin; to urge earnestly; as, to charge a jury; to charge the clergy of a diocese; to charge an agent. Moses . . . charged you to love the Lord your God. Josh. xxii. 5. Cromwell, I charge thee, fing away ambition. Shak. 3. To lay on, impose, or make subject to or liable for. When land shal be charged by any lien. Kent. 4. To fix or demand as a prince; as, he charges two dollars a barrelk for apples. 5. To place something to the account of as a debt; to debit, as to charge one with goods. Also, to enter upon the debit side of an account; as, to charge a sum to one. 6. To impute or ascribe; to lay to one's charge. No more accuse thy pen, but charge the crime On native loth and negligence of time. Dryden. 7. To accuse; to make a charge or assertion against (a) person or thing); to lay the responsibility (for something said or done) at the door of. If the did that wrong you charge with. Tennyson. 8. To place within or upon any firearm, piece of apparatus or machinery, the quantity it is intended and fitted to hold or bear; to load; to fill; as, to charge a gun; to charge an electrical machine, etc. Their battering cannon charged to the mouths. Shak. 9. To ornament with or cause to bear; as, to charge an architectural member with a molding. 10. (Her.)  To assume as a bearing; as, he charges three roses or; to add to or represent on; as, he charges his shield with three roses or. 11. To call to account; to challenge. [Obs.] To charge me to an answer. Shak. 12. To bear down upon; to rush upon; to attack. Charged our main battle's front. Shak. Syn. -- To intrust; command; exhort; instruct; accuse; impeach; arraign. See Accuse.  1. To make an onset or rush; as, to charge with fixed bayonets. Like your heroes of antiquity, he charges in iron. Glanvill. "Charge for the guns!" he said. Tennyson. 2. To demand a price; as, to charge high for goods. 3. To debit on an account; as, to charge for purchases. 4. To squat on its belly and be still; -- a command given by a sportsman to a dog.  1. A load or burder laid upon a person or thing. 2. A person or thing commited or intrusted to the care, custody, or management of another; a trust. Note: The people of a parish or church are called the charge of the clergyman who is set over them. 3. Custody or care of any person, thing, or place; office; responsibility; oversight; obigation; duty. 'Tis a great charge to come under one body's hand. Shak. 4. Heed; care; anxiety; trouble. [Obs.] Chaucer. 5. Harm. [Obs.] Chaucer. 6. An order; a mandate or command; an injunction. The king gave cherge concerning Absalom. 2. Sam. xviii. 5. 7. An address (esp. an earnest or impressive address) containing instruction or exhortation; as, the charge of a judge to a jury; the charge of a bishop to his clergy. 8. An accusation of a wrong of offense; allegation; indictment; specification of something alleged. The charge of confounding very different classes of phenomena. Whewell. 9. Whatever constitutes a burden on property, as rents, taxes, lines, etc.; costs; expense incurred; -- usually in the plural. 10. The price demanded for a thing or service. 11. An entry or a account of that which is due from one party to another; that which is debited in a business transaction; as, a charge in an account book. 12. That quantity, as of ammunition, electricity, ore, fuel, etc., which any apparatus, as a gun, battery, furnace, machine, etc., is intended to receive and fitted to hold, or which is actually in it at one time 13. The act of rushing upon, or towards, an enemy; a sudden onset or attack, as of troops, esp. cavalry; hence, the signal for attack; as, to sound the charge. Never, in any other war afore, gave the Romans a hotter charge upon the enemies. Holland. The charge of the light brigade. Tennyson. 14. A position (of a weapon) fitted for attack; as, to bring a weapon to the charge. 15. (Far.)  A soft of plaster or ointment. 16. (Her.)  A bearing. See Bearing, n., 8. 17. Etym: [Cf. Charre.]  Thirty-six pigs of lead, each pig weighing about seventy pounds; -- called also charre. 18. Weight; import; value. Many suchlike "as's" of great charge. Shak. Back charge. See under Back, a. -- Bursting charge. (a (Mil.) The charge which bursts a shell, etc. (b (Mining) A small quantity of fine powder to secure the ignition of a charge of coarse powder in blasting. -- Charge and discharge (Equity Practice), the old mode or form of taking an account before a master in chancery. -- Charge sheet, the paper on which are entered at a police station all arrests and accusations. -- To sound the charge, to give the signal for an attack. Syn. -- Care; custody; trust; management; office; expense; cost; price; assault; attack; onset; injunction; command; order; mandate; instruction; accusation; indictment.
took: imp. of Take.
grow: 1. To increase in size by a natural and organic process; to increase in bulk by the gradual assimilation of new matter into the living organism; -- said of animals and vegetables and their organs. 2. To increase in any way; to become larger and stronger; to be augmented; to advance; to extend; to wax; to accrue. Winter began to grow fast on. Knolles. Even just the sum that I do owe to you Is growing to me by Antipholus. Shak. 3. To spring up and come to matturity in a natural way; to be produced by vegetation; to thrive; to flourish; as, rice grows in warm countries. Where law faileth, error groweth. Gower. 4. To pass from one state to another; to result as an effect from a cause; to become; as, to grow pale. For his mind Had grown Suspicion's sanctuary. Byron. 5. To become attached of fixed; to adhere. Our knees shall kneel till to the ground they grow. Shak. Growing cell, or Growing slide, a device for preserving alive a minute object in water continually renewed, in a manner to permit its growth to be watched under the microscope. -- Grown over, covered with a growth. -- To grow out of, to issue from, as plants from the soil, or as a branch from the main stem; to result from. These wars have grown out of commercial considerations. A. Hamilton. -- To grow up, to arrive at full stature or maturity; as, grown up children. -- To grow together, to close and adhere; to become united by growth, as flesh or the bark of a tree severed. Howells. Syn. -- To become; increase; enlarge; augment; improve; expand; extend.  To cause to grow; to cultivate; to produce; as, to grow a crop; to grow wheat, hops, or tobacco. Macaulay. Syn. -- To raise; to cultivate. See Raise, v. t., 3.
have: 1. To hold in possession or control; to own; as, he has a farm. 2. To possess, as something which appertains to, is connected with, or affects, one. The earth hath bubbles, as the water has. Shak. He had a fever late. Keats. 3. To accept possession of; to take or accept. Break thy mind to me in broken English; wilt thou have me Shak. 4. To get possession of; to obtain; to get. Shak. 5. To cause or procure to be; to effect; to exact; to desire; to require. It had the church accurately described to me. Sir W. Scott. Wouldst thou have me turn traitor also Ld. Lytton. 6. To bear, as young; as, she has just had a child. 7. To hold, regard, or esteem. Of them shall I be had in honor. 2 Sam. vi. 22. 8. To cause or force to go; to take. "The stars have us to bed." Herbert. "Have out all men from me." 2 Sam. xiii. 9. 9. To take or hold (one's self); to proceed promptly; -- used reflexively, often with ellipsis of the pronoun; as, to have after one; to have at one or at a thing, i. e., to aim at one or at a thing; to attack; to have with a companion. Shak. 10. To be under necessity or obligation; to be compelled; followed by an infinitive. Science has, and will long have, to be a divider and a separatist. M. Arnold. The laws of philology have to be established by external comparison and induction. Earle. 11. To understand. You have me, have you not Shak. 12. To put in an awkward position; to have the advantage of; as, that is where he had him. [Slang] Note: Have, as an auxiliary verb, is used with the past participle to form preterit tenses; as, I have loved; I shall have eaten. Originally it was used only with the participle of transitive verbs, and denoted the possession of the object in the state indicated by the participle; as, I have conquered him, I have or hold him in a conquered state; but it has long since lost this independent significance, and is used with the participles both of transitive and intransitive verbs as a device for expressing past time. Had is used, especially in poetry, for would have or should have. Myself for such a face had boldly died. Tennyson. To have a care, to take care; to be on one's guard. -- To have (a man) out, to engage (one) in a duel. -- To have done (with). See under Do, v. i. -- To have it out, to speak freely; to bring an affair to a conclusion. -- To have on, to wear. -- To have to do with. See under Do, v. t. Syn. -- To possess; to own. See Possess.
mile: A certain measure of distance, being equivalent in England and the United States to 320 poles or rods, or 5,280 feet. Note: The distance called a mile varies greatly in different countries. Its length in yards is, in Norway, 12,182; in Brunswick, 11,816; in Sweden, 11,660; in Hungary, 9,139; in Switzerland, 8,548; in Austria, 8,297; in Prussia, 8,238; in Poland, 8,100; in Italy, 2,025; in England and the United States, 1,760; in Spain, 1,552; in the Netherlands, 1,094. Geographical, or Nautical mile, one sixtieth of a degree of a great circle of the earth, or 6080.27 feet. -- Mile run. Same as Train mile. See under Train. -- Roman mile, a thousand paces, equal to 1,614 yards English measure. -- Statute mile, a mile conforming to statute, that is, in England and the United States, a mile of 5,280 feet, as distinguished from any other mile.
surface: 1. The exterior part of anything that has length and breadth; one of the limits that bound a solid, esp. the upper face; superficies; the outside; as, the surface of the earth; the surface of a diamond; the surface of the body. The bright surface of this ethereous mold. Milton. 2. Hence, outward or external appearance. Vain and weak understandings, which penetrate no deeper than the surface. V. Knox. 3. (Geom.)  A magnitude that has length and breadth without thickness; superficies; as, a plane surface; a spherical surface. 4. (Fort.)  That part of the side which is terminated by the flank prolonged, and the angle of the nearest bastion. Stocqueler. Caustic surface, Heating surface, etc. See under Caustic, Heating, etc. -- Surface condensation, Surface condenser. See under Condensation, and Condenser. -- Surface gauge (Mach.), an instrument consisting of a standard having a flat base and carrying an adjustable pointer, for gauging the evenness of a surface or its height, or for marking a line parallel with a surface. -- Surface grub (Zoöl.), the larva of the great yellow underwing moth (Triphoena pronuba). It is often destructive to the roots of grasses and other plants. -- Surface plate (Mach.), a plate having an accurately dressed flat surface, used as a standard of flatness by which to test other surfaces. -- Surface printing, printing from a surface in relief, as from type, in distinction from plate printing, in which the ink is contained in engraved lines.  1. To give a surface to; especially, to cause to have a smooth or plain surface; to make smooth or plain. 2. To work over the surface or soil of, as ground, in hunting for gold.
sing: 1. To utter sounds with musical inflections or melodious modulations of voice, as fancy may dictate, or according to the notes of a song or tune, or of a given part (as alto, tenor, etc.) in a chorus or concerted piece. The noise of them that sing do I hear. Ex. xxxii. 18. 2. To utter sweet melodious sounds, as birds do. On every bough the briddes heard I sing. Chaucer. Singing birds, in silver cages hung. Dryden. 3. To make a small, shrill sound; as, the air sings in passing through a crevice. O'er his head the flying spear Sang innocent, and spent its force in air. Pope. 4. To tell or relate something in numbers or verse; to celebrate something in poetry. Milton. Bid her . . . sing Of human hope by cross event destroyed. Prior. 5. Ti cry out; to complain. [Obs.] They should sing if thet they were bent. Chaucer.  1. To utter with musical infections or modulations of voice. And they sing the song of Moses, the servant of God, and the song of the Lamb. Rev. xv. 3. And in the darkness sing your carol of high praise. Keble. 2. To celebrate is song; to give praises to in verse; to relate or rehearse in numbers, verse, or poetry. Milton. Arms and the man I sing. Dryden. The last, the happiest British king, Whom thou shalt paint or I shall sing. Addison. 3. To influence by singing; to lull by singing; as, to sing a child to sleep. 4. To accompany, or attend on, with singing. I heard them singing home the bride. Longfellow.
dad: Father; -- a word sometimes used by children. I was never so bethumped withwords, Since I first called my brother's father dad. Shak.
wash: 1. To cleanse by ablution, or dipping or rubbing in water; to apply water or other liquid to for the purpose of cleansing; to scrub with water, etc., or as with water; as, to wash the hands or body; to wash garments; to wash sheep or wool; to wash the pavement or floor; to wash the bark of trees. When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, . . . he took water and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person. Matt. xxvii. 24. 2. To cover with water or any liquid; to wet; to fall on and moisten; hence, to overflow or dash against; as, waves wash the shore. Fresh-blown roses washed with dew. Milton. [The landscape] washed with a cold, gray mist. Longfellow. 3. To waste or abrade by the force of water in motion; as, heavy rains wash a road or an embankment. 4. To remove by washing to take away by, or as by, the action of water; to drag or draw off as by the tide; -- often with away, off, out, etc.; as, to wash dirt from the hands. Arise, and be baptized, and wash away thy sins. Acts xxii. 16. The tide will wash you off. Shak. 5. To cover with a thin or watery coat of color; to tint lightly and thinly. 6. To overlay with a thin coat of metal; as, steel washed with silver. To wash gold, etc., to treat earth or gravel, or crushed ore, with water, in order to separate the gold or other metal, or metallic ore, through their superior gravity. -- To wash the hands of. See under Hand.  1. To perform the act of ablution. Wash in Jordan seven times. 2 Kings v. 10. 2. To clean anything by rubbing or dipping it in water; to perform the business of cleansing clothes, ore, etc., in water. "She can wash and scour." Shak. 3. To bear without injury the operation of being washed; as, some calicoes do not wash. [Colloq.] 4. To be wasted or worn away by the action of water, as by a running or overflowing stream, or by the dashing of the sea; -- said of road, a beach, etc.  1. The act of washing; an ablution; a cleansing, wetting, or dashing with water; hence, a quantity, as of clothes, washed at once. 2. A piece of ground washed by the action of a sea or river, or sometimes covered and sometimes left dry; the shallowest part of a river, or arm of the sea; also, a bog; a marsh; a fen; as, the washes in Lincolnshire. "The Wash of Edmonton so gay." Cowper. These Lincoln washes have devoured them. Shak. 3. Substances collected and deposited by the action of water; as, the wash of a sewer, of a river, etc. The wash of pastures, fields, commons, and roads, where rain water hath a long time settled. Mortimer. 4. Waste liquid, the refuse of food, the collection from washed dishes, etc., from a kitchen, often used as food for pigs. Shak. 5. (Distilling) (a) The fermented wort before the spirit is extracted. (b) A mixture of dunder, molasses, water, and scummings, used in the West Indies for distillation. B. Edwards. 6. That with which anything is washed, or wetted, smeared, tinted, etc., upon the surface. Specifically: -- (a) A liquid cosmetic for the complexion. (b) A liquid dentifrice. (c) A liquid preparation for the hair; as, a hair wash. (d) A medical preparation in a liquid form for external application; a lotion. (e) (Painting) A thin coat of color, esp. water color. (j) A thin coat of metal laid on anything for beauty or preservation. 7. (Naut.) (a) The blade of an oar, or the thin part which enters the water. (b) The backward current or disturbed water caused by the action of oars, or of a steamer's screw or paddles, etc. 8. The flow, swash, or breaking of a body of water, as a wave; also, the sound of it. 9. Ten strikes, or bushels, of oysters. [Prov. Eng.] Wash ball, a ball of soap to be used in washing the hands or face. Swift. -- Wash barrel (Fisheries), a barrel nearly full of split mackerel, loosely put in, and afterward filled with salt water in order to soak the blood from the fish before salting. -- Wash bottle. (Chem.) (a) A bottle partially filled with some liquid through which gases are passed for the purpose of purifying them, especially by removing soluble constituents. (b) A washing bottle. See under Washing. -- Wash gilding. See Water gilding. -- Wash leather, split sheepskin dressed with oil, in imitation of chamois, or shammy, and used for dusting, cleaning glass or plate, etc.; also, alumed, or buff, leather for soldiers' belts.  Washy; weak. [Obs.] Their bodies of so weak and wash a temper. Beau. & Fl. 2. Capable of being washed without injury; washable; as, wash goods. [Colloq.]
horse: 1. (Zoöl.)  A hoofed quadruped of the genus Equus; especially, the domestic horse (E. caballus), which was domesticated in Egypt and Asia at a very early period. It has six broad molars, on each side of each jaw, with six incisors, and two canine teeth, both above and below. The mares usually have the canine teeth rudimentary or wanting. The horse differs from the true asses, in having a long, flowing mane, and the tail bushy to the base. Unlike the asses it has callosities, or chestnuts, on all its legs. The horse excels in strength, speed, docility, courage, and nobleness of character, and is used for drawing, carrying, bearing a rider, and like purposes. Note: Many varieties, differing in form, size, color, gait, speed, etc., are known, but all are believed to have been derived from the same original species. It is supposed to have been a native of the plains of Central Asia, but the wild species from which it was derived is not certainly known. The feral horses of America are domestic horses that have run wild; and it is probably true that most of those of Asia have a similar origin. Some of the true wild Asiatic horses do, however, approach the domestic horse in several characteristics. Several species of fossil (Equus) are known from the later Tertiary formations of Europe and America. The fossil species of other genera of the family Equidæ are also often called horses, in general sense. 2. The male of the genus horse, in distinction from the female or male; usually, a castrated male. 3. Mounted soldiery; cavalry; -- used without the plural termination; as, a regiment of horse; -- distinguished from foot. The armies were appointed, consisting of twenty-five thousand horse and foot. Bacon. 4. A frame with legs, used to support something; as, a clotheshorse, a sawhorse, etc. 5. A frame of timber, shaped like a horse, on which soldiers were made to ride for punishment. 6. Anything, actual or figurative, on which one rides as on a horse; a hobby. 7. (Mining)  A mass of earthy matter, or rock of the same character as the wall rock, occurring in the course of a vein, as of coal or ore; hence, to take horse -- said of a vein -- is to divide into branches for a distance. 8. (Naut.) (a) See Footrope, a. (b) A breastband for a leadsman. (c) An iron bar for a sheet traveler to slide upon. (d) A jackstay. W. C. Russell. Totten. Note: Horse is much used adjectively and in composition to signify of, or having to do with, a horse or horses, like a horse, etc.; as, horse collar, horse dealer or horsehorsehoe, horse jockey; and hence, often in the sense of strong, loud, coarse, etc.; as, horselaugh, horse nettle or horse-nettle, horseplay, horse ant, etc. Black horse, Blood horse, etc. See under Black, etc. -- Horse aloes, caballine aloes. -- Horse ant (Zoöl.), a large ant (Formica rufa); -- called also horse emmet. -- Horse artillery, that portion of the artillery in which the cannoneers are mounted, and which usually serves with the cavalry; flying artillery. -- Horse balm (Bot.), a strong-scented labiate plant (Collinsonia Canadensis), having large leaves and yellowish flowers. -- Horse bean (Bot.), a variety of the English or Windsor bean (Faba vulgaris), grown for feeding horses. -- Horse boat, a boat for conveying horses and cattle, or a boat propelled by horses. -- Horse bot. (Zoöl.) See Botfly, and Bots. -- Horse box, a railroad car for transporting valuable horses, as hunters. [Eng.] -- Horse breaker or trainer, one employed in subduing or training horses for use. -- Horse car. (a) A railroad car drawn by horses. See under Car. (b) A car fitted for transporting horses. -- Horse cassia (Bot.), a leguminous plant (Cassia Javanica), bearing long pods, which contain a black, catharic pulp, much used in the East Indies as a horse medicine. -- Horse cloth, a cloth to cover a horse. -- Horse conch (Zoöl.), a large, spiral, marine shell of the genus Triton. See Triton. -- Horse courser. (a) One that runs horses, or keeps horses for racing. Johnson. (b) A dealer in horses. [Obs.] Wiseman. -- Horse crab (Zoöl.), the Limulus; -- called also horsefoot, horsehoe crab, and king crab. -- Horse crevallé (Zoöl.), the cavally. -- Horse emmet (Zoöl.), the horse ant. -- Horse finch (Zoöl.), the chaffinch. [Prov. Eng.] -- Horse gentian (Bot.), fever root. -- Horse iron (Naut.), a large calking iron. -- Horse latitudes, a space in the North Atlantic famous for calms and baffling winds, being between the westerly winds of higher latitudes and the trade winds. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- Horse mackrel. (Zoöl.) (a) The common tunny (Orcynus thunnus), found on the Atlantic coast of Europe and America, and in the Mediterranean. (b) The bluefish (Pomatomus saltatrix). (c) The scad. (d) The name is locally applied to various other fishes, as the California hake, the black candlefish, the jurel, the bluefish, etc. -- Horse marine (Naut.), an awkward, lubbery person; one of a mythical body of marine cavalry. [Slang] -- Horse mussel (Zoöl.), a large, marine mussel (Modiola modiolus), found on the northern shores of Europe and America. -- Horse nettle (Bot.), a coarse, prickly, American herb, the Solanum Carolinense. -- Horse parsley. (Bot.) See Alexanders. -- Horse purslain (Bot.), a coarse fleshy weed of tropical America (Trianthema monogymnum). -- Horse race, a race by horses; a match of horses in running or trotting. -- Horse racing, the practice of racing with horses. -- Horse railroad, a railroad on which the cars are drawn by horses; -- in England, and sometimes in the United States, called a tramway. -- Horse run (Civil Engin.), a device for drawing loaded wheelbarrows up an inclined plane by horse power. -- Horse sense, strong common sense. [Colloq. U.S.] -- Horse soldier, a cavalryman. -- Horse sponge (Zoöl.), a large, coarse, commercial sponge (Spongia equina). -- Horse stinger (Zoöl.), a large dragon fly. [Prov. Eng.] -- Horse sugar (Bot.), a shrub of the southern part of the United States (Symplocos tinctoria), whose leaves are sweet, and good for fodder. -- Horse tick (Zoöl.), a winged, dipterous insect (Hippobosca equina), which troubles horses by biting them, and sucking their blood; -- called also horsefly, horse louse, and forest fly. -- Horse vetch (Bot.), a plant of the genus Hippocrepis (H. comosa), cultivated for the beauty of its flowers; -- called also horsehoe vetch, from the peculiar shape of its pods. -- Iron horse, a locomotive. [Colloq.] -- Salt horse, the sailor's name for salt beef. -- To look a gift horse in the mouth, to examine the mouth of a horse which has been received as a gift, in order to ascertain his age; -- hence, to accept favors in a critical and thankless spirit. Lowell. -- To take horse. (a) To set out on horseback. Macaulay. (b) To be covered, as a mare. (c) See definition 7 (above).  1. To provide with a horse, or with horses; to mount on, or as on, a horse. "Being better horsed, outrode me." Shak. 2. To sit astride of; to bestride. Shak. 3. To cover, as a mare; -- said of the male. 4. To take or carry on the back; as, the keeper, horsing a deer. S. Butler. 5. To place on the back of another, or on a wooden horse, etc., to be flogged; to subject to such punishment.  To get on horseback. [Obs.] Shelton.
student: 1. A person engaged in study; one who is devoted to learning; a learner; a pupil; a scholar; especially, one who attends a school, or who seeks knowledge from professional teachers or from books; as, the students of an academy, a college, or a university; a medical student; a hard student. Keep a gamester from the dice, and a good student from his book. Shak. 2. One who studies or examines in any manner; an attentive and systematic observer; as, a student of human nature, or of physical nature.
language: 1. Any means of conveying or communicating ideas; specifically, human speech; the expression of ideas by the voice; sounds, expressive of thought, articulated by the organs of the throat and mouth. Note: Language consists in the oral utterance of sounds which usage has made the representatives of ideas. When two or more persons customarily annex the same sounds to the same ideas, the expression of these sounds by one person communicates his ideas to another. This is the primary sense of language, the use of which is to communicate the thoughts of one person to another through the organs of hearing. Articulate sounds are represented to the eye by letters, marks, or characters, which form words. 2. The expression of ideas by writing, or any other instrumentality. 3. The forms of speech, or the methods of expressing ideas, peculiar to a particular nation. 4. The characteristic mode of arranging words, peculiar to an individual speaker or writer; manner of expression; style. Others for language all their care express. Pope. 5. The inarticulate sounds by which animals inferior to man express their feelings or their wants. 6. The suggestion, by objects, actions, or conditions, of ideas associated therewith; as, the language of flowers. There was . . . language in their very gesture. Shak. 7. The vocabulary and phraseology belonging to an art or department of knowledge; as, medical language; the language of chemistry or theology. 8. A race, as distinguished by its speech. [R.] All the people, the nations, and the languages, fell down and worshiped the golden image. Dan. iii. 7. Language master, a teacher of languages.[Obs.] Syn. -- Speech; tongue; idiom; dialect; phraseology; diction; discourse; conversation; talk. -- Language, Speech, Tongue, Idiom, Dialect. Language is generic, denoting, in its most extended use, any mode of conveying ideas; speech is the language of articulate sounds; tongue is the Anglo- Saxon tern for language, esp. for spoken language; as, the English tongue. Idiom denotes the forms of construction peculiar to a particular language; dialects are varieties if expression which spring up in different parts of a country among people speaking substantially the same language.  To communicate by language; to express in language. Others were languaged in such doubtful expressions that they have a double sense. Fuller.
deal: 1. A part or portion; a share; hence, an indefinite quantity, degree, or extent, degree, or extent; as, a deal of time and trouble; a deal of cold. Three tenth deals [parts of an ephah] of flour. Num. xv. 9. As an object of science it [the Celtic genius] may count for a good deal . . . as a spiritual power. M. Arnold. She was resolved to be a good deal more circumspect. W. Black. Note: It was formerly limited by some, every, never a, a thousand, etc.; as, some deal; but these are now obsolete or vulgar. In general, we now qualify the word with great or good, and often use it adverbially, by being understood; as, a great deal of time and pains; a great (or good) deal better or worse; that is, better by a great deal, or by a great part or difference. 2. The process of dealing cards to the players; also, the portion disturbed. The deal, the shuffle, and the cut. Swift. 3. Distribution; apportionment. [Colloq.] 4. An arrangement to attain a desired result by a combination of interested parties; -- applied to stock speculations and political bargains. [Slang] 5. Etym: [Prob. from D. deel a plank, threshing floor. See Thill.]  The division of a piece of timber made by sawing; a board or plank; particularly, a board or plank of fir or pine above seven inches in width, and exceeding six feet in length. If narrower than this, it is called a batten; if shorter, a deal end. Note: Whole deal is a general term for planking one and one half inches thick. 6. Wood of the pine or fir; as, a floor of deal. Deal tree, a fir tree. Dr. Prior.  1. To divide; to separate in portions; hence, to give in portions; to distribute; to bestow successively; -- sometimes with out. Is not to deal thy bread to the hungry Is. lviii. 7. And Rome deals out her blessings and her gold. Tickell. The nightly mallet deals resounding blows. Gay. Hissing through the skies, the feathery deaths were dealt. Dryden. 2. Specifically: To distribute, as cards, to the players at the commencement of a game; as, to deal the cards; to deal one a jack.  1. To make distribution; to share out in portions, as cards to the players. 2. To do a distributing or retailing business, as distinguished from that of a manufacturer or producer; to traffic; to trade; to do business; as, he deals in flour. They buy and sell, they deal and traffic. South. This is to drive to wholesale trade, when all other petty merchants deal but for parcels. Dr. H. More. 3. To act as an intermediary in business or any affairs; to manage; to make arrangements; -- followed by between or with. Sometimes he that deals between man and man, raiseth his own credit with both, by pretending greater interest than he hath in either. Bacon. 4. To conduct one's self; to behave or act in any affair or towards any one; to treat. If he will deal clearly and impartially, . . . he will acknowledge all this to be true. Tillotson. 5. To contend (with); to treat (with), by way of opposition, check, or correction; as, he has turbulent passions to deal with. To deal by, to treat, either well or ill; as, to deal well by servants. "Such an one deals not fairly by his own mind." Locke. -- To deal in. (a) To have to do with; to be engaged in; to practice; as, they deal in political matters. (b) To buy and sell; to furnish, as a retailer or wholesaler; as, they deal in fish. -- To deal with. (a) To treat in any manner; to use, whether well or ill; to have to do with; specifically, to trade with. "Dealing with witches." Shak. (b) To reprove solemnly; to expostulate with. The deacons of his church, who, to use their own phrase, "dealt with him" on the sin of rejecting the aid which Providence so manifestly held out. Hawthorne. Return . . . and I will deal well with thee. Gen. xxxii. 9.
wait: 1. To watch; to observe; to take notice. [Obs.] "But [unless] ye wait well and be privy, I wot right well, I am but dead," quoth she. Chaucer. 2. To stay or rest in expectation; to stop or remain stationary till the arrival of some person or event; to rest in patience; to stay; not to depart. All the days of my appointed time will I wait, till my change come. Job xiv. 14. They also serve who only stand and wait. Milton. Haste, my dear father; 't is no time to wait. Dryden. To wait on or upon. (a) To attend, as a servant; to perform services for; as, to wait on a gentleman; to wait on the table. "Authority and reason on her wait." Milton. "I must wait on myself, must I" Shak. (b) To attend; to go to see; to visit on business or for ceremony. (c) To follow, as a consequence; to await. "That ruin that waits on such a supine temper." Dr. H. More. (d) To look watchfully at; to follow with the eye; to watch. [R.] "It is a point of cunning to wait upon him with whom you speak with your eye." Bacon. (e) To attend to; to perform. "Aaron and his sons . . . shallwait on their priest's office." Num. iii. 10. (f) (Falconry) To fly above its master, waiting till game is sprung; -- said of a hawk. Encyc. Brit.  1. To stay for; to rest or remain stationary in expectation of; to await; as, to wait orders. Awed with these words, in camps they still abide, And wait with longing looks their promised guide. Dryden. 2. To attend as a consequence; to follow upon; to accompany; to await. [Obs.] 3. To attend on; to accompany; especially, to attend with ceremony or respect. [Obs.] He chose a thousand horse, the flower of all His warlike troops, to wait the funeral. Dryden. Remorse and heaviness of heart shall wait thee, And everlasting anguish be thy portion. Rowe. 4. To cause to wait; to defer; to postpone; -- said of a meal; as, to wait dinner. [Colloq.]  1. The act of waiting; a delay; a halt. There is a wait of three hours at the border Mexican town of El Paso. S. B. Griffin. 2. Ambush. "An enemy in wait." Milton. 3. One who watches; a watchman. [Obs.] 4. pl.  Hautboys, or oboes, played by town musicians; not used in the singular. [Obs.] Halliwell. 5. pl.  Musicians who sing or play at night or in the early morning, especially at Christmas time; serenaders; musical watchmen. [Written formerly wayghtes.] Hark! are the waits abroad Beau & Fl. The sound of the waits, rude as may be their minstrelsy, breaks upon the mild watches of a winter night with the effect of perfect harmony. W. Irving. To lay wait, to prepare an ambuscade. -- To lie in wait. See under 4th Lie.
thus: The commoner kind of frankincense, or that obtained from the Norway spruce, the long-leaved pine, and other conifers.  1. In this or that manner; on this wise. Thus did Noah; according to all that God commanded him, so did he. Gen. vi. 22. Thus God the heaven created, thus the earth. Milton. 2. To this degree or extent; so far; so; as, thus wise; thus peaceble; thus bold. Shak. Thus far extend, thus far thy bounds. Milton.
school: A shoal; a multitude; as, a school of fish.  1. A place for learned intercourse and instruction; an institution for learning; an educational establishment; a place for acquiring knowledge and mental training; as, the school of the prophets. Disputing daily in the school of one Tyrannus. Acts xix. 9. 2. A place of primary instruction; an establishment for the instruction of children; as, a primary school; a common school; a grammar school. As he sat in the school at his primer. Chaucer. 3. A session of an institution of instruction. How now, Sir Hugh! No school to-day Shak. 4. One of the seminaries for teaching logic, metaphysics, and theology, which were formed in the Middle Ages, and which were characterized by academical disputations and subtilties of reasoning. At Cambridge the philosophy of Descartes was still dominant in the schools. Macaulay. 5. The room or hall in English universities where the examinations for degrees and honors are held. 6. An assemblage of scholars; those who attend upon instruction in a school of any kind; a body of pupils. What is the great community of Christians, but one of the innumerable schools in the vast plan which God has instituted for the education of various intelligences Buckminster. 7. The disciples or followers of a teacher; those who hold a common doctrine, or accept the same teachings; a sect or denomination in philosophy, theology, science, medicine, politics, etc. Let no man be less confident in his faith . . . by reason of any difference in the several schools of Christians. Jer. Taylor. 8. The canons, precepts, or body of opinion or practice, sanctioned by the authority of a particular class or age; as, he was a gentleman of the old school. His face pale but striking, though not handsome after the schools. A. S. Hardy. 9. Figuratively, any means of knowledge or discipline; as, the school of experience. Boarding school, Common school, District school, Normal school, etc. See under Boarding, Common, District, etc. -- High school, a free public school nearest the rank of a college. [U.S.] -- School board, a corporation established by law in every borough or parish in England, and elected by the burgesses or ratepayers, with the duty of providing public school accomodation for all children in their dictrict. -- School commitee, School board, an elected commitee of citizens having charge and care of the public schools in any district, town, or city, and responsible control of the money appropriated for school purposes. [U.S.] -- School days, the period in which youth are sent to school. -- School district, a division of a town or city for establishing and conducting schools. [U.S.] -- Sunday school, or Sabbath school, a school held on Sunday for study of the Bible and for religious instruction; the pupils, or the teachers and pupils, of such a school, collectively.  1. To train in an institution of learning; to educate at a school; to teach. He's gentle, never schooled, and yet learned. Shak. 2. To tutor; to chide and admonish; to reprove; to subject to systematic disciplene; to train. It now remains for you to school your child, And ask why God's Anointed be reviled. Dryden. The mother, while loving her child with the intensity of a sole affection, had schooled herself to hope for little other return than the waywardness of an April breeze. Hawthorne.
law: 1. In general, a rule of being or of conduct, established by an authority able to enforce its will; a controlling regulation; the mode or order according to which an agent or a power acts. Note: A law may be universal or particular, written or unwritten, published or secret. From the nature of the highest laws a degree of permanency or stability is always implied; but the power which makes a law, or a superior power, may annul or change it. These are the statutes and judgments and law, which the Lord made. Lev. xxvi. 46. The law of thy God, and the law of the King. Ezra vii. 26. As if they would confine the Interminable . . . Who made our laws to bind us, not himself. Milton. His mind his kingdom, and his will his law. Cowper. 2. In morals: The will of God as the rule for the disposition and conduct of all responsible beings toward him and toward each other; a rule of living, conformable to righteousness; the rule of action as obligatory on the conscience or moral nature. 3. The Jewish or Mosaic code, and that part of Scripture where it is written, in distinction from the gospel; hence, also, the Old Testament. What things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law . . . But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets. Rom. iii. 19, 21. 4. In human government: (a) An organic rule, as a constitution or charter, establishing and defining the conditions of the existence of a state or other organized community. (b) Any edict, decree, order, ordinance, statute, resolution, judicial, decision, usage, etc., or recognized, and enforced, by the controlling authority. 5. In philosophy and physics: A rule of being, operation, or change, so certain and constant that it is conceived of as imposed by the will of God or by some controlling authority; as, the law of gravitation; the laws of motion; the law heredity; the laws of thought; the laws of cause and effect; law of self-preservation. 6. In matematics: The rule according to which anything, as the change of value of a variable, or the value of the terms of a series, proceeds; mode or order of sequence. 7. In arts, works, games, etc.: The rules of construction, or of procedure, conforming to the conditions of success; a principle, maxim; or usage; as, the laws of poetry, of architecture, of courtesy, or of whist. 8. Collectively, the whole body of rules relating to one subject, or emanating from one source; -- including usually the writings pertaining to them, and judicial proceedings under them; as, divine law; English law; Roman law; the law of real property; insurance law. 9. Legal science; jurisprudence; the principles of equity; applied justice. Reason is the life of the law; nay, the common law itself is nothing else but reason. Coke. Law is beneficence acting by rule. Burke. And sovereign Law, that state's collected will O'er thrones and globes elate, Sits empress, crowning good, repressing ill. Sir W. Jones. 10. Trial by the laws of the land; judicial remedy; litigation; as, to go law. When every case in law is right. Shak. He found law dear and left it cheap. Brougham. 11. An oath, as in the presence of a court. [Obs.] See Wager of law, under Wager. Avogadro's law (Chem.), a fundamental conception, according to which, under similar conditions of temperature and pressure, all gases and vapors contain in the same volume the same number of ultimate molecules; -- so named after Avogadro, an Italian scientist. Sometimes called Ampère's law. -- Bode's law (Astron.), an approximative empirical expression of the distances of the planets from the sun, as follows: -- Mer. Ven. Earth. Mars. Aste. Jup. Sat. Uran. Nep. 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 4 0 3 6 12 24 48 96 192 384 -- -- -- -- -- -- -- --- ---4 7 10 16 28 52 100 196 388 5.9 7.3 10 15.2 27.4 52 95.4 192 300 where each distance (line third) is the sum of 4 and a multiple of 3 by the series 0, 1, 2, 4, 8, etc., the true distances being given in the lower line. -- Boyle's law (Physics), an expression of the fact, that when an elastic fluid is subjected to compression, and kept at a constant temperature, the product of the pressure and volume is a constant quantity, i. e., the volume is inversely proportioned to the pressure; -- known also as Mariotte's law, and the law of Boyle and Mariotte. -- Brehon laws. See under Brehon. -- Canon law, the body of ecclesiastical law adopted in the Christian Church, certain portions of which (for example, the law of marriage as existing before the Council of Tent) were brought to America by the English colonists as part of the common law of the land. Wharton. -- Civil law, a term used by writers to designate Roman law, with modifications thereof which have been made in the different countries into which that law has been introduced. The civil law, instead of the common law, prevails in the State of Louisiana. Wharton. -- Commercial law. See Law merchant (below). -- Common law. See under Common. -- Criminal law, that branch of jurisprudence which relates to crimes. -- Ecclesiastical law. See under Ecclesiastical. -- Grimm's law (Philol.), a statement (propounded by the German philologist Jacob Grimm) of certain regular changes which the primitive Indo-European mute consonants, so-called (most plainly seen in Sanskrit and, with some changes, in Greek and Latin), have undergone in the Teutonic languages. Examples: Skr. bhatr, L. frater, E. brother, G. bruder; L. tres, E. three, G. drei, Skr. go, E. cow, G. kuh; Skr. dha to put, Gr. ti-qe`-nai, E. do, OHG, tuon, G. thun. -- Kepler's laws (Astron.), three important laws or expressions of the order of the planetary motions, discovered by John Kepler. They are these: (1) The orbit of a planet with respect to the sun is an ellipse, the sun being in one of the foci. (2) The areas swept over by a vector drawn from the sun to a planet are proportioned to the times of describing them. (3) The squares of the times of revolution of two planets are in the ratio of the cubes of their mean distances. -- Law binding, a plain style of leather binding, used for law books; -- called also law calf. -- Law book, a book containing, or treating of, laws. -- Law calf. See Law binding (above). -- Law day. (a) Formerly, a day of holding court, esp. a court-leet. (b) The day named in a mortgage for the payment of the money to secure which it was given. [U. S.] -- Law French, the dialect of Norman, which was used in judicial proceedings and law books in England from the days of William the Conqueror to the thirty-sixth year of Edward III. -- Law language, the language used in legal writings and forms. -- Law Latin. See under Latin. -- Law lords, peers in the British Parliament who have held high judicial office, or have been noted in the legal profession. -- Law merchant, or Commercial law, a system of rules by which trade and commerce are regulated; -- deduced from the custom of merchants, and regulated by judicial decisions, as also by enactments of legislatures. -- Law of Charles (Physics), the law that the volume of a given mass of gas increases or decreases, by a definite fraction of its value for a given rise or fall of temperature; -- sometimes less correctly styled Gay Lussac's law, or Dalton's law. -- Law of nations. See International law, under International. -- Law of nature. (a) A broad generalization expressive of the constant action, or effect, of natural conditions; as, death is a law of nature; self-defense is a law of nature. See Law, 4. (b) A term denoting the standard, or system, of morality deducible from a study of the nature and natural relations of human beings independent of supernatural revelation or of municipal and social usages. -- Law of the land, due process of law; the general law of the land. -- Laws of honor. See under Honor. -- Laws of motion (Physics), three laws defined by Sir Isaac Newton: (1) Every body perseveres in its state of rest or of moving uniformly in a straight line, except so far as it is made to change that state by external force. (2) Change of motion is proportional to the impressed force, and takes place in the direction in which the force is impressed. (3) Reaction is always equal and opposite to action, that is to say, the actions of two bodies upon each other are always equal and in opposite directions. -- Marine law, or Maritime law, the law of the sea; a branch of the law merchant relating to the affairs of the sea, such as seamen, ships, shipping, navigation, and the like. Bouvier. -- Mariotte's law. See Boyle's law (above). -- Martial law.See under Martial. -- Military law, a branch of the general municipal law, consisting of rules ordained for the government of the military force of a state in peace and war, and administered in courts martial. Kent. Warren's Blackstone. -- Moral law,the law of duty as regards what is right and wrong in the sight of God; specifically, the ten commandments given by Moses. See Law, 2. -- Mosaic, or Ceremonial, law. (Script.) See Law, 3. -- Municipal, or Positive, law, a rule prescribed by the supreme power of a state, declaring some right, enforcing some duty, or prohibiting some act; -- distinguished from international and constitutional law. See Law, 1. -- Periodic law. (Chem.) See under Periodic. -- Roman law, the system of principles and laws found in the codes and treatises of the lawmakers and jurists of ancient Rome, and incorporated more or less into the laws of the several European countries and colonies founded by them. See Civil law (above). -- Statute law, the law as stated in statutes or positive enactments of the legislative body. -- Sumptuary law. See under Sumptuary. -- To go to law, to seek a settlement of any matter by bringing it before the courts of law; to sue or prosecute some one. -- To take, or have, the law of, to bring the law to bear upon; as, to take the law of one's neighbor. Addison. -- Wager of law. See under Wager. Syn. -- Justice; equity. -- Law, Statute, Common law, Regulation, Edict, Decree. Law is generic, and, when used with reference to, or in connection with, the other words here considered, denotes whatever is commanded by one who has a right to require obedience. A statute is a particular law drawn out in form, and distinctly enacted and proclaimed. Common law is a rule of action founded on long usage and the decisions of courts of justice. A regulation is a limited and often, temporary law, intended to secure some particular end or object. An edict is a command or law issued by a sovereign, and is peculiar to a despotic government. A decree is a permanent order either of a court or of the executive government. See Justice.  Same as Lawe, v. t. [Obs.]  An exclamation of mild surprise. [Archaic or Low]
ocean: 1. The whole body of salt water which covers more than three fifths of the surface of the globe; -- called also the sea, or great sea. Like the odor of brine from the ocean Comes the thought of other years. Longfellow. 2. One of the large bodies of water into which the great ocean is regarded as divided, as the Atlantic, Pacific, Indian, Arctic and Antarctic oceans. 3. An immense expanse; any vast space or quantity without apparent limits; as, the boundless ocean of eternity; an ocean of affairs. Locke.  Of or pertaining to the main or great sea; as, the ocean waves; an ocean stream. Milton.
yes: Ay; yea; -- a word which expresses affirmation or consent; -- opposed to Ant: no. Note: Yes is used, like yea, to enforce, by repetition or addition, something which precedes; as, you have done all this -- yes, you have done more. "Yes, you despise the man books confined." Pope. Note: "The fine distinction between `yea' and `yes,' `nay' and `no,' that once existed in English, has quite disappeared. `Yea' and `nay' in Wyclif's time, and a good deal later, were the answers to questions framed in the affirmative. `Will he come' To this it would have been replied, `Yea' or `Nay', as the case might be. But, `Will he not come' To this the answer would have been `Yes' or `No.' Sir Thomas More finds fault with Tyndale, that in his translation of the Bible he had not observed this distinction, which was evidently therefore going out even then, that is, in the reign of Henry VIII.; and shortly after it was quite forgotten." Trench.
know: Knee. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. To perceive or apprehend clearly and certainly; to understand; to have full information of; as, to know one's duty. O, that a man might know The end of this day's business ere it come! Shak. There is a certainty in the proposition, and we know it. Dryden. Know how sublime a thing it is To suffer and be strong. Longfellow. 2. To be convinced of the truth of; to be fully assured of; as, to know things from information. 3. To be acquainted with; to be no stranger to; to be more or less familiar with the person, character, etc., of; to possess experience of; as, to know an author; to know the rules of an organization. He hath made him to be sin for us, who knew no sin. 2 Cor. v. 21. Not to know me argues yourselves unknown. Milton. 4. To recognize; to distinguish; to discern the character of; as, to know a person's face or figure. Ye shall know them by their fruits. Matt. vil. 16. And their eyes were opened, and they knew him. Luke xxiv. 31. To know Faithful friend from flattering foe. Shak. At nearer view he thought he knew the dead. Flatman. 5. To have sexual commerce with. And Adam knew Eve his wife. Gen. iv. 1. Note: Know is often followed by an objective and an infinitive (with or without to) or a participle, a dependent sentence, etc. And I knew that thou hearest me always. John xi. 42. The monk he instantly knew to be the prior. Sir W. Scott. In other hands I have known money do good. Dickens. To know how, to understand the manner, way, or means; to have requisite information, intelligence, or sagacity. How is sometimes omitted. " If we fear to die, or know not to be patient." Jer. Taylor.  1. To have knowledge; to have a clear and certain perception; to possess wisdom, instruction, or information; -- often with of. Israel doth not know, my people doth not consider. Is. i. 3. If any man will do his will, he shall know of the doctrine, whether it be of God, or whether I speak of myself. John vii. 17. The peasant folklore of Europe still knows of willows that bleed and weep and speak when hewn. Tylor. 2. To be assured; to feel confident. To know of,to ask, to inquire. [Obs.] " Know of your youth, examine well your blood." Shak.
industry: 1. Habitual diligence in any employment or pursuit, either bodily or mental; steady attention to business; assiduity; -- opposed to sloth and idleness; as, industry pays debts, while idleness or despair will increase them. We are more industrious than our forefathers, because in the present times the funds destined for the maintenance of industry are much greater in proportion to those which are likely to be employed in the maintenance of idleness, than they were two or three centuries ago. A. Smith. 2. Any department or branch of art, occupation, or business; especially, one which employs much labor and capital and is a distinct branch of trade; as, the sugar industry; the iron industry; the cotton industry. 3. (Polit. Econ.)  Human exertion of any kind employed for the creation of value, and regarded by some as a species of capital or wealth; labor. Syn. -- Diligence; assiduity; perseverance; activity; laboriousness; attention. See Diligence.
a: The first letter of the English and of many other alphabets. The capital A of the alphabets of Middle and Western Europe, as also the small letter (a), besides the forms in Italic, black letter, etc., are all descended from the old Latin A, which was borrowed from the Greek Alpha, of the same form; and this was made from the first letter (Aleph, and itself from the Egyptian origin. The Aleph was a consonant letter, with a guttural breath sound that was not an element of Greek articulation; and the Greeks took it to represent their vowel Alpha with the ä sound, the Phoenician alphabet having no vowel symbols. This letter, in English, is used for several different vowel sounds. See Guide to pronunciation, §§ 43-74. The regular long a, as in fate, etc., is a comparatively modern sound, and has taken the place of what, till about the early part of the 17th century, was a sound of the quality of ä (as in far). 2. (Mus.)  The name of the sixth tone in the model major scale (that in C), or the first tone of the minor scale, which is named after it the scale in A minor. The second string of the violin is tuned to the A in the treble staff. -- A sharp (A#) is the name of a musical tone intermediate between A and B. -- A flat (A) is the name of a tone intermediate between A and G. A per se Etym: (L. per se by itself), one preëminent; a nonesuch. [Obs.] O fair Creseide, the flower and A per se Of Troy and Greece. Chaucer.  1. Etym: [Shortened form of an. AS. an one. See One.]  An adjective, commonly called the indefinite article, and signifying one or any, but less emphatically.  "At a birth"; "In a word"; "At a blow". Shak. Note: It is placed before nouns of the singular number denoting an individual object, or a quality individualized, before collective nouns, and also before plural nouns when the adjective few or the phrase great many or good many is interposed; as, a dog, a house, a man; a color; a sweetness; a hundred, a fleet, a regiment; a few persons, a great many days. It is used for an, for the sake of euphony, before words beginning with a consonant sound [for exception of certain words beginning with h, see An]; as, a table, a woman, a year, a unit, a eulogy, a ewe, a oneness, such a one, etc. Formally an was used both before vowels and consonants. 2. Etym: [Originally the preposition a (an, on).]  In each; to or for each; as, "twenty leagues a day", "a hundred pounds a year", "a dollar a yard", etc.  1. In; on; at; by. [Obs.] "A God's name." "Torn a pieces." "Stand a tiptoe." "A Sundays" Shak. "Wit that men have now a days." Chaucer. "Set them a work." Robynson (More's Utopia) 2. In process of; in the act of; into; to; -- used with verbal substantives in -ing which begin with a consonant. This is a shortened form of the preposition an (which was used before the vowel sound); as in a hunting, a building, a begging. "Jacob, when he was a dying" Heb. xi. 21. "We'll a birding together." " It was a doing." Shak. "He burst out a laughing." Macaulay. The hyphen may be used to connect a with the verbal substantive (as, a-hunting, a-building) or the words may be written separately. This form of expression is now for the most part obsolete, the a being omitted and the verbal substantive treated as a participle.  Of. [Obs.] "The name of John a Gaunt." "What time a day is it " Shak. "It's six a clock." B. Jonson.  A barbarous corruption of have, of he, and sometimes of it and of they. "So would I a done" "A brushes his hat." Shak.  An expletive, void of sense, to fill up the meter A merry heart goes all the day, Your sad tires in a mile-a. Shak.
single: 1. One only, as distinguished from more than one; consisting of one alone; individual; separate; as, a single star. No single man is born with a right of controlling the opinions of all the rest. Pope. 2. Alone; having no companion. Who single hast maintained, Against revolted multitudes, the cause Of truth. Milton. 3. Hence, unmarried; as, a single man or woman. Grows, lives, and dies in single blessedness. Shak. Single chose to live, and shunned to wed. Dryden. 4. Not doubled, twisted together, or combined with others; as, a single thread; a single strand of a rope. 5. Performed by one person, or one on each side; as, a single combat. These shifts refuted, answer thy appellant, . . . Who now defles thee thrice ti single fight. Milton. 6. Uncompounded; pure; unmixed. Simple ideas are opposed to complex, and single to compound. I. Watts. 7. Not deceitful or artful; honest; sincere. I speak it with a single heart. Shak. 8. Simple; not wise; weak; silly. [Obs.] He utters such single matter in so infantly a voice. Beau & Fl. Single ale, beer, or drink, small ale, etc., as contrasted with double ale, etc., which is stronger. [Obs.] Nares. -- Single bill (Law), a written engagement, generally under seal, for the payment of money, without a penalty. Burril. -- Single court (Lawn Tennis), a court laid out for only two players. -- Single-cut file. See the Note under 4th File. -- Single entry. See under Bookkeeping. -- Single file. See under 1st File. -- Single flower (Bot.), a flower with but one set of petals, as a wild rose. -- Single knot. See Illust. under Knot. -- Single whip (Naut.), a single rope running through a fixed block.  1. To select, as an individual person or thing, from among a number; to choose out from others; to separate. Dogs who hereby can single out their master in the dark. Bacon. His blood! she faintly screamed her mind Still singling one from all mankind. More. 2. To sequester; to withdraw; to retire. [Obs.] An agent singling itself from consorts. Hooker. 3. To take alone, or one by one. Men . . . commendable when they are singled. Hooker.  To take the irrregular gait called single-foot;- said of a horse. See Single-foot. Many very fleet horses, when overdriven, adopt a disagreeable gait, which seems to be a cross between a pace and a trot, in which the two legs of one side are raised almost but not quite, simultaneously. Such horses are said to single, or to be single-footed. W. S. Clark.  1. A unit; one; as, to score a single. 2. pl.  The reeled filaments of silk, twisted without doubling to give them firmness. 3. A handful of gleaned grain. [Prov. Eng. & Scot.] 4. (Law Tennis)  A game with but one player on each side; -- usually in the plural. 5. (Baseball)  A hit by a batter which enables him to reach first base only.
verb: 1. A word; a vocable. [Obs.] South. 2. (Gram.)  A word which affirms or predicates something of some person or thing; a part of speech expressing being, action, or the suffering of action. Note: A verb is a word whereby the chief action of the mind [the assertion or the denial of a proposition] finds expression. Earle. Active verb, Auxiliary verb, Neuter verb, etc. See Active, Auxiliary, Neuter, etc.
so: 1. In that manner or degree; as, indicated (in any way), or as implied, or as supposed to be known. Why is his chariot so long in coming Judges v. 28. 2. In like manner or degree; in the same way; thus; for like reason; whith equal reason; -- used correlatively, following as, to denote comparison or resemblance; sometimes, also, following inasmuch as. As a war should be undertaken upon a just motive, so a prince ought to consider the condition he is in. Swift. 3. In such manner; to such degree; -- used correlatively with as or that following; as, he was so fortunate as to escape. I viewed in may mind, so far as I was able, the beginning and progress of a rising world. T. Burnet. He is very much in Sir Roger's esteem, so that he lives in the family rather as a relation than dependent. Addison. 4. Very; in a high degree; that is, in such a degree as can not well be expressed; as, he is so good; he planned so wisely. 5. In the same manner; as has been stated or suggested; in this or that condition or state; under these circumstances; in this way; -- with reflex reference to something just asserted or implied; used also with the verb to be, as a predicate. Use him [your tutor] with great respect yourself, and cause all your family to do so too. Locke. It concerns every man, with the greatest seriousness, to inquire into those matters, whether they be so or not. Tillotson. He is Sir Robert's son, and so art thou. Shak. 6. The case being such; therefore; on this account; for this reason; on these terms; -- used both as an adverb and a conjuction. God makes him in his own image an intellectual creature, and so capable of dominion. Locke. Here, then, exchange we mutually forgiveness; So may the guilt of all my broken vows, My perjuries to thee, be all forgotten. Rowe. 7. It is well; let it be as it is, or let it come to pass; -- used to express assent. And when 't is writ, for my sake read it over, And if it please you, so; if not, why, so. Shak. There is Percy; if your father will do me any honor, so; if not, let him kill the next Percy himself. Shak. 8. Well; the fact being as stated; -- used as an expletive; as, so the work is done, is it 9. Is it thus do you mean what you say -- with an upward tone; as, do you say he refuses So [Colloq.] 10. About the number, time, or quantity specified; thereabouts; more or less; as, I will spend a week or so in the country; I have read only a page or so. A week or so will probably reconcile us. Gay. Note: See the Note under Ill, adv. So . . . as. So is now commonly used as a demonstrative correlative of as when it is the puprpose to emphasize the equality or comparison suggested, esp. in negative assertions, and questions implying a negative answer. By Shakespeare and others so . . . as was much used where as . . . as is now common. See the Note under As, 1. So do, as thou hast said. Gen. xviii. 5. As a flower of the field, so he flourisheth. Ps. ciii. 15. Had woman been so strong as men. Shak. No country suffered so much as England. Macaulay. -- So far, to that point or extent; in that particular. "The song was moral, and so far was right." Cowper. -- So far forth, as far; to such a degree. Shak. Bacon. -- So forth, further in the same or similar manner; more of the same or a similar kind. See And so forth, under And. -- So, so, well, well. "So, so, it works; now, mistress, sit you fast." Dryden. Also, moderately or tolerably well; passably; as, he succeeded but so so. "His leg is but so so." Shak. -- So that, to the end that; in order that; with the effect or result that. -- So then, thus then it is; therefore; the consequence is.  Provided that; on condition that; in case that; if. Though all the winds of doctrine were let loose play upon the earth, so truth be in the field, we do injuriously, by licensing and prohibiting, to misdoubt her strength. Milton.  Be as you are; stand still; stop; that will do; right as you are; -- a word used esp. to cows; also used by sailors.
once: The ounce.  1. By limitation to the number one; for one time; not twice nor any number of times more than one. Ye shall . . . go round about the city once. Josh. vi. 3. Trees that bear mast are fruitful but once in two years. Bacon. 2. At some one period of time; -- used indefinitely. My soul had once some foolish fondness for thee. Addison. That court which we shall once govern. Bp. Hall. 3. At any one time; -- often nearly equivalent to ever, if ever, or whenever; as, once kindled, it may not be quenched. Wilt thou not be made clean When shall it once be Jer. xiii. 27. To be once in doubt Is once to be resolved. Shak. Note: Once is used as a noun when preceded by this or that; as, this once, that once. It is also sometimes used elliptically, like an adjective, for once-existing. "The once province of Britain." J. N. Pomeroy.. At once. (a) At the same point of time; immediately; without delay. "Stand not upon the order of your going, but go at once." Shak. "I . . . withdrew at once and altogether." Jeffrey. (b) At one and the same time; simultaneously; in one body; as, they all moved at once. -- Once and again, once and once more; repeatedly. "A dove sent forth once and again, to spy." Milton.
river: One who rives or splits.  1. A large stream of water flowing in a bed or channel and emptying into the ocean, a sea, a lake, or another stream; a stream larger than a rivulet or brook. Transparent and sparkling rivers, from which it is delightful to drink as they flow. Macaulay. 2. Fig.: A large stream; copious flow; abundance; as, rivers of blood; rivers of oil. River chub (Zoöl.), the hornyhead and allied species of fresh-water fishes. -- River crab (Zoöl.), any species of fresh-water crabs of the genus Thelphusa, as T. depressa of Southern Europe. -- River dragon, a crocodile; -- applied by Milton to the king of Egypt. -- River driver, a lumberman who drives or conducts logs down rivers. Bartlett. -- River duck (Zoöl.), any species of duck belonging to Anas, Spatula, and allied genera, in which the hind toe is destitute of a membranous lobe, as in the mallard and pintail; -- opposed to sea duck. -- River god, a deity supposed to preside over a river as its tutelary divinity. -- River herring (Zoöl.), an alewife. -- River hog. (Zoöl.) (a) Any species of African wild hogs of the genus Potamochoerus. They frequent wet places along the rivers. (b) The capybara. -- River horse (Zoöl.), the hippopotamus. -- River jack (Zoöl.), an African puff adder (Clotho nasicornis) having a spine on the nose. -- River limpet (Zoöl.), a fresh-water, air-breathing mollusk of the genus Ancylus, having a limpet-shaped shell. -- River pirate (Zoöl.), the pike. -- River snail (Zoöl.), any species of fresh-water gastropods of Paludina, Melontho, and allied genera. See Pond snail, under Pond. -- River tortoise (Zoöl.), any one of numerous fresh-water tortoises inhabiting rivers, especially those of the genus Trionyx and allied genera. See Trionyx.  To hawk by the side of a river; to fly hawks at river fowl. [Obs.] Halliwell.
an: This word is properly an adjective, but is commonly called the indefinite article. It is used before nouns of the singular number only, and signifies one, or any, but somewhat less emphatically. In such expressions as "twice an hour," "once an age," a shilling an ounce (see 2d A, 2), it has a distributive force, and is equivalent to each, every. Note: An is used before a word beginning with a vowel sound; as, an enemy, an hour. It in also often used before h sounded, when the accent of the word falls on the second syllable; as, an historian, an hyena, an heroic deed. Many writers use a before h in such positions. Anciently an was used before consonants as well as vowels.  If; -- a word used by old English authors. Shak. Nay, an thou dalliest, then I am thy foe. B. Jonson. An if, and if; if.
on: The general signification of on is situation, motion, or condition with respect to contact or support beneath; as: -- 1. At, or in contact with, the surface or upper part of a thing, and supported by it; placed or lying in contact with the surface; as, the book lies on the table, which stands on the floor of a house on an island. I stood on the bridge at midnight. Longfellow. 2. To or against the surface of; -- used to indicate the motion of a thing as coming or falling to the surface of another; as, rain falls on the earth. Whosoever shall fall on this stone shall be broken. Matt. xxi. 44. 3. Denoting performance or action by contact with the surface, upper part, or outside of anything; hence, by means of; with; as, to play on a violin or piano. Hence, figuratively, to work on one's feelings; to make an impression on the mind. 4. At or near; adjacent to; -- indicating situation, place, or position; as, on the one hand, on the other hand; the fleet is on the American coast. 5. In addition to; besides; -- indicating multiplication or succession in a series; as, heaps on heaps; mischief on mischief; loss on loss; thought on thought. Shak. 6. Indicating dependence or reliance; with confidence in; as, to depend on a person for assistance; to rely on; hence, indicating the ground or support of anything; as, he will promise on certain conditions; to bet on a horse. 7. At or in the time of; during; as, on Sunday we abstain from labor. See At (synonym). 8. At the time of, conveying some notion of cause or motive; as, on public occasions, the officers appear in full dress or uniform. Hence, in consequence of, or following; as, on the ratification of the treaty, the armies were disbanded. 9. Toward; for; -- indicating the object of some passion; as, have pity or compassion on him. 10. At the peril of, or for the safety of. "Hence, on thy life." Dryden. 11. By virtue of; with the pledge of; -- denoting a pledge or engagement, and put before the thing pledged; as, he affirmed or promised on his word, or on his honor. 12. To the account of; -- denoting imprecation or invocation, or coming to, falling, or resting upon; as, on us be all the blame; a curse on him. His blood be on us and on our children. Matt. xxvii. 25. 13. In reference or relation to; as, on our part expect punctuality; a satire on society. 14. Of. [Obs.] "Be not jealous on me." Shak. Or have we eaten on the insane root That takes the reason prisoner Shak. Note: Instances of this usage are common in our older writers, and are sometimes now heard in illiterate speech. 15. Occupied with; in the performance of; as, only three officers are on duty; on a journey. 16. In the service of; connected with; of the number of; as, he is on a newspaper; on a committee. Note: On and upon are in general interchangeable. In some applications upon is more euphonious, and is therefore to be preferred; but in most cases on is preferable. On a bowline. (Naut.) Same as Closehauled. -- On a wind, or On the wind (Naut.), sailing closehauled. -- On a sudden. See under Sudden. -- On board, On draught, On fire, etc. See under Board, Draught, Fire, etc. -- On it, On't, of it. [Obs. or Colloq.] Shak. -- On shore, on land; to the shore. -- On the road, On the way, On the wing, etc. See under Road, Way, etc. -- On to, upon; on; to; -- sometimes written as one word, onto, and usually called a colloquialism; but it may be regarded in analogy with into. They have added the -en plural form on to an elder plural. Earle. We see the strength of the new movement in the new class of ecclesiastics whom it forced on to the stage. J. R. Green.  1. Forward, in progression; onward; -- usually with a verb of motion; as, move on; go on. "Time glides on." Macaulay. The path is smooth that leadeth on to danger. Shak. 2. Forward, in succession; as, from father to son, from the son to the grandson, and so on. 3. In continuance; without interruption or ceasing; as, sleep on, take your ease; say on; sing on. 4. Adhering; not off; as in the phrase, "He is neither on nor off," that is, he is not steady, he is irresolute. 5. Attached to the body, as clothing or ornament, or for use. "I have boots on." B. Gonson. He put on righteousness as a breastplate. Is. lix. 17. 6. In progress; proceeding; as, a game is on. Note: On is sometimes used as an exclamation, or a command to move or proceed, some verb being understood; as, on, comrades; that is, go on, move on. On and on, continuously; for a long time together. "Toiling on and on and on." Longfellow.
begin: 1. To have or commence an independent or first existence; to take rise; to commence. Vast chain of being! which from God began. Pope. 2. To do the first act or the first part of an action; to enter upon or commence something new, as a new form or state of being, or course of action; to take the first step; to start. "Tears began to flow." Dryden. When I begin, I will also make an end. 1 Sam. iii. 12.  1. To enter on; to commence. Ye nymphs of Solyma ! begin the song. Pope. 2. To trace or lay the foundation of; to make or place a beginning of. The apostle begins our knowledge in the creatures, which leads us to the knowledge of God. Locke. Syn. -- To commence; originate; set about; start.  Beginning. [Poetic & Obs.] Spenser.
value: 1. The property or aggregate properties of a thing by which it is rendered useful or desirable, or the degree of such property or sum of properties; worth; excellence; utility; importance. Ye are all physicians of no value. Job xiii. 4. Ye are of more value than many sparrows. Matt. x. 31. Cæsar is well acquainted with your virtue, And therefore sets this value on your life. Addison. Before events shall have decided on the value of the measures. Marshall. 2. (Trade & Polit. Econ.)  Worth estimated by any standard of purchasing power, especially by the market price, or the amount of money agreed upon as an equivalent to the utility and cost of anything. An article may be possessed of the highest degree of utility, or power to minister to our wants and enjoyments, and may be universally made use of, without possessing exchangeable value. M'Culloch. Value is the power to command commodities generally. A. L. Chapin (Johnson's Cys.). Value is the generic term which expresses power in exchange. F. A. Walker. His design was not to pay him the value of his pictures, because they were above any price. Dryden. Note: In political economy, value is often distinguished as intrinsic and exchangeable. Intrinsic value is the same as utility or adaptation to satisfy the desires or wants of men. Exchangeable value is that in an article or product which disposes individuals to give for it some quantity of labor, or some other article or product obtainable by labor; as, pure air has an intrinsic value, but generally not an exchangeable value. 3. Precise signification; import; as, the value of a word; the value of a legal instrument Mitford. 4. Esteem; regard. Dryden. My relation to the person was so near, and my value for him so great Bp. Burnet. 5. (Mus.)  The relative length or duration of a tone or note, answering to quantity in prosody; thus, a quarter note [value of two eighth notes [ 6. In an artistical composition, the character of any one part in its relation to other parts and to the whole; -- often used in the plural; as, the values are well given, or well maintained. 7. Valor. [Written also valew.] [Obs.] Spenser. Value received, a phrase usually employed in a bill of exchange or a promissory note, to denote that a consideration has been given for it. Bouvier.  1. To estimate the value, or worth, of; to rate at a certain price; to appraise; to reckon with respect to number, power, importance, etc. The mind doth value every moment. Bacon. The queen is valued thirty thousand strong. Shak. The king must take it ill, That he's so slightly valued in his messenger. Shak. Neither of them valued their promises according to rules of honor or integrity. Clarendon. 2. To rate highly; to have in high esteem; to hold in respect and estimation; to appreciate; to prize; as, to value one for his works or his virtues. Which of the dukes he values most. Shak. 3. To raise to estimation; to cause to have value, either real or apparent; to enhance in value. [Obs.] Some value themselves to their country by jealousies of the crown. Sir W. Temple. 4. To be worth; to be equal to in value. [Obs.] The peace between the French and us not values The cost that did conclude it. Shak. Syn. -- To compute; rate; appraise; esteem; respect; regard; estimate; prize; appreciate.
ring: 1. To cause to sound, especially by striking, as a metallic body; as, to ring a bell. 2. To make (a sound), as by ringing a bell; to sound. The shard-borne beetle, with his drowsy hums, Hath rung night's yawning peal. Shak. 3. To repeat often, loudly, or earnestly. To ring a peal, to ring a set of changes on a chime of bells. -- To ring the changes upon. See under Change. -- To ring in or out, to usher, attend on, or celebrate, by the ringing of bells; as, to ring out the old year and ring in the new. Tennyson. -- To ring the bells backward, to sound the chimes, reversing the common order; -- formerly done as a signal of alarm or danger. Sir W. Scott.  1. To sound, as a bell or other sonorous body, particularly a metallic one. Now ringen trompes loud and clarion. Chaucer. Why ring not out the bells Shak. 2. To practice making music with bells. Holder. 3. To sound loud; to resound; to be filled with a With sweeter notes each rising temple rung. Pope. The hall with harp and carol rang. Tennyson. My ears still ring with noise. Dryden. 4. To continue to sound or vibrate; to resound. The assertion is still ringing in our ears. Burke. 5. To be filled with report or talk; as, the whole town rings with his fame.  1. A sound; especially, the sound of vibrating metals; as, the ring of a bell. 2. Any loud sound; the sound of numerous voices; a sound continued, repeated, or reverberated. The ring of acclamations fresh in his ears. Bacon 3. A chime, or set of bells harmonically tuned. As great and tunable a ring of bells as any in the world. Fuller.  A circle, or a circular line, or anything in the form of a circular line or hoop. 2. Specifically, a circular ornament of gold or other precious material worn on the finger, or attached to the ear, the nose, or some other part of the person; as, a wedding ring. Upon his thumb he had of gold a ring. Chaucer. The dearest ring in Venice will I give you. Shak. 3. A circular area in which races are or run or other sports are performed; an arena. Place me. O, place me in the dusty ring, Where youthful charioteers contened for glory. E. Smith. 4. An inclosed space in which pugilists fight; hence, figuratively, prize fighting. "The road was an institution, the ring was an institution." Thackeray. 5. A circular group of persons. And hears the Muses in a Aye round about Jove's alter sing. Milton. 6. (Geom.) (a) The plane figure included between the circumferences of two concentric circles. (b) The solid generated by the revolution of a circle, or other figure, about an exterior straight line (as an axis) lying in the same plane as the circle or other figure. 7. (Astron. & Navigation)  An instrument, formerly used for taking the sun's altitude, consisting of a brass ring suspended by a swivel, with a hole at one side through which a solar ray entering indicated the altitude on the graduated inner surface opposite. 8. (Bot.)  An elastic band partly or wholly encircling the spore cases of ferns. See Illust. of Sporangium. 9. A clique; an exclusive combination of persons for a selfish purpose, as to control the market, distribute offices, obtain contracts, etc. The ruling ring at Constantinople. E. A. Freeman. Ring armor, armor composed of rings of metal. See Ring mail, below, and Chain mail, under Chain. -- Ring blackbird (Zoöl.), the ring ousel. -- Ring canal (Zoöl.), the circular water tube which surrounds the esophagus of echinoderms. -- Ring dotterel, or Ringed dotterel. (Zoöl.) See Dotterel, and Illust. of Pressiroster. -- Ring dropper, a sharper who pretends to have found a ring (dropped by himself), and tries to induce another to buy it as valuable, it being worthless. -- Ring fence. See under Fence. -- Ring finger, the third finger of the left hand, or the next the little finger, on which the ring is placed in marriage. -- Ring formula (Chem.), a graphic formula in the shape of a closed ring, as in the case of benzene, pyridine, etc. See Illust. under Benzene. -- Ring mail, a kind of mail made of small steel rings sewed upon a garment of leather or of cloth. -- Ring micrometer. (Astron.) See Circular micrometer, under Micrometer. -- Saturn's rings. See Saturn. -- Ring ousel. (Zoöl.) See Ousel. -- Ring parrot (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Old World parrakeets having a red ring around the neck, especially Palæornis torquatus, common in India, and P. Alexandri of Java. -- Ring plover. (Zoöl.) (a) The ringed dotterel. (b) Any one of several small American plovers having a dark ring around the neck, as the semipalmated plover (Ægialitis semipalmata). -- Ring snake (Zoöl.), a small harmless American snake (Diadophis punctatus) having a white ring around the neck. The back is ash- colored, or sage green, the belly of an orange red. -- Ring stopper. (Naut.) See under Stopper. -- Ring thrush (Zoöl.), the ring ousel. -- The prize ring, the ring in which prize fighters contend; prize fighters, collectively. -- The ring. (a) The body of sporting men who bet on horse races. [Eng.] (b) The prize ring.  1. To surround with a ring, or as with a ring; to encircle. "Ring these fingers." Shak. 2. (Hort.)  To make a ring around by cutting away the bark; to girdle; as, to ring branches or roots. 3. To fit with a ring or with rings, as the fingers, or a swine's snout.  To rise in the air spirally.
six: One more than five; twice three; as, six yards. Six Nations (Ethnol.), a confederation of North American Indians formed by the union of the Tuscaroras and the Five Nations. -- Six points circle. (Geom.) See Nine points circle, under Nine.  1. The number greater by a unit than five; the sum of three and three; six units or objects. 2. A symbol representing six units, as 6, vi., or VI. To be at six and seven or at sixes and sevens, to be in disorder. Bacon. Shak. Swift.
nature: 1. The existing system of things; the world of matter, or of matter and mind; the creation; the universe. But looks through nature up to nature's God. Pope. Nature has caprices which art can not imitate. Macaulay. 2. The personified sum and order of causes and effects; the powers which produce existing phenomena, whether in the total or in detail; the agencies which carry on the processes of creation or of being; -- often conceived of as a single and separate entity, embodying the total of all finite agencies and forces as disconnected from a creating or ordering intelligence. I oft admire How Nature, wise and frugal, could commit Such disproportions. Milton. 3. The established or regular course of things; usual order of events; connection of cause and effect. 4. Conformity to that which is natural, as distinguished from that which is artifical, or forced, or remote from actual experience. One touch of nature makes the whole world kin. Shak. 5. The sum of qualities and attributes which make a person or thing what it is, as distinct from others; native character; inherent or essential qualities or attributes; peculiar constitution or quality of being. Thou, therefore, whom thou only canst redeem, Their nature also to thy nature join, And be thyself man among men on earth. Milton. 6. Hence: Kind, sort; character; quality. A dispute of this nature caused mischief. Dryden. 7. Physical constitution or existence; the vital powers; the natural life. "My days of nature." Shak. Oppressed nature sleeps. Shak. 8. Natural affection or reverence. Have we not seen The murdering son ascend his parent's bed, Through violated nature foce his way Pope. 9. Constitution or quality of mind or character. A born devil, on whose nature Nurture can never stick. Shak. That reverence which is due to a superior nature. Addison. Good nature, Ill nature. see under Good and Ill. -- In a state of nature. (a) Naked as when born; nude. (b) In a condition of sin; unregenerate. (c) Untamed; uncvilized. -- Nature printng, a process of printing from metallic or other plates which have received an impression, as by heavy pressure, of an object such as a leaf, lace, or the like. -- Nature worship, the worship of the personified powers of nature. -- To pay the debt of nature, to die.  To endow with natural qualities. [Obs.] He [God] which natureth every kind. Gower.
long: 1. Drawn out in a line, or in the direction of length; protracted; extended; as, a long line; -- opposed to short, and distinguished from broad or wide. 2. Drawn out or extended in time; continued through a considerable tine, or to a great length; as, a long series of events; a long debate; a long drama; a long history; a long book. 3. Slow in passing; causing weariness by length or duration; lingering; as, long hours of watching. 4. Occurring or coming after an extended interval; distant in time; far away. The we may us reserve both fresh and strong Against the tournament, which is not long. Spenser. 5. Extended to any specified measure; of a specified length; as, a span long; a yard long; a mile long, that is, extended to the measure of a mile, etc. 6. Far-reaching; extensive. " Long views." Burke. 7. (Phonetics)  Prolonged, or relatively more prolonged, in utterance; -- said of vowels and syllables. See Short, a., 13, and Guide to Pronunciation, §§ 22, 30. Note: Long is used as a prefix in a large number of compound adjectives which are mostly of obvious meaning; as, long-armed, long- beaked, long-haired, long-horned, long-necked, long-sleeved, long- tailed, long- worded, etc. In the long run, in the whole course of things taken together; in the ultimate result; eventually. -- Long clam (Zoöl.), the common clam (Mya arenaria) of the Northern United States and Canada; -- called also soft-shell clam and long- neck clam. See Mya. -- Long cloth, a kind of cotton cloth of superior quality. -- Long clothes, clothes worn by a young infant, extending below the feet. -- Long division. (Math.) See Division. -- Long dozen, one more than a dozen; thirteen. -- Long home, the grave. -- Long measure, Long mater. See under Measure, Meter. -- Long Parliament (Eng. Hist.), the Parliament which assembled Nov. 3, 1640, and was dissolved by Cromwell, April 20, 1653. -- Long price, the full retail price. -- Long purple (Bot.), a plant with purple flowers, supposed to be the Orchis mascula. Dr. Prior. -- Long suit (Whist), a suit of which one holds originally more than three cards. R. A. Proctor. -- Long tom. (a) A pivot gun of great length and range, on the dock of a vessel. (b) A long trough for washing auriferous earth. [Western U.S.] (c) (Zoöl.) The long-tailed titmouse. -- Long wall (Coal Mining), a working in which the whole seam is removed and the roof allowed to fall in, as the work progresses, except where passages are needed. -- Of long, a long time. [Obs.] Fairfax. -- To be, or go, long of the market, To be on the long side of the market, etc. (Stock Exchange), to hold stock for a rise in price, or to have a contract under which one can demand stock on or before a certain day at a stipulated price; -- opposed to short in such phrases as, to be short of stock, to sell short, etc. [Cant] See Short. -- To have a long head, to have a farseeing or sagacious mind.  1. (Mus.)  A note formerly used in music, one half the length of a large, twice that of a breve. 2. (Phonetics)  A long sound, syllable, or vowel. 3. The longest dimension; the greatest extent; -- in the phrase, the long and the short of it, that is, the sum and substance of it. Addison.  1. To a great extent in apace; as, a long drawn out line. 2. To a great extent in time; during a long time. They that tarry long at the wine. Prov. xxiii. 30. When the trumpet soundeth long. Ex. xix. 13. 3. At a point of duration far distant, either prior or posterior; as, not long before; not long after; long before the foundation of Rome; long after the Conquest. 4. Through the whole extent or duration. The bird of dawning singeth all night long. Shak. 5. Through an extent of time, more or less; -- only in question; as, how long will you be gone  By means of; by the fault of; because of. [Obs.] See Along of, under 3d Along.  1. To feel a strong or morbid desire or craving; to wish for something with eagerness; -- followed by an infinitive, or by after or for. I long to see you. Rom. i. 11. I have longed after thy precepts. Ps. cxix. 40. I have longed for thy salvation. Ps. cxix. 174. Nicomedes, longing for herrings, was supplied with fresh ones . . . at a great distance from the sea. Arbuthnot. 2. To belong; -- used with to, unto, or for. [Obs.] The labor which that longeth unto me. Chaucer.
than: A particle expressing comparison, used after certain adjectives and adverbs which express comparison or diversity, as more, better, other, otherwise, and the like. It is usually followed by the object compared in the nominative case. Sometimes, however, the object compared is placed in the objective case, and than is then considered by some grammarians as a preposition. Sometimes the object is expressed in a sentence, usually introduced by that; as, I would rather suffer than that you should want. Behold, a greater than Solomon is here. Matt. xii. 42. Which when Beelzebub perceived, than whom, Satan except, none higher sat. Milton. It's wiser being good than bad; It's safer being meek than fierce; It's fitter being sane than mad. R. Browning.  Then. See Then. [Obs.] Gower. Thanne longen folk to gon on pilgrimages. Chaucer.
down: 1. Fine, soft, hairy outgrowth from the skin or surface of animals or plants, not matted and fleecy like wool; esp.: (a) (Zoöl.) The soft under feathers of birds. They have short stems with soft rachis and bards and long threadlike barbules, without hooklets. (b) (Bot.) The pubescence of plants; the hairy crown or envelope of the seeds of certain plants, as of the thistle. (c) The soft hair of the face when beginning to appear. And the first down begins to shade his face. Dryden. 2. That which is made of down, as a bed or pillow; that which affords ease and repose, like a bed of down When in the down I sink my head, Sleep, Death's twin brother, times my breath. Tennyson. Thou bosom softness, down of all my cares! Southern. Down tree (Bot.), a tree of Central America (Ochroma Lagopus), the seeds of which are enveloped in vegetable wool.  To cover, ornament, line, or stuff with down. [R.] Young.  1. A bank or rounded hillock of sand thrown up by the wind along or near the shore; a flattish-topped hill; -- usually in the plural. Hills afford prospects, as they must needs acknowledge who have been on the downs of Sussex. Ray. She went by dale, and she went by down. Tennyson. 2. A tract of poor, sandy, undulating or hilly land near the sea, covered with fine turf which serves chiefly for the grazing of sheep; -- usually in the plural. [Eng.] Seven thousand broad-tailed sheep grazed on his downs. Sandys. 3. pl.  A road for shipping in the English Channel or Straits of Dover, near Deal, employed as a naval rendezvous in time of war. On the 11th [June, 1771] we run up the channel . . . at noon we were abreast of Dover, and about three came to an anchor in the Downs, and went ashore at Deal. Cook (First Voyage). 4. pl. Etym: [From the adverb.]  A state of depression; low state; abasement. [Colloq.] It the downs of life too much outnumber the ups. M. Arnold.  1. In the direction of gravity or toward the center of the earth; toward or in a lower place or position; below; -- the opposite of up. 2. Hence, in many derived uses, as: (a) From a higher to a lower position, literally or figuratively; in a descending direction; from the top of an ascent; from an upright position; to the ground or floor; to or into a lower or an inferior condition; as, into a state of humility, disgrace, misery, and the like; into a state of rest; -- used with verbs indicating motion. It will be rain to-night. Let it come down. Shak. I sit me down beside the hazel grove. Tennyson. And that drags down his life. Tennyson. There is not a more melancholy object in the learned world than a man who has written himself down. Addison. The French . . . shone down [i. e., outshone] the English. Shak. (b) In a low or the lowest position, literally or figuratively; at the bottom of a decent; below the horizon; of the ground; in a condition of humility, dejection, misery, and the like; in a state of quiet. I was down and out of breath. Shak. The moon is down; I have not heard the clock. Shak. He that is down needs fear no fall. Bunyan. 3. From a remoter or higher antiquity. Venerable men! you have come down to us from a former generation. D. Webster. 4. From a greater to a less bulk, or from a thinner to a thicker consistence; as, to boil down in cookery, or in making decoctions. Arbuthnot. Note: Down is sometimes used elliptically, standing for go down, come down, tear down, take down, put down, haul down, pay down, and the like, especially in command or exclamation. Down, therefore, and beg mercy of the duke. Shak. If he be hungry more than wanton, bread alone will down. Locke. Down is also used intensively; as, to be loaded down; to fall down; to hang down; to drop down; to pay down. The temple of Herè at Argos was burnt down. Jowett (Thucyd. ). Down, as well as up, is sometimes used in a conventional sense; as, down East. Persons in London say down to Scotland, etc., and those in the provinces, up to London. Stormonth. Down helm (Naut.), an order to the helmsman to put the helm to leeward. -- Down on or upon (joined with a verb indicating motion, as go, come, pounce), to attack, implying the idea of threatening power. Come down upon us with a mighty power. Shak. -- Down with, take down, throw down, put down; -- used in energetic command. "Down with the palace; fire it." Dryden. -- To be down on, to dislike and treat harshly. [Slang, U.S.] -- To cry down. See under Cry, v. t. -- To cut down. See under Cut, v. t. -- Up and down, with rising and falling motion; to and fro; hither and thither; everywhere. "Let them wander up and down." Ps. lix. 15.  1. In a descending direction along; from a higher to a lower place upon or within; at a lower place in or on; as, down a hill; down a well. 2. Hence: Towards the mouth of a river; towards the sea; as, to sail or swim down a stream; to sail down the sound. Down the country, toward the sea, or toward the part where rivers discharge their waters into the ocean. -- Down the sound, in the direction of the ebbing tide; toward the sea.  To cause to go down; to make descend; to put down; to overthrow, as in wrestling; hence, to subdue; to bring down. [Archaic or Colloq.] "To down proud hearts." Sir P. Sidney. I remember how you downed Beauclerk and Hamilton, the wits, once at our house. Madame D'Arblay.  To go down; to descend. Locke.  1. Downcast; as, a down look. [R.] 2. Downright; absolute; positive; as, a down denial. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl. 3. Downward; going down; sloping; as, a down stroke; a down grade; a down train on a railway. Down draught, a downward draft, as in a flue, chimney, shaft of a mine, etc. -- Down in the mouth, chopfallen; dejected.
pitch: 1. A thick, black, lustrous, and sticky substance obtained by boiling down tar. It is used in calking the seams of ships; also in coating rope, canvas, wood, ironwork, etc., to preserve them. He that toucheth pitch shall be defiled therewith. Ecclus. xiii. 1. 2. (Geol.)  See Pitchstone. Amboyna pitch, the resin of Dammara australis. See Kauri. -- Burgundy pitch. See under Burgundy. -- Canada pitch, the resinous exudation of the hemlock tree (Abies Canadensis); hemlock gum. -- Jew's pitch, bitumen. -- Mineral pitch. See Bitumen and Asphalt. -- Pitch coal (Min.), bituminous coal. -- Pitch peat (Min.), a black homogeneous peat, with a waxy luster. -- Pitch pine (Bot.), any one of several species of pine, yielding pitch, esp. the Pinus rigida of North America.  1. To cover over or smear with pitch. Gen. vi. 14. 2. Fig.: To darken; to blacken; to obscure. The welkin pitched with sullen could. Addison.  1. To throw, generally with a definite aim or purpose; to cast; to hurl; to toss; as, to pitch quoits; to pitch hay; to pitch a ball. 2. To thrust or plant in the ground, as stakes or poles; hence, to fix firmly, as by means of poles; to establish; to arrange; as, to pitch a tent; to pitch a camp. 3. To set, face, or pave with rubble or undressed stones, as an embankment or a roadway. Knight. 4. To fix or set the tone of; as, to pitch a tune. 5. To set or fix, as a price or value. [Obs.] Shak. Pitched battle, a general battle; a battle in which the hostile forces have fixed positions; -- in distinction from a skirmish. -- To pitch into, to attack; to assault; to abuse. [Slang]  1. To fix or place a tent or temporary habitation; to encamp. "Laban with his brethren pitched in the Mount of Gilead." Gen. xxxi. 25. 2. To light; to settle; to come to rest from flight. The tree whereon they [the bees] pitch. Mortimer. 3. To fix one's choise; -- with on or upon. Pitch upon the best course of life, and custom will render it the more easy. Tillotson. 4. To plunge or fall; esp., to fall forward; to decline or slope; as, to pitch from a precipice; the vessel pitches in a heavy sea; the field pitches toward the east. Pitch and pay, an old aphorism which inculcates ready-money payment, or payment on delivery of goods. Shak.  1. A throw; a toss; a cast, as of something from the hand; as, a good pitch in quoits. Pitch and toss, a game played by tossing up a coin, and calling "Heads or tails;" hence: To play pitch and toss with (anything), to be careless or trust to luck about it. "To play pitch and toss with the property of the country." G. Eliot. -- Pitch farthing. See Chuck farthing, under 5th Chuck. 2. (Cricket)  That point of the ground on which the ball pitches or lights when bowled. 3. A point or peak; the extreme point or degree of elevation or depression; hence, a limit or bound. Driven headlong from the pitch of heaven, down Into this deep. Milton. Enterprises of great pitch and moment. Shak. To lowest pitch of abject fortune. Milton. He lived when learning was at its highest pitch. Addison. The exact pitch, or limits, where temperance ends. Sharp. 4. Height; stature. [Obs.] Hudibras. 5. A descent; a fall; a thrusting down. 6. The point where a declivity begins; hence, the declivity itself; a descending slope; the degree or rate of descent or slope; slant; as, a steep pitch in the road; the pitch of a roof. 7. (Mus.)  The relative acuteness or gravity of a tone, determined by the number of vibrations which produce it; the place of any tone upon a scale of high and low. Note: Musical tones with reference to absolute pitch, are named after the first seven letters of the alphabet; with reference to relative pitch, in a series of tones called the scale, they are called one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight. Eight is also one of a new scale an octave higher, as one is eight of a scale an octave lower. 8. (Mining)  The limit of ground set to a miner who receives a share of the ore taken out. 9. (Mech.) (a) The distance from center to center of any two adjacent teeth of gearing, measured on the pitch line; -- called also circular pitch. (b) The length, measured along the axis, of a complete turn of the thread of a screw, or of the helical lines of the blades of a screw propeller. (c) The distance between the centers of holes, as of rivet holes in boiler plates. Concert pitch (Mus.), the standard of pitch used by orchestras, as in concerts, etc. -- Diametral pitch (Gearing), the distance which bears the same relation to the pitch proper, or circular pitch, that the diameter of a circle bears to its circumference; it is sometimes described by the number expressing the quotient obtained by dividing the number of teeth in a wheel by the diameter of its pitch circle in inches; as, 4 pitch, 8 pitch, etc. -- Pitch chain, a chain, as one made of metallic plates, adapted for working with a sprocket wheel. -- Pitch line, or Pitch circle (Gearing), an ideal line, in a toothed gear or rack, bearing such a relation to a corresponding line in another gear, with which the former works, that the two lines will have a common velocity as in rolling contact; it usually cuts the teeth at about the middle of their height, and, in a circular gear, is a circle concentric with the axis of the gear; the line, or circle, on which the pitch of teeth is measured. -- Pitch of a roof (Arch.), the inclination or slope of the sides expressed by the height in parts of the span; as, one half pitch; whole pitch; or by the height in parts of the half span, especially among engineers; or by degrees, as a pitch of 30°, of 45°, etc.; or by the rise and run, that is, the ratio of the height to the half span; as, a pitch of six rise to ten run. Equilateral pitch is where the two sloping sides with the span form an equilateral triangle. -- Pitch of a plane (Carp.), the slant of the cutting iron. -- Pitch pipe, a wind instrument used by choristers in regulating the pitch of a tune. -- Pitch point (Gearing), the point of contact of the pitch lines of two gears, or of a rack and pinion, which work together.
walk: 1. To move along on foot; to advance by steps; to go on at a moderate pace; specifically, of two-legged creatures, to proceed at a slower or faster rate, but without running, or lifting one foot entirely before the other touches the ground. At the end of twelve months, he walked in the palace of the kingdom of Babylon. Dan. iv. 29. When Peter was come down out of the ship, he walked on the water, to go to Jesus. Matt. xiv. 29. Note: In the walk of quadrupeds, there are always two, and for a brief space there are three, feet on the ground at once, but never four. 2. To move or go on the feet for exercise or amusement; to take one's exercise; to ramble. 3. To be stirring; to be abroad; to go restlessly about; -- said of things or persons expected to remain quiet, as a sleeping person, or the spirit of a dead person; to go about as a somnambulist or a specter. I have heard, but not believed, the spirits of the dead May walk again. Shak. When was it she last walked Shak. 4. To be in motion; to act; to move; to wag. [Obs.] "Her tongue did walk in foul reproach." Spenser. Do you think I'd walk in any plot B. Jonson. I heard a pen walking in the chimney behind the cloth. Latimer. 5. To behave; to pursue a course of life; to conduct one's self. We walk perversely with God, and he will walk crookedly toward us. Jer. Taylor. 6. To move off; to depart. [Obs. or Colloq.] He will make their cows and garrans to walk. Spenser. To walk in, to go in; to enter, as into a house. -- To walk after the flesh (Script.), to indulge sensual appetites, and to live in sin. Rom. viii. 1. -- To walk after the Spirit (Script.), to be guided by the counsels and influences of the Spirit, and by the word of God. Rom. viii. 1. -- To walk by faith (Script.), to live in the firm belief of the gospel and its promises, and to rely on Christ for salvation. 2 Cor. v. 7. -- To walk in darkness (Script.), to live in ignorance, error, and sin. 1 John i. 6. -- To walk in the flesh (Script.), to live this natural life, which is subject to infirmities and calamities. 2 Cor. x. 3. -- To walk in the light (Script.), to live in the practice of religion, and to enjoy its consolations. 1 John i. 7. -- To walk over, in racing, to go over a course at a walk; -- said of a horse when there is no other entry; hence, colloquially, to gain an easy victory in any contest. -- To walk through the fire (Script.), to be exercised with severe afflictions. Isa. xliii. 2. -- To walk with God (Script.), to live in obedience to his commands, and have communion with him.  1. To pass through, over, or upon; to traverse; to perambulate; as, to walk the streets. As we walk our earthly round. Keble. 2. To cause to walk; to lead, drive, or ride with a slow pace; as to walk one's horses. " I will rather trust . . . a thief to walk my ambling gelding." Shak. 3. Etym: [AS. wealcan to roll. See Walk to move on foot.]  To subject, as cloth or yarn, to the fulling process; to full. [Obs. or Scot.] To walk the plank, to walk off the plank into the water and be drowned; -- an expression derived from the practice of pirates who extended a plank from the side of a ship, and compelled those whom they would drown to walk off into the water; figuratively, to vacate an office by compulsion. Bartlett.  1. The act of walking, or moving on the feet with a slow pace; advance without running or leaping. 2. The act of walking for recreation or exercise; as, a morning walk; an evening walk. 3. Manner of walking; gait; step; as, we often know a person at a distance by his walk. 4. That in or through which one walks; place or distance walked over; a place for walking; a path or avenue prepared for foot passengers, or for taking air and exercise; way; road; hence, a place or region in which animals may graze; place of wandering; range; as, a sheep walk. A woody mountain . . . with goodliest trees Planted, with walks and bowers. Milton. He had walk for a hundred sheep. Latimer. Amid the sound of steps that beat The murmuring walks like rain. Bryant. 5. A frequented track; habitual place of action; sphere; as, the walk of the historian. The mountains are his walks. Sandys. He opened a boundless walk for his imagination. Pope. 6. Conduct; course of action; behavior. 7. The route or district regularly served by a vender; as, a milkman's walk. [Eng.]
control: 1. A duplicate book, register, or account, kept to correct or check another account or register; a counter register. [Obs.] Johnson. 2. That which serves to check, restrain, or hinder; restraint. "Speak without control." Dryden. 3. Power or authority to check or restrain; restraining or regulating influence; superintendence; government; as, children should be under parental control. The House of Commons should exercise a control over all the departments of the executive administration. Macaulay. Board of control. See under Board.  1. To check by a counter register or duplicate account; to prove by counter statements; to confute. [Obs.] This report was controlled to be false. Fuller. 2. To exercise restraining or governing influence over; to check; to counteract; to restrain; to regulate; to govern; to overpower. Give me a staff of honor for mine age, But not a scepter to control the world. Shak. I feel my virtue struggling in my soul: But stronger passion does its power control. Dryden. Syn. -- To restrain; rule; govern; manage; guide; regulate; hinder; direct; check; curb; counteract; subdue.
soft: 1. Easily yielding to pressure; easily impressed, molded, or cut; not firm in resisting; impressible; yielding; also, malleable; -- opposed to Ant: hard; as, a soft bed; a soft peach; soft earth; soft wood or metal. 2. Not rough, rugged, or harsh to the touch; smooth; delicate; fine; as, soft silk; a soft skin. They that wear soft clothing are in king's houses. Matt. xi. 8. 3. Hence, agreeable to feel, taste, or inhale; not irritating to the tissues; as, a soft liniment; soft wines. "The soft, delicious air." Milton. 4. Not harsh or offensive to the sight; not glaring; pleasing to the eye; not exciting by intensity of color or violent contrast; as, soft hues or tints. The sun, shining upon the upper part of the clouds . . . made the softest lights imaginable. Sir T. Browne. 5. Not harsh or rough in sound; gentle and pleasing to the ear; flowing; as, soft whispers of music. Her voice was ever soft, Gentle, and low, -- an excellent thing in woman. Shak. Soft were my numbers; who could take offense Pope. 6. Easily yielding; susceptible to influence; flexible; gentle; kind. I would to God my heart were flint, like Edward's; Or Edward's soft and pitiful, like mine. Shak. The meek or soft shall inherit the earth. Tyndale. 7. Expressing gentleness, tenderness, or the like; mild; conciliatory; courteous; kind; as, soft eyes. A soft answer turneth away wrath. Prov. xv. 1. A face with gladness overspread, Soft smiles, by human kindness bred. Wordsworth. 8. Effeminate; not courageous or manly, weak. A longing after sensual pleasures is a dissolution of the spirit of a man, and makes it loose, soft, and wandering. Jer. Taylor. 9. Gentle in action or motion; easy. On her soft axle, white she paces even, And bears thee soft with the smooth air along. Milton. 10. Weak in character; impressible. The deceiver soon found this soft place of Adam's. Glanvill. 11. Somewhat weak in intellect. [Colloq.] He made soft fellows stark noddies, and such as were foolish quite mad. Burton. 12. Quiet; undisturbed; paceful; as, soft slumbers. 13. Having, or consisting of, a gentle curve or curves; not angular or abrupt; as, soft outlines. 14. Not tinged with mineral salts; adapted to decompose soap; as, soft water is the best for washing. 15. (Phonetics) (a) Applied to a palatal, a sibilant, or a dental consonant (as g in gem, c in cent, etc.) as distinguished from a guttural mute (as g in go, c in cone, etc.); -- opposed to hard. (b) Belonging to the class of sonant elements as distinguished from the surd, and considered as involving less force in utterance; as, b, d, g, z, v, etc., in contrast with p, t, k, s, f, etc. Soft clam (Zoöl.), the common or long clam (Mya arenaria). See Mya. -- Soft coal, bituminous coal, as distinguished from anthracite, or hard, coal. -- Soft crab (Zoöl.), any crab which has recently shed its shell. -- Soft dorsal (Zoöl.), the posterior part of the dorsal fin of fishes when supported by soft rays. -- Soft grass. (Bot.) See Velvet grass. -- Soft money, paper money, as distinguished from coin, or hard money. [Colloq. U.S.] -- Soft mute. (Phonetics) See Media. -- Soft palate. See the Note under Palate. -- Soft ray (Zoöl.), a fin ray which is articulated and usually branched. -- Soft soap. See under Soap. -- Soft-tack, leavened bread, as distinguished from hard-tack, or ship bread. -- Soft tortoise (Zoöl.), any river tortoise of the genus Trionyx. See Trionyx.  A soft or foolish person; an idiot. [Colloq.] G. Eliot.  Softly; without roughness or harshness; gently; quietly. Chaucer. A knight soft riding toward them. Spenser.  Be quiet; hold; stop; not so fast. Soft, you; a word or two before you go. Shak.
half: 1. Consisting of a moiety, or half; as, a half bushel; a half hour; a half dollar; a half view. Note: The adjective and noun are often united to form a compound. 2. Consisting of some indefinite portion resembling a half; approximately a half, whether more or less; partial; imperfect; as, a half dream; half knowledge. Assumed from thence a half consent. Tennyson. Half ape (Zoöl.), a lemur. -- Half back. (Football) See under 2d Back. -- Half bent, the first notch, for the sear point to enter, in the tumbler of a gunlock; the halfcock notch. -- Half binding, a style of bookbinding in which only the back and corners are in leather. -- Half boarder, one who boards in part; specifically, a scholar at a boarding school who takes dinner only. -- Half-breadth plan (Shipbuilding), a horizontal plan of the half a vessel, divided lengthwise, showing the lines. -- Half cadence (Mus.), a cadence on the dominant. -- Half cap, a slight salute with the cap. [Obs.] Shak. -- A half cock, the position of the cock of a gun when retained by the first notch. -- Half hitch, a sailor's knot in a rope; half of a clove hitch. -- Half hose, short stockings; socks. -- Half measure, an imperfect or weak line of action. -- Half note (Mus.), a minim, one half of a semibreve. -- Half pay, half of the wages or salary; reduced pay; as, an officer on half pay. -- Half price, half the ordinary price; or a price much reduced. -- Half round. (a) (Arch.) A molding of semicircular section. (b) (Mech.) Having one side flat and the other rounded; -- said of a file. -- Half shift (Mus.), a position of the hand, between the open position and the first shift, in playing on the violin and kindred instruments. See Shift. -- Half step (Mus.), a semitone; the smallest difference of pitch or interval, used in music. -- Half tide, the time or state of the tide equally distant from ebb and flood. -- Half time, half the ordinary time for work or attendance; as, the half-time system. -- Half tint (Fine Arts), a middle or intermediate tint, as in drawing or painting. See Demitint. -- Half truth, a statement only partially true, or which gives only a part of the truth. Mrs. Browning. -- Half year, the space of six moths; one term of a school when there are two terms in a year.  In an equal part or degree; in some paas, half-colored, half done, half-hearted, half persuaded, half conscious. "Half loth and half consenting." Dryden. Their children spoke halfin the speech of Ashdod. Neh. xiii. 24  1. Part; side; behalf. [Obs.] Wyclif. The four halves of the house. Chaucer. 2. One of two equal parts into which anything may be divided, or considered as divided; -- sometimes followed by of; as, a half of an apple. Not half his riches known, and yet despised. Milton. A friendship so complete Portioned in halves between us. Tennyson. Better half. See under Better. -- In half, in two; an expression sometimes used improperly instead of in or into halves; as, to cut in half. [Colloq.] Dickens. -- In, or On, one's half, in one's behalf; on one's part. [Obs.] -- To cry halves, to claim an equal share with another. -- To go halves, to share equally between two.  To halve. [Obs.] See Halve. Sir H. Wotton.
drive: 1. To impel or urge onward by force in a direction away from one, or along before one; to push forward; to compel to move on; to communicate motion to; as, to drive cattle; to drive a nail; smoke drives persons from a room. A storm came on and drove them into Pylos. Jowett (Thucyd. ). Shield pressed on shield, and man drove man along. Pope. Go drive the deer and drag the finny prey. Pope. 2. To urge on and direct the motions of, as the beasts which draw a vehicle, or the vehicle borne by them; hence, also, to take in a carriage; to convey in a vehicle drawn by beasts; as, to drive a pair of horses or a stage; to drive a person to his own door. How . . . proud he was to drive such a brother! Thackeray. 3. To urge, impel, or hurry forward; to force; to constrain; to urge, press, or bring to a point or state; as, to drive person by necessity, by persuasion, by force of circumstances, by argument, and the like. " Enough to drive one mad." Tennyson. He, driven to dismount, threatened, if I did not do the like, to do as much for my horse as fortune had done for his. Sir P. Sidney. 4. To carry or; to keep in motion; to conduct; to prosecute. [Now used only colloquially.] Bacon. The trade of life can not be driven without partners. Collier. 5. To clear, by forcing away what is contained. To drive the country, force the swains away. Dryden. 6. (Mining)  To dig Horizontally; to cut a horizontal gallery or tunnel. Tomlinson. 7. To pass away; -- said of time. [Obs.] Chaucer. Note: Drive, in all its senses, implies forcible or violent action. It is the reverse of to lead. To drive a body is to move it by applying a force behind; to lead is to cause to move by applying the force before, or in front. It takes a variety of meanings, according to the objects by which it is followed; as, to drive an engine, to direct and regulate its motions; to drive logs, to keep them in the current of a river and direct them in their course; to drive feathers or down, to place them in a machine, which, by a current of air, drives off the lightest to one end, and collects them by themselves. "My thrice-driven bed of down." Shak.  1. To rush and press with violence; to move furiously. Fierce Boreas drove against his flying sails. Dryden. Under cover of the night and a driving tempest. Prescott. Time driveth onward fast, And in a little while our lips are dumb. Tennyson. 2. To be forced along; to be impelled; to be moved by any physical force or agent; to be driven. The hull drives on, though mast and sail be torn. Byron. The chaise drives to Mr. Draper's chambers. Thackeray. 3. To go by carriage; to pass in a carriage; to proceed by directing or urging on a vehicle or the animals that draw it; as, the coachman drove to my door. 4. To press forward; to aim, or tend, to a point; to make an effort; to strive; -- usually with at. Let them therefore declare what carnal or secular interest he drove at. South. 5. To distrain for rent. [Obs.] To let drive, to aim a blow; to strike with force; to attack. "Four rogues in buckram let drive at me." Shak.  Driven. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. The act of driving; a trip or an excursion in a carriage, as for exercise or pleasure; -- distinguished from a ride taken on horseback. 2. A place suitable or agreeable for driving; a road prepared for driving. 3. Violent or rapid motion; a rushing onward or away; esp., a forced or hurried dispatch of business. The Murdstonian drive in business. M. Arnold. 4. In type founding and forging, an impression or matrix, formed by a punch drift. 5. A collection of objects that are driven; a mass of logs to be floated down a river. [Colloq.] Syn. -- See Ride.
paper: 1. A substance in the form of thin sheets or leaves intended to be written or printed on, or to be used in wrapping. It is made of rags, straw, bark, wood, or other fibrous material, which is first reduced to pulp, then molded, pressed, and dried. 2. A sheet, leaf, or piece of such substance. 3. A printed or written instrument; a document, essay, or the like; a writing; as, a paper read before a scientific society. They brought a paper to me to be signed. Dryden. 4. A printed sheet appearing periodically; a newspaper; a journal; as, a daily paper. 5. Negotiable evidences of indebtedness; notes; bills of exchange, and the like; as, the bank holds a large amount of his paper. 6. Decorated hangings or coverings for walls, made of paper. See Paper hangings, below. 7. A paper containing (usually) a definite quantity; as, a paper of pins, tacks, opium, etc. 8. A medicinal preparation spread upon paper, intended for external application; as, cantharides paper. Note: Paper is manufactured in sheets, the trade names of which, together with the regular sizes in inches, are shown in the following table. But paper makers vary the size somewhat. Note: In the manufacture of books, etc., a sheet, of whatever size originally, is termed, when folded once, a folio; folded twice, a quarto, or 4to; three times, an octavo, or 8vo; four times, a sextodecimo, or 16mo; five times, a 32mo; three times, with an offcut folded twice and set in, a duodecimo, or 12mo; four times, with an offcut folded three times and set in, a 24mo. Note: Paper is often used adjectively or in combination, having commonly an obvious signification; as, paper cutter or paper-cutter; paper knife, paper-knife, or paperknife; paper maker, paper-maker, or papermaker; paper mill or paper-mill; paper weight, paper-weight, or paperweight, etc. Business paper, checks, notes, drafts, etc., given in payment of actual indebtedness; -- opposed to accommodation paper. -- Fly paper, paper covered with a sticky preparation, -- used for catching flies. -- Laid paper. See under Laid. -- Paper birch (Bot.), the canoe birch tree (Betula papyracea). -- Paper blockade, an ineffective blockade, as by a weak naval force. -- Paper boat (Naut.), a boat made of water-proof paper. -- Paper car wheel (Railroad), a car wheel having a steel tire, and a center formed of compressed paper held between two plate-iron disks. Forney. -- Paper credit, credit founded upon evidences of debt, such as promissory notes, duebills, etc. -- Paper hanger, one who covers walls with paper hangings. -- Paper hangings, paper printed with colored figures, or otherwise made ornamental, prepared to be pasted against the walls of apartments, etc.; wall paper. -- Paper house, an audience composed of people who have come in on free passes. [Cant] -- Paper money, notes or bills, usually issued by government or by a banking corporation, promising payment of money, and circulated as the representative of coin. -- Paper mulberry. (Bot.) See under Mulberry. -- Paper muslin, glazed muslin, used for linings, etc. -- Paper nautilus. (Zoöl.) See Argonauta. -- Paper reed (Bot.), the papyrus. -- Paper sailor. (Zoöl.) See Argonauta. -- Paper stainer, one who colors or stamps wall paper. De Colange. -- Paper wasp (Zoöl.), any wasp which makes a nest of paperlike material, as the yellow jacket. -- Paper weight, any object used as a weight to prevent loose papers from being displaced by wind, or otherwise. -- Parchment paper. See Papyrine. -- Tissue paper, thin, gauzelike paper, such as is used to protect engravings in books. -- Wall paper. Same as Paper hangings, above. -- Waste paper, paper thrown aside as worthless or useless, except for uses of little account. -- Wove paper, a writing paper with a uniform surface, not ribbed or watermarked.  Of or pertaining to paper; made of paper; resembling paper; existing only on paper; unsubstantial; as, a paper box; a paper army.  1. To cover with paper; to furnish with paper hangings; as, to paper a room or a house. 2. To fold or inclose in paper. 3. To put on paper; to make a memorandum of. [Obs.]
head: 1. The anterior or superior part of an animal, containing the brain, or chief ganglia of the nervous system, the mouth, and in the higher animals, the chief sensory organs; poll; cephalon. 2. The uppermost, foremost, or most important part of an inanimate object; such a part as may be considered to resemble the head of an animal; often, also, the larger, thicker, or heavier part or extremity, in distinction from the smaller or thinner part, or from the point or edge; as, the head of a cane, a nail, a spear, an ax, a mast, a sail, a ship; that which covers and closes the top or the end of a hollow vessel; as, the head of a cask or a steam boiler. 3. The place where the head should go; as, the head of a bed, of a grave, etc.; the head of a carriage, that is, the hood which covers the head. 4. The most prominent or important member of any organized body; the chief; the leader; as, the head of a college, a school, a church, a state, and the like. "Their princes and heads." Robynson (More's Utopia). The heads of the chief sects of philosophy. Tillotson. Your head I him appoint. Milton. 5. The place or honor, or of command; the most important or foremost position; the front; as, the head of the table; the head of a column of soldiers. An army of fourscore thousand troops, with the duke Marlborough at the head of them. Addison. 6. Each one among many; an individual; -- often used in a plural sense; as, a thousand head of cattle. It there be six millions of people, there are about four acres for every head. Graunt. 7. The seat of the intellect; the brain; the understanding; the mental faculties; as, a good head, that is, a good mind; it never entered his head, it did not occur to him; of his own head, of his own thought or will. Men who had lost both head and heart. Macaulay. 8. The source, fountain, spring, or beginning, as of a stream or river; as, the head of the Nile; hence, the altitude of the source, or the height of the surface, as of water, above a given place, as above an orifice at which it issues, and the pressure resulting from the height or from motion; sometimes also, the quantity in reserve; as, a mill or reservoir has a good head of water, or ten feet head; also, that part of a gulf or bay most remote from the outlet or the sea. 9. A headland; a promontory; as, Gay Head. Shak. 10. A separate part, or topic, of a discourse; a theme to be expanded; a subdivision; as, the heads of a sermon. 11. Culminating point or crisis; hence, strength; force; height. Ere foul sin, gathering head, shall break into corruption. Shak. The indisposition which has long hung upon me, is at last grown to such a head, that it must quickly make an end of me or of itself. Addison. 12. Power; armed force. My lord, my lord, the French have gathered head. Shak. 13. A headdress; a covering of the head; as, a laced head; a head of hair. Swift. 14. An ear of wheat, barley, or of one of the other small cereals. 15. (Bot.) (a) A dense cluster of flowers, as in clover, daisies, thistles; a capitulum. (b) A dense, compact mass of leaves, as in a cabbage or a lettuce plant. 16. The antlers of a deer. 17. A rounded mass of foam which rises on a pot of beer or other effervescing liquor. Mortimer. 18. pl.  Tiles laid at the eaves of a house. Knight. Note: Head is often used adjectively or in self-explaining combinations; as, head gear or headgear, head rest. Cf. Head, a. A buck of the first head, a male fallow deer in its fifth year, when it attains its complete set of antlers. Shak. -- By the head. (Naut.) See under By. -- Elevator head, Feed head, etc. See under Elevator, Feed, etc. -- From head to foot, through the whole length of a man; completely; throughout. "Arm me, audacity, from head to foot." Shak. -- Head and ears, with the whole person; deeply; completely; as, he was head and ears in debt or in trouble. [Colloq.] -- Head fast. (Naut.) See 5th Fast. -- Head kidney (Anat.), the most anterior of the three pairs of embryonic renal organs developed in most vertebrates -- Head money, a capitation tax; a poll tax. Milton. -- Head pence, a poll tax. [Obs.] -- Head sea, a sea that meets the head of a vessel or rolls against her course. -- Head and shoulders. (a) By force; violently; as, to drag one, head and shoulders. "They bring in every figure of speech, head and shoulders." Felton. (b) By the height of the head and shoulders; hence, by a great degree or space; by far; much; as, he is head and shoulders above them. -- Head or tail, this side or that side; this thing or that; -- a phrase used in throwing a coin to decide a choice, guestion, or stake, head being the side of the coin bearing the effigy or principal figure (or, in case there is no head or face on either side, that side which has the date on it), and tail the other side. -- Neither head nor tail, neither beginning nor end; neither this thing nor that; nothing distinct or definite; -- a phrase used in speaking of what is indefinite or confused; as, they made neither head nor tail of the matter. [Colloq.] -- Head wind, a wind that blows in a direction opposite the vessel's course. -- Out one's own head, according to one's own idea; without advice or coöperation of another. Over the head of, beyond the comprehension of. M. Arnold. -- To be out of one's head, to be temporarily insane. -- To come or draw to a head. See under Come, Draw. -- To give (one) the head, or To give head, to let go, or to give up, control; to free from restraint; to give license. "He gave his able horse the head." Shak. "He has so long given his unruly passions their head." South. -- To his head, before his face. "An uncivil answer from a son to a father, from an obliged person to a benefactor, is a greater indecency than if an enemy should storm his house or revile him to his head." Jer. Taylor. -- To lay heads together, to consult; to conspire. -- To lose one's head, to lose presence of mind. -- To make head, or To make head against, to resist with success; to advance. -- To show one's head, to appear. Shak. -- To turn head, to turn the face or front. "The ravishers turn head, the fight renews." Dryden.  Principal; chief; leading; first; as, the head master of a school; the head man of a tribe; a head chorister; a head cook.  1. To be at the head of; to put one's self at the head of; to lead; to direct; to act as leader to; as, to head an army, an expedition, or a riot. Dryden. 2. To form a head to; to fit or furnish with a head; as, to head a nail. Spenser. 3. To behead; to decapitate. [Obs.] Shak. 4. To cut off the top of; to lop off; as, to head trees. 5. To go in front of; to get in the front of, so as to hinder or stop; to oppose; hence, to check or restrain; as, to head a drove of cattle; to head a person; the wind heads a ship. 6. To set on the head; as, to head a cask. To head off, to intercept; to get before; as, an officer heads off a thief who is escaping. -- To head up, to close, as a cask or barrel, by fitting a head to.  1. To originate; to spring; to have its A broad river, that heads in the great Blue Ridge. Adair. 2. To go or point in a certain direction; to tend; as, how does the ship head 3. To form a head; as, this kind of cabbage heads early.
stick: 1. A small shoot, or branch, separated, as by a cutting, from a tree or shrub; also, any stem or branch of a tree, of any size, cut for fuel or timber. Withered sticks to gather, which might serve Against a winter's day. Milton. 2. Any long and comparatively slender piece of wood, whether in natural form or shaped with tools; a rod; a wand; a staff; as, the stick of a rocket; a walking stick. 3. Anything shaped like a stick; as, a stick of wax. 4. A derogatory expression for a person; one who is inert or stupid; as, an odd stick; a poor stick. [Colloq.] 5. (Print.)  A composing stick. See under Composing. It is usually a frame of metal, but for posters, handbills, etc., one made of wood is used. 6. A thrust with a pointed instrument; a stab. A stick of eels, twenty-five eels. [Prov. Eng.] -- Stick chimney, a chimney made of sticks laid crosswise, and cemented with clay or mud, as in some log houses. [U.S.] -- Stick insect, (Zoöl.), any one of various species of wingless orthopterous insects of the family Phasmidæ, which have a long round body, resembling a stick in form and color, and long legs, which are often held rigidly in such positions as to make them resemble small twigs. They thus imitate the branches and twigs of the trees on which they live. The common American species is Diapheromera femorata. Some of the Asiatic species are more than a foot long. -- To cut one's stick, or To cut stick, to run away. [Slang] De Quincey.  1. To penetrate with a pointed instrument; to pierce; to stab; hence, to kill by piercing; as, to stick a beast. And sticked him with bodkins anon. Chaucer. It was a shame . . . to stick him under the other gentleman's arm while he was redding the fray. Sir W. Scott. 2. To cause to penetrate; to push, thrust, or drive, so as to pierce; as, to stick a needle into one's finger. Thou stickest a dagger in me. Shak. 3. To fasten, attach, or cause to remain, by thrusting in; hence, also, to adorn or deck with things fastened on as by piercing; as, to stick a pin on the sleeve. My shroud of white, stuck all with yew. Shak. The points of spears are stuck within the shield. Dryden. 4. To set; to fix in; as, to stick card teeth. 5. To set with something pointed; as, to stick cards. 6. To fix on a pointed instrument; to impale; as, to stick an apple on a fork. 7. To attach by causing to adhere to the surface; as, to stick on a plaster; to stick a stamp on an envelope; also, to attach in any manner. 8. (Print.)  To compose; to set, or arrange, in a composing stick; as, to stick type. [Cant] 9. (Joinery)  To run or plane (moldings) in a machine, in contradistinction to working them by hand. Such moldings are said to be stuck. 10. To cause to stick; to bring to a stand; to pose; to puzzle; as, to stick one with a hard problem. [Colloq.] 11. To impose upon; to compel to pay; sometimes, to cheat. [Slang] To stick out, to cause to project or protrude; to render prominent.  1. To adhere; as, glue sticks to the fingers; paste sticks to the wall. The green caterpillar breedeth in the inward parts of roses not blown, where the dew sticketh. Bacon. 2. To remain where placed; to be fixed; to hold fast to any position so as to be moved with difficulty; to cling; to abide; to cleave; to be united closely. A friend that sticketh closer than a brother. Prov. xviii. 24. I am a kind of bur; I shall stick. Shak. If on your fame our sex a bolt has thrown, 'T will ever stick through malice of your own. Young. 3. To be prevented from going farther; to stop by reason of some obstacle; to be stayed. I had most need of blessing, and "Amen" Stuck in my throat. Shak. The trembling weapon passed Through nine bull hides, . . . and stuck within the last. Dryden. 4. To be embarrassed or puzzled; to hesitate; to be deterred, as by scruples; to scruple; -- often with at. They will stick long at part of a demonstration for want of perceiving the connection of two ideas. Locke. Some stick not to say, that the parson and attorney forged a will. Arbuthnot. 5. To cause difficulties, scruples, or hesitation. This is the difficulty that sticks with the most reasonable. Swift. To stick by. (a) To adhere closely to; to be firm in supporting. "We are your only friends; stick by us, and we will stick by you." Davenant. (b) To be troublesome by adhering. "I am satisfied to trifle away my time, rather than let it stick by me." Pope. -- To stick out. (a) To project; to be prominent. "His bones that were not seen stick out." Job xxxiii. 21. (b) To persevere in a purpose; to hold out; as, the garrison stuck out until relieved. [Colloq.]v.i. to stick it out. -- To stick to, to be persevering in holding to; as, to stick to a party or cause. "The advantage will be on our side if we stick to its essentials." Addison. -- To stick up, to stand erect; as, his hair sticks up. -- To stick up for, to assert and defend; as, to stick up for one's rights or for a friend. [Colloq.] -- To stick upon, to dwell upon; not to forsake. "If the matter be knotty, the mind must stop and buckle to it, and stick upon it with labor and thought." Locke.
ear: 1. The organ of hearing; the external ear. Note: In man and the higher vertebrates, the organ of hearing is very complicated, and is divisible into three parts: the external ear, which includes the pinna or auricle and meatus or external opening; the middle ear, drum, or tympanum; and the internal ear, or labyrinth. The middle ear is a cavity connected by the Eustachian tube with the pharynx, separated from the opening of the external ear by the tympanic membrane, and containing a chain of three small bones, or ossicles, named malleus, incus, and stapes, which connect this membrane with the internal ear. The essential part of the internal ear where the fibers of the auditory nerve terminate, is the membranous labyrinth, a complicated system of sacs and tubes filled with a fluid (the endolymph), and lodged in a cavity, called the bony labyrinth, in the periotic bone. The membranous labyrinth does not completely fill the bony labyrinth, but is partially suspended in it in a fluid (the perilymph). The bony labyrinth consists of a central cavity, the vestibule, into which three semicircular canals and the canal of the cochlea (spirally coiled in mammals) open. The vestibular portion of the membranous labyrinth consists of two sacs, the utriculus and sacculus, connected by a narrow tube, into the former of which three membranous semicircular canals open, while the latter is connected with a membranous tube in the cochlea containing the organ of Corti. By the help of the external ear the sonorous vibrations of the air are concentrated upon the tympanic membrane and set it vibrating, the chain of bones in the middle ear transmits these vibrations to the internal ear, where they cause certain delicate structures in the organ of Corti, and other parts of the membranous labyrinth, to stimulate the fibers of the auditory nerve to transmit sonorous impulses to the brain. 2. The sense of hearing; the perception of sounds; the power of discriminating between different tones; as, a nice ear for music; -- in the singular only. Songs . . . not all ungrateful to thine ear. Tennyson. 3. That which resembles in shape or position the ear of an animal; any prominence or projection on an object, -- usually one for support or attachment; a lug; a handle; as, the ears of a tub, a skillet, or dish. The ears of a boat are outside kneepieces near the bow. See Illust. of Bell. 4. (Arch.) (a) Same as Acroterium (a). (b) Same as Crossette. 5. Privilege of being kindly heard; favor; attention. Dionysius . . . would give no ear to his suit. Bacon. Friends, Romans, countrymen, lend me your ears. Shak. About the ears, in close proximity to; near at hand. -- By the ears, in close contest; as, to set by the ears; to fall together by the ears; to be by the ears. -- Button ear (in dogs), an ear which falls forward and completely hides the inside. -- Ear finger, the little finger. -- Ear of Dionysius, a kind of ear trumpet with a flexible tube; -- named from the Sicilian tyrant, who constructed a device to overhear the prisoners in his dungeons. -- Ear sand (Anat.), otoliths. See Otolith. -- Ear snail (Zoöl.), any snail of the genus Auricula and allied genera. -- Ear stones (Anat.), otoliths. See Otolith. -- Ear trumpet, an instrument to aid in hearing. It consists of a tube broad at the outer end, and narrowing to a slender extremity which enters the ear, thus collecting and intensifying sounds so as to assist the hearing of a partially deaf person. -- Ear vesicle (Zoöl.), a simple auditory organ, occurring in many worms, mollusks, etc. It consists of a small sac containing a fluid and one or more solid concretions or otocysts. -- Rose ear (in dogs), an ear which folds backward and shows part of the inside. -- To give ear to, to listen to; to heed, as advice or one advising. "Give ear unto my song." Goldsmith. -- To have one's ear, to be listened to with favor. -- Up to the ears, deeply submerged; almost overwhelmed; as, to be in trouble up to one's ears. [Colloq.]  To take in with the ears; to hear. [Sportive] "I eared her language." Two Noble Kinsmen.  The spike or head of any cereal (as, wheat, rye, barley, Indian corn, etc.), containing the kernels. First the blade, then the ear, after that the full corn in the ear. Mark iv. 28.  To put forth ears in growing; to form ears, as grain; as, this corn ears well.  To plow or till; to cultivate. "To ear the land." Shak.
flow: imp. sing. of Fly, v. i. Chaucer.  1. To move with a continual change of place among the particles or parts, as a fluid; to change place or circulate, as a liquid; as, rivers flow from springs and lakes; tears flow from the eyes. 2. To become liquid; to melt. The mountains flowed down at thy presence. Is. lxiv. 3. 3. To pproceed; to issue forth; as, wealth flows from industry and economy. Those thousand decencies that daily flow From all her words and actions. Milton. 4. To glide along smoothly, without harshness or asperties; as, a flowing period; flowing numbers; to sound smoothly to the ear; to be uttered easily. Virgil is sweet and flowingin his hexameters. Dryden. 5. To have or be in abundance; to abound; to full, so as to run or flow over; to be copious. In that day . . . the hills shall flow with milk. Joel iii. 18. The exhilaration of a night that needed not the influence of the flowing bowl. Prof. Wilson. 6. To hang loose and waving; as, a flowing mantle; flowing locks. The imperial purple flowing in his train. A. Hamilton. 7. To rise, as the tide; -- opposed to ebb; as, the tide flows twice in twenty-four hours. The river hath thrice flowed, no ebb between. Shak. 8. To discharge blood in excess from the uterus.  1. To cover with water or other liquid; to overflow; to inundate; to flood. 2. To cover with varnish.  1. A stream of water or other fluid; a current; as, a flow of water; a flow of blood. 2. A continuous movement of something abundant; as, a flow of words. 3. Any gentle, gradual movement or procedure of thought, diction, music, or the like, resembling the quiet, steady movement of a river; a stream. The feast of reason and the flow of soul. Pope. 4. The tidal setting in of the water from the ocean to the shore. See Ebb and flow, under Ebb. 5. A low-lying piece of watery land; -- called also flow moss and flow bog. [Scot.] Jamieson.
motion: 1. The act, process, or state of changing place or position; movement; the passing of a body from one place or position to another, whether voluntary or involuntary; -- opposed to rest. Speaking or mute, all comeliness and grace attends thee, and each word, each motion, forms. Milton. 2. Power of, or capacity for, motion. Devoid of sense and motion. Milton. 3. Direction of movement; course; tendency; as, the motion of the planets is from west to east. In our proper motion we ascend. Milton. 4. Change in the relative position of the parts of anything; action of a machine with respect to the relative movement of its parts. This is the great wheel to which the clock owes its motion. Dr. H. More. 5. Movement of the mind, desires, or passions; mental act, or impulse to any action; internal activity. Let a good man obey every good motion rising in his heart, knowing that every such motion proceeds from God. South. 6. A proposal or suggestion looking to action or progress; esp., a formal proposal made in a deliberative assembly; as, a motion to adjourn. Yes, I agree, and thank you for your motion. Shak. 7. (Law)  An application made to a court or judge orally in open court. Its object is to obtain an order or rule directing some act to be done in favor of the applicant. Mozley & W. 8. (Mus.)  Change of pitch in successive sounds, whether in the same part or in groups of parts. The independent motions of different parts sounding together constitute counterpoint. Grove. Note: Conjunct motion is that by single degrees of the scale. Contrary motion is that when parts move in opposite directions. Disjunct motion is motion by skips. Oblique motion is that when one part is stationary while another moves. Similar or direct motion is that when parts move in the same direction. 9. A puppet show or puppet. [Obs.] What motion's this the model of Nineveh Beau. & Fl. Note: Motion, in mechanics, may be simple or compound. Simple motions are: (a) straight translation, which, if of indefinite duration, must be reciprocating. (b) Simple rotation, which may be either continuous or reciprocating, and when reciprocating is called oscillating. (c) Helical, which, if of indefinite duration, must be reciprocating. Compound motion consists of combinations of any of the simple motions. Center of motion, Harmonic motion, etc. See under Center, Harmonic, etc. -- Motion block (Steam Engine), a crosshead. -- Perpetual motion (Mech.), an incessant motion conceived to be attainable by a machine supplying its own motive forces independently of any action from without. Syn. -- See Movement.  1. To make a significant movement or gesture, as with the hand; as, to motion to one to take a seat. 2. To make proposal; to offer plans. [Obs.] Shak.  1. To direct or invite by a motion, as of the hand or head; as, to motion one to a seat. 2. To propose; to move. [Obs.] I want friends to motion such a matter. Burton.
indicate: 1. To point out; to discover; to direct to a knowledge of; to show; to make known. That turns and turns to indicate From what point blows the weather. Cowper. 2. (Med.)  To show or manifest by symptoms; to point to as the proper remedies; as, great prostration of strength indicates the use of stimulants. 3. (Mach.)  To investigate the condition or power of, as of steam engine, by means of an indicator. Syn. -- To show; mark; signify; denote; discover; evidence; evince; manifest; declare; specify; explain; exhibit; present; reveal; disclose; display.
pattern: 1. Anything proposed for imitation; an archetype; an exemplar; that which is to be, or is worthy to be, copied or imitated; as, a pattern of a machine. I will be the pattern of all patience. Shak. 2. A part showing the figure or quality of the whole; a specimen; a sample; an example; an instance. He compares the pattern with the whole piece. Swift. 3. Stuff sufficient for a garment; as, a dress pattern. 4. Figure or style of decoration; design; as, wall paper of a beautiful pattern. 5. Something made after a model; a copy. Shak. The patterns of things in the heavens. Heb. ix. 23. 6. Anything cut or formed to serve as a guide to cutting or forming objects; as, a dressmaker's pattern. 7. (Founding)  A full-sized model around which a mold of sand is made, to receive the melted metal. It is usually made of wood and in several parts, so as to be removed from the mold without injuring it. Pattern box, chain, or cylinder (Figure Weaving), devices, in a loom, for presenting several shuttles to the picker in the proper succession for forming the figure. -- Pattern card. (a) A set of samples on a card. (b) (Weaving) One of the perforated cards in a Jacquard apparatus. -- Pattern reader, one who arranges textile patterns. -- Pattern wheel (Horology), a count-wheel.  1. To make or design (anything) by, from, or after, something that serves as a pattern; to copy; to model; to imitate. Milton. [A temple] patterned from that which Adam reared in Paradise. Sir T. Herbert. 2. To serve as an example for; also, to parallel. To pattern after, to imitate; to follow. PATTINSON'S PROCESS Pat"tin*son's proc"ess. (Metal.)  A process of desilverizing argentiferous lead by repeated meltings and skimmings, which concentrate the silver in the molten bath, the final skimmings being nearly pure lad. The processwas invented in 1833 by Hugh Lee Pattinson, an English metallurgist.
during: In the time of; as long as the action or existence of; as, during life; during the space of a year.
clock: 1. A machine for measuring time, indicating the hour and other divisions by means of hands moving on a dial plate. Its works are moved by a weight or a spring, and it is often so constructed as to tell the hour by the stroke of a hammer on a bell. It is not adapted, like the watch, to be carried on the person. 2. A watcg, esp. one that strikes. [Obs.] Walton. 3. The striking of a clock. [Obs.] Dryden. 4. A figure or figured work on the ankle or side of a stocking. Swift. Note: The phrases what o'clock it is nine o'clock, etc., are contracted from what of the clock it is nine of the clock, etc. Alarm clock. See under Alarm. -- Astronomical clock. (a) A clock of superior construction, with a compensating pendulum, etc., to measure time with great accuracy, for use in astronomical observatories; -- called a regulator when used by watchmakers as a standard for regulating timepieces. (b) A clock with mechanism for indicating certain astronomical phenomena, as the phases of the moon, position of the sun in the ecliptic, equation of time, etc. -- Electric clock. (a) A clock moved or regulated by electricity or electro-magnetism. (b) A clock connected with an electro-magnetic recording apparatus. -- Ship's clock (Naut.), a clock arranged to strike from one to eight strokes, at half hourly intervals, marking the divisions of the ship's watches. -- Sidereal clock, an astronomical clock regulated to keep sidereal time.  To ornament with figured work, as the side of a stocking.  To call, as a hen. See Cluck. [R.]  A large beetle, esp. the European dung beetle (Scarabæus stercorarius).
draw: 1. To cause to move continuously by force applied in advance of the thing moved; to pull along; to haul; to drag; to cause to follow. He cast him down to ground, and all along Drew him through dirt and mire without remorse. Spenser. He hastened to draw the stranger into a private room. Sir W. Scott. Do not rich men oppress you, and draw you before the judgment seats James ii. 6. The arrow is now drawn to the head. Atterbury. 2. To influence to move or tend toward one's self; to exercise an attracting force upon; to call towards itself; to attract; hence, to entice; to allure; to induce. The poet Did feign that Orpheus drew trees, stones, and floods. Shak. All eyes you draw, and with the eyes the heart. Dryden. 3. To cause to come out for one's use or benefit; to extract; to educe; to bring forth; as: (a) To bring or take out, or to let out, from some receptacle, as a stick or post from a hole, water from a cask or well, etc. The drew out the staves of the ark. 2 Chron. v. 9. Draw thee waters for the siege. Nahum iii. 14. I opened the tumor by the point of a lancet without drawing one drop of blood. Wiseman. (b) To pull from a sheath, as a sword. I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them. Ex. xv. 9. (c) To extract; to force out; to elicit; to derive. Spirits, by distillations, may be drawn out of vegetable juices, which shall flame and fume of themselves. Cheyne. Until you had drawn oaths from him. Shak. (d) To obtain from some cause or origin; to infer from evidence or reasons; to deduce from premises; to derive. We do not draw the moral lessons we might from history. Burke. (e) To take or procure from a place of deposit; to call for and receive from a fund, or the like; as, to draw money from a bank. (f) To take from a box or wheel, as a lottery ticket; to receive from a lottery by the drawing out of the numbers for prizes or blanks; hence, to obtain by good fortune; to win; to gain; as, he drew a prize. (g) To select by the drawing of lots. Provided magistracies were filled by men freely chosen or drawn. Freeman. 4. To remove the contents of; as: (a) To drain by emptying; to suck dry. Sucking and drawing the breast dischargeth the milk as fast as it can generated. Wiseman. (b) To extract the bowels of; to eviscerate; as, to draw a fowl; to hang, draw, and quarter a criminal. In private draw your poultry, clean your tripe. King. 5. To take into the lungs; to inhale; to inspire; hence, also, to utter or produce by an inhalation; to heave. "Where I first drew air." Milton. Drew, or seemed to draw, a dying groan. Dryden. 6. To extend in length; to lengthen; to protract; to stretch; to extend, as a mass of metal into wire. How long her face is drawn! Shak. And the huge Offa's dike which he drew from the mouth of Wye to that of Dee. J. R. Green. 7. To run, extend, or produce, as a line on any surface; hence, also, to form by marking; to make by an instrument of delineation; to produce, as a sketch, figure, or picture. 8. To represent by lines drawn; to form a sketch or a picture of; to represent by a picture; to delineate; hence, to represent by words; to depict; to describe. A flattering painter who made it his care To draw men as they ought to be, not as they are. Goldsmith. Can I, untouched, the fair one's passions move, Or thou draw beauty and not feel its power Prior. 9. To write in due form; to prepare a draught of; as, to draw a memorial, a deed, or bill of exchange. Clerk, draw a deed of gift. Shak. 10. To require (so great a depth, as of water) for floating; -- said of a vessel; to sink so deep in (water); as, a ship draws ten feet of water. 11. To withdraw. [Obs.] Chaucer. Go wash thy face, and draw the action. Shak. 12. To trace by scent; to track; -- a hunting term. Note: Draw, in most of its uses, retains some shade of its original sense, to pull, to move forward by the application of force in advance, or to extend in length, and usually expresses an action as gradual or continuous, and leisurely. We pour liquid quickly, but we draw it in a continued stream. We force compliance by threats, but we draw it by gradual prevalence. We may write a letter with haste, but we draw a bill with slow caution and regard to a precise form. We draw a bar of metal by continued beating. To draw a bow, to bend the bow by drawing the string for discharging the arrow. -- To draw a cover, to clear a cover of the game it contains. -- To draw a curtain, to cause a curtain to slide or move, either closing or unclosing. "Night draws the curtain, which the sun withdraws." Herbert. -- To draw a line, to fix a limit or boundary. -- To draw back, to receive back, as duties on goods for exportation. -- To draw breath, to breathe. Shak. -- To draw cuts or lots. See under Cut, n. -- To draw in. (a) To bring or pull in; to collect. (b) To entice; to inveigle. -- To draw interest, to produce or gain interest. -- To draw off, to withdraw; to abstract. Addison. -- To draw on, to bring on; to occasion; to cause. "War which either his negligence drew on, or his practices procured." Hayward. -- To draw (one) out, to elicit cunningly the thoughts and feelings of another. -- To draw out, to stretch or extend; to protract; to spread out. -- "Wilt thou draw out thine anger to all generations" Ps. lxxxv. 5. "Linked sweetness long drawn out." Milton. -- To draw over, to cause to come over, to induce to leave one part or side for the opposite one. -- To draw the longbow, to exaggerate; to tell preposterous tales. -- To draw (one) to or on to (something), to move, to incite, to induce. "How many actions most ridiculous hast thou been drawn to by thy fantasy" Shak. -- To draw up. (a) To compose in due form; to draught; to form in writing. (b) To arrange in order, as a body of troops; to array. "Drawn up in battle to receive the charge." Dryden. Syn. -- To Draw, Drag. Draw differs from drag in this, that drag implies a natural inaptitude for drawing, or positive resistance; it is applied to things pulled or hauled along the ground, or moved with toil or difficulty. Draw is applied to all bodies moved by force in advance, whatever may be the degree of force; it commonly implies that some kind of aptitude or provision exists for drawing. Draw is the more general or generic term, and drag the more specific. We say, the horses draw a coach or wagon, but they drag it through mire; yet draw is properly used in both cases.  1. To pull; to exert strength in drawing anything; to have force to move anything by pulling; as, a horse draws well; the sails of a ship draw well. Note: A sail is said to draw when it is filled with wind. 2. To draw a liquid from some receptacle, as water from a well. The woman saith unto him, Sir, thou hast nothing to draw with, and the well is deep. John iv. 11. 3. To exert an attractive force; to act as an inducement or enticement. Keep a watch upon the particular bias of their minds, that it may not draw too much. Addison. 4. (Med.)  To have efficiency as an epispastic; to act as a sinapism; -- said of a blister, poultice, etc. 5. To have draught, as a chimney, flue, or the like; to furnish transmission to smoke, gases, etc. 6. To unsheathe a weapon, especially a sword. So soon as ever thou seest him, draw; and as thou drawest, swear horrible. Shak. 7. To perform the act, or practice the art, of delineation; to sketch; to form figures or pictures. "Skill in drawing." Locke. 8. To become contracted; to shrink. "To draw into less room." Bacon. 9. To move; to come or go; literally, to draw one's self; -- with prepositions and adverbs; as, to draw away, to move off, esp. in racing, to get in front; to obtain the lead or increase it; to draw back, to retreat; to draw level, to move up even (with another); to come up to or overtake another; to draw off, to retire or retreat; to draw on, to advance; to draw up, to form in array; to draw near, nigh, or towards, to approach; to draw together, to come together, to collect. 10. To make a draft or written demand for payment of money deposited or due; -- usually with on or upon. You may draw on me for the expenses of your journey. Jay. 11. To admit the action of pulling or dragging; to undergo draught; as, a carriage draws easily. 12. To sink in water; to require a depth for floating. "Greater hulks draw deep." Shak. To draw to a head. (a) (Med.) To begin to suppurate; to ripen, as a boil. (b) Fig.: To ripen, to approach the time for action; as, the plot draws to a head.  1. The act of drawing; draught. 2. A lot or chance to be drawn. 3. A drawn game or battle, etc. [Colloq.] 4. That part of a bridge which may be raised, swung round, or drawn aside; the movable part of a drawbridge. See the Note under Drawbridge. [U.S.]
crop: 1. The pouchlike enlargement of the gullet of birds, serving as a receptacle for food; the craw. 2. The top, end, or highest part of anything, especially of a plant or tree. [Obs.] "Crop and root." Chaucer. 3. That which is cropped, cut, or gathered from a single felld, or of a single kind of grain or fruit, or in a single season; especially, the product of what is planted in the earth; fruit; harvest. Lab'ring the soil, and reaping plenteous crop, Corn, wine, and oil. Milton. 4. Grain or other product of the field while standing. 5. Anything cut off or gathered. Guiltless of steel, and from the razor free, It falls a plenteous crop reserved for thee. Dryden. 6. Hair cut close or short, or the act or style of so cutting; as, a convict's crop. 7. (Arch.)  A projecting ornament in carved stone. Specifically, a finial. [Obs.] 8. (Mining.) (a) Tin ore prepared for smelting. (b) Outcrop of a vein or seam at the surface. Knight. 9. A riding whip with a loop instead of a lash. Neck and crop, altogether; roughly and at once. [Colloq.]  1. To cut off the tops or tips of; to bite or pull off; to browse; to pluck; to mow; to reap. I will crop off from the top of his young twigs a tender one. Ezek. xvii. 22. 2. Fig.: To cut off, as if in harvest. Death . . . .crops the growing boys. Creech. 3. To cause to bear a crop; as, to crop a field.  To yield harvest. To crop out. (a) (Geol.) To appear above the surface, as a seam or vein, or inclined bed, as of coal. (b) To come to light; to be manifest; to appear; as, the peculiarities of an author crop out. -- To crop up, to sprout; to spring up. "Cares crop up in villas." Beaconsfield.
next: 1. Nearest in place; having no similar object intervening. Chaucer. Her princely guest Was next her side; in order sat the rest. Dryden. Fear followed me so hard, that I fled the next way. Bunyan. 2. Nearest in time; as, the next day or hour. 3. Adjoining in a series; immediately preceding or following in order. None could tell whose turn should be the next. Gay. 4. Nearest in degree, quality, rank, right, or relation; as, the next heir was an infant. The man is near of kin unto us, one of our next kinsmen. Ruth ii. 20. Note: Next is usually followed by to before an object, but to is sometimes omitted. In such cases next in considered by many grammarians as a preposition. Next friend (Law), one who represents an infant, a married woman, or any person who can not appear sui juris, in a suit at law.  In the time, place, or order nearest or immediately suceeding; as, this man follows next.
loud: 1. Having, making, or being a strong or great sound; noisy; striking the ear with great force; as, a loud cry; loud thunder. They were instant with loud voices, requiring that he might be crucified. Luke xxiii. 23. 2. Clamorous; boisterous. She is loud and stubborn. Prov. vii. 11. 3. Emphatic; impressive; urgent; as, a loud call for united effort. [Colloq.] 4. Ostentatious; likely to attract attention; gaudy; as, a loud style of dress; loud colors. [Slang] Syn. -- Noisy; boisterous; vociferous; clamorous; obstreperous; turbulent; blustering; vehement.  With loudness; loudly. To speak loud in public assemblies. Addison.
twenty: 1. One more that nineteen; twice; as, twenty men. 2. An indefinite number more or less that twenty. Shak. Maximilian, upon twenty respects, could not have been the man. Bacon.  1. The number next following nineteen; the sum of twelve and eight, or twice ten; twenty units or objects; a score. 2. A symbol representing twenty units, as 20, or xx.
of: In a general sense, from, or out from; proceeding from; belonging to; relating to; concerning; -- used in a variety of applications; as: 1. Denoting that from which anything proceeds; indicating origin, source, descent, and the like; as, he is of a race of kings; he is of noble blood. That holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God. Luke i. 35. I have received of the Lord that which also I delivered unto you. 1 Cor. xi. 23. 2. Denoting possession or ownership, or the relation of subject to attribute; as, the apartment of the consul: the power of the king; a man of courage; the gate of heaven. "Poor of spirit." Macaulay. 3. Denoting the material of which anything is composed, or that which it contains; as, a throne of gold; a sword of steel; a wreath of mist; a cup of water. 4. Denoting part of an aggregate or whole; belonging to a number or quantity mentioned; out of; from amongst; as, of this little he had some to spare; some of the mines were unproductive; most of the company. It is of the Lord's mercies that we are not consumed. Lam. iii. 22. It is a duty to communicate of those blessings we have received. Franklin. 5. Denoting that by which a person or thing is actuated or impelled; also, the source of a purpose or action; as, they went of their own will; no body can move of itself; he did it of necessity. For it was of the Lord to harden their hearts. Josh. xi. 20. 6. Denoting reference to a thing; about; concerning; relating to; as, to boast of one's achievements. Knew you of this fair work Shak. 7. Denoting nearness or distance, either in space or time; from; as, within a league of the town; within an hour of the appointed time. 8. Denoting identity or equivalence; -- used with a name or appellation, and equivalent to the relation of apposition; as, the continent of America; the city of Rome; the Island of Cuba. 9. Denoting the agent, or person by whom, or thing by which, anything is, or is done; by. And told to her of [by] some. Chaucer. He taught in their synagogues, being glorified of all. Luke iv. 15. [Jesus] being forty days tempted of the devil. Luke iv. 1, 2. Note: The use of the word in this sense, as applied to persons, is nearly obsolete. 10. Denoting relation to place or time; belonging to, or connected with; as, men of Athens; the people of the Middle Ages; in the days of Herod. 11. Denoting passage from one state to another; from. [Obs.] "O miserable of happy." Milton. 12. During; in the course of. Not be seen to wink of all the day. Shak. My custom always of the afternoon. Shak. Note: Of may be used in a subjective or an objective sense. "The love of God" may mean, our love for God, or God's love for us. Note: From is the primary sense of this preposition; a sense retained in off, the same word differently written for distinction. But this radical sense disappears in most of its application; as, a man of genius; a man of rare endowments; a fossil of a red color, or of an hexagonal figure; he lost all hope of relief; an affair of the cabinet; he is a man of decayed fortune; what is the price of corn In these and similar phrases, of denotes property or possession, or a relation of some sort involving connection. These applications, however all proceeded from the same primary sense. That which proceeds from, or is produced by, a person or thing, either has had, or still has, a close connection with the same; and hence the word was applied to cases of mere connection, not involving at all the idea of separation. Of consequence, of importance, value, or influence. -- Of late, recently; in time not long past. -- Of old, formerly; in time long past. -- Of one's self, by one's self; without help or prompting; spontaneously. Why, knows not Montague, that of itself England is safe, if true within itself Shak.
knew: of Know.
simple: 1. Single; not complex; not infolded or entangled; uncombined; not compounded; not blended with something else; not complicated; as, a simple substance; a simple idea; a simple sound; a simple machine; a simple problem; simple tasks. 2. Plain; unadorned; as, simple dress. "Simple truth." Spenser. "His simple story." Burns. 3. Mere; not other than; being only. A medicine . . . whose simple touch Is powerful to araise King Pepin. Shak. 4. Not given to artifice, stratagem, or duplicity; undesigning; sincere; true. Full many fine men go upon my score, as simple as I stand here, and I trust them. Marston. Must thou trust Tradition's simple tongue Byron. To be simple is to be great. Emerson. 5. Artless in manner; unaffected; unconstrained; natural; inartificial;; straightforward. In simple manners all the secret lies. Young. 6. Direct; clear; intelligible; not abstruse or enigmatical; as, a simple statement; simple language. 7. Weak in intellect; not wise or sagacious; of but moderate understanding or attainments; hence, foolish; silly. "You have simple wits." Shak. The simple believeth every word; but the prudent man looketh well to his going. Prov. xiv. 15. 8. Not luxurious; without much variety; plain; as, a simple diet; a simple way of living. Thy simple fare and all thy plain delights. Cowper. 9. Humble; lowly; undistinguished. A simple husbandman in garments gray. Spenser. Clergy and laity, male and female, gentle and simple made the fuel of the same fire. Fuller. 10. (BOt.)  Without subdivisions; entire; as, a simple stem; a simple leaf. 11. (Chem.)  Not capable of being decomposed into anything more simple or ultimate by any means at present known; elementary; thus, atoms are regarded as simple bodies. Cf. Ultimate, a. Note: A simple body is one that has not as yet been decomposed. There are indications that many of our simple elements are still compound bodies, though their actual decomposition into anything simpler may never be accomplished.fundamental particle 12. (Min.)  Homogenous. 13. (Zoöl.)  Consisting of a single individual or zooid; as, a simple ascidian; -- opposed to compound. Simple contract (Law), any contract, whether verbal or written, which is not of record or under seal. J. W. Smith. Chitty. -- Simple equation (Alg.), an eqyation containing but one unknown quantity, and that quantity only in the first degree. -- Simple eye (Zoöl.), an eye having a single lens; -- opposed to Ant: compound eye. -- Simple interest. See under Interest. -- Simple larceny. (Law) See under Larceny. -- Simple obligation (Rom. Law), an obligation which does not depend for its execution upon any event provided for by the parties, or is not to become void on the happening of any such event. Burrill. Syn. -- Single; uncompounded; unmingled; unmixed; mere; uncombined; elementary; plain; artless; sincere; harmless; undesigning; frank; open; unaffected; inartificial; unadorned; credulous; silly; foolish; shallow; unwise. -- Simple, Silly. One who is simple is sincere, unaffected, and inexperienced in duplicity, -- hence liable to be duped. A silly person is one who is ignorant or weak and also self-confident; hence, one who shows in speech and act a lack of good sense. Simplicity is incompatible with duplicity, artfulness, or vanity, while silliness is consistent with all three. Simplicity denotes lack of knowledge or of guile; silliness denotes want of judgment or right purpose, a defect of character as well as of education. I am a simple woman, much too weak To oppose your cunning. Shak. He is the companion of the silliest people in their most silly pleasure; he is ready for every impertinent entertainment and diversion. Law.  1. Something not mixed or compounded. "Compounded of many simples." Shak. 2. (Med.)  A medicinal plant; -- so called because each vegetable was supposed to possess its particular virtue, and therefore to constitute a simple remedy. What virtue is in this remedy lies in the naked simple itself as it comes over from the Indies. Sir W. Temple. 3. (Weaving) (a) A drawloom. (b) A part of the apparatus for raising the heddles of a drawloom. 4. (R. C. Ch.)  A feast which is not a double or a semidouble.  To gather simples, or medicinal plants. As simpling on the flowery hills she [Circe] strayed. Garth.
share: 1. The part (usually an iron or steel plate) of a plow which cuts the ground at the bottom of a furrow; a plowshare. 2. The part which opens the ground for the reception of the seed, in a machine for sowing seed. Knight.  1. A certain quantity; a portion; a part; a division; as, a small share of prudence. 2. Especially, the part allotted or belonging to one, of any property or interest owned by a number; a portion among others; an apportioned lot; an allotment; a dividend. "My share of fame." Dryden. 3. Hence, one of a certain number of equal portions into which any property or invested capital is divided; as, a ship owned in ten shares. 4. The pubes; the sharebone. [Obs.] Holland. To go shares, to partake; to be equally concerned. -- Share and share alike, in equal shares.  1. To part among two or more; to distribute in portions; to divide. Suppose I share my fortune equally between my children and a stranger. Swift. 2. To partake of, use, or experience, with others; to have a portion of; to take and possess in common; as, to share a shelter with another. While avarice and rapine share the land. Milton. 3. To cut; to shear; to cleave; to divide. [Obs.] The shared visage hangs on equal sides. Dryden.  To have part; to receive a portion; to partake, enjoy, or suffer with others. A right of inheritance gave every one a title to share in the goods of his father. Locke.
pass: 1. To go; to move; to proceed; to be moved or transferred from one point to another; to make a transit; -- usually with a following adverb or adverbal phrase defining the kind or manner of motion; as, to pass on, by, out, in, etc.; to pass swiftly, directly, smoothly, etc.; to pass to the rear, under the yoke, over the bridge, across the field, beyond the border, etc. "But now pass over [i.e., pass on]." Chaucer. On high behests his angels to and fro Passed frequent. Milton. Sweet sounds rose slowly through their mouths, And from their bodies passed. Coleridge. 2. To move or be transferred from one state or condition to another; to change possession, condition, or circumstances; to undergo transition; as, the business has passed into other hands. Others, dissatisfied with what they have, . . . pass from just to unjust. Sir W. Temple. 3. To move beyond the range of the senses or of knowledge; to pass away; hence, to disappear; to vanish; to depart; specifically, to depart from life; to die. Disturb him not, let him pass paceably. Shak. Beauty is a charm, but soon the charm will pass. Dryden. The passing of the sweetest soul That ever looked with human eyes. Tennyson. 4. To move or to come into being or under notice; to come and go in consciousness; hence, to take place; to occur; to happen; to come; to occur progressively or in succession; to be present transitorly. So death passed upon all men. Rom. v. 12. Our own consciousness of what passes within our own mind. I. Watts. 5. To go by or glide by, as time; to elapse; to be spent; as, their vacation passed pleasantly. Now the time is far passed. Mark vi. 35 6. To go from one person to another; hence, to be given and taken freely; as, clipped coin will not pass; to obtain general acceptance; to be held or regarded; to circulate; to be current; -- followed by for before a word denoting value or estimation. "Let him pass for a man." Shak. False eloquence passeth only where true is not understood. Felton. This will not pass for a fault in him. Atterbury. 7. To advance through all the steps or stages necessary to validity or effectiveness; to be carried through a body that has power to sanction or reject; to receive legislative sanction; to be enacted; as, the resolution passed; the bill passed both houses of Congress. 8. To go through any inspection or test successfully; to be approved or accepted; as, he attempted the examination, but did not expect to pass. 9. To be suffered to go on; to be tolerated; hence, to continue; to live alogn. "The play may pass." Shak. 10. To go unheeded or neglected; to proceed without hindrance or opposition; as, we let this act pass. 11. To go beyond bounds; to surpass; to be in excess. [Obs.] "This passes, Master Ford." Shak. 12. To take heed; to care. [Obs.] As for these silken-coated slaves, I pass not. Shak. 13. To go through the intestines. Arbuthnot. 14. (Law)  To be conveyed or transferred by will, deed, or other instrument of conveyance; as, an estate passes by a certain clause in a deed. Mozley & W. 15. (Fencing)  To make a lunge or pass; to thrust. 16. (Card Playing)  To decline to play in one's turn; in euchre, to decline to make the trump. She would not play, yet must not pass. Prior. To bring to pass, To come to pass. See under Bring, and Come. -- To pass away, to disappear; to die; to vanish. "The heavens shall pass away." 2 Pet. iii. 10. "I thought to pass away before, but yet alive I am." Tennyson. -- To pass by, to go near and beyond a certain person or place; as, he passed by as we stood there. -- To pass into, to change by a gradual transmission; to blend or unite with. -- To pass on, to proceed. -- To pass on or upon. (a) To happen to; to come upon; to affect. "So death passed upon all men." Rom. v. 12. "Provided no indirect act pass upon our prayers to define them." Jer. Taylor. (b) To determine concerning; to give judgment or sentence upon. "We may not pass upon his life." Shak. -- To pass off, to go away; to cease; to disappear; as, an agitation passes off. -- To pass over, to go from one side or end to the other; to cross, as a river, road, or bridge.  1. In simple, transitive senses; as: (a) To go by, beyond, over, through, or the like; to proceed from one side to the other of; as, to pass a house, a stream, a boundary, etc. (b) Hence:  To go from one limit to the other of; to spend; to live through; to have experience of; to undergo; to suffer. "To pass commodiously this life." Milton. She loved me for the dangers I had passed. Shak. (c) To go by without noticing; to omit attention to; to take no note of; to disregard. Please you that I may pass This doing. Shak. I pass their warlike pomp, their proud array. Dryden. (d) To transcend; to surpass; to excel; to exceed. And strive to pass . . . Their native music by her skillful art. Spenser. Whose tender power Passes the strength of storms in their most desolate hour. Byron. (e) To go successfully through, as an examination, trail, test, etc.; to obtain the formal sanction of, as a legislative body; as, he passed his examination; the bill passed the senate. 2. In causative senses: as: (a) To cause to move or go; to send; to transfer from one person, place, or condition to another; to transmit; to deliver; to hand; to make over; as, the waiter passed bisquit and cheese; the torch was passed from hand to hand. I had only time to pass my eye over the medals. Addison. Waller passed over five thousand horse and foot by Newbridge. Clarendon. (b) To cause to pass the lips; to utter; to pronounce; hence, to promise; to pledge; as, to pass sentence. Shak. Father, thy word is passed. Milton. (c) To cause to advance by stages of progress; to carry on with success through an ordeal, examination, or action; specifically, to give legal or official sanction to; to ratify; to enact; to approve as valid and just; as, he passed the bill through the committee; the senate passed the law. (e) To put in circulation; to give currency to; as, to pass counterfeit money. "Pass the happy news." Tennyson. (f) To cause to obtain entrance, admission, or conveyance; as, to pass a person into a theater, or over a railroad. 3. To emit from the bowels; to evacuate. 4. (Naut.)  To take a turn with (a line, gasket, etc.), as around a sail in furling, and make secure. 5. (Fencing)  To make, as a thrust, punto, etc. Shak. Passed midshipman. See under Midshipman. -- To pass a dividend, to omit the declaration and payment of a dividend at the time when due. -- To pass away, to spend; to waste. "Lest she pass away the flower of her age." Ecclus. xlii. 9. -- To pass by. (a) To disregard; to neglect. (b) To excuse; to spare; to overlook. -- To pass off, to impose fraudulently; to palm off. "Passed himself off as a bishop." Macaulay. -- To pass (something) on or upon (some one), to put upon as a trick or cheat; to palm off. "She passed the child on her husband for a boy." Dryden. -- To pass over, to overlook; not to note or resent; as, to pass over an affront.  1. An opening, road, or track, available for passing; especially, one through or over some dangerous or otherwise impracticable barrier; a passageway; a defile; a ford; as, a mountain pass. "Try not the pass!" the old man said. Longfellow. 2. (Fencing)  A thrust or push; an attempt to stab or strike an adversary. Shak. 3. A movement of the hand over or along anything; the manipulation of a mesmerist. 4. (Rolling Metals)  A single passage of a bar, rail, sheet, etc., between the rolls. 5. State of things; condition; predicament. Have his daughters brought him to this pass. Shak. Matters have been brought to this pass. South. 6. Permission or license to pass, or to go and come; a psssport; a ticket permitting free transit or admission; as, a railroad or theater pass; a military pass. A ship sailing under the flag and pass of an enemy. Kent. 7. Fig.: a thrust; a sally of wit. Shak. 8. Estimation; character. [Obs.] Common speech gives him a worthy pass. Shak. 9. Etym: [Cf. Passus.]  A part; a division. [Obs.] Chaucer. Pass boat (Naut.), a punt, or similar boat. -- Pass book. (a) A book in which a trader enters articles bought on credit, and then passes or sends it to the purchaser. (b) See Bank book. -- Pass box (Mil.), a wooden or metallic box, used to carry cartridges from the service magazine to the piece. -- Pass check, a ticket of admission to a place of entertainment, or of readmission for one who goes away in expectation of returning.
level: 1. A line or surface to which, at every point, a vertical or plumb line is perpendicular; a line or surface which is everywhere parallel to the surface of still water; -- this is the true level, and is a curve or surface in which all points are equally distant from the center of the earth, or rather would be so if the earth were an exact sphere. 2. A horizontal line or plane; that is, a straight line or a plane which is tangent to a true level at a given point and hence parallel to the horizon at that point; -- this is the apparent level at the given point. 3. An approximately horizontal line or surface at a certain degree of altitude, or distance from the center of the earth; as, to climb from the level of the coast to the l of the plateau and then descent to the level of the valley or of the sea. After draining of the level in Northamptonshire. Sir M. Hale. Shot from the deadly level of a gun. Shak. 4. Hence, figuratively, a certain position, rank, standard, degree, quality, character, etc., conceived of as in one of several planes of different elevation. Providence, for the most part, sets us on a level. Addison. Somebody there of his own level. Swift. Be the fair level of thy actions laid As temperance wills and prudence may persuade. Prior. 5. A uniform or average height; a normal plane or altitude; a condition conformable to natural law or which will secure a level surface; as, moving fluids seek a level. When merit shall find its level. F. W. Robertson. 6. (Mech. & Surv.) (a) An instrument by which to find a horizontal line, or adjust something with reference to a horizontal line. (b) A measurement of the difference of altitude of two points, by means of a level; as, to take a level. 7. A horizontal passage, drift, or adit, in mine. Air level, a spirit level. See Spirit level (below). -- Box level, a spirit level in which a glass-covered box is used instead of a tube. -- Garpenter's level, Mason's level, either the plumb level or a straight bar of wood, in which is imbedded a small spirit level. -- Level of the sea, the imaginary level from which heights and depths are calculated, taken at a mean distance between high and low water. -- Line of levels, a connected series of measurements, by means of a level, along a given line, as of a railroad, to ascertain the profile of the ground. -- Plumb level, one in which a horizontal bar is placed in true position by means of a plumb line, to which it is at right angles. -- Spirit level, one in which the adjustment to the horizon is shown by the position of a bubble in alcohol or ether contained in a nearly horizontal glass tube, or a circular box with a glass cover. -- Surveyor's level, a telescope, with a spirit level attached, and with suitable screws, etc., for accurate adjustment, the whole mounted on a tripod, for use in leveling; -- called also leveling instrument. -- Water level, an instrument to show the level by means the surface of water in a trough, or in upright tubes connected by a pipe.  1. Even; flat; having no part higher than another; having, or conforming to, the curvature which belongs to the undisturbed liquid parts of the earth's surface; as, a level field; level ground; the level surface of a pond or lake. Ample spaces o'er the smooth And level pavement. Milton. 2. Coinciding or parallel with the plane of the horizon; horizontal; as, the telescope is now level. 3. Even with anything else; of the same height; on the same line or plane; on the same footing; of equal importance; -- followed by with, sometimes by to. Young boys and girls Are level now with men; the odds is gone. Shak. Everything lies level to our wish. Shak. 4. Straightforward; direct; direct; clear; open. A very plain and level account. M. Arnold. 5. Well balanced; even; just; steady; impartial; as, a level head; a level understanding. [Colloq.] " A level consideration." Shak. 6. (Phonetics)  Of even tone; without rising or falling inflection. H. Sweet. Level line (Shipbuilding), the outline of a section which is horizontal crosswise, and parallel with the rabbet of the keel lengthwise. Level surface (Physics), an equipotential surface at right angles at every point to the lines of force.  1. To make level; to make horizontal; to bring to the condition of a level line or surface; hence, to make flat or even; as, to level a road, a walk, or a garden. 2. To bring to a lower level; to overthrow; to topple down; to reduce to a flat surface; to lower. And their proud structures level with the ground. Sandys. He levels mountains and he raises plains. Dryden. 3. To bring to a horizontal position, as a gun; hence, to point in taking aim; to aim; to direct. Bertram de Gordon, standing on the castle wall, leveled a quarrel out of a crossbow. Stow. 4. Figuratively, to bring to a common level or plane, in respect of rank, condition, character, privilege, etc.; as, to level all the ranks and conditions of men. 5. To adjust or adapt to a certain level; as, to level remarks to the capacity of children. For all his mind on honor fixed is, To which he levels all his purposes. Spenser.  1. To be level; to be on a level with, or on an equality with, something; hence, to accord; to agree; to suit. [Obs.] With such accommodation and besort As levels with her breeding. Shak. 2. To aim a gun, spear, etc., horizontally; hence, to aim or point a weapon in direct line with the mark; fig., to direct the eye, mind, or effort, directly to an object. The foeman may with as great aim level at the edge of a penknife. Shak. The glory of God and the good of his church . . . ought to be the mark whereat we also level. Hooker. She leveled at our purposes. Shak.
corn: A thickening of the epidermis at some point, esp. on the toees, by friction or pressure. It is usually painful and troublesome. Welkome, gentlemen! Ladies that have their toes Unplagued with corns, will have a bout with you. Shak. Note: The substance of a corn usually resembles horn, but where moisture is present, as between the toes, it is white and sodden, and is called a soft corn.  1. A single seed of certain plants, as wheat, rye, barley, and maize; a grain. 2. The various farinaceous grains of the cereal grasses used for food, as wheat, rye, barley, maize, oats. Note: In Scotland, corn is generally restricted to oats, in the United States, to maize, or Indian corn, of which there are several kinds; as, yellow corn, which grows chiefly in the Northern States, and is yellow when ripe; white or southern corn, which grows to a great height, and has long white kernels; sweet corn, comprising a number of sweet and tender varieties, grown chiefly at the North, some of which have kernels that wrinkle when ripe and dry; pop corn, any small variety, used for popping. 3. The plants which produce corn, when growing in the field; the stalks and ears, or the stalks, ears, and seeds, after reaping and before thrashing. In one night, ere glimpse of morn, His shadowy flail had thrashed the corn. Milton. 4. A small, hard particle; a grain. "Corn of sand." Bp. Hall. "A corn of powder." Beau & Fl. Corn ball, a ball of popped corn stuck together with soft candy from molasses or sugar. -- Corn bread, bread made of Indian meal. -- Corn cake, a kind of corn bread; johnny cake; hoecake. -- Corn cockle (Bot.), a weed (Agrostemma or Lychnis Githago), having bright flowers, common in grain fields. -- Corn flag (Bot.), a plant of the genus Gladiolus; -- called also sword lily. -- Corn fly. (Zoöl.) (a) A small fly which, in the larval state, is injurious to grain, living in the stalk, and causing the disease called "gout," on account of the swelled joints. The common European species is Chlorops tæniopus. (b) A small fly (Anthomyia ze) whose larva or maggot destroys seed corn after it has been planted. -- Corn fritter, a fritter having green Indian corn mixed through its batter. [U. S.] -- Corn laws, laws regulating trade in corn, especially those in force in Great Britain till 1846, prohibiting the importation of foreign grain for home consumption, except when the price rose above a certain rate. -- Corn marigold. (Bot.) See under Marigold. -- Corn oyster, a fritter containing grated green Indian corn and butter, the combined taste resembling that of oysters. [U.S.] -- Corn parsley (Bot.), a plant of the parsley genus (Petroselinum ssegetum), a weed in parts of Europe and Asia. -- Corn popper, a utensil used in popping corn. -- Corn poppy (Bot.), the red poppy (Papaver Rhoeas), common in European cornfields; -- also called corn rose. -- Corn rent, rent paid in corn. -- Corn rose. See Corn poppy. -- Corn salad (Bot.), a name given to several species of Valerianella, annual herbs sometimes used for salad. V. olitoria is also called lamb's lettuce. -- Corn stone, red limestone. [Prov. Eng.] -- Corn violet (Bot.), a species of Campanula. -- Corn weevil. (Zoöl.) (a) A small weevil which causes great injury to grain. (b) In America, a weevil (Sphenophorus zeæ) which attacks the stalk of maize near the root, often doing great damage. See Grain weevil, under Weevil.  1. To preserve and season with salt in grains; to sprinkle with salt; to cure by salting; now, specifically, to salt slightly in brine or otherwise; as, to corn beef; to corn a tongue. 2. To form into small grains; to granulate; as, to corn gunpowder. 3. To feed with corn or (in Sctland) oats; as, to corn horses. Jamieson. 4. To render intoxicated; as, ale strong enough to corn one. [Colloq.] Corning house, a house or place where powder is corned or granulated.
settle: 1. A seat of any kind. [Obs.] "Upon the settle of his majesty" Hampole. 2. A bench; especially, a bench with a high back. 3. A place made lower than the rest; a wide step or platform lower than some other part. And from the bottom upon the ground, even to the lower settle, shall be two cubits, and the breadth one cubit. Ezek. xliii. 14. Settle bed, a bed convertible into a seat. [Eng.]  1. To place in a fixed or permanent condition; to make firm, steady, or stable; to establish; to fix; esp., to establish in life; to fix in business, in a home, or the like. And he settled his countenance steadfastly upon him, until he was ashamed. 2 Kings viii. 11. (Rev. Ver.) The father thought the time drew on Of setting in the world his only son. Dryden. 2. To establish in the pastoral office; to ordain or install as pastor or rector of a church, society, or parish; as, to settle a minister. [U. S.] 3. To cause to be no longer in a disturbed condition; to render quiet; to still; to calm; to compose. God settled then the huge whale-bearing lake. Chapman. Hoping that sleep might settle his brains. Bunyan. 4. To clear of dregs and impurities by causing them to sink; to render pure or clear; -- said of a liquid; as, to settle coffee, or the grounds of coffee. 5. To restore or bring to a smooth, dry, or passable condition; -- said of the ground, of roads, and the like; as, clear weather settles the roads. 6. To cause to sink; to lower; to depress; hence, also, to render close or compact; as, to settle the contents of a barrel or bag by shaking it. 7. To determine, as something which is exposed to doubt or question; to free from unscertainty or wavering; to make sure, firm, or constant; to establish; to compose; to quiet; as, to settle the mind when agitated; to settle questions of law; to settle the succession to a throne; to settle an allowance. It will settle the wavering, and confirm the doubtful. Swift. 8. To adjust, as something in discussion; to make up; to compose; to pacify; as, to settle a quarrel. 9. To adjust, as accounts; to liquidate; to balance; as, to settle an account. 10. Hence, to pay; as, to settle a bill. [Colloq.] Abbott. 11. To plant with inhabitants; to colonize; to people; as, the French first settled Canada; the Puritans settled New England; Plymouth was settled in 1620. To settle on or upon, to confer upon by permanent grant; to assure to. "I . . . have settled upon him a good annuity." Addison. -- To settle the land (Naut.), to cause it to sink, or appear lower, by receding from it. Syn. -- To fix; establish; regulate; arrange; compose; adjust; determine; decide.  1. To become fixed or permanent; to become stationary; to establish one's self or itself; to assume a lasting form, condition, direction, or the like, in place of a temporary or changing state. The wind came about and settled in the west. Bacon. Chyle . . . runs through all the intermediate colors until it settles in an intense red. Arbuthnot. 2. To fix one's residence; to establish a dwelling place or home; as, the Saxons who settled in Britain. 3. To enter into the married state, or the state of a householder. As people marry now and settle. Prior. 4. To be established in an employment or profession; as, to settle in the practice of law. 5. To become firm, dry, and hard, as the ground after the effects of rain or frost have disappeared; as, the roads settled late in the spring. 6. To become clear after being turbid or obscure; to clarify by depositing matter held in suspension; as, the weather settled; wine settles by standing. A government, on such occasions, is always thick before it settles. Addison. 7. To sink to the bottom; to fall to the bottom, as dregs of a liquid, or the sediment of a reserveir. 8. To sink gradually to a lower level; to subside, as the foundation of a house, etc. 9. To become calm; to cease from agitation. Till the fury of his highness settle, Come not before him. Shak. 10. To adjust differences or accounts; to come to an agreement; as, he has settled with his creditors. 11. To make a jointure for a wife. He sighs with most success that settles well. Garth.
engine: 1. (Pronounced, in this sense, [Obs.] A man hath sapiences three, Memory, engine, and intellect also. Chaucer. 2. Anything used to effect a purpose; any device or contrivance; an agent. Shak. You see the ways the fisherman doth take To catch the fish; what engines doth he make Bunyan. Their promises, enticements, oaths, tokens, and all these engines of lust. Shak. 3. Any instrument by which any effect is produced; especially, an instrument or machine of war or torture. "Terrible engines of death." Sir W. Raleigh. 4. (Mach.)  A compound machine by which any physical power is applied to produce a given physical effect. Engine driver, one who manages an engine; specifically, the engineer of a locomotive. -- Engine lathe. (Mach.) See under Lathe. -- Engine tool, a machine tool. J. Whitworth. -- Engine turning (Fine Arts), a method of ornamentation by means of a rose engine. Note: The term engine is more commonly applied to massive machines, or to those giving power, or which produce some difficult result. Engines, as motors, are distinguished according to the source of power, as steam engine, air engine, electro-magnetic engine; or the purpose on account of which the power is applied, as fire engine, pumping engine, locomotive engine; or some peculiarity of construction or operation, as single-acting or double-acting engine, high-pressure or low-pressure engine, condensing engine, etc.  1. To assault with an engine. [Obs.] To engine and batter our walls. T. Adams. 2. To equip with an engine; -- said especially of steam vessels; as, vessels are often built by one firm and engined by another. 3. (Pronounced, in this sense, [Obs.] Chaucer.
finger: 1. One of the five terminating members of the hand; a digit; esp., one of the four extermities of the hand, other than the thumb. 2. Anything that does work of a finger; as, the pointer of a clock, watch, or other registering machine; especially (Mech.) a small projecting rod, wire, or piece, which is brought into contact with an object to effect, direct, or restrain a motion. 3. The breadth of a finger, or the fourth part of the hand; a measure of nearly an inch; also, the length of finger, a measure in domestic use in the United States, of about four and a half inches or one eighth of a yard. A piece of steel three fingers thick. Bp. Wilkins. 4. Skill in the use of the fingers, as in playing upon a musical instrument. [R.] She has a good finger. Busby. Ear finger, the little finger. -- Finger alphabet. See Dactylology. -- Finger bar, the horizontal bar, carrying slotted spikes, or fingers, through which the vibratory knives of mowing and reaping machines play. -- Finger board (Mus.), the part of a stringed instrument against which the fingers press the strings to vary the tone; the keyboard of a piano, organ, etc.; manual. -- Finger bowl or glass, a bowl or glass to hold water for rinsing the fingers at table. -- Finger flower (Bot.), the foxglove. -- Finger grass (Bot.), a kind of grass (Panicum sanguinale) with slender radiating spikes; common crab grass. See Crab grass, under Crab. -- Finger nut, a fly nut or thumb nut. -- Finger plate, a strip of metal, glass, etc., to protect a painted or polished door from finger marks. -- Finger post, a guide post bearing an index finger. -- Finger reading, reading printed in relief so as to be sensible to the touch; -- so made for the blind. -- Finger shell (Zoöl.), a marine shell (Pholas dactylus) resembling a finger in form. -- Finger sponge (Zoöl.), a sponge having finger-shaped lobes, or branches. -- Finger stall, a cover or shield for a finger. -- Finger steel, a steel instrument for whetting a currier's knife. To burn one's fingers. See under Burn. -- To have a finger in, to be concerned in. [Colloq.] -- To have at one's fingers' ends, to be thoroughly familiar with. [Colloq.]  1. To touch with the fingers; to handle; to meddle with. Let the papers lie; You would be fingering them to anger me. Shak. 2. To touch lightly; to toy with. 3. (Mus.) (a) To perform on an instrument of music. (b) To mark the notes of (a piece of music) so as to guide the fingers in playing. 4. To take thievishly; to pilfer; to purloin. Shak. 5. To execute, as any delicate work.  To use the fingers in playing on an instrument. Busby.
lady: 1. A woman who looks after the domestic affairs of a family; a mistress; the female head of a household. Agar, the handmaiden of Sara, whence comest thou, and whither goest thou The which answered, Fro the face of Sara my lady. Wyclif (Gen. xvi. 8.). 2. A woman having proprietary rights or authority; mistress; -- a feminine correlative of lord. "Lord or lady of high degree." Lowell. Of all these bounds, even from this line to this, . . . We make thee lady. Shak. 3. A woman to whom the particular homage of a knight was paid; a woman to whom one is devoted or bound; a sweetheart. The soldier here his wasted store supplies, And takes new valor from his lady's eyes. Waller. 4. A woman of social distinction or position. In England, a title prefixed to the name of any woman whose husband is not of lower rank than a baron, or whose father was a nobleman not lower than an earl. The wife of a baronet or knight has the title of Lady by courtesy, but not by right. 5. A woman of refined or gentle manners; a well-bred woman; -- the feminine correlative of gentleman. 6. A wife; -- not now in approved usage. Goldsmith. 7. (Zoöl.)  The triturating apparatus in the stomach of a lobster; -- so called from a fancied resemblance to a seated female figure. It consists of calcareous plates. Ladies' man, a man who affects the society of ladies. -- Lady altar, an altar in a lady chapel. Shipley. -- Lady chapel, a chapel dedicated to the Virgin Mary. -- Lady court, the court of a lady of the manor. -- Lady crab (Zoöl.), a handsomely spotted swimming crab (Platyonichus ocellatus) very common on the sandy shores of the Atlantic coast of the United States. -- Lady fern. (Bot.) See Female fern, under Female, and Illust. of Fern. -- Lady in waiting, a lady of the queen's household, appointed to wait upon or attend the queen. -- Lady Mass, a Mass said in honor of the Virgin Mary. Shipley. Lady of the manor, a lady having jurisdiction of a manor; also, the wife of a manor lord. Lady's maid, a maidservant who dresses and waits upon a lady. Thackeray. -- Our Lady, the Virgin Mary.  Belonging or becoming to a lady; ladylike. "Some lady trifles." Shak.
magnet: 1. The loadstone; a species of iron ore (the ferrosoferric or magnetic ore, Fe3O4) which has the property of attracting iron and some of its ores, and, when freely suspended, of pointing to the poles; -- called also natural magnet. Dinocrates began to make the arched roof of the temple of Arsinoë all of magnet, or this loadstone. Holland. Two magnets, heaven and earth, allure to bliss, The larger loadstone that, the nearer this. Dryden. 2. (Physics)  A bar or mass of steel or iron to which the peculiar properties of the loadstone have been imparted; -- called, in distinction from the loadstone, an artificial magnet. Note: An artificial magnet, produced by the action of a voltaic or electrical battery, is called an electro-magnet. Field magnet (Physics & Elec.), a magnet used for producing and maintaining a magnetic field; -- used especially of the stationary or exciting magnet of a dynamo or electromotor in distinction from that of the moving portion or armature.
continue: 1. To remain ina given place or condition; to remain in connection with; to abide; to stay. Here to continue, and build up here A growing empire. Milton. They continue with me now three days, and have nothing to eat. Matt. xv. 32. 2. To be permanent or durable; to endure; to last. But now thy kingdom shall not continue. 1 Sam. xiii. 14. 3. To be steadfast or constant in any course; to persevere; to abide; to endure; to persist; to keep up or maintain a particular condition, course, or series of actions; as, the army continued to advance. If ye continue in my word, then are ye my disciples indeed. John viii. 31. Syn. -- To persevere; persist. See Persevere.  1. To unite; to connect. [Obs.] the use of the navel is to continue the infant unto the mother. Sir T. browne. 2. To protract or extend in duration; to preserve or persist in; to cease not. O continue thy loving kindness unto them that know thee. Ps. xxxvi. 10. You know how to make yourself happy by only continuing such a life as you have been long acustomed to lead. Pope. 3. To carry onward or extend; to prolong or produce; to add to or draw out in length. A bridge of wond'rous length, From hell continued, reaching th' utmost orb of this frall world. Milton. 4. To retain; to suffer or cause to remain; as, the trustees were continued; also, to suffer to live. And how shall we continue Claudio. Shak.
please: 1. To give pleasure to; to excite agreeable sensations or emotions in; to make glad; to gratify; to content; to satisfy. I pray to God that it may plesen you. Chaucer. What next I bring shall please thee, be assured. Milton. 2. To have or take pleasure in; hence, to choose; to wish; to desire; to will. Whatsoever the Lord pleased, that did he. Ps. cxxxv. 6. A man doing as he wills, and doing as he pleases, are the same things in common speech. J. Edwards. 3. To be the will or pleasure of; to seem good to; -- used impersonally. "It pleased the Father that in him should all fullness dwell." Col. i. 19. To-morrow, may it please you. Shak. To be pleased in or with, to have complacency in; to take pleasure in. -- To be pleased to do a thing, to take pleasure in doing it; to have the will to do it; to think proper to do it. Dryden.  1. To afford or impart pleasure; to excite agreeable emotions. What pleasing scemed, for her now pleases more. Milton. For we that live to please, must please to live. Johnson. 2. To have pleasure; to be willing, as a matter of affording pleasure or showing favor; to vouchsafe; to consent. Heavenly stranger, please to taste These bounties. Milton. That he would please 8give me my liberty. Swift.
came: imp. of Come.  A slender rod of cast lead, with or without grooves, used, in casements and stained-glass windows, to hold together the panes or pieces of glass.
deep: 1. Extending far below the surface; of great perpendicular dimension (measured from the surface downward, and distinguished from high, which is measured upward); far to the bottom; having a certain depth; as, a deep sea. The water where the brook is deep. Shak. 2. Extending far back from the front or outer part; of great horizontal dimension (measured backward from the front or nearer part, mouth, etc.); as, a deep cave or recess or wound; a gallery ten seats deep; a company of soldiers six files deep. Shadowing squadrons deep. Milton. Safely in harbor Is the king's ship in the deep nook. Shak. 3. Low in situation; lying far below the general surface; as, a deep valley. 4. Hard to penetrate or comprehend; profound; -- opposed to shallow or superficial; intricate; mysterious; not obvious; obscure; as, a deep subject or plot. Speculations high or deep. Milton. A question deep almost as the mystery of life. De Quincey. O Lord, . . . thy thought are very deep. Ps. xcii. 5. 5. Of penetrating or far-reaching intellect; not superficial; thoroughly skilled; sagacious; cunning. Deep clerks she dumbs. Shak. 6. Profound; thorough; complete; unmixed; intense; heavy; heartfelt; as, deep distress; deep melancholy; deep horror. "Deep despair." Milton. "Deep silence." Milton. "Deep sleep." Gen. ii. 21. "Deeper darkness." Hoole. "Their deep poverty." 2 Cor. viii. 2. An attitude of deep respect. Motley. 7. Strongly colored; dark; intense; not light or thin; as, deep blue or crimson. 8. Of low tone; full-toned; not high or sharp; grave; heavy. "The deep thunder." Byron. The bass of heaven's deep organ. Milton. 9. Muddy; boggy; sandy; -- said of roads. Chaucer. The ways in that vale were very deep. Clarendon. A deep line of operations (Military), a long line. -- Deep mourning (Costume), mourning complete and strongly marked, the garments being not only all black, but also composed of lusterless materials and of such fashion as is identified with mourning garments.  To a great depth; with depth; far down; profoundly; deeply. Deep-versed in books, and shallow in himself. Milton. Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian spring. Pope. Note: Deep, in its usual adverbial senses, is often prefixed to an adjective; as, deep-chested, deep-cut, deep-seated, deep-toned, deep- voiced, "deep-uddered kine."  1. That which is deep, especially deep water, as the sea or ocean; an abyss; a great depth. Courage from the deeps of knowledge springs. Cowley. The hollow deep of hell resounded. Milton. Blue Neptune storms, the bellowing deeps resound. Pope. 2. That which is profound, not easily fathomed, or incomprehensible; a moral or spiritual depth or abyss. Thy judgments are a great. Ps. xxxvi. 6. Deep of night, the most quiet or profound part of night; dead of night. The deep of night is crept upon our talk. Shak.
nothing: 1. Not anything; no thing (in the widest sense of the word thing); -- opposed to Ant: anything and Ant: something. Yet had his aspect nothing of severe. Dryden. 2. Nonexistence; nonentity; absence of being; nihility; nothingness. Shak. 3. A thing of no account, value, or note; something irrelevant and impertinent; something of comparative unimportance; utter insignificance; a trifle. Behold, ye are of nothing, and your work of nought. Is. xli. 24. 'T is nothing, says the fool; but, says the friend, This nothing, sir, will bring you to your end. Dryden. 4. (Arith.)  A cipher; naught. Nothing but, only; no more than. Chaucer. -- To make nothing of. (a) To make no difficulty of; to consider as trifling or important. "We are industrious to preserve our bodies from slavery, but we make nothing of suffering our souls to be slaves to our lusts." Ray. (b) Not to understand; as, I could make nothing of what he said.  In no degree; not at all; in no wise. Adam, with such counsel nothing swayed. Milton. The influence of reason in producing our passions is nothing near so extensive as is commonly believed. Burke. Nothing off (Naut.), an order to the steersman to keep the vessel close to the wind.
coat: 1. An outer garment fitting the upper part of the body; especially, such a garment worn by men. Let each His adamantine coat gird well. Milton. 2. A petticoat. [Obs.] "A child in coats." Locke. 3. The habit or vesture of an order of men, indicating the order or office; cloth. Men of his coat should be minding their prayers. Swift. She was sought by spirits of richest coat. Shak. 4. An external covering like a garment, as fur, skin, wool, husk, or bark; as, the horses coats were sleek. Fruit of all kinds, in coat Rough or smooth rined, or bearded husk, or shell. Milton. 5. A layer of any substance covering another; a cover; a tegument; as, the coats of the eye; the coats of an onion; a coat of tar or varnish. 6. Same as Coat of arms. See below. Hark, countrymen! either renew the fight, Or tear the lions out of England's coat. Shak. 7. A coat card. See below. [Obs.] Here's a trick of discarded cards of us! We were ranked with coats as long as old master lived. Massinger. Coat armor. See under Armor. -- Coat of arms (Her.), a translation of the French cotte d'armes, a garment of light material worn over the armor in the 15th and 16th centuries. This was often charged with the heraldic bearings of the wearer. Hence, an heraldic achievement; the bearings of any person, taken together. -- Coat card, a card bearing a coated figure; the king, queen, or knave of playing cards. "`I am a coat card indeed.' `Then thou must needs be a knave, for thou art neither king nor queen.'" Rowley. -- Coat link, a pair of buttons or studs joined by a link, to hold together the lappels of a double-breasted coat; or a button with a loop for a single-breasted coat. -- Coat of mail, a defensive garment of chain mail. See Chain mail, under Chain. -- Mast coat (Naut.), a piece of canvas nailed around a mast, where it passes through the deck, to prevent water from getting below. -- Sail coat (Naut.), a canvas cover laced over furled sails, and the like, to keep them dry and clean.  1. To cover with a coat or outer garment. 2. To cover with a layer of any substance; as, to coat a jar with tin foil; to coat a ceiling.
length: 1. The longest, or longer, dimension of any object, in distinction from breadth or width; extent of anything from end to end; the longest line which can be drawn through a body, parallel to its sides; as, the length of a church, or of a ship; the length of a rope or line. 2. A portion of space or of time considered as measured by its length; -- often in the plural. Large lengths of seas and shores. Shak. The future but a length behind the past. Dryden. 3. The quality or state of being long, in space or time; extent; duration; as, some sea birds are remarkable for the length of their wings; he was tired by the length of the sermon, and the length of his walk. 4. A single piece or subdivision of a series, or of a number of long pieces which may be connected together; as, a length of pipe; a length of fence. 5. Detail or amplification; unfolding; continuance as, to pursue a subject to a great length. May Heaven, great monarch, still augment your bliss. With length of days and every day like this. Dryden. 6. Distance.[Obs.] He had marched to the length of Exeter. Clarendon. At length. (a) At or in the full extent; without abbreviation; as, let the name be inserted at length. (b) At the end or conclusion; after a long period. See Syn. of At last, under Last. -- At arm's length. See under Arm.  To lengthen. [Obs.] Shak.
your: The form of the possessive case of the personal pronoun you. Note: The possessive takes the form yours when the noun to which it refers is not expressed, but implied; as, this book is yours. "An old fellow of yours." Chaucer.
slip: 1. To move along the surface of a thing without bounding, rolling, or stepping; to slide; to glide. 2. To slide; to lose one's footing or one's hold; not to tread firmly; as, it is necessary to walk carefully lest the foot should slip. 3. To move or fly (out of place); to shoot; -- often with out, off, etc.; as, a bone may slip out of its place. 4. To depart, withdraw, enter, appear, intrude, or escape as if by sliding; to go or come in a quiet, furtive manner; as, some errors slipped into the work. Thus one tradesman slips away, To give his partner fairer play. Prior. Thrice the flitting shadow slipped away. Dryden. 5. To err; to fall into error or fault. There is one that slippeth in his speech, but not from his heart. Ecclus. xix. 16. To let slip, to loose from the slip or noose, as a hound; to allow to escape. Cry, "Havoc," and let slip the dogs of war. Shak.  1. To cause to move smoothly and quickly; to slide; to convey gently or secretly. He tried to slip a powder into her drink. Arbuthnot. 2. To omit; to loose by negligence. And slip no advantage That my secure you. B. Jonson. 3. To cut slips from; to cut; to take off; to make a slip or slips of; as, to slip a piece of cloth or paper. The branches also may be slipped and planted. Mortimer. 4. To let loose in pursuit of game, as a greyhound. Lucento slipped me like his greyhound. Shak. 5. To cause to slip or slide off, or out of place; as, a horse slips his bridle; a dog slips his collar. 6. To bring forth (young) prematurely; to slink. To slip a cable. (Naut.) See under Cable. -- To slip off, to take off quickly; as, to slip off a coat. -- To slip on, to put on in haste or loosely; as, to slip on a gown or coat.  1. The act of slipping; as, a slip on the ice. 2. An unintentional error or fault; a false step. This good man's slip mended his pace to martyrdom. Fuller. 3. A twig separated from the main stock; a cutting; a scion; hence, a descendant; as, a slip from a vine. A native slip to us from foreign seeds. Shak. The girlish slip of a Sicilian bride. R. Browning. 4. A slender piece; a strip; as, a slip of paper. Moonlit slips of silver cloud. Tennyson. A thin slip of a girl, like a new moon Sure to be rounded into beauty soon. Longfellow. 5. A leash or string by which a dog is held; -- so called from its being made in such a manner as to slip, or become loose, by relaxation of the hand. We stalked over the extensive plains with Killbuck and Lena in the slips, in search of deer. Sir S. Baker. 6. An escape; a secret or unexpected desertion; as, to give one the slip. Shak. 7. (Print.)  A portion of the columns of a newspaper or other work struck off by itself; a proof from a column of type when set up and in the galley. 8. Any covering easily slipped on. Specifically: (a) A loose garment worn by a woman. (b) A child's pinafore. (c) An outside covering or case; as, a pillow slip. (d) The slip or sheath of a sword, and the like. [R.] 9. A counterfeit piece of money, being brass covered with silver. [Obs.] Shak 10. Matter found in troughs of grindstones after the grinding of edge tools. [Prov. Eng.] Sir W. Petty. 11. Potter's clay in a very liquid state, used for the decoration of ceramic ware, and also as a cement for handless and other applied parts. 12. A particular quantity of yarn. [Prov. Eng.] 13. An inclined plane on which a vessel is built, or upon which it is hauled for repair. 14. An opening or space for vessels to lie in, between wharves or in a dock; as, Peck slip. [U. S.] 15. A narrow passage between buildings. [Eng.] 16. A long seat or narrow pew in churches, often without a door. [U. S.] 17. (Mining.)  A dislocation of a lead, destroying continuity. Knight. 18. (Engin.)  The motion of the center of resistance of the float of a paddle wheel, or the blade of an oar, through the water horozontally, or the difference between a vessel's actual speed and the speed which she would have if the propelling instrument acted upon a solid; also, the velocity, relatively to still water, of the backward current of water produced by the propeller. 19. (Zoöl.)  A fish, the sole. 20. (Cricket)  A fielder stationed on the off side and to the rear of the batsman. There are usually two of them, called respectively short slip, and long slip. To give one the slip, to slip away from one; to elude one. -- Slip dock. See under Dock. -- Slip link (Mach.), a connecting link so arranged as to allow some play of the parts, to avoid concussion. -- Slip rope (Naut.), a rope by which a cable is secured preparatory to slipping. Totten. -- Slip stopper (Naut.), an arrangement for letting go the anchor suddenly.
near: 1. At a little distance, in place, time, manner, or degree; not remote; nigh. My wife! my traitress! let her not come near me. Milton. 2. Nearly; almost; well-nigh. "Near twenty years ago." Shak. "Near a fortnight ago." Addison. Near about the yearly value of the land. Locke. 3. Closely; intimately. Shak. Far and near, at a distance and close by; throughout a whole region. -- To come near to, to want but little of; to approximate to. "Such a sum he found would go near to ruin him." Addison. -- Near the wind (Naut.), close to the wind; closehauled.  1. Not far distant in time, place, or degree; not remote; close at hand; adjacent; neighboring; nigh. "As one near death." Shak. He served great Hector, and was ever near, Not with his trumpet only, but his spear. Dryden. 2. Closely connected or related. She is thy father's near kinswoman. Lev. xviii. 12. 3. Close to one's interests, affection, etc.; touching, or affecting intimately; intimate; dear; as, a near friend. 4. Close to anything followed or imitated; not free, loose, or rambling; as, a version near to the original. 5. So as barely to avoid or pass injury or loss; close; narrow; as, a near escape. 6. Next to the driver, when he is on foot; in the Unted States, on the left of an animal or a team; as, the near ox; the near leg. See Off side, under Off, a. 7. Immediate; direct; close; short. "The nearest way." Milton. 8. Close-fisted; parsimonious. [Obs. or Low, Eng.] Note: Near may properly be followed by to before the thing approached'; but more frequently to is omitted, and the adjective or the adverb is regarded as a preposition. The same is also true of the word nigh. Syn. -- Nigh; close; adjacent; proximate; contiguous; present; ready; intimate; dear.  Adjacent to; close by; not far from; nigh; as, the ship sailed near the land. See the Note under near, a.  To approach; to come nearer; as, the ship neared the land.  To draw near; to approach. A speck, a mist, a shape, I wist! And still it neared, and neared. Coleridge.
practice: 1. Frequently repeated or customary action; habitual performance; a succession of acts of a similar kind; usage; habit; custom; as, the practice of rising early; the practice of making regular entries of accounts; the practice of daily exercise. A heart . . . exercised with covetous practices. 2 Pet. ii. 14. 2. Customary or constant use; state of being used. Obsolete words may be revived when they are more sounding or more significant than those in practice. Dryden. 3. Skill or dexterity acquired by use; expertness. [R.] "His nice fence and his active practice." Shak. 4. Actual performance; application of knowledge; -- opposed to theory. There are two functions of the soul, -- contemplation and practice. South. There is a distinction, but no opposition, between theory and practice; each, to a certain extent, supposes the other; theory is dependent on practice; practice must have preceded theory. Sir W. Hamilton. 5. Systematic exercise for instruction or discipline; as, the troops are called out for practice; she neglected practice in music. 6. Application of science to the wants of men; the exercise of any profession; professional business; as, the practice of medicine or law; a large or lucrative practice. Practice is exercise of an art, or the application of a science in life, which application is itself an art. Sir W. Hamilton. 7. Skillful or artful management; dexterity in contrivance or the use of means; art; stratagem; artifice; plot; -- usually in a bad sense. [Obs.] Bacon. He sought to have that by practice which he could not by prayer. Sir P. Sidney. 8. (Math.)  A easy and concise method of applying the rules of arithmetic to questions which occur in trade and business. 9. (Law)  The form, manner, and order of conducting and carrying on suits and prosecutions through their various stages, according to the principles of law and the rules laid down by the courts. Bouvier. Syn. -- Custom; usage; habit; manner.  1. To do or perform frequently, customarily, or habitually; to make a practice of; as, to practice gaming. "Incline not my heart . . . practice wicked works." Ps. cxli. 4. 2. To exercise, or follow, as a profession, trade, art, etc., as, to practice law or medicine. 2. To exercise one's self in, for instruction or improvement, or to acquire discipline or dexterity; as, to practice gunnery; to practice music. 4. To put into practice; to carry out; to act upon; to commit; to execute; to do. "Aught but Talbot's shadow whereon to practice your severity." Shak. As this advice ye practice or neglect. Pope. 5. To make use of; to employ. [Obs.] In malice to this good knight's wife, I practiced Ubaldo and Ricardo to corrupt her. Massinger. 6. To teach or accustom by practice; to train. In church they are taught to love God; after church they are practiced to love their neighbor. Landor.  1. To perform certain acts frequently or customarily, either for instruction, profit, or amusement; as, to practice with the broadsword or with the rifle; to practice on the piano. practise 2. To learn by practice; to form a habit. They shall practice how to live secure. Milton. Practice first over yourself to reign. Waller. 3. To try artifices or stratagems. He will practice against thee by poison. Shak. 4. To apply theoretical science or knowledge, esp. by way of experiment; to exercise or pursue an employment or profession, esp. that of medicine or of law. [I am] little inclined to practice on others, and as little that others should practice on me. Sir W. Temple.
card: 1. A piece of pasteboard, or thick paper, blank or prepared for various uses; as, a playing card; a visiting card; a card of invitation; pl. a game played with cards. Our first cards were to Carabas House. Thackeray. 2. A published note, containing a brief statement, explanation, request, expression of thanks, or the like; as, to put a card in the newspapers. Also, a printed programme, and (fig.), an attraction or inducement; as, this will be a good card for the last day of the fair. 3. A paper on which the points of the compass are marked; the dial or face of the mariner's compass. All the quartere that they know I' the shipman's card. Shak. 4. (Weaving)  A perforated pasteboard or sheet-metal plate for warp threads, making part of the Jacquard apparatus of a loom. See Jacquard. 5. An indicator card. See under Indicator. Business card, a card on which is printed an advertisement or business address. -- Card basket (a) A basket to hold visiting cards left by callers. (b) A basket made of cardboard. -- Card catalogue. See Catalogue. -- Card rack, a rack or frame for holding and displaying business or visiting card. -- Card table, a table for use inplaying cards, esp. one having a leaf which folds over. -- On the cards, likely to happen; foretold and expected but not yet brought to pass; -- a phrase of fortune tellers that has come into common use; also, according to the programme. -- Playing card, cards used in playing games; specifically, the cards cards used playing which and other games of chance, and having each pack divided onto four kinds or suits called hearts, diamonds, clubs, and spades. The full or whist pack contains fifty-two cards. -- To have the cards in one's own hands, to have the winning cards; to have the means of success in an undertaking. -- To play one's cards well, to make no errors; to act shrewdly. -- To play snow one's cards, to expose one's plants to rivals or foes. -- To speak by the card, to speak from information and definitely, not by guess as in telling a ship's bearing by the compass card. -- Visiting card, a small card bearing the name, and sometimes the address, of the person presenting it.  To play at cards; to game. Johnson.  1. An instrument for disentangling and arranging the fibers of cotton, wool, flax, etc.; or for cleaning and smoothing the hair of animals; -- usually consisting of bent wire teeth set closely in rows in a thick piece of leather fastened to a back. 2. A roll or sliver of fiber (as of wool) delivered from a carding machine. Card clothing, strips of wire-toothed card used for covering the cylinders of carding machines.  1. To comb with a card; to cleanse or disentangle by carding; as, to card wool; to card a horse. These card the short comb the longer flakes. Dyer. 2. To clean or clear, as if by using a card. [Obs.] This book [must] be carded and purged. T. Shelton. 3. To mix or mingle, as with an inferior or weaker article. [Obs.] You card your beer, if you guests being to be drunk. -- half small, half strong. Greene. Note: In the manufacture of wool, cotton, etc., the process of carding disentangles and collects together all the fibers, of whatever length, and thus differs from combing, in which the longer fibers only are collected, while the short straple is combed away. See Combing.
car: 1. A small vehicle moved on wheels; usually, one having but two wheels and drawn by one horse; a cart. 2. A vehicle adapted to the rails of a railroad. [U. S.] Note: In England a railroad passenger car is called a railway carriage; a freight car a goods wagon; a platform car a goods truck; a baggage car a van. But styles of car introduced into England from America are called cars; as, tram car. Pullman car. See Train. 3. A chariot of war or of triumph; a vehicle of splendor, dignity, or solemnity. [Poetic]. The gilded car of day. Milton. The towering car, the sable steeds. Tennyson. 4. (Astron.)  The stars also called Charles's Wain, the Great Bear, or the Dipper. The Pleiads, Hyads, and the Northern Car. Dryden. 5. The cage of a lift or elevator. 6. The basket, box, or cage suspended from a ballon to contain passengers, ballast, etc. 7. A floating perforated box for living fish. [U. S.] Car coupling, or Car coupler, a shackle or other device for connecting the cars in a railway train. [U. S.] -- Dummy car (Railroad), a car containing its own steam power or locomotive. -- Freight car (Railrood), a car for the transportation of merchandise or other goods. [U. S.] -- Hand car (Railroad), a small car propelled by hand, used by railroad laborers, etc. [U. S.] -- Horse car, or Street car, an ommibus car, draw by horses or other power upon rails laid in the streets. [U. S.] -- Palace car, Drawing- room car, Sleeping car, Parior caretc. , (Railroad), cars especially designed and furnished for the comfort of travelers.
string: 1. A small cord, a line, a twine, or a slender strip of leather, or other substance, used for binding together, fastening, or tying things; a cord, larger than a thread and smaller than a rope; as, a shoe string; a bonnet string; a silken string. Shak. Round Ormond's knee thou tiest the mystic string. Prior. 2. A thread or cord on which a number of objects or parts are strung or arranged in close and orderly succession; hence, a line or series of things arranged on a thread, or as if so arranged; a succession; a concatenation; a chain; as, a string of shells or beads; a string of dried apples; a string of houses; a string of arguments. "A string of islands." Gibbon. 3. A strip, as of leather, by which the covers of a book are held together. Milton. 4. The cord of a musical instrument, as of a piano, harp, or violin; specifically (pl.), the stringed instruments of an orchestra, in distinction from the wind instruments; as, the strings took up the theme. "An instrument of ten strings." Ps. xxx. iii. 2. Me softer airs befit, and softer strings Of lute, or viol still. Milton. 5. The line or cord of a bow. Ps. xi. 2. He twangs the grieving string. Pope. 6. A fiber, as of a plant; a little, fibrous root. Duckweed putteth forth a little string into the water, from the bottom. Bacon. 7. A nerve or tendon of an animal body. The string of his tongue was loosed. Mark vii. 35. 8. (Shipbuilding)  An inside range of ceiling planks, corresponding to the sheer strake on the outside and bolted to it. 9. (Bot.)  The tough fibrous substance that unites the valves of the pericap of leguminous plants, and which is readily pulled off; as, the strings of beans. 10. (Mining)  A small, filamentous ramification of a metallic vein. Ure. 11. (Arch.)  Same as Stringcourse. 12. (Billiards)  The points made in a game. String band (Mus.), a band of musicians using only, or chiefly, stringed instruments. -- String beans. (a) A dish prepared from the unripe pods of several kinds of beans; -- so called because the strings are stripped off. (b) Any kind of beans in which the pods are used for cooking before the seeds are ripe; usually, the low bush bean. -- To have two strings to one's bow, to have a means or expedient in reserve in case the one employed fails.  1. To furnish with strings; as, to string a violin. Has not wise nature strung the legs and feet With firmest nerves, designed to walk the street Gay. 2. To put in tune the strings of, as a stringed instrument, in order to play upon it. For here the Muse so oft her harp has strung, That not a mountain rears its head unsung. Addison. 3. To put on a string; to file; as, to string beads. 4. To make tense; to strengthen. Toil strung the nerves, and purified the blood. Dryden. 5. To deprive of strings; to strip the strings from; as, to string beans. See String, n., 9.
rather: Prior; earlier; former. [Obs.] Now no man dwelleth at the rather town. Sir J. Mandeville.  1. Earlier; sooner; before. [Obs.] Thou shalt, quod he, be rather false than I. Chaucer. A good mean to come the rather to grace. Foxe. 2. More readily or willingly; preferably. My soul chooseth . . . death rather than my life. Job vii. 15. 3. On the other hand; to the contrary of what was said or suggested; instead. Was nothing bettered, but rather grew worse. Mark v. 26. 4. Of two alternatives conceived of, by preference to, or as more likely than, the other; somewhat. He sought throughout the world, but sought in vain, And nowhere finding, rather feared her slain. Dryden. 5. More properly; more correctly speaking. This is an art Which does mend nature, change it rather, but The art itself is nature. Shak. 6. In some degree; somewhat; as, the day is rather warm; the house is rather damp. The rather, the more so; especially; for better reason; for particular cause. You are come to me in happy time, The rather for I have some sport in hand. Shak. -- Had rather, or Would rather, prefer to; prefers to; as, he had, or would, rather go than stay. "I had rather speak five words with my understanding than ten thousands words in an unknown tongue." 1 Cor. xiv. 19. See Had rather, under Had.
center: 1. A point equally distant from the extremities of a line, figure, or body, or from all parts of the circumference of a circle; the middle point or place. 2. The middle or central portion of anything. 3. A principal or important point of concentration; the nucleus around which things are gathered or to which they tend; an object of attention, action, or force; as, a center of attaction. 4. The earth. [Obs.] Shak. 5. Those members of a legislative assembly (as in France) who support the existing government. They sit in the middle of the legislative chamber, opposite the presiding officer, between the conservatives or monarchists, who sit on the right of the speaker, and the radicals or advanced republicans who occupy the seats on his left, See Right, and Left. 6. (Arch.)  A temporary structure upon which the materials of a vault or arch are supported in position util the work becomes self-supporting. 7. (Mech.) (a) One of the two conical steel pins, in a lathe, etc., upon which the work is held, and about which it revolves. (b) A conical recess, or indentation, in the end of a shaft or other work, to receive the point of a center, on which the work can turn, as in a lathe. Note: In a lathe the live center is in the spindle of the head stock; the dead center is on the tail stock. Planer centers are stocks carrying centers, when the object to be planed must be turned on its axis. Center of an army, the body or troops ossupying the place in the line between the wings. -- Center of a curve or surface (Geom.) (a) A point such that every line drawn through the point and terminated by the curve or surface is bisected at the point. (b) The fixed point of reference in polar coördinates. See Coördinates. -- Center of curvature of a curve (Geom.), the center of that circle which has at any given point of the curve closer contact with the curve than has any other circle whatever. See Circle. -- Center of a fleet, the division or column between the van and rear, or between the weather division and the lee. -- Center of gravity (Mech.), that point of a body about which all its parts can be balanced, or which being supported, the whole body will remain at rest, though acted upon by gravity. -- Center of gyration (Mech.), that point in a rotating body at which the whole mass might be concentrated (theoretically) without altering the resistance of the intertia of the body to angular acceleration or retardaton. -- Center of inertia (Mech.), the center of gravity of a body or system of bodies. -- Center of motion, the point which remains at rest, while all the other parts of a body move round it. -- Center of oscillation, the point at which, if the whole matter of a suspended body were collected, the time of oscillation would be the same as it is in the actual form and state of the body. -- Center of percussion, that point in a body moving about a fixed axis at which it may strike an obstacle without communicating a shock to the axis. -- Center of pressure (Hydros.), that point in a surface pressed by a fluid, at which, if a force equal to the whole pressure and in the same line be applied in a contrary direction, it will balance or counteract the whole pressure of the fluid.  1. To be placed in a center; to be central. 2. To be collected to a point; to be concentrated; to rest on, or gather about, as a center. Where there is no visible truth wherein to center, error is as wide as men's fancies. Dr. H. More. Our hopes must center in ourselves alone. Dryden.  1. To place or fix in the center or on a central point. Milton. 2. To collect to a point; to concentrate. Thy joys are centered all in me alome. Prior. 3. (Mech.)  To form a recess or indentation for the reception of a center.
claim: 1. To ask for, or seek to obtain, by virtue of authority, right, or supposed right; to challenge as a right; to demand as due. 2. To proclaim. [Obs.] Spenser. 3. To call or name. [Obs.] Spenser. 4. To assert; to maintain. [Colloq.]  To be entitled to anything; to deduce a right or title; to have a claim. We must know how the first ruler, from whom any one claims, came by his authority. Locke.  1. A demand of a right or supposed right; a calling on another for something due or supposed to be due; an assertion of a right or fact. 2. A right to claim or demand something; a title to any debt, privilege, or other thing in possession of another; also, a title to anything which another should give or concede to, or confer on, the claimant. "A bar to all claims upon land." Hallam. 3. The thing claimed or demanded; that (as land) to which any one intends to establish a right; as a settler's claim; a miner's claim. [U.S. & Australia] 4. A laoud call. [Obs.] Spenser To lay claim to, to demand as a right. "Doth he lay claim to thine inheritance" Shak.
win: 1. To gain by superiority in competition or contest; to obtain by victory over competitors or rivals; as, to win the prize in a gate; to win money; to win a battle, or to win a country. "This city for to win." Chaucer. "Who thus shall Canaan win." Milton. Thy well-breathed horse Impels the flying car, and wins the course. Dryden. 2. To allure to kindness; to bring to compliance; to gain or obtain, as by solicitation or courtship. Thy virtue wan me; with virtue preserve me. Sir P. Sidney. She is a woman; therefore to be won. Shak. 3. To gain over to one's side or party; to obtain the favor, friendship, or support of; to render friendly or approving; as, to win an enemy; to win a jury. 4. To come to by toil or effort; to reach; to overtake. [Archaic] Even in the porch he him did win. Spenser. And when the stony path began, By which the naked peak they wan, Up flew the snowy ptarmigan. Sir W. Scott. 5. (Mining)  To extract, as ore or coal. Raymond. Syn. -- To gain; get; procure; earn. See Gain.  To gain the victory; to be successful; to triumph; to prevail. Nor is it aught but just That he, who in debate of truth hath won, should win in arms. Milton. To win of, to be conqueror over. [Obs.] Shak. -- To win on or upon. (a) To gain favor or influence with. "You have a softness and beneficence winning on the hearts of others." Dryden. (b) To gain ground on. "The rabble . . . will in time win upon power." Shak.
wrong: imp. of Wring. Wrung. Chaucer.  1. Twisted; wry; as, a wrong nose. [Obs.] Wyclif (Lev. xxi. 19). 2. Not according to the laws of good morals, whether divine or human; not suitable to the highest and best end; not morally right; deviating from rectitude or duty; not just or equitable; not true; not legal; as, a wrong practice; wrong ideas; wrong inclinations and desires. 3. Not fit or suitable to an end or object; not appropriate for an intended use; not according to rule; unsuitable; improper; incorrect; as, to hold a book with the wrong end uppermost; to take the wrong way. I have deceived you both; I have directed you to wrong places. Shak. 4. Not according to truth; not conforming to fact or intent; not right; mistaken; erroneous; as, a wrong statement. 5. Designed to be worn or placed inward; as, the wrong side of a garment or of a piece of cloth. Syn. -- Injurious; unjust; faulty; detrimental; incorrect; erroneous; unfit; unsuitable.  In a wrong manner; not rightly; amiss; morally ill; erroneously; wrongly. Ten censure wrong for one that writes amiss. Pope.  That which is not right. Specifically: (a) Nonconformity or disobedience to lawful authority, divine or human; deviation from duty; -- the opposite of moral Ant: right. When I had wrong and she the right. Chaucer. One spake much of right and wrong. Milton. (b) Deviation or departure from truth or fact; state of falsity; error; as, to be in the wrong. (c) Whatever deviates from moral rectitude; usually, an act that involves evil consequences, as one which inflicts injury on a person; any injury done to, or received from; another; a trespass; a violation of right. Friend, I do thee no wrong. Matt. xx. 18. As the king of England can do no wrong, so neither can he do right but in his courts and by his courts. Milton. The obligation to redress a wrong is at least as binding as that of paying a debt. E. Evereth. Note: Wrongs, legally, are private or public. Private wrongs are civil injuries, immediately affecting individuals; public wrongs are crimes and misdemeanors which affect the community. Blackstone.  1. To treat with injustice; to deprive of some right, or to withhold some act of justice from; to do undeserved harm to; to deal unjustly with; to injure. He that sinneth . . . wrongeth his own soul. Prov. viii. 36. 2. To impute evil to unjustly; as, if you suppose me capable of a base act, you wrong me. I rather choose To wrong the dead, to wrong myself and you, Than I will wrong such honorable men. Shak.
bird: 1. Orig., a chicken; the young of a fowl; a young eaglet; a nestling; and hence, a feathered flying animal (see 2). That ungentle gull, the cuckoo's bird. Shak. The brydds [birds] of the aier have nestes. Tyndale (Matt. viii. 20). 2. (Zoöl.)  A warm-blooded, feathered vertebrate provided with wings. See Aves. 3. Specifically, among sportsmen, a game bird. 4. Fig.: A girl; a maiden. And by my word! the bonny bird In danger shall not tarry. Campbell. Arabian bird, the phenix. -- Bird of Jove, the eagle. -- Bird of Juno, the peacock. -- Bird louse (Zoöl.), a wingless insect of the group Mallophaga, of which the genera and species are very numerous and mostly parasitic upon birds. -- Bird mite (Zoöl.), a small mite (genera Dermanyssus, Dermaleichus and allies) parasitic upon birds. The species are numerous. -- Bird of passage, a migratory bird. -- Bird spider (Zoöl.), a very large South American spider (Mygale avicularia). It is said sometimes to capture and kill small birds. -- Bird tick (Zoöl.), a dipterous insect parasitic upon birds (genus Ornithomyia, and allies), usually winged.  1. To catch or shoot birds. 2. Hence: To seek for game or plunder; to thieve. [R.] B. Jonson.
happy: 1. Favored by hap, luck, or fortune; lucky; fortunate; successful; prosperous; satisfying desire; as, a happy expedient; a happy effort; a happy venture; a happy omen. Chymists have been more happy in finding experiments than the causes of them. Boyle. 2. Experiencing the effect of favorable fortune; having the feeling arising from the consciousness of well-being or of enjoyment; enjoying good of any kind, as peace, tranquillity, comfort; contented; joyous; as, happy hours, happy thoughts. Happy is that people, whose God is the Lord. Ps. cxliv. 15. The learned is happy Nature to explore, The fool is happy that he knows no more. Pope. 3. Dexterous; ready; apt; felicitous. One gentleman is happy at a reply, another excels in a in a rejoinder. Swift. Happy family, a collection of animals of different and hostile propensities living peaceably together in one cage. Used ironically of conventional alliances of persons who are in fact mutually repugnant. -- Happy-go-lucky, trusting to hap or luck; improvident; easy-going. "Happy-go-lucky carelessness." W. Black.
we: The plural nominative case of the pronoun of the first person; the word with which a person in speaking or writing denotes a number or company of which he is one, as the subject of an action expressed by a verb. Note: We is frequently used to express men in general, including the speaker. We is also often used by individuals, as authors, editors, etc., in speaking of themselves, in order to avoid the appearance of egotism in the too frequent repetition of the pronoun I. The plural style is also in use among kings and other sovereigns, and is said to have been begun by King John of England. Before that time, monarchs used the singular number in their edicts. The German and the French sovereigns followed the example of King John in a. d. 1200.
went: imp. & p. p. of Wend; -- now obsolete except as the imperfect of go, with which it has no etymological connection. See Go. To the church both be they went. Chaucer.  Course; way; path; journey; direction. [Obs.] "At a turning of a wente." Chaucer. But here my weary team, nigh overspent, Shall breathe itself awhile after so long a went. Spenser. He knew the diverse went of mortal ways. Spenser.
first: 1. Preceding all others of a series or kind; the ordinal of one; earliest; as, the first day of a month; the first year of a reign. 2. Foremost; in front of, or in advance of, all others. 3. Most eminent or exalted; most excellent; chief; highest; as, Demosthenes was the first orator of Greece. At first blush. See under Blush. -- At first hand, from the first or original source; without the intervention of any agent. It is the intention of the person to reveal it at first hand, by way of mouth, to yourself. Dickens. -- First coat (Plastering), the solid foundation of coarse stuff, on which the rest is placed; it is thick, and crossed with lines, so as to give a bond for the next coat. -- First day, Sunday; -- so called by the Friends. -- First floor. (a) The ground floor. [U.S.] (b) The floor next above the ground floor. [Eng.] -- First fruit or fruits. (a) The fruits of the season earliest gathered. (b) (Feudal Law) One year's profits of lands belonging to the king on the death of a tenant who held directly from him. (c) (Eng. Eccl. Law) The first year's whole profits of a benefice or spiritual living. (d) The earliest effects or results. See, Father, what first fruits on earth are sprung From thy implanted grace in man! Milton. -- First mate, an officer in a merchant vessel next in rank to the captain. -- First name, same as Christian name. See under Name, n. -- First officer (Naut.), in the merchant service, same as First mate (above). -- First sergeant (Mil.), the ranking non-commissioned officer in a company; the orderly sergeant. Farrow. -- First watch (Naut.), the watch from eight to twelve at midnight; also, the men on duty during that time. -- First water, the highest quality or purest luster; -- said of gems, especially of diamond and pearls. Syn. -- Primary; primordial; primitive; primeval; pristine; highest; chief; principal; foremost.  Before any other person or thing in time, space, rank, etc.; -- much used in composition with adjectives and participles. Adam was first formed, then Eve. 1 Tim. ii. 13. At first, At the first, at the beginning or origin. -- First or last, at one time or another; at the beginning or end. And all are fools and lovers first or last. Dryden.  The upper part of a duet, trio, etc., either vocal or instrumental; -- so called because it generally expresses the air, and has a preëminence in the combined effect.
hundred: 1. The product of ten mulitplied by ten, or the number of ten times ten; a collection or sum, consisting of ten times ten units or objects; five score. Also, a symbol representing one hundred units, as 100 or C. With many hundreds treading on his heels. Shak. Note: The word hundred, as well as thousand, million, etc., often takes a plural form. We may say hundreds, or many hundreds, meaning individual objects or units, but with an ordinal numeral adjective in constructions like five hundreds, or eight hundreds, it is usually intended to consider each hundred as a separate aggregate; as, ten hundreds are one thousand. 2. A division of a country in England, supposed to have originally contained a hundred families, or freemen. Hundred court, a court held for all the inhabitants of a hundred. [Eng.] Blackstone.  Ten times ten; five score; as, a hundred dollars.
spring: 1. To leap; to bound; to jump. The mountain stag that springs From height to height, and bounds along the plains. Philips. 2. To issue with speed and violence; to move with activity; to dart; to shoot. And sudden light Sprung through the vaulted roof. Dryden. 3. To start or rise suddenly, as from a covert. Watchful as fowlers when their game will spring. Otway. 4. To fly back; as, a bow, when bent, springs back by its elastic power. 5. To bend from a straight direction or plane surface; to become warped; as, a piece of timber, or a plank, sometimes springs in seasoning. 6. To shoot up, out, or forth; to come to the light; to begin to appear; to emerge; as a plant from its seed, as streams from their source, and the like; -often followed by up, forth, or out. Till well nigh the day began to spring. Chaucer. To satisfy the desolate and waste ground, and to cause the bud of the tender herb to spring forth. Job xxxviii. 27. Do not blast my springing hopes. Rowe. O, spring to light; auspicious Babe, be born. Pope. 7. To issue or proceed, as from a parent or ancestor; to result, as from a cause, motive, reason, or principle. [They found] new hope to spring Out of despair, joy, but with fear yet linked. Milton. 8. To grow; to prosper. What makes all this, but Jupiter the king, At whose command we perish, and we spring Dryden. To spring at, to leap toward; to attempt to reach by a leap. -- To spring forth, to leap out; to rush out. -- To spring in, to rush in; to enter with a leap or in haste. -- To spring on or upon, to leap on; to rush on with haste or violence; to assault.  1. To cause to spring up; to start or rouse, as game; to cause to rise from the earth, or from a covert; as, to spring a pheasant. 2. To produce or disclose suddenly or unexpectedly. She starts, and leaves her bed, amd springs a light. Dryden. The friends to the cause sprang a new project. Swift. 3. To cause to explode; as, to spring a mine. 4. To crack or split; to bend or strain so as to weaken; as, to spring a mast or a yard. 5. To cause to close suddenly, as the parts of a trap operated by a spring; as, to spring a trap. 6. To bend by force, as something stiff or strong; to force or put by bending, as a beam into its sockets, and allowing it to straighten when in place; -- often with in, out, etc.; as, to spring in a slat or a bar. 7. To pass over by leaping; as, to spring a fence. To spring a butt (Naut.), to loosen the end of a plank in a ship's bottom. -- To spring a leak (Naut.), to begin to leak. -- To spring an arch (Arch.), to build an arch; -- a common term among masons; as, to spring an arcg over a lintel. -- To spring a rattle, to cause a rattle to sound. See Watchman's rattle, under Watchman. -- To spring the luff (Naut.), to ease the helm, and sail nearer to the wind than before; -- said of a vessel. Mar. Dict. -- To spring a mast or spar (Naut.), to strain it so that it is unserviceable.  1. A leap; a bound; a jump. The prisoner, with a spring, from prison broke. Dryden. 2. A flying back; the resilience of a body recovering its former state by elasticity; as, the spring of a bow. 3. Elastic power or force. Heavens! what a spring was in his arm! Dryden. 4. An elastic body of any kind, as steel, India rubber, tough wood, or compressed air, used for various mechanical purposes, as receiving and imparting power, diminishing concussion, regulating motion, measuring weight or other force. Note: The principal varieties of springs used in mechanisms are the spiral spring (Fig. a), the coil spring (Fig. b), the elliptic spring (Fig. c), the half-elliptic spring (Fig. d), the volute spring, the India-rubber spring, the atmospheric spring, etc. 5. Any source of supply; especially, the source from which a stream proceeds; as issue of water from the earth; a natural fountain. "All my springs are in thee." Ps. lxxxvii. 7. "A secret spring of spiritual joy." Bentley. "The sacred spring whence and honor streams." red rose of the House of Lancaster. Sir J. Davies. 6. Any active power; that by which action, or motion, is produced or propagated; cause; origin; motive. Our author shuns by vulgar springs to move The hero's glory, or the virgin's love. Pope. 7. That which springs, or is originated, from a source; as: (a) A race; lineage. [Obs.] Chapman. (b) A youth; a springal. [Obs.] Spenser. (c) A shoot; a plant; a young tree; also, a grove of trees; woodland. [Obs.] Spenser. Milton. 8. That which causes one to spring; specifically, a lively tune. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl. 9. The season of the year when plants begin to vegetate and grow; the vernal season, usually comprehending the months of March, April, and May, in the middle latitudes north of the equator. "The green lap of the new-come spring." Shak. Note: Spring of the astronomical year begins with the vernal equinox, about March 21st, and ends with the summer solstice, about June 21st. 10. The time of growth and progress; early portion; first stage. "The spring of the day." 1 Sam. ix. 26. O how this spring of love resembleth The uncertain glory of an April day. Shak. 11. (Naut.) (a) A crack or fissure in a mast or yard, running obliquely or transversely. (b) A line led from a vessel's quarter to her cable so that by tightening or slacking it she can be made to lie in any desired position; a line led diagonally from the bow or stern of a vessel to some point upon the wharf to which she is moored. Air spring, Boiling spring, etc. See under Air, Boiling, etc. -- Spring back (Bookbinding), a back with a curved piece of thin sheet iron or of stiff pasteboard fastened to the inside, the effect of which is to make the leaves of a book thus bound (as a ledger or other account or blank book) spring up and lie flat. -- Spring balance, a contrivance for measuring weight or force by the elasticity of a spiral spring of steel. -- Spring beam, a beam that supports the side of a paddle box. See Paddle beam, under Paddle, n. -- Spring beauty. (a) (Bot.) Any plant of the genus Claytonia, delicate herbs with somewhat fleshy leaves and pretty blossoms, appearing in springtime. (b) (Zoöl.) A small, elegant American butterfly (Erora læta) which appears in spring. The hind wings of the male are brown, bordered with deep blue; those of the female are mostly blue. -- Spring bed, a mattress, under bed, or bed bottom, in which springs, as of metal, are employed to give the required elasticity. -- Spring beetle (Zoöl.), a snapping beetle; an elater. -- Spring box, the box or barrel in a watch, or other piece of mechanism, in which the spring is contained. -- Spring fly (Zoöl.), a caddice fly; -- so called because it appears in the spring. -- Spring grass (Bot.), a vernal grass. See under Vernal. -- Spring gun, a firearm disharged by a spring, when this is trodden upon or is otherwise moved. -- Spring hook (Locomotive Engines), one of the hooks which fix the driving-wheel spring to the frame. -- Spring latch, a latch that fastens with a spring. -- Spring lock, a lock that fastens with a spring. -- Spring mattress, a spring bed. -- Spring of an arch (Arch.) See Springing line of an arch, under Springing. -- Spring of pork, the lower part of a fore quarter, which is divided from the neck, and has the leg and foot without the shoulder. [Obs.] Nares. Sir, pray hand the spring of pork to me. Gayton. -- Spring pin (Locomotive Engines), an iron rod fitted between the springs and the axle boxes, to sustain and regulate the pressure on the axles. -- Spring rye, a kind of rye sown in the spring; -- in distinction from winter rye, sown in autumn. -- Spring stay (Naut.), a preventer stay, to assist the regular one. R. H. Dana, Jr. -- Spring tide, the tide which happens at, or soon after, the new and the full moon, and which rises higher than common tides. See Tide. -- Spring wagon, a wagon in which springs are interposed between the body and the axles to form elastic supports. -- Spring wheat, any kind of wheat sown in the spring; -- in distinction from winter wheat, which is sown in autumn.
use: 1. The act of employing anything, or of applying it to one's service; the state of being so employed or applied; application; employment; conversion to some purpose; as, the use of a pen in writing; his machines are in general use. Books can never teach the use of books. Bacon. This Davy serves you for good uses. Shak. When he framed All things to man's delightful use. Milton. 2. Occasion or need to employ; necessity; as, to have no further use for a book. Shak. 3. Yielding of service; advantage derived; capability of being used; usefulness; utility. God made two great lights, great for their use To man. Milton. 'T is use alone that sanctifies expense. Pope. 4. Continued or repeated practice; customary employment; usage; custom; manner; habit. Let later age that noble use envy. Spenser. How weary, stale, flat and unprofitable, Seem to me all the uses of this world! Shak. 5. Common occurrence; ordinary experience. [R.] O Cæsar! these things are beyond all use. Shak. 6. (Eccl.)  The special form of ritual adopted for use in any diocese; as, the Sarum, or Canterbury, use; the Hereford use; the York use; the Roman use; etc. From henceforth all the whole realm shall have but one use. Pref. to Book of Common Prayer. 7. The premium paid for the possession and employment of borrowed money; interest; usury. [Obs.] Thou art more obliged to pay duty and tribute, use and principal, to him. Jer. Taylor. 8. Etym: [In this sense probably a corruption of OF. oes, fr. L. opus need, business, employment, work. Cf. Operate.] (Law)  The benefit or profit of lands and tenements. Use imports a trust and confidence reposed in a man for the holding of lands. He to whose use or benefit the trust is intended shall enjoy the profits. An estate is granted and limited to A for the use of B. 9. (Forging)  A stab of iron welded to the side of a forging, as a shaft, near the end, and afterward drawn down, by hammering, so as to lengthen the forging. Contingent, or Springing, use (Law), a use to come into operation on a future uncertain event. -- In use. (a) In employment; in customary practice observance. (b) In heat; -- said especially of mares. J. H. Walsh. -- Of no use, useless; of no advantage. -- Of use, useful; of advantage; profitable. -- Out of use, not in employment. -- Resulting use (Law), a use, which, being limited by the deed, expires or can not vest, and results or returns to him who raised it, after such expiration. -- Secondary, or Shifting, use, a use which, though executed, may change from one to another by circumstances. Blackstone. -- Statute of uses (Eng. Law), the stat. 27 Henry VIII., cap. 10, which transfers uses into possession, or which unites the use and possession. -- To make use of, To put to use, to employ; to derive service from; to use.  1. To make use of; to convert to one's service; to avail one's self of; to employ; to put a purpose; as, to use a plow; to use a chair; to use time; to use flour for food; to use water for irrigation. Launcelot Gobbo, use your legs. Shak. Some other means I have which may be used. Milton. 2. To behave toward; to act with regard to; to treat; as, to use a beast cruelly. "I will use him well." Shak. How wouldst thou use me now Milton. Cato has used me ill. Addison. 3. To practice customarily; to make a practice of; as, to use diligence in business. Use hospitality one to another. 1 Pet. iv. 9. 4. To accustom; to habituate; to render familiar by practice; to inure; -- employed chiefly in the passive participle; as, men used to cold and hunger; soldiers used to hardships and danger. I am so used in the fire to blow. Chaucer. Thou with thy compeers, Used to the yoke, draw'st his triumphant wheels. Milton. To use one's self, to behave. [Obs.] "Pray, forgive me, if I have used myself unmannerly." Shak. -- To use up. (a) To consume or exhaust by using; to leave nothing of; as, to use up the supplies. (b) To exhaust; to tire out; to leave no capacity of force or use in; to overthrow; as, he was used up by fatigue. [Colloq.] Syn. -- Employ. -- Use, Employ. We use a thing, or make use of it, when we derive from it some enjoyment or service. We employ it when we turn that service into a particular channel. We use words to express our general meaning; we employ certain technical terms in reference to a given subject. To make use of, implies passivity in the thing; as, to make use of a pen; and hence there is often a material difference between the two words when applied to persons. To speak of "making use of another" generally implies a degrading idea, as if we had used him as a tool; while employ has no such sense. A confidential friend is employed to negotiate; an inferior agent is made use of on an intrigue. I would, my son, that thou wouldst use the power Which thy discretion gives thee, to control And manage all. Cowper. To study nature will thy time employ: Knowledge and innocence are perfect joy. Dryden.  1. To be wont or accustomed; to be in the habit or practice; as, he used to ride daily; -- now disused in the present tense, perhaps because of the similarity in sound, between "use to," and "used to." They use to place him that shall be their captain on a stone. Spenser. Fears use to be represented in an imaginary. Bacon. Thus we use to say, it is the room that smokes, when indeed it is the fire in the room. South. Now Moses used to take the tent and to pitch it without the camp. Ex. xxxiii. 7 (Rev. Ver.) 2. To be accustomed to go; to frequent; to inhabit; to dwell; -- sometimes followed by of. [Obs.] "Where never foot did use." Spenser. He useth every day to a merchant's house. B. Jonson. Ye valleys low, where the mild whispers use Of shades, and wanton winds, and gushing brooks. Milton.
raise: 1. To cause to rise; to bring from a lower to a higher place; to lift upward; to elevate; to heave; as, to raise a stone or weight. Hence, figuratively: -- (a) To bring to a higher condition or situation; to elevate in rank, dignity, and the like; to increase the value or estimation of; to promote; to exalt; to advance; to enhance; as, to raise from a low estate; to raise to office; to raise the price, and the like. This gentleman came to be raised to great titles. Clarendon. The plate pieces of eight were raised three pence in the piece. Sir W. Temple. (b) To increase the strength, vigor, or vehemence of; to excite; to intensify; to invigorate; to heighten; as, to raise the pulse; to raise the voice; to raise the spirits or the courage; to raise the heat of a furnace. (c) To elevate in degree according to some scale; as, to raise the pitch of the voice; to raise the temperature of a room. 2. To cause to rise up, or assume an erect position or posture; to set up; to make upright; as, to raise a mast or flagstaff. Hence: -- (a) To cause to spring up from recumbent position, from a state of quiet, or the like; to awaken; to arouse. They shall not awake, nor be raised out of their sleep. Job xiv. 12. (b) To rouse to action; to stir up; to incite to tumult, struggle, or war; to excite. He commandeth, and raiseth the stormy wind. Ps. cvii. 25. Æneas . . . employs his pains, In parts remote, to raise the Tuscan swains. Dryden. (c) To bring up from the lower world; to call up, as a spirit from the world of spirits; to recall from death; to give life to. Why should it be thought a thing incredible with you, that God should raise the dead Acts xxvi. 8. 3. To cause to arise, grow up, or come into being or to appear; to give to; to originate, produce, cause, effect, or the like. Hence, specifically: -- (a) To form by the accumulation of materials or constituent parts; to build up; to erect; as, to raise a lofty structure, a wall, a heap of stones. I will raise forts against thee. Isa. xxxix. 3. (b) To bring together; to collect; to levy; to get together or obtain for use or service; as, to raise money, troops, and the like. "To raise up a rent." Chaucer. (c) To cause to grow; to procure to be produced, bred, or propagated; to grow; as, to raise corn, barley, hops, etc.; toraise cattle. "He raised sheep." "He raised wheat where none grew before." Johnson's Dict. Note: In some parts of the United States, notably in the Southern States, raise in also commonly applied to the rearing or bringing up of children. I was raised, as they say in Virginia, among the mountains of the North. Paulding. (d) To bring into being; to produce; to cause to arise, come forth, or appear; -- often with up. I will raise them up a prophet from among their brethren, like unto thee. Deut. xviii. 18. God vouchsafes to raise another world From him [Noah], and all his anger to forget. Milton. (e) To give rise to; to set agoing; to occasion; to start; to originate; as, to raise a smile or a blush. Thou shalt not raise a false report. Ex. xxiii. 1. (f) To give vent or utterance to; to utter; to strike up. Soon as the prince appears, they raise a cry. Dryden. (g) To bring to notice; to submit for consideration; as, to raise a point of order; to raise an objection. 4. To cause to rise, as by the effect of leaven; to make light and spongy, as bread. Miss Liddy can dance a jig, and raise paste. Spectator. 5. (Naut.) (a) To cause (the land or any other object) to seem higher by drawing nearer to it; as, to raise Sandy Hook light. (b) To let go; as in the command, Raise tacks and sheets, i. e., Let go tacks and sheets. 6. (Law)  To create or constitute; as, to raise a use that is, to create it. Burrill. To raise a blockade (Mil.), to remove or break up a blockade, either by withdrawing the ships or forces employed in enforcing it, or by driving them away or dispersing them. -- To raise a check, note, bill of exchange, etc., to increase fraudulently its nominal value by changing the writing, figures, or printing in which the sum payable is specified. -- To raise a siege, to relinquish an attempt to take a place by besieging it, or to cause the attempt to be relinquished. -- To raise steam, to produce steam of a required pressure. -- To raise the wind, to procure ready money by some temporary expedient. [Colloq.] -- To raise Cain, or To raise the devil, to cause a great disturbance; to make great trouble. [Slang] Syn. -- To lift; exalt; elevate; erect; originate; cause; produce; grow; heighten; aggravate; excite.
spread: 1. To extend in length and breadth, or in breadth only; to stretch or expand to a broad or broader surface or extent; to open; to unfurl; as, to spread a carpet; to spread a tent or a sail. He bought a parcel of a field where he had spread his tent. Gen. xxxiii. 19. Here the Rhone Hath spread himself a couch. Byron. 2. To extend so as to cover something; to extend to a great or grater extent in every direction; to cause to fill or cover a wide or wider space. Rose, as in a dance, the stately trees, and spread Their branches hung with copious fruit. Milton. 3. To divulge; to publish, as news or fame; to cause to be more extensively known; to disseminate; to make known fully; as, to spread a report; -- often acompanied by abroad. They, when they were departed, spread abroad his fame in all that country. Matt. ix. 31. 4. To propagate; to cause to affect great numbers; as, to spread a disease. 5. To diffuse, as emanations or effluvia; to emit; as, odoriferous plants spread their fragrance. 6. To strew; to scatter over a surface; as, to spread manure; to spread lime on the ground. 7. To prepare; to set and furnish with provisions; as, to spread a table. Boiled the flesh, and spread the board. Tennyson. To sprad cloth, to unfurl sail. [Obs.] Evelyn. Syn. -- To diffuse; propogate; disperse; publish; distribute; scatter; circulate; disseminate; dispense.  1. To extend in length and breadth in all directions, or in breadth only; to be extended or stretched; to expand. Plants, if they spread much, are seldom tall. Bacon. Govrnor Winthrop, and his associates at Charlestown, had for a church a large, spreading tree. B. Trumbull. 2. To be extended by drawing or beating; as, some metals spread with difficulty. 3. To be made known more extensively, as news. 4. To be propagated from one to another; as, the disease spread into all parts of the city. Shak.  1. Extent; compass. I have got a fine spread of improvable land. Addison. 2. Expansion of parts. No flower hath spread like that of the woodbine. Bacon. 3. A cloth used as a cover for a table or a bed. 4. A table, as spread or furnished with a meal; hence, an entertainment of food; a feast. [Colloq.] 5. A privilege which one person buys of another, of demanding certain shares of stock at a certain price, or of delivering the same shares of stock at another price, within a time agreed upon. [Broker's Cant] 6. (Geom.)  An unlimited expanse of discontinuous points.  imp. & p. p. of Spread, v. Spread eagle. (a) An eagle with outspread wings, the national emblem of the United States. (b) The figure of an eagle, with its wings elevated and its legs extended; often met as a device upon military ornaments, and the like. (c) (Her.) An eagle displayed; an eagle with the wings and legs extended on each side of the body, as in the double-headed eagle of Austria and Russia. See Displayed, 2.
man: 1. A human being; -- opposed tobeast. These men went about wide, and man found they none, But fair country, and wild beast many [a] one. R. of Glouc. The king is but a man, as I am; the violet smells to him as it doth to me. Shak. 2. Especially: An adult male person; a grown-up male person, as distinguished from a woman or a child. When I became a man, I put away childish things. I Cor. xiii. 11. Ceneus, a woman once, and once a man. Dryden. 3. The human race; mankind. And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness, and let them have dominion. Gen. i. 26. The proper study of mankind is man. Pope. 4. The male portion of the human race. Woman has, in general, much stronger propensity than man to the discharge of parental duties. Cowper. 5. One possessing in a high degree the distinctive qualities of manhood; one having manly excellence of any kind. Shak. This was the noblest Roman of them all . . . the elements So mixed in him that Nature might stand up And say to all the world "This was a man! Shak. 6. An adult male servant; also, a vassal; a subject. Like master, like man. Old Proverb. The vassal, or tenant, kneeling, ungirt, uncovered, and holding up his hands between those of his lord, professed that he did become his man from that day forth, of life, limb, and earthly honor. Blackstone. 7. A term of familiar address often implying on the part of the speaker some degree of authority, impatience, or haste; as, Come, man, we 've no time to lose ! 8. A married man; a husband; -- correlative to wife. I pronounce that they are man and wife. Book of Com. Prayer. every wife ought to answer for her man. Addison. 9. One, or any one, indefinitely; -- a modified survival of the Saxon use of man, or mon, as an indefinite pronoun. A man can not make him laugh. Shak. A man would expect to find some antiquities; but all they have to show of this nature is an old rostrum of a Roman ship. Addison. 10. One of the piece with which certain games, as chess or draughts, are played. Note: Man is often used as a prefix in composition, or as a separate adjective, its sense being usually self-explaining; as, man child, man eater or maneater, man-eating, man hater or manhater, man-hating, manhunter, man-hunting, mankiller, man-killing, man midwife, man pleaser, man servant, man-shaped, manslayer, manstealer, man- stealing, manthief, man worship, etc. Man is also used as a suffix to denote a person of the male sex having a business which pertains to the thing spoken of in the qualifying part of the compound; ashman, butterman, laundryman, lumberman, milkman, fireman, showman, waterman, woodman. Where the combination is not familiar, or where some specific meaning of the compound is to be avoided, man is used as a separate substantive in the foregoing sense; as, apple man, cloth man, coal man, hardware man, wood man (as distinguished from woodman). Man ape (Zoöl.), a anthropoid ape, as the gorilla. -- Man at arms, a designation of the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries for a soldier fully armed. -- Man engine, a mechanical lift for raising or lowering people through considerable distances; specifically (Mining), a contrivance by which miners ascend or descend in a shaft. It consists of a series of landings in the shaft and an equal number of shelves on a vertical rod which has an up and down motion equal to the distance between the successive landings. A man steps from a landing to a shelf and is lifted or lowered to the next landing, upon which he them steps, and so on, traveling by successive stages. -- Man Friday, a person wholly subservient to the will of another, like Robinson Crusoe's servant Friday. -- Man of straw, a puppet; one who is controlled by others; also, one who is not responsible pecuniarily. -- Man-of-the earth (Bot.), a twining plant (Ipomoea pandurata) with leaves and flowers much like those of the morning-glory, but having an immense tuberous farinaceous root. -- Man of war. (a) A warrior; a soldier. Shak. (b) (Naut.) See in the Vocabulary. -- To be one's own man, to have command of one's self; not to be subject to another.  1. To supply with men; to furnish with a sufficient force or complement of men, as for management, service, defense, or the like; to guard; as, to man a ship, boat, or fort. See how the surly Warwick mans the wall ! Shak. They man their boats, and all their young men arm. Waller. 2. To furnish with strength for action; to prepare for efficiency; to fortify. "Theodosius having manned his soul with proper reflections." Addison. 3. To tame, as a hawk. [R.] Shak. 4. To furnish with a servants. [Obs.] Shak. 5. To wait on as a manservant. [Obs.] Shak. Note: In "Othello," V. ii. 270, the meaning is uncertain, being, perhaps: To point, to aim, or to manage. To man a yard (Naut.), to send men upon a yard, as for furling or reefing a sail. -- To man the yards (Naut.), to station men on the yards as a salute or mark of respect.
build: 1. To erect or construct, as an edifice or fabric of any kind; to form by uniting materials into a regular structure; to fabricate; to make; to raise. Nor aught availed him now To have built in heaven high towers. Milton. 2. To raise or place on a foundation; to form, establish, or produce by using appropriate means. Who builds his hopes in air of your good looks. Shak. 3. To increase and strengthen; to increase the power and stability of; to settle, or establish, and preserve; -- frequently with up; as, to build up one's constitution. I commend you to God, and to the word of his grace, which is able to build you up. Acts xx. 32. Syn. -- To erect; construct; raise; found; frame.  1. To exercise the art, or practice the business, of building. 2. To rest or depend, as on a foundation; to ground one's self or one's hopes or opinions upon something deemed reliable; to rely; as, to build on the opinions or advice of others.  Form or mode of construction; general figure; make; as, the build of a ship.
print: 1. To fix or impress, as a stamp, mark, character, idea, etc., into or upon something. A look will print a thought that never may remove. Surrey. Upon his breastplate he beholds a dint, Which in that field young Edward's sword did print. Sir John Beaumont. Perhaps some footsteps printed in the clay. Roscommon. 2. To stamp something in or upon; to make an impression or mark upon by pressure, or as by pressure. Forth on his fiery steed betimes he rode, That scarcely prints the turf on which he trod. Dryden. 3. Specifically:  To strike off an impression or impressions of, from type, or from stereotype, electrotype, or engraved plates, or the like; in a wider sense, to do the typesetting, presswork, etc., of (a book or other publication); as, to print books, newspapers, pictures; to print an edition of a book. 4. To stamp or impress with colored figures or patterns; as, to print calico. 5. (Photog.)  To take (a copy, a positive picture, etc.), from a negative, a transparent drawing, or the like, by the action of light upon a sensitized surface. Printed goods, textile fabrics printed in patterns, especially cotton cloths, or calicoes.  1. To use or practice the art of typography; to take impressions of letters, figures, or electrotypes, engraved plates, or the like. 2. To publish a book or an article. From the moment he prints, he must except to hear no more truth. Pope.  1. A mark made by impression; a line, character, figure, or indentation, made by the pressure of one thing on another; as, the print of teeth or nails in flesh; the print of the foot in sand or snow. Where print of human feet was never seen. Dryden. 2. A stamp or die for molding or impressing an ornamental design upon an object; as, a butter print. 3. That which receives an impression, as from a stamp or mold; as, a print of butter. 4. Printed letters; the impression taken from type, as to excellence, form, size, etc.; as, small print; large print; this line is in print. 5. That which is produced by printing. Specifically: (a) An impression taken from anything, as from an engraved plate. "The prints which we see of antiquities." Dryden. (b) A printed publication, more especially a newspaper or other periodical. Addison. (c) A printed cloth; a fabric figured by stamping, especially calico or cotton cloth. (d) A photographic copy, or positive picture, on prepared paper, as from a negative, or from a drawing on transparent paper. 6. (Founding)  A core print. See under Core. Blue print, a copy in white lines on a blue ground, of a drawing, plan, tracing, etc., or a positive picture in blue and white, from a negative, produced by photographic printing on peculiarly prepared paper.blueprint for action -- In print. (a) In a printed form; issued from the press; published. Shak. (b) To the letter; with accurateness. "All this I speak in print." Shak. -- Out of print. See under Out. -- Print works, a factory where cloth, as calico, is printed.
die: 1. To pass from an animate to a lifeless state; to cease to live; to suffer a total and irreparable loss of action of the vital functions; to become dead; to expire; to perish; -- said of animals and vegetables; often with of, by, with, from, and rarely for, before the cause or occasion of death; as, to die of disease or hardships; to die by fire or the sword; to die with horror at the thought. To die by the roadside of grief and hunger. Macaulay. She will die from want of care. Tennyson. 2. To suffer death; to lose life. In due time Christ died for the ungodly. Rom. v. 6. 3. To perish in any manner; to cease; to become lost or extinct; to be extinguished. Letting the secret die within his own breast. Spectator. Great deeds can not die. Tennyson. 4. To sink; to faint; to pine; to languish, with weakness, discouragement, love, etc. His heart died within, and he became as a stone. 1 Sam. xxv. 37. The young men acknowledged, in love letters, that they died for Rebecca. Tatler. 5. To become indifferent; to cease to be subject; as, to die to pleasure or to sin. 6. To recede and grow fainter; to become imperceptible; to vanish; -- often with out or away. Blemishes may die away and disappear amidst the brightness. Spectator. 7. (Arch.)  To disappear gradually in another surface, as where moldings are lost in a sloped or curved face. 8. To become vapid, flat, or spiritless, as liquor. To die in the last ditch, to fight till death; to die rather than surrender. "There is one certain way," replied the Prince [William of Orange] " by which I can be sure never to see my country's ruin, -- I will die in the last ditch." Hume (Hist. of Eng. ). -- To die out, to cease gradually; as, the prejudice has died out. Syn. -- To expire; decease; perish; depart; vanish.  1. A small cube, marked on its faces with spots from one to six, and used in playing games by being shaken in a box and thrown from it. See Dice. 2. Any small cubical or square body. Words . . . pasted upon little flat tablets or dies. Watts. 3. That which is, or might be, determined, by a throw of the die; hazard; chance. Such is the die of war. Spenser. 4. (Arch.)  That part of a pedestal included between base and cornice; the dado. 5. (Mach.) (a) A metal or plate (often one of a pair) so cut or shaped as to give a certain desired form to, or impress any desired device on, an object or surface, by pressure or by a blow; used in forging metals, coining, striking up sheet metal, etc. (b) A perforated block, commonly of hardened steel used in connection with a punch, for punching holes, as through plates, or blanks from plates, or for forming cups or capsules, as from sheet metal, by drawing. (c) A hollow internally threaded screw-cutting tool, made in one piece or composed of several parts, for forming screw threads on bolts, etc.; one of the separate parts which make up such a tool. Cutting die (Mech.), a thin, deep steel frame, sharpened to a cutting edge, for cutting out articles from leather, cloth, paper, etc. -- The die is cast, the hazard must be run; the step is taken, and it is too late to draw back; the last chance is taken.
night: 1. That part of the natural day when the sun is beneath the horizon, or the time from sunset to sunrise; esp., the time between dusk and dawn, when there is no light of the sun, but only moonlight, starlight, or artificial light. And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. Gen. i. 5. 2. Hence: (a) Darkness; obscurity; concealment. Nature and nature's laws lay hid in night. Pope. (b) Intellectual and moral darkness; ignorance. (c) A state of affliction; adversity; as, a dreary night of sorrow. (d) The period after the close of life; death. She closed her eyes in everlasting night. Dryden. (e) A lifeless or unenlivened period, as when nature seems to sleep. "Sad winter's night". Spenser. Note: Night is sometimes used, esp. with participles, in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, night-blooming, night- born, night-warbling, etc. Night by night, Night after night, nightly; many nights. So help me God, as I have watched the night, Ay, night by night, in studying good for England. Shak. -- Night bird. (Zoöl.) (a) The moor hen (Gallinula chloropus). (b) The Manx shearwater (Puffinus Anglorum). -- Night blindness. (Med.) See Hemeralopia. -- Night cart, a cart used to remove the contents of privies by night. -- Night churr, (Zoöl.), the nightjar. -- Night crow, a bird that cries in the night. -- Night dog, a dog that hunts in the night, -- used by poachers. -- Night fire. (a) Fire burning in the night. (b) Ignis fatuus; Will-o'-the-wisp; Jask-with-a-lantern. -- Night flyer (Zoöl.), any creature that flies in the night, as some birds and insects. -- night glass, a spyglass constructed to concentrate a large amount of light, so as see objects distinctly at night. Totten. -- Night green, iodine green. -- Night hag, a witch supposed to wander in the night. -- Night hawk (Zoöl.), an American bird (Chordeiles Virginianus), allied to the goatsucker. It hunts the insects on which it feeds toward evening, on the wing, and often, diving down perpendicularly, produces a loud whirring sound, like that of a spinning wheel. Also sometimes applied to the European goatsuckers. It is called also bull bat. -- Night heron (Zoöl.), any one of several species of herons of the genus Nycticorax, found in various parts of the world. The best known species is Nycticorax griseus, or N. nycticorax, of Europe, and the American variety (var. nævius). The yellow-crowned night heron (Nycticorax violaceus) inhabits the Southern States. Called also qua- bird, and squawk. -- Night house, a public house, or inn, which is open at night. -- Night key, a key for unfastening a night latch. -- Night latch, a kind of latch for a door, which is operated from the outside by a key. -- Night monkey (Zoöl.), an owl monkey. -- night moth (Zoöl.), any one of the noctuids. -- Night parrot (Zoöl.), the kakapo. -- Night piece, a painting representing some night scene, as a moonlight effect, or the like. -- Night rail, a loose robe, or garment, worn either as a nightgown, or over the dress at night, or in sickness. [Obs.] -- Night raven (Zoöl.), a bird of ill omen that cries in the night; esp., the bittern. -- Night rule. (a) A tumult, or frolic, in the night; -- as if a corruption, of night revel. [Obs.] (b) Such conduct as generally rules, or prevails, at night. What night rule now about this haunted grove Shak. -- Night sight. (Med.) See Nyctolopia. -- Night snap, a night thief. [Cant] Beau. & Fl. -- Night soil, human excrement; -- so called because in cities it is collected by night and carried away for manure. -- Night spell, a charm against accidents at night. -- Night swallow (Zoöl.), the nightjar. -- Night walk, a walk in the evening or night. -- Night walker. (a) One who walks in his sleep; a somnambulist; a noctambulist. (b) One who roves about in the night for evil purposes; specifically, a prostitute who walks the streets. -- Night walking. (a) Walking in one's sleep; somnambulism; noctambulism. (b) Walking the streets at night with evil designs. -- Night warbler (Zoöl.), the sedge warbler (Acrocephalus phragmitis); -- called also night singer. [prov. Eng.] -- Night watch. (a) A period in the night, as distinguished by the change of watch. (b) A watch, or guard, to aford protection in the night. -- Night watcher, one who watches in the night; especially, one who watches with evil designs. -- Night witch. Same as Night hag, above.
those: The plural of that. See That.
truck: 1. A small wheel, as of a vehicle; specifically (Ord.), a small strong wheel, as of wood or iron, for a gun carriage. 2. A low, wheeled vehicle or barrow for carrying goods, stone, and other heavy articles. Goods were conveyed about the town almost exclusively in trucks drawn by dogs. Macaulay. 3. (Railroad Mach.)  A swiveling carriage, consisting of a frame with one or more pairs of wheels and the necessary boxes, springs, etc., to carry and guide one end of a locomotive or a car; -- sometimes called bogie in England. Trucks usually have four or six wheels. 4. (Naut.) (a) A small wooden cap at the summit of a flagstaff or a masthead, having holes in it for reeving halyards through. (b) A small piece of wood, usually cylindrical or disk-shaped, used for various purposes. 5. A freight car. [Eng.] 6. A frame on low wheels or rollers; -- used for various purposes, as for a movable support for heavy bodies.  To transport on a truck or trucks.  To exchange; to give in exchange; to barter; as, to truck knives for gold dust. We will begin by supposing the international trade to be in form, what it always is in reality, an actual trucking of one commodity against another. J. S. Mill.  To exchange commodities; to barter; to trade; to deal. A master of a ship, who deceived them under color of trucking with them. Palfrey. Despotism itself is obliged to truck and huckster. Burke. To truck and higgle for a private good. Emerson.  1. Exchange of commodities; barter. Hakluyt. 2. Commodities appropriate for barter, or for small trade; small commodities; esp., in the United States, garden vegetables raised for the market. [Colloq.] 3. The practice of paying wages in goods instead of money; -- called also truck system. Garden truck, vegetables raised for market. [Colloq.] [U. S.] -- Truck farming, raising vegetables for market: market gardening. [Colloq. U. S.]
stretch: 1. To reach out; to extend; to put forth. And stretch forth his neck long and small. Chaucer. I in conquest stretched mine arm. Shak. 2. To draw out to the full length; to cause to extend in a straight line; as, to stretch a cord or rope. 3. To cause to extend in breadth; to spread; to expand; as, to stretch cloth; to stretch the wings. 4. To make tense; to tighten; to distend forcibly. The ox hath therefore stretched his yoke in vain. Shak. 5. To draw or pull out to greater length; to strain; as, to stretch a tendon or muscle. Awake, my soul, stretch every nerve. Doddridge. 6. To exaggerate; to extend too far; as, to stretch the truth; to stretch one's credit. They take up, one day, the most violent and stretched prerogative. Burke.  1. To be extended; to be drawn out in length or in breadth, or both; to spread; to reach; as, the iron road stretches across the continent; the lake stretches over fifty square miles. As far as stretcheth any ground. Gower. 2. To extend or spread one's self, or one's limbs; as, the lazy man yawns and stretches. 3. To be extended, or to bear extension, without breaking, as elastic or ductile substances. The inner membrane . . . because it would stretch and yield, remained umbroken. Boyle. 4. To strain the truth; to exaggerate; as, a man apt to stretch in his report of facts. [Obs. or Colloq.] 5. (Naut.)  To sail by the wind under press of canvas; as, the ship stretched to the eastward. Ham. Nav. Encyc. Stretch out, an order to rowers to extend themselves forward in dipping the oar.  1. Act of stretching, or state of being stretched; reach; effort; struggle; strain; as, a stretch of the limbs; a stretch of the imagination. By stretch of arms the distant shore to gain. Dryden. Those put a lawful authority upon the stretch, to the abuse of yower, under the color of prerogative. L'Estrange. 2. A continuous line or surface; a continuous space of time; as, grassy stretches of land. A great stretch of cultivated country. W. Black. But all of them left me a week at a stretch. E. Eggleston. 3. The extent to which anything may be stretched. Quotations, in their utmost stretch, can signify no more than that Luther lay under severe agonies of mind. Atterbury. This is the utmost stretch that nature can. Granville. 4. (Naut.)  The reach or extent of a vessel's progress on one tack; a tack or board. 5. Course; direction; as, the stretch of seams of coal. To be on the stretch, to be obliged to use one's utmost powers. -- Home stretch. See under Home, a.
solve: To explain; to resolve; to unfold; to clear up out to a result or conclusion; as, to solve a doubt; to solve difficulties; to solve a problem. True piety would effectually solve such scruples. South. God shall solve the dark decrees of fate. Tickell. Syn. -- To explain; resolve; unfold; clear up.  A solution; an explanation. [Obs.] Shak.
human: Belonging to man or mankind; having the qualities or attributes of a man; of or pertaining to man or to the race of man; as, a human voice; human shape; human nature; human sacrifices. To err is human; to forgive, divine. Pope.  A human being. [Colloq.] Sprung of humans that inhabit earth. Chapman. We humans often find ourselves in strange position. Prof. Wilson.
little: 1. Small in size or extent; not big; diminutive; -- opposed to big or large; as, a little body; a little animal; a little piece of ground; a little hill; a little distance; a little child. He sought to see Jesus who he was; and could not for the press, because he was little of stature. Luke xix. 3. 2. Short in duration; brief; as, a little sleep. Best him enough: after a little time, I'll beat him too. Shak. 3. Small in quantity or amount; not much; as, a little food; a little air or water. Conceited of their little wisdoms, and doting upon their own fancies. Barrow. 4. Small in dignity, power, or importance; not great; insignificant; contemptible. When thou wast little in thine own sight, wast thou not made the head of the tribes I Sam. xv. 17. 5. Small in force or efficiency; not strong; weak; slight; inconsiderable; as, little attention or exertion;little effort; little care or diligence. By sad experiment I know How little weight my words with thee can find. Milton. 6. Small in extent of views or sympathies; narrow; shallow; contracted; mean; illiberal; ungenerous. The long-necked geese of the world that are ever hissing dispraise, Because their natures are little. Tennyson. Little chief. (Zoöl.) See Chief hare. -- Little finger, the fourth and smallest finger of the hand. -- Little go (Eng. Universities), a public examination about the middle of the course, which as less strict and important than the final one; -- called also smalls. Cf. Great go, under Great. Thackeray. -- Little hours (R. C. Ch.), the offices of prime, tierce, sext, and nones. Vespers and compline are sometimes included. -- Little ones, young children. The men, and the women, and the little ones. Deut. ii. 34.  1. That which is little; a small quantity, amount, space, or the like. Much was in little writ. Dryden. There are many expressions, which carrying with them no clear ideas, are like to remove but little of my ignorance. Locke. 2. A small degree or scale; miniature. " His picture in little." Shak. A little, to or in a small degree; to a limited extent; somewhat; for a short time. " Stay a little." Shak. The painter flattered her a little. Shak. -- By little and little, or Little by little, by slow degrees; piecemeal; gradually.  In a small quantity or degree; not much; slightly; somewhat; -- often with a preceding it. " The poor sleep little." Otway.
heart: 1. (Anat.)  A hollow, muscular organ, which, by contracting rhythmically, keeps up the circulation of the blood. Why does my blood thus muster to my heart! Shak. Note: In adult mammals and birds, the heart is four-chambered, the right auricle and ventricle being completely separated from the left auricle and ventricle; and the blood flows from the systematic veins to the right auricle, thence to the right ventricle, from which it is forced to the lungs, then returned to the left auricle, thence passes to the left ventricle, from which it is driven into the systematic arteries. See Illust. under Aorta. In fishes there are but one auricle and one ventricle, the blood being pumped from the ventricle through the gills to the system, and thence returned to the auricle. In most amphibians and reptiles, the separation of the auricles is partial or complete, and in reptiles the ventricles also are separated more or less completely. The so-called lymph hearts, found in many amphibians, reptiles, and birds, are contractile sacs, which pump the lymph into the veins. 2. The seat of the affections or sensibilities, collectively or separately, as love, hate, joy, grief, courage, and the like; rarely, the seat of the understanding or will; -- usually in a good sense, when no epithet is expressed; the better or lovelier part of our nature; the spring of all our actions and purposes; the seat of moral life and character; the moral affections and character itself; the individual disposition and character; as, a good, tender, loving, bad, hard, or selfish heart. Hearts are dust, hearts' loves remain. Emerson. 3. The nearest the middle or center; the part most hidden and within; the inmost or most essential part of any body or system; the source of life and motion in any organization; the chief or vital portion; the center of activity, or of energetic or efficient action; as, the heart of a country, of a tree, etc. Exploits done in the heart of France. Shak. Peace subsisting at the heart Of endless agitation. Wordsworth. 4. Courage; courageous purpose; spirit. Eve, recovering heart, replied. Milton. The expelled nations take heart, and when they fly from one country invade another. Sir W. Temple. 5. Vigorous and efficient activity; power of fertile production; condition of the soil, whether good or bad. That the spent earth may gather heart again. Dryden. 6. That which resembles a heart in shape; especially, a roundish or oval figure or object having an obtuse point at one end, and at the other a corresponding indentation, -- used as a symbol or representative of the heart. 7. One of a series of playing cards, distinguished by the figure or figures of a heart; as, hearts are trumps. 8. Vital part; secret meaning; real intention. And then show you the heart of my message. Shak. 9. A term of affectionate or kindly and familiar address. "I speak to thee, my heart." Shak. Note: Heart is used in many compounds, the most of which need no special explanation; as, heart-appalling, heart-breaking, heart- cheering, heart-chilled, heart-expanding, heart-free, heart-hardened, heart-heavy, heart-purifying, heart-searching, heart-sickening, heart-sinking, heart-stirring, heart-touching, heart-wearing, heart- whole, heart-wounding, heart-wringing, etc. After one's own heart, conforming with one's inmost approval and desire; as, a friend after my own heart. The Lord hath sought him a man after his own heart. 1 Sam. xiii. 14. -- At heart, in the inmost character or disposition; at bottom; really; as, he is at heart a good man. -- By heart, in the closest or most thorough manner; as, to know or learn by heart. "Composing songs, for fools to get by heart" (that is, to commit to memory, or to learn thoroughly). Pope. -- For my heart, for my life; if my life were at stake. [Obs.] "I could not get him for my heart to do it." Shak. -- Heart bond (Masonry), a bond in which no header stone stretches across the wall, but two headers meet in the middle, and their joint is covered by another stone laid header fashion. Knight. -- Heart and hand, with enthusiastic coöperation. -- Heart hardness, hardness of heart; callousness of feeling; moral insensibility. Shak. -- Heart heaviness, depression of spirits. Shak. -- Heart point (Her.), the fess point. See Escutcheon. -- Heart rising, a rising of the heart, as in opposition. -- Heart shell (Zoöl.), any marine, bivalve shell of the genus Cardium and allied genera, having a heart-shaped shell; esp., the European Isocardia cor; -- called also heart cockle. -- Heart sickness, extreme depression of spirits. -- Heart and soul, with the utmost earnestness. -- Heart urchin (Zoöl.), any heartshaped, spatangoid sea urchin. See Spatangoid. -- Heart wheel, a form of cam, shaped like a heart. See Cam. -- In good heart, in good courage; in good hope. -- Out of heart, discouraged. -- Poor heart, an exclamation of pity. -- To break the heart of. (a) To bring to despair or hopeless grief; to cause to be utterly cast down by sorrow. (b) To bring almost to completion; to finish very nearly; -- said of anything undertaken; as, he has broken the heart of the task. -- To find in the heart, to be willing or disposed. "I could find in my heart to ask your pardon." Sir P. Sidney. -- To have at heart, to desire (anything) earnestly. -- To have in the heart, to purpose; to design or intend to do. -- To have the heart in the mouth, to be much frightened. -- To lose heart, to become discouraged. -- To lose one's heart, to fall in love. -- To set the heart at rest, to put one's self at ease. -- To set the heart upon, to fix the desires on; to long for earnestly; to be very fond of. -- To take heart of grace, to take courage. -- To take to heart, to grieve over. -- To wear one's heart upon one's sleeve, to expose one's feelings or intentions; to be frank or impulsive. -- With all one's whole heart, very earnestly; fully; completely; devotedly.  To give heart to; to hearten; to encourage; to inspirit. [Obs.] My cause is hearted; thine hath no less reason. Shak.  To form a compact center or heart; as, a hearting cabbage.
operate: 1. To perform a work or labor; to exert power or strengh, physical or mechanical; to act. 2. To produce an appropriate physical effect; to issue in the result designed by nature; especially (Med.), to take appropriate effect on the human system. 3. To act or produce effect on the mind; to exert moral power or influence. The virtues of private persons operate but on a few. Atterbury. A plain, convincing reason operates on the mind both of a learned and ignorant hearer as long as they live. Swift. 4. (Surg.)  To perform some manual act upon a human body in a methodical manner, and usually with instruments, with a view to restore soundness or health, as in amputation, lithotomy, etc. 5. To deal in stocks or any commodity with a view to speculative profits. [Brokers' Cant]  1. To produce, as an effect; to cause. The same cause would operate a diminution of the value of stock. A. Hamilton. 2. To put into, or to continue in, operation or activity; to work; as, to operate a machine.
fair: 1. Free from spots, specks, dirt, or imperfection; unblemished; clean; pure. A fair white linen cloth. Book of Common Prayer. 2. Pleasing to the eye; handsome; beautiful. Who can not see many a fair French city, for one fair French made. Shak. 3. Without a dark hue; light; clear; as, a fair skin. The northern people large and fair-complexioned. Sir M. Hale. 4. Not overcast; cloudless; clear; pleasant; propitious; favorable; - - said of the sky, weather, or wind, etc.; as, a fair sky; a fair day. You wish fair winds may waft him over. Prior. 5. Free from obstacles or hindrances; unobstructed; unincumbered; open; direct; -- said of a road, passage, etc.; as, a fair mark; in fair sight; a fair view. The caliphs obtained a mighty empire, which was in a fair way to have enlarged. Sir W. Raleigh. 6. (Shipbuilding)  Without sudden change of direction or curvature; smooth; fowing; -- said of the figure of a vessel, and of surfaces, water lines, and other lines. 7. Characterized by frankness, honesty, impartiality, or candor; open; upright; free from suspicion or bias; equitable; just; -- said of persons, character, or conduct; as, a fair man; fair dealing; a fair statement. "I would call it fair play." Shak. 8. Pleasing; favorable; inspiring hope and confidence; -- said of words, promises, etc. When fair words and good counsel will not prevail on us, we must be frighted into our duty. L' Estrange. 9. Distinct; legible; as, fair handwriting. 10. Free from any marked characteristic; average; middling; as, a fair specimen. The news is very fair and good, my lord. Shak. Fair ball. (Baseball) (a) A ball passing over the home base at the height called for by the batsman, and delivered by the pitcher while wholly within the lines of his position and facing the batsman. (b) A batted ball that falls inside the foul lines; -- called also a fair hit. -- Fair maid. (Zoöl.) (a) The European pilchard (Clupea pilchardus) when dried. (b) The southern scup (Stenotomus Gardeni). [Virginia] -- Fair one, a handsome woman; a beauty, -- Fair play, equitable or impartial treatment; a fair or equal chance; justice. -- From fair to middling, passable; tolerable. [Colloq.] -- The fair sex, the female sex. Syn. -- Candid; open; frank; ingenuous; clear; honest; equitable; impartial; reasonable. See Candid.  Clearly; openly; frankly; civilly; honestly; favorably; auspiciously; agreeably. Fair and square, justly; honestly; equitably; impartially. [Colloq.] -- To bid fair. See under Bid. -- To speak fair, to address with courtesy and frankness. [Archaic]  1. Fairness, beauty. [Obs.] Shak. 2. A fair woman; a sweetheart. I have found out a gift for my fair. Shenstone. 3. Good fortune; good luck. Now fair befall thee ! Shak. The fair, anything beautiful; women, collectively. "For slander's mark was ever yet the fair." Shak.  1. To make fair or beautiful. [Obs.] Fairing the foul. Shak. 2. (Shipbuilding)  To make smooth and flowing, as a vessel's lines.  1. A gathering of buyers and sellers, assembled at a particular place with their merchandise at a stated or regular season, or by special appointment, for trade. 2. A festival, and sale of fancy articles. erc., usually for some charitable object; as, a Grand Army fair. 3. A competitive exhibition of wares, farm products, etc., not primarily for purposes of sale; as, the Mechanics' fair; an agricultural fair. After the fair, Too late. [Colloq.]
type: 1. The mark or impression of something; stamp; impressed sign; emblem. The faith they have in tennis, and tall stockings, Short blistered breeches, and those types of travel. Shak. 2. Form or character impressed; style; semblance. Thy father bears the type of king of Naples. Shak. 3. A figure or representation of something to come; a token; a sign; a symbol; -- correlative to antitype. A type is no longer a type when the thing typified comes to be actually exhibited. South. 4. That which possesses or exemplifies characteristic qualities; the representative. Specifically: (a) (Biol.)  A general form or structure common to a number of individuals; hence, the ideal representation of a species, genus, or other group, combining the essential characteristics; an animal or plant possessing or exemplifying the essential characteristics of a species, genus, or other group. Also, a group or division of animals having a certain typical or characteristic structure of body maintained within the group. Since the time of Cuvier and Baer . . . the whole animal kingdom has been universally held to be divisible into a small number of main divisions or types. Haeckel. (b) (Fine Arts)  The original object, or class of objects, scene, face, or conception, which becomes the subject of a copy; esp., the design on the face of a medal or a coin. (c) (Chem.) A simple compound, used as a mode or pattern to which other compounds are conveniently regarded as being related, and from which they may be actually or theoretically derived. Note: The fundamental types used to express the simplest and most essential chemical relations are hydrochloric acid, HCl; water, H2O; ammonia, NH3; and methane, CH4. 5. (Typog.) (a) A raised letter, figure, accent, or other character, cast in metal or cut in wood, used in printing. (b) Such letters or characters, in general, or the whole quantity of them used in printing, spoken of collectively; any number or mass of such letters or characters, however disposed. Note: Type are mostly made by casting type metal in a mold, though some of the larger sizes are made from maple, mahogany, or boxwood. In the cut, a is the body; b, the face, or part from which the impression is taken; c, the shoulder, or top of the body; d, the nick (sometimes two or more are made), designed to assist the compositor in distinguishing the bottom of the face from the top; e, the groove made in the process of finishing, -- each type as cast having attached to the bottom of the body a jet, or small piece of metal (formed by the surplus metal poured into the mold), which, when broken off, leaves a roughness that requires to be removed. The fine lines at the top and bottom of a letter are technically called ceriphs, and when part of the face projects over the body, as in the letter f, the projection is called a kern. The type which compose an ordinary book font consist of Roman CAPITALS, small capitals, and lower-case letters, and Italic CAPITALS and lower-case letters, with accompanying figures, points, and reference marks, -- in all about two hundred characters. Including the various modern styles of fancy type, some three or four hundred varieties of face are made. Besides the ordinary Roman and Italic, some of the most important of the varieties are -- Old English. Black Letter. Old Style. French Elzevir. Boldface. Antique. Clarendon. Gothic. Typewriter. Script. The smallest body in common use is diamond; then follow in order of size, pearl, agate, nonpareil, minion, brevier, bourgeois (or two-line diamond), long primer (or two-line pearl), small pica (or two-line agate), pica (or two-line nonpareil), English (or two-line minion), Columbian (or two- line brevier), great primer (two-line bourgeois), paragon (or two- line long primer), double small pica (or two-line small pica), double pica (or two-line pica), double English (or two-line English), double great primer (or two-line great primer), double paragon (or two-line paragon), canon (or two-line double pica). Above this, the sizes are called five-line pica, six-line pica, seven-line pica, and so on, being made mostly of wood. The following alphabets show the different sizes up to great primer. Brilliant . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Diamond . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Pearl . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Agate . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Nonpareil . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Minion . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Brevier . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Bourgeois . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Long primer . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Small pica . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Pica . . . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz English . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Columbian . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz Great primer . . . abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz The foregoing account is conformed to the designations made use of by American type founders, but is substantially correct for England. Agate, however, is called ruby, in England, where, also, a size intermediate between nonpareil and minion is employed, called emerald. Point system of type bodies (Type Founding), a system adopted by the type founders of the United States by which the various sizes of type have been so modified and changed that each size bears an exact proportional relation to every other size. The system is a modification of a French system, and is based on the pica body. This pica body is divided into twelfths, which are termed "points," and every type body consist of a given number of these points. Many of the type founders indicate the new sizes of type by the number of points, and the old names are gradually being done away with. By the point system type founders cast type of a uniform size and height, whereas formerly fonts of pica or other type made by different founders would often vary slightly so that they could not be used together. There are no type in actual use corresponding to the smaller theoretical sizes of the point system. In some cases, as in that of ruby, the term used designates a different size from that heretofore so called. 1 American 9 Bourgeois | | 1| 2 Saxon 10 Long Primer | | 2| 3 Brilliant 11 Small Pica | | 3| | 4 Excelsior | 4| | 5 Pearl 16 Columbian | | 5| 6 Nonpareil 18 Great Primer | | 7 Minion | 8 Brevier 20 Paragon | | Diagram of the "points" by which sizes of Type are graduated in the "Point System". Type founder, one who casts or manufacture type. -- Type foundry, Type foundery, a place for the manufacture of type. -- Type metal, an alloy used in making type, stereotype plates, etc., and in backing up electrotype plates. It consists essentially of lead and antimony, often with a little tin, nickel, or copper. -- Type wheel, a wheel having raised letters or characters on its periphery, and used in typewriters, printing telegraphs, etc. -- Unity of type (Biol.), that fundamental agreement in structure which is seen in organic beings of the same class, and is quite independent of their habits of life. Darwin.  1. To represent by a type, model, or symbol beforehand; to prefigure. [R.] White (Johnson). 2. To furnish an expression or copy of; to represent; to typify. [R.] Let us type them now in our own lives. Tennyson.
symbol: 1. A visible sign or representation of an idea; anything which suggests an idea or quality, or another thing, as by resemblance or by convention; an emblem; a representation; a type; a figure; as, the lion is the symbol of courage; the lamb is the symbol of meekness or patience. A symbol is a sign included in the idea which it represents, e.g., an actual part chosen to represent the whole, or a lower form or species used as the representative of a higher in the same kind. Coleridge. 2. (Math.)  Any character used to represent a quantity, an operation, a relation, or an abbreviation. Note: In crystallography, the symbol of a plane is the numerical expression which defines its position relatively to the assumed axes. 3. (Theol.)  An abstract or compendium of faith or doctrine; a creed, or a summary of the articles of religion. 4. Etym: [Gr.  That which is thrown into a common fund; hence, an appointed or accustomed duty. [Obs.] They do their work in the days of peace . . . and come to pay their symbol in a war or in a plague. Jer. Taylor. 5. Share; allotment. [Obs.] The persons who are to be judged . . . shall all appear to receive their symbol. Jer. Taylor. 6. (Chem.)  An abbreviation standing for the name of an element and consisting of the initial letter of the Latin or New Latin name, or sometimes of the initial letter with a following one; as, C for carbon, Na for sodium (Natrium), Fe for iron (Ferrum), Sn for tin (Stannum), Sb for antimony (Stibium), etc. See the list of names and symbols under Element. Note: In pure and organic chemistry there are symbols not only for the elements, but also for their grouping in formulas, radicals, or residues, as evidenced by their composition, reactions, synthesis, etc. See the diagram of Benzene nucleus, under Benzene. Syn. -- Emblem; figure; type. See Emblem.  To symbolize. [R.] Tennyson.
light: 1. That agent, force, or action in nature by the operation of which upon the organs of sight, objects are rendered visible or luminous. Note: Light was regarded formerly as consisting of material particles, or corpuscules, sent off in all directions from luminous bodies, and traversing space, in right lines, with the known velocity of about 186,300 miles per second; but it is now generally understood to consist, not in any actual transmission of particles or substance, but in the propagation of vibrations or undulations in a subtile, elastic medium, or ether, assumed to pervade all space, and to be thus set in vibratory motion by the action of luminous bodies, as the atmosphere is by sonorous bodies. This view of the nature of light is known as the undulatory or wave theory; the other, advocated by Newton (but long since abandoned), as the corpuscular, emission, or Newtonian theory. A more recent theory makes light to consist in electrical oscillations, and is known as the electro-magnetic theory of light. 2. That which furnishes, or is a source of, light, as the sun, a star, a candle, a lighthouse, etc. Then he called for a light, and sprang in. Acts xvi. 29. And God made two great lights; the greater light to rule the day, and the lesser light to rule the night. Gen. i. 16. 3. The time during which the light of the sun is visible; day; especially, the dawn of day. The murderer, rising with the light, killeth the poor and needy. Job xxiv. 14. 4. The brightness of the eye or eyes. He seemed to find his way without his eyes; For out o'door he went without their helps, And, to the last, bended their light on me. Shak. 5. The medium through which light is admitted, as a window, or window pane; a skylight; in architecture, one of the compartments of a window made by a mullion or mullions. There were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. I Kings vii.4. 6. Life; existence. O, spring to light, auspicious Babe, be born ! Pope. 7. Open view; a visible state or condition; public observation; publicity. The duke yet would have dark deeds darkly answered; he would never bring them to light. Shak. 8. The power of perception by vision. My strength faileth me; as for the light of my eyes, it also is gone from me. Ps. xxxviii. 10. 9. That which illumines or makes clear to the mind; mental or spiritual illumination; enlightenment; knowledge; information. He shall never know That I had any light of this from thee. Shak. 10. Prosperity; happiness; joy; felicity. Then shall thy light break forth as the morning, and thy health shall spring forth speedily. Is. lviii. 8. 11. (Paint.)  The manner in which the light strikes upon a picture; that part of a picture which represents those objects upon which the light is supposed to fall; the more illuminated part of a landscape or other scene; -- opposed to shade. Cf. Chiaroscuro. 12. Appearance due to the particular facts and circumstances presented to view; point of view; as, to state things fairly and put them in the right light. Frequent consideration of a thing . . . shows it in its several lights and various ways of appearance. South. 13. One who is conspicuous or noteworthy; a model or example; as, the lights of the age or of antiquity. Joan of Are, A light of ancient France. Tennyson. 14. (Pyrotech.)  A firework made by filling a case with a substance which burns brilliantly with a white or colored flame; as, a Bengal light. Note: Light is used figuratively to denote that which resembles physical light in any respect, as illuminating, benefiting, enlightening, or enlivening mankind. Ancient lights (Law), Calcium light, Flash light, etc. See under Ancient, Calcium, etc. -- Light ball (Mil.), a ball of combustible materials, used to afford light; -- sometimes made so as to fired from a cannon or mortar, or to be carried up by a rocket. -- Light barrel (Mil.), an empty power barrel pierced with holes and filled with shavings soaked in pitch, used to light up a ditch or a breach. --Light dues (Com.), tolls levied on ships navigating certain waters, for the maintenance of lighthouses. -- Light iron, a candlestick. [Obs.] -- Light keeper, a person appointed to take care of a lighthouse or light-ship. -- Light money, charges laid by government on shipping entering a port, for the maintenance of lighthouses and light-ships. -- The light of the countenance, favor; kindness; smiles. Lord, lift thou up the light of thy countenance upon us. Ps. iv. 6. -- Northern lights. See Aurora borealis, under Aurora. -- To bring to light, to cause to be disclosed. -- To come to light, to be disclosed. -- To see the light, to come into the light; hence, to come into the world or public notice; as, his book never saw the light. -- To stand in one's own light, to take a position which is injurious to one's own interest.  1. Having light; not dark or obscure; bright; clear; as, the apartment is light. 2. White or whitish; not intense or very marked; not of a deep shade; moderately colored; as, a light color; a light brown; a light complexion.  1. To set fire to; to cause to burn; to set burning; to ignite; to kindle; as, to light a candle or lamp; to light the gas; -- sometimes with up. If a thousand candles be all lighted from one. Hakewill. And the largest lamp is lit. Macaulay. Absence might cure it, or a second mistress Light up another flame, and put out this. Addison. 2. To give light to; to illuminate; to fill with light; to spread over with light; -- often with up. Ah, hopeless, lasting flames I like those that burn To light the dead. Pope. One hundred years ago, to have lit this theater as brilliantly as it is now lighted would have cost, I suppose, fifty pounds. F. Harrison. The sun has set, and Vesper, to supply His absent beams, has lighted up the sky. Dryden. 3. To attend or conduct with a light; to show the way to by means of a light. His bishops lead him forth, and light him on. Landor. To light a fire, to kindle the material of a fire.  1. To become ignited; to take fire; as, the match will not light. 2. To be illuminated; to receive light; to brighten; -- with up; as, the room light up very well.  1. Having little, or comparatively little, weight; not tending to be the center of gravity with force; not heavy. These weights did not exert their natural gravity . . . insomuch that I could not guess which was light or heavy whilst I held them in my hand. Addison. 2. Not burdensome; easy to be lifted, borne, or carried by physical strength; as, a light burden, or load. Ye shall find rest unto your souls. For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. Matt. xi. 29. 30. 3. Easy to be endured or performed; not severe; not difficult; as, a light affliction or task. Chaucer. Light sufferings give us leisure to complain. Dryden. 4. Easy to be digested; not oppressive to the stomach; as, light food; also, containing little nutriment. 5. Not heavily armed; armed with light weapons; as, light troops; a troop of light horse. 6. Not encumbered; unembarrassed; clear of impediments; hence, active; nimble; swift. Unmarried men are best friends, best masters . . . but not always best subjects, for they are light to run away. Bacon. 7. Not heavily burdened; not deeply laden; not sufficiently ballasted; as, the ship returned light. 8. Slight; not important; as, a light error. Shak. 9. Well leavened; not heavy; as, light bread. 10. Not copious or heavy; not dense; not inconsiderable; as, a light rain; a light snow; light vapors. 11. Not strong or violent; moderate; as, a light wind. 12. Not pressing heavily or hard upon; hence, having an easy graceful manner; delicate; as, a light touch; a light style of execution. 13. Easy to admit influence; inconsiderate; easily influenced by trifling considerations; unsteady; unsettled; volatile; as, a light, vain person; a light mind. There is no greater argument of a light and inconsiderate person than profanely to scoff at religion. Tillotson. 14. Indulging in, or inclined to, levity; wanting dignity or solemnity; trifling; gay; frivolous; airy; unsubstantial. Seneca can not be too heavy, nor Plautus too light. Shak. Specimens of New England humor laboriously light and lamentably mirthful. Hawthorne. 15. Not quite sound or normal; somewhat impaired or deranged; dizzy; giddy. Are his wits safe Is he not light of brain Shak. 16. Easily bestowed; inconsiderately rendered. To a fair semblance doth light annex. Spenser. 17. Wanton; unchaste; as, a woman of light character. A light wife doth make a heavy husband. Shak. 18. Not of the legal, standard, or usual weight; clipped; diminished; as, light coin. 19. Loose; sandy; easily pulverized; as, a light soil. Light cavalry, Light horse (Mil.), light-armed soldiers mounted on strong and active horses. -- Light eater, one who eats but little. -- Light infantry, infantry soldiers selected and trained for rapid evolutions. -- Light of foot. (a) Having a light step. (b) Fleet. -- Light of heart, gay, cheerful. -- Light oil (Chem.), the oily product, lighter than water, forming the chief part of the first distillate of coal tar, and consisting largely of benzene and toluene. -- Light sails (Naut.), all the sails above the topsails, with, also, the studding sails and flying jib. Dana. -- Light sleeper, one easily wakened. -- Light weight, a prize fighter, boxer, wrestler, or jockey, who is below a standard medium weight. Cf. Feather weight, under Feather. [Cant] -- To make light of, to treat as of little consequence; to slight; to disregard. -- To set light by, to undervalue; to slight; to treat as of no importance; to despise.  Lightly; cheaply. Hooker.  To lighten; to ease of a burden; to take off. [Obs.] From his head the heavy burgonet did light. Spenser.  1. To dismount; to descend, as from a horse or carriage; to alight; - - with from, off, on, upon, at, in. When she saw Isaac, she lighted off the camel. Gen. xxiv. 64. Slowly rode across a withered heath, And lighted at a ruined inn. Tennyson. 2. To feel light; to be made happy. [Obs.] It made all their hearts to light. Chaucer. 3. To descend from flight, and rest, perch, or settle, as a bird or insect. [The bee] lights on that, and this, and tasteth all. Sir. J. Davies. On the tree tops a crested peacock lit. Tennyson. 4. To come down suddenly and forcibly; to fall; -- with on or upon. On me, me only, as the source and spring Of all corruption, all the blame light due. Milton. 5. To come by chance; to happen; -- with on or upon; formerly with into. The several degrees of vision, which the assistance of glasses (casually at first lit on) has taught us to conceive. Locke. They shall light into atheistical company. South. And here we lit on Aunt Elizabeth, And Lilia with the rest. Tennyson.
written: p. p. of Write, v.
rain: Reign. [Obs.] Spenser.  Water falling in drops from the clouds; the descent of water from the clouds in drops. Rain is water by the heat of the sun divided into very small parts ascending in the air, till, encountering the cold, it be condensed into clouds, and descends in drops. Ray. Fair days have oft contracted wind and rain. Milton. Note: Rain is distinguished from mist by the size of the drops, which are distinctly visible. When water falls in very small drops or particles, it is called mist; and fog is composed of particles so fine as to be not only individually indistinguishable, but to float or be suspended in the air. See Fog, and Mist. Rain band (Meteorol.), a dark band in the yellow portion of the solar spectrum near the sodium line, caused by the presence of watery vapor in the atmosphere, and hence sometimes used in weather predictions. -- Rain bird (Zoöl.), the yaffle, or green woodpecker. [Prov. Eng.] The name is also applied to various other birds, as to Saurothera vetula of the West Indies. -- Rain fowl (Zoöl.), the channel-bill cuckoo (Scythrops Novæ- Hollandiæ) of Australia. -- Rain gauge, an instrument of various forms measuring the quantity of rain that falls at any given place in a given time; a pluviometer; an ombrometer. -- Rain goose (Zoöl.), the red-throated diver, or loon. [Prov. Eng.] -- Rain prints (Geol.), markings on the surfaces of stratified rocks, presenting an appearance similar to those made by rain on mud and sand, and believed to have been so produced. -- Rain quail. (Zoöl.) See Quail, n., 1. -- Rain water, water that has fallen from the clouds in rain.  1. To fall in drops from the clouds, as water; used mostly with it for a nominative; as, it rains. The rain it raineth every day. Shak. 2. To fall or drop like water from the clouds; as, tears rained from their eyes.  1. To pour or shower down from above, like rain from the clouds. Then said the Lord unto Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from heaven for you. Ex. xvi. 4. 2. To bestow in a profuse or abundant manner; as, to rain favors upon a person.
team: 1. A group of young animals, especially of young ducks; a brood; a litter. A team of ducklings about her. Holland. 2. Hence, a number of animals moving together. A long team of snowy swans on high. Dryden. 3. Two or more horses, oxen, or other beasts harnessed to the same vehicle for drawing, as to a coach, wagon, sled, or the like. "A team of dolphins." Spenser. To take his team and till the earth. Piers Plowman. It happened almost every day that coaches stuck fast, until a team of cattle could be procured from some neighboring farm to tug them out of the slough. Macaulay. 4. A number of persons associated together in any work; a gang; especially, a number of persons selected to contend on one side in a match, or a series of matches, in a cricket, football, rowing, etc. 5. (Zoöl.)  A flock of wild ducks. 6. (O. Eng. Law)  A royalty or privilege granted by royal charter to a lord of a manor, of having, keeping, and judging in his court, his bondmen, neifes, and villains, and their offspring, or suit, that is, goods and chattels, and appurtenances thereto. Burrill.  To engage in the occupation of driving a team of horses, cattle, or the like, as in conveying or hauling lumber, goods, etc.; to be a teamster. team up, to form one or more teams, either for a common endeavor, or to compete in a contest.  To convey or haul with a team; as, to team lumber. [R.] Thoreau.
true: 1. Conformable to fact; in accordance with the actual state of things; correct; not false, erroneous, inaccurate, or the like; as, a true relation or narration; a true history; a declaration is true when it states the facts. 2. Right to precision; conformable to a rule or pattern; exact; accurate; as, a true copy; a true likeness of the original. Making his eye, foot, and hand keep true time. Sir W. Scott. 3. Steady in adhering to friends, to promises, to a prince, or the like; unwavering; faithful; loyal; not false, fickle, or perfidious; as, a true friend; a wife true to her husband; an officer true to his charge. Thy so true, So faithful, love unequaled. Milton. Dare to be true: nothing can need a lie. Herbert. 4. Actual; not counterfeit, adulterated, or pretended; genuine; pure; real; as, true balsam; true love of country; a true Christian. The true light which lighteth every man that cometh into the world. John i. 9. True ease in writing comes from art, not chance. Pope. Note: True is sometimes used elliptically for It is true. Out of true, varying from correct mechanical form, alignment, adjustment, etc.; -- said of a wall that is not perpendicular, of a wheel whose circumference is not in the same plane, and the like. [Colloq.] -- A true bill (Law), a bill of indictment which is returned by the grand jury so indorsed, signifying that the charges to be true. -- True time. See under Time.  In accordance with truth; truly. Shak.
few: Not many; small, limited, or confined in number; -- indicating a small portion of units or individuals constituing a whole; often, by ellipsis of a noun, a few people. "Are not my days few" Job x. 20. Few know and fewer care. Proverb. Note: Few is often used partitively; as, few of them. A few, a small number. -- In few, in a few words; briefly. Shak. - No few, not few; more than a few; many. Cowper. - The few, the minority; -- opposed to the many or the majority.
wide: 1. Having considerable distance or extent between the sides; spacious across; much extended in a direction at right angles to that of length; not narrow; broad; as, wide cloth; a wide table; a wide highway; a wide bed; a wide hall or entry. The chambers and the stables weren wyde. Chaucer. Wide is the gate . . . that leadeth to destruction. Matt. vii. 18. 2. Having a great extent every way; extended; spacious; broad; vast; extensive; as, a wide plain; the wide ocean; a wide difference. "This wyde world." Chaucer. For sceptered cynics earth were far too wide a den. Byron. When the wide bloom, on earth that lies, Seems of a brighter world than ours. Bryant. 3. Of large scope; comprehensive; liberal; broad; as, wide views; a wide understanding. Men of strongest head and widest culture. M. Arnold. 4. Of a certain measure between the sides; measuring in a direction at right angles to that of length; as, a table three feet wide. 5. Remote; distant; far. The contrary being so wide from the truth of Scripture and the attributes of God. Hammond. 6. Far from truth, from propriety, from necessity, or the like. "Our wide expositors." Milton. It is far wide that the people have such judgments. Latimer. How wide is all this long pretense ! Herbert. 7. On one side or the other of the mark; too far side-wise from the mark, the wicket, the batsman, etc. Surely he shoots wide on the bow hand. Spenser. I was but two bows wide. Massinger. 8. (Phon.)  Made, as a vowel, with a less tense, and more open and relaxed, condition of the mouth organs; -- opposed to primary as used by Mr. Bell, and to narrow as used by Mr. Sweet. The effect, as explained by Mr. Bell, is due to the relaxation or tension of the pharynx; as explained by Mr. Sweet and others, it is due to the action of the tongue. The wide of e (eve) is î (îll); of a (ate) is ê (ênd), etc. See Guide to Pronunciation, § 13-15. Note: Wide is often prefixed to words, esp. to participles and participial adjectives, to form self-explaining compounds; as, wide- beaming, wide-branched, wide-chopped, wide-echoing, wide-extended, wide-mouthed, wide-spread, wide-spreading, and the like. Far and wide. See under Far. -- Wide gauge. See the Note under Cauge, 6.  1. To a distance; far; widely; to a great distance or extent; as, his fame was spread wide. [I] went wyde in this world, wonders to hear. Piers Plowman. 2. So as to leave or have a great space between the sides; so as to form a large opening. Shak. 3. So as to be or strike far from, or on one side of, an object or purpose; aside; astray.  1. That which is wide; wide space; width; extent. "The waste wide of that abyss." Tennyson. 2. That which goes wide, or to one side of the mark.
other: Either; -- used with other or or for its correlative (as either . . . or are now used). [Obs.] Other of chalk, other of glass. Chaucer.  1. Different from that which, or the one who, has been specified; not the same; not identical; additional; second of two. Each of them made other for to win. Chaucer. Whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. Matt. v. 39. 2. Not this, but the contrary; opposite; as, the other side of a river. 3. Alternate; second; -- used esp. in connection with every; as, every other day, that is, each alternate day, every second day. 4. Left, as opposed to right. [Obs.] A distaff in her other hand she had. Spenser. Note: Other is a correlative adjective, or adjective pronoun, often in contrast with one, some, that, this, etc. The one shall be taken, and the other left. Matt. xxiv. 4 And some fell among thorns . . . but other fell into good ground. Matt. xiii. 7, 8. It is also used, by ellipsis, with a noun, expressed or understood. To write this, or to design the other. Dryden. It is written with the indefinite article as one word, another; is used with each, indicating a reciprocal action or relation; and is employed absolutely, or eliptically for other thing, or other person, in which case it may have a plural. The fool and the brutish person perish, and leave their wealth to others. Ps. xlix. 10. If he is trimming, others are true. Thackeray. Other is sometimes followed by but, beside, or besides; but oftener by than. No other but such a one as he. Coleridge. Other lords beside thee have had dominion over us. Is. xxvi. 13. For other foundation can no man lay than that is laid. 1 Cor. iii. 11. The whole seven years of . . . ignominy had been little other than a preparation for this very hour. Hawthorne. Other some, some others. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.] -- The other day, at a certain time past, not distant, but indefinite; not long ago; recently; rarely, the third day past. Bind my hair up: as't was yesterday No, nor t' other day. B. Jonson.  Otherwise. "It shall none other be." Chaucer. "If you think other." Shak.
vary: 1. To change the aspect of; to alter in form, appearance, substance, position, or the like; to make different by a partial change; to modify; as, to vary the properties, proportions, or nature of a thing; to vary a posture or an attitude; to vary one's dress or opinions. Shall we vary our device at will, Even as new occasion appears Spenser. 2. To change to something else; to transmute; to exchange; to alternate. Gods, that never change their state, Vary oft their love and hate. Waller. We are to vary the customs according to the time and country where the scene of action lies. Dryden. 3. To make of different kinds; to make different from one another; to diversity; to variegate. God hath varied their inclinations. Sir T. Browne. God hath here Varied his bounty so with new delights. Milton. 4. (Mus.)  To embellish; to change fancifully; to present under new aspects, as of form, key, measure, etc. See Variation, 4.  1. To alter, or be altered, in any manner; to suffer a partial change; to become different; to be modified; as, colors vary in different lights. That each from other differs, first confess; Next, that he varies from himself no less. Pope. 2. To differ, or be different; to be unlike or diverse; as, the laws of France vary from those of England. 3. To alter or change in succession; to alternate; as, one mathematical quantity varies inversely as another. While fear and anger, with alternate grace, Pant in her breast, and vary in her face. Addison. 4. To deviate; to depart; to swerve; -- followed by from; as, to vary from the law, or from reason. Locke. 5. To disagree; to be at variance or in dissension; as, men vary in opinion. The rich jewel which we vary for. Webster (1623).  Alteration; change. [Obs.] Shak.
shore: imp. of Shear. Chaucer.  A sewer. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.]  A prop, as a timber, placed as a brace or support against the side of a building or other structure; a prop placed beneath anything, as a beam, to prevent it from sinking or sagging. [Written also shoar.]  To support by a shore or shores; to prop; -- usually with up; as, to shore up a building.  The coast or land adjacent to a large body of water, as an ocean, lake, or large river. Michael Cassio, Lieutenant to the warlike Moor Othello, Is come shore. Shak. The fruitful shore of muddy Nile. Spenser. In shore, near the shore. Marryat. -- On shore. See under On. -- Shore birds (Zoöl.), a collective name for the various limicoline birds found on the seashore. -- Shore crab (Zoöl.), any crab found on the beaches, or between tides, especially any one of various species of grapsoid crabs, as Heterograpsus nudus of California. -- Shore lark (Zoöl.), a small American lark (Otocoris alpestris) found in winter, both on the seacoast and on the Western plains. Its upper parts are varied with dark brown and light brown. It has a yellow throat, yellow local streaks, a black crescent on its breast, a black streak below each eye, and two small black erectile ear tufts. Called also horned lark. -- Shore plover (Zoöl.), a large-billed Australian plover (Esacus magnirostris). It lives on the seashore, and feeds on crustaceans, etc. -- Shore teetan (Zoöl.), the rock pipit (Anthus obscurus). [Prov. Eng.]  To set on shore. [Obs.] Shak.
silent: 1. Free from sound or noise; absolutely still; perfectly quiet. How silent is this town! Shak. 2. Not speaking; indisposed to talk; speechless; mute; taciturn; not loquacious; not talkative. Ulysses, adds he, was the most eloquent and most silent of men. Broome. This new-created world, whereof in hell Fame is not silent. Milton. 3. Keeping at rest; inactive; calm; undisturbed; as, the wind is silent. Parnell. Sir W. Raleigh. 4. (Pron.)  Not pronounced; having no sound; quiescent; as, e is silent in "fable." 5. Having no effect; not operating; inefficient. [R.] Cause . . . silent, virtueless, and dead. Sir W. Raleigh. Silent partner. See Dormant partner, under Dormant. Syn. -- Mute; taciturn; dumb; speechless; quiet; still. See Mute, and Taciturn.  That which is silent; a time of silence. [R.] "The silent of the night." Shak.
like: 1. Having the same, or nearly the same, appearance, qualities, or characteristics; resembling; similar to; similar; alike; -- often with in and the particulars of the resemblance; as, they are like each other in features, complexion, and many traits of character. 'The as like you As cherry is to cherry. Shak. Like master, like man. Old Prov. He giveth snow like wool; he scattereth the hoar-frost like ashes. Ps. cxlvii. 16. Note: To, which formerly often followed like, is now usually omitted. 2. Equal, or nearly equal; as, fields of like extent. More clergymen were impoverished by the late war than ever in the like space before. Sprat. 3. Having probability; affording probability; probable; likely. [Likely is more used now.] Shak. But it is like the jolly world about us will scoff at the paradox of these practices. South. Many were not easy to be governed, nor like to conform themselves to strict rules. Clarendon. 4. Inclined toward; disposed to; as, to feel like taking a walk. Had like (followed by the infinitive), had nearly; came little short of. Had like to have been my utter overthrow. Sir W. Raleigh Ramona had like to have said the literal truth, . . . but recollected herself in time. Mrs. H. H. Jackson. Like figures (Geom.), similar figures. Note: Like is used as a suffix, converting nouns into adjectives expressing resemblance to the noun; as, manlike, like a man; childlike, like a child; godlike, like a god, etc. Such compounds are readily formed whenever convenient, and several, as crescentlike, serpentlike, hairlike, etc., are used in this book, although, in some cases, not entered in the vocabulary. Such combinations as bell-like, ball-like, etc., are hyphened.  1. That which is equal or similar to another; the counterpart; an exact resemblance; a copy. He was a man, take him for all in all, I shall not look upon his like again. Shak. 2. A liking; a preference; inclination; -- usually in pl.; as, we all have likes and dislikes.  1. In a manner like that of; in a manner similar to; as, do not act like him. He maketh them to stagger like a drunken man. Job xii. 25. Note: Like, as here used, is regarded by some grammarians as a preposition. 2. In a like or similar manner. Shak. Like as a father pitieth his children, so the Lord pitieth them that fear him. Ps. ciii. 13. 3. Likely; probably. "Like enough it will." Shak.  1. To suit; to please; to be agreeable to. [Obs.] Cornwall him liked best, therefore he chose there. R. of Gloucester. I willingly confess that it likes me much better when I find virtue in a fair lodging than when I am bound to seek it in an ill-favored creature. Sir P. Sidney. 2. To be pleased with in a moderate degree; to approve; to take satisfaction in; to enjoy. He proceeded from looking to liking, and from liking to loving. Sir P. Sidney. 3. To liken; to compare.[Obs.] Like me to the peasant boys of France. Shak.  1. To be pleased; to choose. He may either go or stay, as he best likes. Locke. 2. To have an appearance or expression; to look; to seem to be (in a specified condition). [Obs.] You like well, and bear your years very well. Shak. 3. To come near; to avoid with difficulty; to escape narrowly; as, he liked to have been too late. Cf. Had like, under Like, a. [Colloq.] He probably got his death, as he liked to have done two years ago, by viewing the troops for the expedition from the wall of Kensington Garden. Walpole. To like of, to be pleased with. [Obs.] Massinger.
may: An auxiliary verb qualifyng the meaning of another verb, by expressing: (a) Ability, competency, or possibility; -- now oftener expressed by can. How may a man, said he, with idle speech, Be won to spoil the castle of his health ! Spenser. For what he [the king] may do is of two kinds; what he may do as just, and what he may do as possible. Bacon. For of all sad words of tongue or pen The saddest are these: "It might have been." Whittier. (b) Liberty; permission; allowance. Thou mayst be no longer steward. Luke xvi. 2. (c) Contingency or liability; possibility or probability. Though what he learns he speaks, and may advance Some general maxims, or be right by chance. Pope. (d) Modesty, courtesy, or concession, or a desire to soften a question or remark. How old may Phillis be, you ask. Prior. (e) Desire or wish, as in prayer, imprecation, benediction, and the like. "May you live happily." Dryden. May be, and It may be, are used as equivalent to possibly, perhaps, by chance, peradventure. See 1st Maybe.  A maiden. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. The fifth month of the year, containing thirty-one days. Chaucer. 2. The early part or springtime of life. His May of youth, and bloom of lustihood. Shak. 3. (Bot.)  The flowers of the hawthorn; -- so called from their time of blossoming; also, the hawthorn. The palm and may make country houses gay. Nash. Plumes that micked the may. Tennyson. 4. The merrymaking of May Day. Tennyson. Italian may (Bot.), a shrubby species of Spiræa (S. hypericifolia) with many clusters of small white flowers along the slender branches. -- May apple (Bot.), the fruit of an American plant (Podophyllum peltatum). Also, the plant itself (popularly called mandrake), which has two lobed leaves, and bears a single egg-shaped fruit at the forking. The root and leaves, used in medicine, are powerfully drastic. -- May beetle, May bug (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of large lamellicorn beetles that appear in the winged state in May. They belong to Melolontha, and allied genera. Called also June beetle. -- May Day, the first day of May; -- celebrated in the rustic parts of England by the crowning of a May queen with a garland, and by dancing about a May pole. -- May dew, the morning dew of the first day of May, to which magical properties were attributed. -- May flower (Bot.), a plant that flowers in May; also, its blossom. See Mayflower, in the vocabulary. -- May fly (Zoöl.), any species of Ephemera, and allied genera; -- so called because the mature flies of many species appear in May. See Ephemeral fly, under Ephemeral. -- May game, any May-day sport. -- May lady, the queen or lady of May, in old May games. -- May lily (Bot.), the lily of the valley (Convallaria majalis). -- May pole. See Maypole in the Vocabulary. -- May queen, a girl or young woman crowned queen in the sports of May Day. -- May thorn, the hawthorn.
book: 1. A collection of sheets of paper, or similar material, blank, written, or printed, bound together; commonly, many folded and bound sheets containing continuous printing or writing. Note: When blank, it is called a blank book. When printed, the term often distinguishes a bound volume, or a volume of some size, from a pamphlet. Note: It has been held that, under the copyright law, a book is not necessarily a volume made of many sheets bound together; it may be printed on a single sheet, as music or a diagram of patterns. Abbott. 2. A composition, written or printed; a treatise. A good book is the precious life blood of a master spirit, embalmed and treasured up on purpose to a life beyond life. Milton. 3. A part or subdivision of a treatise or literary work; as, the tenth book of "Paradise Lost." 4. A volume or collection of sheets in which accounts are kept; a register of debts and credits, receipts and expenditures, etc. 5. Six tricks taken by one side, in the game of whist; in certain other games, two or more corresponding cards, forming a set. Note: Book is used adjectively or as a part of many compounds; as, book buyer, bookrack, book club, book lore, book sale, book trade, memorandum book, cashbook. Book account, an account or register of debt or credit in a book. -- Book debt, a debt for items charged to the debtor by the creditor in his book of accounts. -- Book learning, learning acquired from books, as distinguished from practical knowledge. "Neither does it so much require book learning and scholarship, as good natural sense, to distinguish true and false." Burnet. -- Book louse (Zoöl.), one of several species of minute, wingless insects injurious to books and papers. They belong to the Pseudoneuroptera. -- Book moth (Zoöl.), the name of several species of moths, the larvæ of which eat books. -- Book oath, an oath made on The Book, or Bible. -- The Book of Books, the Bible. -- Book post, a system under which books, bulky manuscripts, etc., may be transmitted by mail. -- Book scorpion (Zoöl.), one of the false scorpions (Chelifer cancroides) found among books and papers. It can run sidewise and backward, and feeds on small insects. -- Book stall, a stand or stall, often in the open air, for retailing books. -- Canonical books. See Canonical. -- In one's books, in one's favor. "I was so much in his books, that at his decease he left me his lamp." Addison. -- To bring to book. (a) To compel to give an account. (b) To compare with an admitted authority. "To bring it manifestly to book is impossible." M. Arnold. -- To course by bell, book, and candle. See under Bell. -- To make a book (Horse Racing), to lay bets (recorded in a pocket book) against the success of every horse, so that the bookmaker wins on all the unsuccessful horses and loses only on the winning horse or horses. -- To speak by the book, to speak with minute exactness. -- Without book. (a) By memory. (b) Without authority.  1. To enter, write, or register in a book or list. Let it be booked with the rest of this day's deeds. Shak. 2. To enter the name of (any one) in a book for the purpose of securing a passage, conveyance, or seat; as, to be booked for Southampton; to book a seat in a theater. 3. To mark out for; to destine or assign for; as, he is booked for the valedictory. [Colloq.] Here I am booked for three days more in Paris. Charles Reade.
reach: An effort to vomit. [R.]  1. To extend; to stretch; to thrust out; to put forth, as a limb, a member, something held, or the like. Her tresses yellow, and long straughten, Unto her heeles down they raughten. Rom. of R. Reach hither thy hand and thrust it into my side. John xx. 27. Fruit trees, over woody, reached too far Their pampered boughs. Milton. 2. Hence, to deliver by stretching out a member, especially the hand; to give with the hand; to pass to another; to hand over; as, to reach one a book. He reached me a full cap. 2 Esd. xiv. 39. 3. To attain or obtain by stretching forth the hand; too extend some part of the body, or something held by one, so as to touch, strike, grasp, or the like; as, to reach an object with the hand, or with a spear. O patron power, . . . thy present aid afford, Than I may reach the beast. Dryden. 4. To strike, hit, or tough with a missile; as, to reach an object with an arrow, a bullet, or a shell. 5. Hence, to extend an action, effort, or influence to; to penetrate to; to pierce, or cut, as far as. If these examples of grown men reach not the case of children, let them examine. Locke. 6. To extend to; to stretch out as far as; to touch by virtue of extent; as, his hand reaches the river. Thy desire . . . leads to no excess That reaches blame. Milton. 7. To arrive at by effort of any kind; to attain to; to gain; to be advanced to. The best account of the appearances of nature which human penetration can reach, comes short of its reality. Cheyne. 9. To understand; to comprehend. [Obs.] Do what, sir I reach you not. Beau. & Fl. 10. To overreach; to deceive. [Obs.] South.  1. To stretch out the hand. Goddess humane, reach, then, and freely taste! Milton. 2. To strain after something; to make efforts. Reaching above our nature does no good. Dryden. 3. To extend in dimension, time, amount, action, influence, etc., so as to touch, attain to, or be equal to, something. And behold, a ladder set upon the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven. Gen. xxviii. 12. The new world reaches quite across the torrid zone. Boyle. 4. (Naut.)  To sail on the wind, as from one point of tacking to another, or with the ind nearly abeam. To reach after or at, to make efforts to attain to or obtain. He would be in the mind reaching after a positive idea of infinity. Locke.  1. The act of stretching or extending; extension; power of reaching or touching with the person, or a limb, or something held or thrown; as, the fruit is beyond my reach; to be within reach of cannon shot. 2. The power of stretching out or extending action, influence, or the like; power of attainment or management; extent of force or capacity. Drawn by others who had deeper reaches than themselves to matters which they least intended. Hayward. Be sure yourself and your own reach to know. Pope. 3. Extent; stretch; expanse; hence, application; influence; result; scope. And on the left hand, hell, With long reach, interposed. Milton. I am to pray you not to strain my speech To grosser issues, nor to larger reach Than to suspicion. Shak. 4. An extended portion of land or water; a stretch; a straight portion of a stream or river, as from one turn to another; a level stretch, as between locks in a canal; an arm of the sea extending up into the land. "The river's wooded reach." Tennyson. The coast . . . is very full of creeks and reaches. Holland. 5. An article to obtain an advantage. The Duke of Parma had particular reaches and ends of his own underhand to cross the design. Bacon. 6. The pole or rod which connects the hind axle with the forward bolster of a wagon.
interest: 1. To engage the attention of; to awaken interest in; to excite emotion or passion in, in behalf of a person or thing; as, the subject did not interest him; to interest one in charitable work. To love our native country . . . to be interested in its concerns is natural to all men. Dryden. A goddess who used to interest herself in marriages. Addison. 2. To be concerned with or engaged in; to affect; to concern; to excite; -- often used impersonally. [Obs.] Or rather, gracious sir, Create me to this glory, since my cause Doth interest this fair quarrel. Ford. 3. To cause or permit to share. [Obs.] The mystical communion of all faithful men is such as maketh every one to be interested in those precious blessings which any one of them receiveth at God's hands. Hooker. Syn. -- To concern; excite; attract; entertain; engage; occupy; hold.  1. Excitement of feeling, whether pleasant or painful, accompanying special attention to some object; concern. Note: Interest expresses mental excitement of various kinds and degrees. It may be intellectual, or sympathetic and emotional, or merely personal; as, an interest in philosophical research; an interest in human suffering; the interest which an avaricious man takes in money getting. So much interest have I in thy sorrow. Shak. 2. Participation in advantage, profit, and responsibility; share; portion; part; as, an interest in a brewery; he has parted with his interest in the stocks. 3. Advantage, personal or general; good, regarded as a selfish benefit; profit; benefit. Divisions hinder the common interest and public good. Sir W. Temple. When interest calls of all her sneaking train. Pope. 4. Premium paid for the use of money, -- usually reckoned as a percentage; as, interest at five per cent per annum on ten thousand dollars. They have told their money, and let out Their coin upon large interest. Shak. 5. Any excess of advantage over and above an exact equivalent for what is given or rendered. You shall have your desires with interest. Shak. 6. The persons interested in any particular business or measure, taken collectively; as, the iron interest; the cotton interest. Compound interest, interest, not only on the original principal, but also on unpaid interest from the time it fell due. -- Simple interest, interest on the principal sum without interest on overdue interest.
rise: 1. To move from a lower position to a higher; to ascend; to mount up. Specifically: -- (a) To go upward by walking, climbing, flying, or any other voluntary motion; as, a bird rises in the air; a fish rises to the bait. (b) To ascend or float in a fluid, as gases or vapors in air, cork in water, and the like. (c) To move upward under the influence of a projecting force; as, a bullet rises in the air. (d) To grow upward; to attain a certain heght; as, this elm rises to the height of seventy feet. (e) To reach a higher level by increase of quantity or bulk; to swell; as, a river rises in its bed; the mercury rises in the thermometer. (f) To become erect; to assume an upright position; as, to rise from a chair or from a fall. (g) To leave one's bed; to arise; as, to rise early. He that would thrive, must rise by five. Old Proverb. (h) To tower up; to be heaved up; as, the Alps rise far above the sea. (i) To slope upward; as, a path, a line, or surface rises in this direction. "A rising ground." Dryden. (j) To retire; to give up a siege. He, rising with small honor from Gunza, . . . was gone. Knolles. (k) To swell or puff up in the process of fermentation; to become light, as dough, and the like. 2. To have the aspect or the effect of rising. Specifically: -- (a) To appear above the horizont, as the sun, moon, stars, and the like. "He maketh his sun to rise on the evil and the good." Matt. v. 45. (b) To become apparent; to emerge into sight; to come forth; to appear; as, an eruption rises on the skin; the land rises to view to one sailing toward the shore. (c) To become perceptible to other senses than sight; as, a noise rose on the air; odor rises from the flower. (d) To have a beginning; to proceed; to originate; as, rivers rise in lakes or springs. A scepter shall rise out of Israel. Num. xxiv. 17. Honor and shame from no condition rise. Pope. 3. To increase in size, force, or value; to proceed toward a climax. Specifically: -- (a) To increase in power or fury; -- said of wind or a storm, and hence, of passion. "High winde . . . began to rise, high passions -- anger, hate." Milton. (b) To become of higher value; to increase in price. Bullion is risen to six shillings . . . the ounce. Locke. (c) To become larger; to swell; -- said of a boil, tumor, and the like. (d) To increase in intensity; -- said of heat. (e) To become louder, or higher in pitch, as the voice. (f) To increase in amount; to enlarge; as, his expenses rose beyond his expectations. 4. In various figurative senses. Specifically: -- (a) To become excited, opposed, or hostile; to go to war; to take up arms; to rebel. At our heels all hell should rise With blackest insurrection. Milton. No more shall nation against nation rise. Pope. (b) To attain to a better social position; to be promoted; to excel; to succeed. Some rise by sin, and some by virtue fall. Shak. (c) To become more and more dignified or forcible; to increase in interest or power; -- said of style, thought, or discourse; as, to rise in force of expression; to rise in eloquence; a story rises in interest. (d) To come to mind; to be suggested; to occur. A thought rose in me, which often perplexes men of contemplative natures. Spectator. (e) To come; to offer itself. There chanced to the prince's hand to rise An ancient book. Spenser. 5. To ascend from the grave; to come to life. But now is Christ risen from the dead. 1. Cor. xv. 20. 6. To terminate an official sitting; to adjourn; as, the committee rose after agreeing to the report. It was near nine . . . before the House rose. Macaulay. 7. To ascend on a musical scale; to take a higher pith; as, to rise a tone or semitone. 8. (Print.)  To be lifted, or to admit of being lifted, from the imposing stone without dropping any of the type; -- said of a form. Syn. -- To arise; mount; ascend; climb; scale. -- Rise, Appreciate. Some in America use the word appreciate for "rise in value;" as, stocks appreciate, money appreciates, etc. This use is not unknown in England, but it is less common there. It is undesirable, because rise sufficiently expresses the idea, and appreciate has its own distinctive meaning, which ought not to be confused with one so entirely different.  1. The act of rising, or the state of being risen. 2. The distance through which anything rises; as, the rise of the thermometer was ten degrees; the rise of the river was six feet; the rise of an arch or of a step. 3. Land which is somewhat higher than the rest; as, the house stood on a rise of land. [Colloq.] 4. Spring; source; origin; as, the rise of a stream. All wickednes taketh its rise from the heart. R. Nelson. 5. Appearance above the horizon; as, the rise of the sun or of a planet. Shak. 6. Increase; advance; augmentation, as of price, value, rank, property, fame, and the like. The rise or fall that may happen in his constant revenue by a Spanish war. Sir W. Temple. 7. Increase of sound; a swelling of the voice. The ordinary rises and falls of the voice. Bacon. 8. Elevation or ascent of the voice; upward change of key; as, a rise of a tone or semitone. 9. The spring of a fish to seize food (as a fly) near the surface of the water.
place: 1. Any portion of space regarded as measured off or distinct from all other space, or appropriated to some definite object or use; position; ground; site; spot; rarely, unbounded space. Here is the place appointed. Shak. What place can be for us Within heaven's bound Milton. The word place has sometimes a more confused sense, and stands for that space which any body takes up; and so the universe is a place. Locke. 2. A broad way in a city; an open space; an area; a court or short part of a street open only at one end. "Hangman boys in the market place." Shak. 3. A position which is occupied and held; a dwelling; a mansion; a village, town, or city; a fortified town or post; a stronghold; a region or country. Are you native of this place Shak. 4. Rank; degree; grade; order of priority, advancement, dignity, or importance; especially, social rank or position; condition; also, official station; occupation; calling. "The enervating magic of place." Hawthorne. Men in great place are thrice servants. Bacon. I know my place as I would they should do theirs. Shak. 5. Vacated or relinquished space; room; stead (the departure or removal of another being or thing being implied). "In place of Lord Bassanio." Shak. 6. A definite position or passage of a document. The place of the scripture which he read was this. Acts viii. 32. 7. Ordinal relation; position in the order of proceeding; as, he said in the first place. 8. Reception; effect; -- implying the making room for. My word hath no place in you. John viii. 37. 9. (Astron.)  Position in the heavens, as of a heavenly body; -- usually defined by its right ascension and declination, or by its latitude and longitude. Place of arms (Mil.), a place calculated for the rendezvous of men in arms, etc., as a fort which affords a safe retreat for hospitals, magazines, etc. Wilhelm. -- High place (Script.), a mount on which sacrifices were offered. "Him that offereth in the high place." Jer. xlviii. 35. -- In place, in proper position; timely. -- Out of place, inappropriate; ill-timed; as, his remarks were out of place. -- Place kick (Football), the act of kicking the ball after it has been placed on the ground. -- Place name, the name of a place or locality. London Academy. -- To give place, to make room; to yield; to give way; to give advantage. "Neither give place to the devil." Eph. iv. 27. "Let all the rest give place." Shak. -- To have place, to have a station, room, or seat; as, such desires can have no place in a good heart. -- To take place. (a) To come to pass; to occur; as, the ceremony will not take place. (b) To take precedence or priority. Addison. (c) To take effect; to prevail. "If your doctrine takes place." Berkeley. "But none of these excuses would take place." Spenser. -- To take the place of, to be substituted for. Syn. -- Situation; seat; abode; position; locality; location; site; spot; office; employment; charge; function; trust; ground; room; stead.  1. To assign a place to; to put in a particular spot or place, or in a certain relative position; to direct to a particular place; to fix; to settle; to locate; as, to place a book on a shelf; to place balls in tennis. Upon my head they placed a fruitless crown. Shak. 2. To put or set in a particular rank, office, or position; to surround with particular circumstances or relations in life; to appoint to certain station or condition of life; as, in whatever sphere one is placed. Place such over them to be rulers. Ex. xviii. 21. 3. To put out at interest; to invest; to loan; as, to place money in a bank. 4. To set; to fix; to repose; as, to place confidence in a friend. "My resolution 's placed." Shak. 5. To attribute; to ascribe; to set down. Place it for her chief virtue. Shak. To place (a person), to identify him. [Colloq. U.S.] Syn. -- See Put.
town: 1. Formerly: (a) An inclosure which surrounded the mere homestead or dwelling of the lord of the manor. [Obs.] (b) The whole of the land which constituted the domain. [Obs.] (c) A collection of houses inclosed by fences or walls. [Obs.] Palsgrave. 2. Any number or collection of houses to which belongs a regular market, and which is not a city or the see of a bishop. [Eng.] Johnson. 3. Any collection of houses larger than a village, and not incorporated as a city; also, loosely, any large, closely populated place, whether incorporated or not, in distinction from the country, or from rural communities. God made the country, and man made the town. Cowper. 4. The body of inhabitants resident in a town; as, the town voted to send two representatives to the legislature; the town voted to lay a tax for repairing the highways. 5. A township; the whole territory within certain limits, less than those of a country. [U.S.] 6. The court end of London;-commonly with the. 7. The metropolis or its inhabitants; as, in winter the gentleman lives in town; in summer, in the country. Always hankering after the diversions of the town. Addison. Stunned with his giddy larum half the town. Pope. Note: The same form of expressions is used in regard to other populous towns. 8. A farm or farmstead; also, a court or farmyard. [Prov. Eng.& Scot.] Note: Town is often used adjectively or in combination with other words; as, town clerk, or town-clerk; town-crier, or town crier; townhall, town-hall, or town hall; townhouse, town house, or town- house. Syn. -- Village; hamlet. See Village. Town clerk, an office who keeps the records of a town, and enters its official proceedings. See Clerk. -- Town cress (Bot.), the garden cress, or peppergrass. Dr. Prior. -- Town house. (a) A house in town, in distinction from a house in the country. (b) See Townhouse. -- Town meeting, a legal meeting of the inhabitants of a town entitled to vote, for the transaction of public bisiness. [U.S.] -- Town talk, the common talk of a place; the subject or topic of common conversation.
gun: 1. A weapon which throws or propels a missile to a distance; any firearm or instrument for throwing projectiles by the explosion of gunpowder, consisting of a tube or barrel closed at one end, in which the projectile is placed, with an explosive charge behind, which is ignited by various means. Muskets, rifles, carbines, and fowling pieces are smaller guns, for hand use, and are called small arms. Larger guns are called cannon, ordnance, fieldpieces, carronades, howitzers, etc. See these terms in the Vocabulary. As swift as a pellet out of a gunne When fire is in the powder runne. Chaucer. The word gun was in use in England for an engine to cast a thing from a man long before there was any gunpowder found out. Selden. 2. (Mil.)  A piece of heavy ordnance; in a restricted sense, a cannon. 3. pl. (Naut.)  Violent blasts of wind. Note: Guns are classified, according to their construction or manner of loading as rifled or smoothbore, breech-loading or muzzle-loading, cast or built-up guns; or according to their use, as field, mountain, prairie, seacoast, and siege guns. Armstrong gun, a wrought iron breech-loading cannon named after its English inventor, Sir William Armstrong. -- Great gun, a piece of heavy ordnance; hence (Fig.), a person superior in any way. -- Gun barrel, the barrel or tube of a gun. -- Gun carriage, the carriage on which a gun is mounted or moved. -- Gun cotton (Chem.), a general name for a series of explosive nitric ethers of cellulose, obtained by steeping cotton in nitric and sulphuric acids. Although there are formed substances containing nitric acid radicals, yet the results exactly resemble ordinary cotton in appearance. It burns without ash, with explosion if confined, but quietly and harmlessly if free and open, and in small quantity. Specifically, the lower nitrates of cellulose which are insoluble in ether and alcohol in distinction from the highest (pyroxylin) which is soluble. See Pyroxylin, and cf. Xyloidin. The gun cottons are used for blasting and somewhat in gunnery: for making celluloid when compounded with camphor; and the soluble variety (pyroxylin) for making collodion. See Celluloid, and Collodion. Gun cotton is frequenty but improperly called nitrocellulose. It is not a nitro compound, but an ethereal salt of nitric acid. -- Gun deck. See under Deck. -- Gun fire, the time at which the morning or the evening gun is fired. -- Gun metal, a bronze, ordinarily composed of nine parts of copper and one of tin, used for cannon, etc. The name is also given to certain strong mixtures of cast iron. -- Gun port (Naut.), an opening in a ship through which a cannon's muzzle is run out for firing. -- Gun tackle (Naut.), the blocks and pulleys affixed to the side of a ship, by which a gun carriage is run to and from the gun port. -- Gun tackle purchase (Naut.), a tackle composed of two single blocks and a fall. Totten. -- Krupp gun, a wrought steel breech-loading cannon, named after its German inventor, Herr Krupp. -- Machine gun, a breech-loading gun or a group of such guns, mounted on a carriage or other holder, and having a reservoir containing cartridges which are loaded into the gun or guns and fired in rapid succession, sometimes in volleys, by machinery operated by turning a crank. Several hundred shots can be fired in a minute with accurate aim. The Gatling gun, Gardner gun, Hotchkiss gun, and Nordenfelt gun, named for their inventors, and the French mitrailleuse, are machine guns. -- To blow great guns (Naut.), to blow a gale. See Gun, n., 3.  To practice fowling or hunting small game; -- chiefly in participial form; as, to go gunning.
name: 1. The title by which any person or thing is known or designated; a distinctive specific appellation, whether of an individual or a class. Whatsoever Adam called every living creature, that was the name thereof. Gen. ii. 19. What's in a name That which we call a rose By any other name would smell as sweet. Shak. 2. A descriptive or qualifying appellation given to a person or thing, on account of a character or acts. His name shall be called Wonderful, Counsellor, The mighty God, The everlasting Father, The Prince of Peace. Is. ix. 6. 3. Reputed character; reputation, good or bad; estimation; fame; especially, illustrious character or fame; honorable estimation; distinction. What men of name resort to him Shak. Far above ... every name that is named, not only in this world, but also in that which is to come. Eph. i. 21. I will get me a name and honor in the kingdom. 1 Macc. iii. 14. He hath brought up an evil name upon a virgin. Deut. xxii. 19. The king's army ...had left no good name behind. Clarendon. 4. Those of a certain name; a race; a family. The ministers of the republic, mortal enemies of his name, came every day to pay their feigned civilities. Motley. 5. A person, an individual. [Poetic] They list with women each degenerate name. Dryden. Christian name. (a) The name a person receives at baptism, as distinguished from surname; baptismal name. (b) A given name, whether received at baptism or not. -- Given name. See under Given. -- In name, in profession, or by title only; not in reality; as, a friend in name. -- In the name of. (a) In behalf of; by the authority of. " I charge you in the duke's name to obey me." Shak. (b) In the represented or assumed character of. " I'll to him again in name of Brook." Shak. -- Name plate, a plate as of metal, glass, etc., having a name upon it, as a sign; a doorplate. -- Pen name, a name assumed by an author; a pseudonym or nom de plume. Bayard Taylor. -- Proper name (Gram.), a name applied to a particular person, place, or thing. -- To call names, to apply opprobrious epithets to; to call by reproachful appellations. -- To take a name in vain, to use a name lightly or profanely; to use a name in making flippant or dishonest oaths. Ex. xx. 7. Syn. -- Appellation; title; designation; cognomen; denomination; epithet. -- Name, Appellation, Title, Denomination. Name is generic, denoting that combination of sounds or letters by which a person or thing is known and distinguished. Appellation, although sometimes put for name simply, denotes, more properly, a descriptive term, used by way of marking some individual peculiarity or characteristic; as, Charles the Bold, Philip the Stammerer. A title is a term employed to point out one's rank, office, etc.; as, the Duke of Bedford, Paul the Apostle, etc. Denomination is to particular bodies what appellation is to individuals; thus, the church of Christ is divided into different denominations, as Congregationalists, Episcopalians, Presbyterians, etc.  1. To give a distinctive name or appellation to; to entitle; to denominate; to style; to call. She named the child Ichabod. 1 Sam. iv. 21. Thus was the building left Ridiculous, and the work Confusion named. Milton. 2. To mention by name; to utter or publish the name of; to refer to by distinctive title; to mention. None named thee but to praise. Halleck. Old Yew, which graspest at the stones That name the underlying dead. Tennyson. 3. To designate by name or specifically for any purpose; to nominate; to specify; to appoint; as, to name a day for the wedding. Whom late you have named for consul. Shak. 4. (House of Commons)  To designate (a member) by name, as the Speaker does by way of reprimand. Syn. -- To denominate; style; term; call; mention; specify; designate; nominate.
mountain: 1. A large mass of earth and rock, rising above the common level of the earth or adjacent land; earth and rock forming an isolated peak or a ridge; an eminence higher than a hill; a mount. 2. pl.  A range, chain, or group of such elevations; as, the White Mountains. 3. A mountainlike mass; something of great bulk. I should have been a mountain of mummy. Shak. The Mountain (La montagne) (French Hist.), a popular name given in 1793 to a party of extreme Jacobins in the National Convention, who occupied the highest rows of seats.  1. Of or pertaining to a mountain or mountains; growing or living on a mountain; found on or peculiar to mountains; among mountains; as, a mountain torrent; mountain pines; mountain goats; mountain air; mountain howitzer. 2. Like a mountain; mountainous; vast; very great. The high, the mountain majesty of worth. Byron. Mountain anthelope (Zoöl.), the goral. -- Mountain ash (Bot.), an ornamental tree, the Pyrus (Sorbus) Americana, producing beautiful bunches of red berries. Its leaves are pinnate, and its flowers white, growing in fragrant clusters. The European species is the P. aucuparia, or rowan tree. -- Mountain barometer, a portable barometer, adapted for safe transportation, used in measuring the heights of mountains. -- Mountain beaver (Zoöl.), the sewellel. -- Mountain blue (Min.), blue carbonate of copper; azurite. -- Mountain cat (Zoöl.), the catamount. See Catamount. -- Mountain chain, a series of contiguous mountain ranges, generally in parallel or consecutive lines or curves. -- Mountain cock (Zoöl.), capercailzie. See Capercailzie. -- Mountain cork (Min.), a variety of asbestus, resembling cork in its texture. -- Mountain crystal. See under Crystal. -- Mountain damson (Bot.), a large tree of the genus Simaruba (S. amarga) growing in the West Indies, which affords a bitter tonic and astringent, sometimes used in medicine. -- Mountain dew, Scotch whisky, so called because often illicitly distilled among the mountains. [Humorous] -- Mountain ebony (Bot.), a small leguminous tree (Bauhinia variegata) of the East and West Indies; -- so called because of its dark wood. The bark is used medicinally and in tanning. -- Mountain flax (Min.), a variety of asbestus, having very fine fibers; amianthus. See Amianthus. -- Mountain fringe (Bot.), climbing fumitory. See under Fumitory. -- Mountain goat. (Zoöl.) See Mazama. -- Mountain green. (Min.) (a) Green malachite, or carbonate of copper. (b) See Green earth, under Green, a. -- Mountain holly (Bot.), a branching shrub (Nemopanthes Canadensis), having smooth oblong leaves and red berries. It is found in the Northern United States. -- Mountain laurel (Bot.), an American shrub (Kalmia latifolia) with glossy evergreen leaves and showy clusters of rose-colored or white flowers. The foliage is poisonous. Called also American laurel, ivy bush, and calico bush. See Kalmia. -- Mountain leather (Min.), a variety of asbestus, resembling leather in its texture. -- Mountain licorice (Bot.), a plant of the genus Trifolium (T. Alpinum). -- Mountain limestone (Geol.), a series of marine limestone strata below the coal measures, and above the old red standstone of Great Britain. See Chart of Geology. -- Mountain linnet (Zoöl.), the twite. -- Mountain magpie. (Zoöl.) (a) The yaffle, or green woodpecker. (b) The European gray shrike. -- Mountain mahogany (Bot.) See under Mahogany. -- Mountain meal (Min.), a light powdery variety of calcite, occurring as an efflorescence. -- Mountain milk (Min.), a soft spongy variety of carbonate of lime. -- Mountain mint. (Bot.) See Mint. -- Mountain ousel (Zoöl.), the ring ousel; -- called also mountain thrush and mountain colley. See Ousel. -- Mountain pride, or Mountain green (Bot.), a tree of Jamaica (Spathelia simplex), which has an unbranched palmlike stem, and a terminal cluster of large, pinnate leaves. -- Mountain quail (Zoöl.), the plumed partridge (Oreortyx pictus) of California. It has two long, slender, plumelike feathers on the head. The throat and sides are chestnut; the belly is brown with transverse bars of black and white; the neck and breast are dark gray. -- Mountain range, a series of mountains closely related in position and direction. -- Mountain rice. (Bot.) (a) An upland variety of rice, grown without irrigation, in some parts of Asia, Europe, and the United States. (b) An American genus of grasses (Oryzopsis). -- Mountain rose (Bot.), a species of rose with solitary flowers, growing in the mountains of Europe (Rosa alpina). -- Mountain soap (Min.), a soft earthy mineral, of a brownish color, used in crayon painting; saxonite. -- Mountain sorrel (Bot.), a low perennial plant (Oxyria digyna with rounded kidney-form leaves, and small greenish flowers, found in the White Mountains of New Hampshire, and in high northern latitudes. Gray. -- Mountain sparrow (Zoöl.), the European tree sparrow. -- Mountain spinach. (Bot.) See Orach. -- Mountain tobacco (Bot.), a composite plant (Arnica montana) of Europe; called also leopard's bane. -- Mountain witch (Zoöl.), a ground pigeon of Jamaica, of the genus Geotrygon.
hear: 1. To perceive by the ear; to apprehend or take cognizance of by the ear; as, to hear sounds; to hear a voice; to hear one call. Lay thine ear close to the ground, and list if thou canst hear the tread of travelers. Shak. He had been heard to utter an ominous growl. Macaulay. 2. To give audience or attention to; to listen to; to heed; to accept the doctrines or advice of; to obey; to examine; to try in a judicial court; as, to hear a recitation; to hear a class; the case will be heard to-morrow. 3. To attend, or be present at, as hearer or worshiper; as, to hear a concert; to hear Mass. 4. To give attention to as a teacher or judge. Thy matters are good and right, but there is no man deputed of the king to hear thee. 2 Sam. xv. 3. I beseech your honor to hear me one single word. Shak. 5. To accede to the demand or wishes of; to listen to and answer favorably; to favor. I love the Lord, because he hath heard my voice. Ps. cxvi. 1. They think that they shall be heard for their much speaking. Matt. vi. 7. Hear him. See Remark, under Hear, v. i. -- To hear a bird sing, to receive private communication. [Colloq.] Shak. -- To hear say, to hear one say; to learn by common report; to receive by rumor. [Colloq.]  1. To have the sense or faculty of perceiving sound. "The Hearing ear." Prov. xx. 12. 2. To use the power of perceiving sound; to perceive or apprehend by the ear; to attend; to listen. So spake our mother Eve, and Adam heard, Well pleased, but answered not. Milton. 3. To be informed by oral communication; to be told; to receive information by report or by letter. I have heard, sir, of such a man. Shak. I must hear from thee every day in the hour. Shak. To hear ill, to be blamed. [Obs.] Not only within his own camp, but also now at Rome, he heard ill for his temporizing and slow proceedings. Holland. -- To hear well, to be praised. [Obs.] Note: Hear, or Hear him, is often used in the imperative, especially in the course of a speech in English assemblies, to call attention to the words of the speaker. Hear him, . . . a cry indicative, according to the tone, of admiration, acquiescence, indignation, or derision. Macaulay.
ship: Pay; reward. [Obs.] In withholding or abridging of the ship or the hire or the wages of servants. Chaucer.  1. Any large seagoing vessel. Like a stately ship . . . With all her bravery on, and tackle trim, Sails filled, and streamers waving. Milton. Thou, too, sail on, O Ship of State! Longfellow. 2. Specifically, a vessel furnished with a bowsprit and three masts (a mainmast, a foremast, and a mizzenmast), each of which is composed of a lower mast, a topmast, and a topgallant mast, and square-rigged on all masts. See Illustation in Appendix. l Port or Larboard Side; s Starboard Side; 1 Roundhouse or Deck House; 2 Tiller; 3 Grating; 4 Wheel; 5 Wheel Chains; 6 Binnacle; 7 Mizzenmast; 8 Skylight; 9 Capstan; 10 Mainmast; 11 Pumps; 12 Galley or Caboose; 13 Main Hatchway; 14 Windlass; 15 Foremast; 16 Fore Hatchway; 17 Bitts; 18 Bowsprit; 19 Head Rail; 20 Boomkins; 21 Catheads on Port Bow and Starboard Bow; 22 Fore Chains; 23 Main Chains; 24 Mizzen Chains; 25 Stern. 1 Fore Royal Stay; 2 Flying Jib Stay; 3 Fore Topgallant Stay;4 Jib Stay; 5 Fore Topmast Stays; 6 Fore Tacks; 8 Flying Martingale; 9 Martingale Stay, shackled to Dolphin Striker; 10 Jib Guys; 11 Jumper Guys; 12 Back Ropes; 13 Robstays; 14 Flying Jib Boom; 15 Flying Jib Footropes; 16 Jib Boom; 17 Jib Foottropes; 18 Bowsprit; 19 Fore Truck; 20 Fore Royal Mast; 21 Fore Royal Lift; 22 Fore Royal Yard; 23 Fore Royal Backstays; 24 Fore Royal Braces; 25 Fore Topgallant Mast and Rigging; 26 Fore Topgallant Lift; 27 Fore Topgallant Yard; 28 Fore Topgallant Backstays; 29 Fore Topgallant Braces; 30 Fore Topmast and Rigging; 31 Fore Topsail Lift; 32 Fore Topsail Yard; 33 Fore Topsail Footropes; 34 Fore Topsail Braces; 35 Fore Yard; 36 Fore Brace; 37 Fore Lift; 38 Fore Gaff; 39 Fore Trysail Vangs; 40 Fore Topmast Studding-sail Boom; 41 Foremast and Rigging; 42 Fore Topmast Backstays; 43 Fore Sheets; 44 Main Truck and Pennant; 45 Main Royal Mast and Backstay; 46 Main Royal Stay; 47 Main Royal Lift; 48 Main Royal Yard; 49 Main Royal Braces; 50 Main Topgallant Mast and Rigging; 51 Main Topgallant Lift; 52 Main Topgallant Backstays; 53 Main Topgallant Yard; 54 Main Topgallant Stay; 55 Main Topgallant Braces; 56 Main Topmast and Rigging; 57 Topsail Lift; 58 Topsail Yard; 59 Topsail Footropes; 60 Topsail Braces; 61 Topmast Stays; 62 Main Topgallant Studding-sail Boom; 63 Main Topmast Backstay; 64 Main Yard; 65 Main Footropes; 66 Mainmast and Rigging; 67 Main Lift; 68 Main Braces; 69 Main Tacks; 70 Main Sheets; 71 Main Trysail Gaff; 72 Main Trysail Vangs; 73 Main Stays; 74 Mizzen Truck; 75 Mizzen Royal Mast and Rigging; 76 Mizzen Royal Stay; 77 Mizzen Royal Lift; 78 Mizzen Royal Yard; 79 Mizzen Royal Braces; 80 Mizzen Topgallant Mast and Rigging; 81 Mizzen Topgallant Lift; 82 Mizzen Topgallant Backstays; 83 Mizzen Topgallant Braces; 84 Mizzen Topgallant Yard; 85 Mizzen Topgallant Stay; 86 Mizzen Topmast and Rigging; 87 Mizzen Topmast Stay; 88 Mizzen Topsail Lift; 89 Mizzen Topmast Backstays; 90 Mizzen Topsail Braces; 91 Mizzen Topsail Yard; 92 Mizzen Topsail Footropes; 93 Crossjack Yard; 94 Crossjack Footropes; 95 Crossjack Lift; 96 Crossjack Braces; 97 Mizzenmast and Rigging; 98 Mizzen Stay; 99 Spanker Gaff; 100 Peak Halyards; 101 Spanker Vangs; 102 Spanker Boom; 103 Spanker Boom Topping Lift; 104 Jacob's Ladder, or Stern Ladder; 105 Spanker Sheet; 106 Cutwater; 107 Starboard Bow; 108 Starboard Beam; 109 Water Line; 110 Starboard Quarter; 111 Rudder. 3. A dish or utensil (originally fashioned like the hull of a ship) used to hold incense. [Obs.] Tyndale. Armed ship, a private ship taken into the service of the government in time of war, and armed and equipped like a ship of war. [Eng.] Brande & C. -- General ship. See under General. -- Ship biscuit, hard biscuit prepared for use on shipboard; -- called also ship bread. See Hardtack. -- Ship boy, a boy who serves in a ship. "Seal up the ship boy's eyes." Shak. -- Ship breaker, one who breaks up vessels when unfit for further use. -- Ship broker, a mercantile agent employed in buying and selling ships, procuring cargoes, etc., and generally in transacting the business of a ship or ships when in port. -- Ship canal, a canal suitable for the passage of seagoing vessels. -- Ship carpenter, a carpenter who works at shipbuilding; a shipwright. -- Ship chandler, one who deals in cordage, canvas, and other, furniture of vessels. -- Ship chandlery, the commodities in which a ship chandler deals; also, the business of a ship chandler. -- Ship fever (Med.), a form of typhus fever; -- called also putrid, jail, or hospital fever. -- Ship joiner, a joiner who works upon ships. -- Ship letter, a letter conveyed by a ship not a mail packet. -- Ship money (Eng. Hist.), an imposition formerly charged on the ports, towns, cities, boroughs, and counties, of England, for providing and furnishing certain ships for the king's service. The attempt made by Charles I. to revive and enforce this tax was resisted by John Hampden, and was one of the causes which led to the death of Charles. It was finally abolished. -- Ship of the line. See under Line. -- Ship pendulum, a pendulum hung amidships to show the extent of the rolling and pitching of a vessel. -- Ship railway. (a) An inclined railway with a cradelike car, by means of which a ship may be drawn out of water, as for repairs. (b) A railway arranged for the transportation of vessels overland between two water courses or harbors. -- Ship's company, the crew of a ship or other vessel. -- Ship's days, the days allowed a vessel for loading or unloading. -- Ship's husband. See under Husband. -- Ship's papers (Mar. Law), papers with which a vessel is required by law to be provided, and the production of which may be required on certain occasions. Among these papers are the register, passport or sea letter, charter party, bills of lading, invoice, log book, muster roll, bill of health, etc. Bouvier. Kent. -- To make ship, to embark in a ship or other vessel.  1. To put on board of a ship, or vessel of any kind, for transportation; to send by water. The timber was . . . shipped in the bay of Attalia, from whence it was by sea transported to Pelusium. Knolles. 2. By extension, in commercial usage, to commit to any conveyance for transportation to a distance; as, to ship freight by railroad. 3. Hence, to send away; to get rid of. [Colloq.] 4. To engage or secure for service on board of a ship; as, to ship seamen. 5. To receive on board ship; as, to ship a sea. 6. To put in its place; as, to ship the tiller or rudder.  1. To engage to serve on board of a vessel; as, to ship on a man-of- war. 2. To embark on a ship. Wyclif (Acts xxviii. 11)
segment: 1. One of the parts into which any body naturally separates or is divided; a part divided or cut off; a section; a portion; as, a segment of an orange; a segment of a compound or divided leaf. 2. (Geom.)  A part cut off from a figure by a line or plane; especially, that part of a circle contained between a chord and an arc of that circle, or so much of the circle as is cut off by the chord; as, the segment acb in the Illustration. 3. (Mach.) (a) A piece in the form of the sector of a circle, or part of a ring; as, the segment of a sectional fly wheel or flywheel rim. (b) A segment gear. 4. (Biol.) (a) One of the cells or division formed by segmentation, as in egg cleavage or in fissiparous cell formation. (b) One of the divisions, rings, or joints into which many animal bodies are divided; a somite; a metamere; a somatome. Segment gear, a piece for receiving or communicating reciprocating motion from or to a cogwheel, consisting of a sector of a circular gear, or ring, having cogs on the periphery, or face. -- Segment of a line, the part of a line contained between two points on it. -- Segment of a sphere, the part of a sphere cut off by a plane, or included between two parallel planes. -- Ventral segment. (Acoustics) See Loor, n., 5.  To divide or separate into parts in growth; to undergo segmentation, or cleavage, as in the segmentation of the ovum.
arm: 1. The limb of the human body which extends from the shoulder to the hand; also, the corresponding limb of a monkey. 2. Anything resembling an arm; as, (a) The fore limb of an animal, as of a bear. (b) A limb, or locomotive or prehensile organ, of an invertebrate animal. (c) A branch of a tree. (d) A slender part of an instrument or machine, projecting from a trunk, axis, or fulcrum; as, the arm of a steelyard. (e) (Naut) The end of a yard; also, the part of an anchor which ends in the fluke. (f) An inlet of water from the sea. (g) A support for the elbow, at the side of a chair, the end of a sofa, etc. 3. Fig.: Power; might; strength; support; as, the secular arm; the arm of the law. To whom is the arm of the Lord revealed Isa. lii. 1. Arm's end, the end of the arm; a good distance off. Dryden. -- Arm's length, the length of the arm. -- Arm's reach, reach of the arm; the distance the arm can reach. -- To go (or walk) arm in arm, to go with the arm or hand of one linked in the arm of another. "When arm in armwe went along." Tennyson. -- To keep at arm's length, to keep at a distance (literally or figuratively); not to allow to come into close contact or familiar intercourse. -- To work at arm's length, to work disadvantageously.  (a) A branch of the military service; as, the cavalry arm was made efficient. (b) A weapon of offense or defense; an instrument of warfare; -- commonly in the pl.  1. To take by the arm; to take up in one's arms. [Obs.] And make him with our pikes and partisans A grave: come, arm him. Shak. Arm your prize; I know you will not lose him. Two N. Kins. 2. To furnish with arms or limbs. [R.] His shoulders broad and strong, Armed long and round. Beau. & Fl. 3. To furnish or equip with weapons of offense or defense; as, to arm soldiers; to arm the country. Abram . . . armed his trained servants. Gen. xiv. 14. 4. To cover or furnish with a plate, or with whatever will add strength, force, security, or efficiency; as, to arm the hit of a sword; to arm a hook in angling. 5. Fig.: To furnish with means of defense; to prepare for resistance; to fortify, in a moral sense. Arm yourselves . . . with the same mind. 1 Pet. iv. 1. To arm a magnet, to fit it with an armature.  To provide one's self with arms, weapons, or means of attack or resistance; to take arms. " 'Tis time to arm." Shak.
sign: That by which anything is made known or represented; that which furnishes evidence; a mark; a token; an indication; a proof. Specifically: (a) A remarkable event, considered by the ancients as indicating the will of some deity; a prodigy; an omen. (b) An event considered by the Jews as indicating the divine will, or as manifesting an interposition of the divine power for some special end; a miracle; a wonder. Through mighty signs and wonders, by the power of the Spirit of God. Rom. xv. 19. It shall come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither hearken to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the voice of the latter sign. Ex. iv. 8. (c) Something serving to indicate the existence, or preserve the memory, of a thing; a token; a memorial; a monument. What time the fire devoured two hundred and fifty men, and they became a sign. Num. xxvi. 10. (d) Any symbol or emblem which prefigures, typifles, or represents, an idea; a type; hence, sometimes, a picture. The holy symbols, or signs, are not barely significative; but what they represent is as certainly delivered to us as the symbols themselves. Brerewood. Saint George of Merry England, the sign of victory. Spenser. (e) A word or a character regarded as the outward manifestation of thought; as, words are the sign of ideas. (f) A motion, an action, or a gesture by which a thought is expressed, or a command or a wish made known. They made signs to his father, how he would have him called. Luke i. 62. (g) Hence, one of the gestures of pantomime, or of a language of a signs such as those used by the North American Indians, or those used by the deaf and dumb. Note: Educaters of the deaf distinguish between natural signs, which serve for communicating ideas, and methodical, or systematic, signs, adapted for the dictation, or the rendering, of written language, word by word; and thus the signs are to be distinguished from the manual alphabet, by which words are spelled on the fingers. (h) A military emblem carried on a banner or a standard. Milton. (i) A lettered board, or other conspicuous notice, placed upon or before a building, room, shop, or office to advertise the business there transacted, or the name of the person or firm carrying it on; a publicly displayed token or notice. The shops were, therefore, distinguished by painted signs, which gave a gay and grotesque aspect to the streets. Macaulay. (j) (Astron.)  The twelfth part of the ecliptic or zodiac. Note: The signs are reckoned from the point of intersection of the ecliptic and equator at the vernal equinox, and are named, respectively, Aries (Taurus (Gemini (II), Cancer (Leo (Virgo (Libra (Scorpio (Sagittarius (Capricornus (Aquarius (Pisces ( (k) (Alg.) A character indicating the relation of quantities, or an operation performed upon them; as, the sign + (plus); the sign -- (minus); the sign of division ÷, and the like. (l) (Med.) An objective evidence of disease; that is, one appreciable by some one other than the patient. Note: The terms symptom and and sign are often used synonymously; but they may be discriminated. A sign differs from a symptom in that the latter is perceived only by the patient himself. The term sign is often further restricted to the purely local evidences of disease afforded by direct examination of the organs involved, as distinguished from those evidence of general disturbance afforded by observation of the temperature, pulse, etc. In this sense it is often called physical sign. (m) (Mus.) Any character, as a flat, sharp, dot, etc. (n) (Theol.) That which, being external, stands for, or signifies, something internal or spiritual; -- a term used in the Church of England in speaking of an ordinance considered with reference to that which it represents. An outward and visible sign of an inward and spiritual grace. Bk. of Common Prayer. Note: See the Table of Arbitrary Signs, p. 1924. Sign manual. (a) (Eng. Law) The royal signature superscribed at the top of bills of grants and letter patent, which are then sealed with the privy signet or great seal, as the case may be, to complete their validity. (b) The signature of one's name in one's own handwriting. Craig. Tomlins. Wharton. Syn. -- Token; mark; note; symptom; indication; signal; symbol; type; omen; prognostic; presage; manifestation. See Emblem.  1. To represent by a sign; to make known in a typical or emblematic manner, in distinction from speech; to signify. I signed to Browne to make his retreat. Sir W. Scott. 2. To make a sign upon; to mark with a sign. We receive this child into the congregation of Christ's flock, and do sign him with the sign of the cross. Bk. of Com Prayer. 3. To affix a signature to; to ratify by hand or seal; to subscribe in one's own handwriting. Inquire the Jew's house out, give him this deed, And let him sign it. Shak. 4. To assign or convey formally; -- used with away. 5. To mark; to make distinguishable. Shak.  1. To be a sign or omen. [Obs.] Shak. 2. To make a sign or signal; to communicate directions or intelligence by signs. 3. To write one's name, esp. as a token of assent, responsibility, or obligation.
form: A suffix used to denote in the form or shape of, resembling, etc.; as, valiform; oviform.  1. The shape and structure of anything, as distinguished from the material of which it is composed; particular disposition or arrangement of matter, giving it individuality or distinctive character; configuration; figure; external appearance. The form of his visage was changed. Dan. iii. 19. And woven close close, both matter, form, and style. Milton. 2. Constitution; mode of construction, organization, etc.; system; as, a republican form of government. 3. Established method of expression or practice; fixed way of proceeding; conventional or stated scheme; formula; as, a form of prayer. Those whom form of laws Condemned to die. Dryden. 4. Show without substance; empty, outside appearance; vain, trivial, or conventional ceremony; conventionality; formality; as, a matter of mere form. Though well we may not pass upon his life Without the form of justice. Shak. 5. Orderly arrangement; shapeliness; also, comeliness; elegance; beauty. The earth was without form and void. Gen. i. 2. He hath no form nor comeliness. Is. liii. 2. 6. A shape; an image; a phantom. 7. That by which shape is given or determined; mold; pattern; model. 8. A long seat; a bench; hence, a rank of students in a school; a class; also, a class or rank in society. "Ladies of a high form." Bp. Burnet. 9. The seat or bed of a hare. As in a form sitteth a weary hare. Chaucer. 10. (Print.)  The type or other matter from which an impression is to be taken, arranged and secured in a chase. 11. (Fine Arts)  The boundary line of a material object. In painting, more generally, the human body. 12. (Gram.)  The particular shape or structure of a word or part of speech; as, participial forms; verbal forms. 13. (Crystallog.)  The combination of planes included under a general crystallographic symbol. It is not necessarily a closed solid. 14. (Metaph.)  That assemblage or disposition of qualities which makes a conception, or that internal constitution which makes an existing thing to be what it is; -- called essential or substantial form, and contradistinguished from matter; hence, active or formative nature; law of being or activity; subjectively viewed, an idea; objectively, a law. 15. Mode of acting or manifestation to the senses, or the intellect; as, water assumes the form of ice or snow. In modern usage, the elements of a conception furnished by the mind's own activity, as contrasted with its object or condition, which is called the matter; subjectively, a mode of apprehension or belief conceived as dependent on the constitution of the mind; objectively, universal and necessary accompaniments or elements of every object known or thought of. 16. (Biol.)  The peculiar characteristics of an organism as a type of others; also, the structure of the parts of an animal or plant. Good form or Bad form, the general appearance, condition or action, originally of horses, atterwards of persons; as, the members of a boat crew are said to be in good form when they pull together uniformly. The phrases are further used colloquially in description of conduct or manners in society; as, it is not good form to smoke in the presence of a lady.  1. To give form or shape to; to frame; to construct; to make; to fashion. God formed man of the dust of the ground. Gen. ii. 7. The thought that labors in my forming brain. Rowe. 2. To give a particular shape to; to shape, mold, or fashion into a certain state or condition; to arrange; to adjust; also, to model by instruction and discipline; to mold by influence, etc.; to train. 'T is education forms the common mind. Pope. Thus formed for speed, he challenges the wind. Dryden. 3. To go to make up; to act as constituent of; to be the essential or constitutive elements of; to answer for; to make the shape of; -- said of that out of which anything is formed or constituted, in whole or in part. The diplomatic politicians . . . who formed by far the majority. Burke. 4. To provide with a form, as a hare. See Form, n., 9. The melancholy hare is formed in brakes and briers. Drayton. 5. (Gram.)  To derive by grammatical rules, as by adding the proper suffixes and affixes.  1. To take a form, definite shape, or arrangement; as, the infantry should form in column. 2. To run to a form, as a hare. B. Jonson. To form on (Mil.), to form a lengthened line with reference to (any given object) as a basis.
wish: 1. To have a desire or yearning; to long; to hanker. They cast four anchors out of the stern, and wished for the day. Acts xxvii. 29. This is as good an argument as an antiquary could wish for. Arbuthnot.  1. To desire; to long for; to hanker after; to have a mind or disposition toward. I would not wish Any companion in the world but you. Shak. I wish above all things that thou mayest prosper. 3. John 2. 2. To frame or express desires concerning; to invoke in favor of, or against, any one; to attribute, or cal down, in desire; to invoke; to imprecate. I would not wish them to a fairer death. Shak. I wish it may not prove some ominous foretoken of misfortune to have met with such a miser as I am. Sir P. Sidney. Let them be driven backward, and put to shame, that wish me evil. Ps. xl. 14. 3. To recommend; to seek confidence or favor in behalf of. [Obs.] Shak. I would be glad to thrive, sir, And I was wished to your worship by a gentleman. B. Jonson. Syn. -- See Desire.  1. Desire; eager desire; longing. Behold, I am according to thy wish in God a stead. Job xxxiii. 6. 2. Expression of desire; request; petition; hence, invocation or imprecation. Blistered be thy tongue for such a wish. Shak. 3. A thing desired; an object of desire. Will he, wise, let loose at once his ire . . . To give his enemies their wish! Milton.
toward: 1. In the direction of; to. He set his face toward the wilderness. Num. xxiv. 1. The waves make towards'' the pebbled shore. Shak. 2. With direction to, in a moral sense; with respect or reference to; regarding; concerning. His eye shall be evil toward his brother. Deut. xxviii. 54. Herein do I exercise myself, to have always a conscience void of offense toward God, and toward men. Acts xxiv. 16. 3. Tending to; in the direction of; in behalf of. This was the first alarm England received towards any trouble. Clarendom. 4. Near; about; approaching to. I am toward nine years older since I left you. Swift.  Near; at hand; in state of preparation. Do you hear sught, sir, of a battle toward Shak. We have a trifling foolish banquet Towards. Shak.  1. Approaching; coming near. "His toward peril." Spenser. 2. Readly to do or learn; compliant with duty; not froward; apt; docile; tractable; as, a toward youth. 3. Ready to act; forward; bold; valiant. Why, that is spoken like a toward prince. Shak.
job: 1. A sudden thrust or stab; a jab. 2. A piece of chance or occasional work; any definite work undertaken in gross for a fixed price; as, he did the job for a thousand dollars. 3. A public transaction done for private profit; something performed ostensibly as a part of official duty, but really for private gain; a corrupt official business. 4. Any affair or event which affects one, whether fortunately or unfortunately. [Colloq.] 5. A situation or opportunity of work; as, he lost his job. [Colloq.] Note: Job is used adjectively to signify doing jobs, used for jobs, or let on hire to do jobs; as, job printer; job master; job horse; job wagon, etc. By the job, at a stipulated sum for the work, or for each piece of work done; -- distinguished from time work; as, the house was built by the job. -- Job lot, a quantity of goods, usually miscellaneous, sold out of the regular course of trade, at a certain price for the whole; as, these articles were included in a job lot. -- Job master, one who lest out horses and carriages for hire, as for family use. [Eng.] -- Job printer, one who does miscellaneous printing, esp. circulars, cards, billheads, etc. -- Odd job, miscellaneous work of a petty kind; occasional work, of various kinds, or for various people.  1. To strike or stab with a pointed instrument. L'Estrange. 2. To thrust in, as a pointed instrument. Moxon. 3. To do or cause to be done by separate portions or lots; to sublet (work); as, to job a contract. 4. (Com.)  To buy and sell, as a broker; to purchase of importers or manufacturers for the purpose of selling to retailers; as, to job goods. 5. To hire or let by the job or for a period of service; as, to job a carriage. Thackeray.  1. To do chance work for hire; to work by the piece; to do petty work. Authors of all work, to job for the season. Moore. 2. To seek private gain under pretense of public service; to turn public matters to private advantage. And judges job, and bishops bite the town. Pope. 3. To carry on the business of a jobber in merchandise or stocks.  The hero of the book of that name in the Old Testament; the typical patient man. Job's comforter. (a) A false friend; a tactless or malicious person who, under pretense of sympathy, insinuates rebukes. (b) A boil. [Colloq.] -- Job's news, bad news. Carlyle. -- Job's tears (Bot.), a kind of grass (Coix Lacryma), with hard, shining, pearly grains.
state: 1. The circumstances or condition of a being or thing at any given time. State is a term nearly synonymous with "mode," but of a meaning more extensive, and is not exclusively limited to the mutable and contingent. Sir W. Hamilton. Declare the past and present state of things. Dryden. Keep the state of the question in your eye. Boyle. 2. Rank; condition; quality; as, the state of honor. Thy honor, state, and seat is due to me. Shak. 3. Condition of prosperity or grandeur; wealthy or prosperous circumstances; social importance. She instructed him how he should keep state, and yet with a modest sense of his misfortunes. Bacon. Can this imperious lord forget to reign, Quit all his state, descend, and serve again Pope. 4. Appearance of grandeur or dignity; pomp. Where least og state there most of love is shown. Dryden. 5. A chair with a canopy above it, often standing on a dais; a seat of dignity; also, the canopy itself. [Obs.] His high throne, . . . under state Of richest texture spread. Milton. When he went to court, he used to kick away the state, and sit down by his prince cheek by jowl. Swift. 6. Estate, possession. [Obs.] Daniel. Your state, my lord, again in yours. Massinger. 7. A person of high rank. [Obs.] Latimer. 8. Any body of men united by profession, or constituting a community of a particular character; as, the civil and ecclesiastical states, or the lords spiritual and temporal and the commons, in Great Britain. Cf. Estate, n., 6. 9. The principal persons in a government. The bold design Pleased highly those infernal states. Milton. 10. The bodies that constitute the legislature of a country; as, the States-general of Holland. 11. A form of government which is not monarchial, as a republic. [Obs.] Well monarchies may own religion's name, But states are atheists in their very fame. Dryden. 12. A political body, or body politic; the whole body of people who are united one government, whatever may be the form of the government; a nation. Municipal law is a rule of conduct prescribed by the supreme power in a state. Blackstone. The Puritans in the reign of Mary, driven from their homes, sought an asylum in Geneva, where they found a state without a king, and a church without a bishop. R. Choate. 13. In the United States, one of the commonwealth, or bodies politic, the people of which make up the body of the nation, and which, under the national constitution, stands in certain specified relations with the national government, and are invested, as commonwealth, with full power in their several spheres over all matters not expressly inhibited. Note: The term State, in its technical sense, is used in distinction from the federal system, i. e., the government of the United States. 14. Highest and stationary condition, as that of maturity between growth and decline, or as that of crisis between the increase and the abating of a disease; height; acme. [Obs.] Note: When state is joined with another word, or used adjectively, it denotes public, or what belongs to the community or body politic, or to the government; also, what belongs to the States severally in the American Union; as, state affairs; state policy; State laws of Iowa. Nascent state. (Chem.) See under Nascent. -- Secretary of state. See Secretary, n., 3. -- State bargea royal barge, or a barge belonging to a government. -- State bed, an elaborately carved or decorated bed. -- State carriage, a highly decorated carriage for officials going in state, or taking part in public processions. -- State paper, an official paper relating to the interests or government of a state. Jay. -- State prison, a public prison or penitentiary; -- called also State's prison. -- State prisoner, one is confinement, or under arrest, for a political offense. -- State rights, or States' rights, the rights of the several independent States, as distinguished from the rights of the Federal government. It has been a question as to what rights have been vested in the general government. [U.S.] -- State's evidence. See Probator, 2, and under Evidence. -- State sword, a sword used on state occasions, being borne before a sovereign by an attendant of high rank. -- State trial, a trial of a person for a political offense. -- States of the Church. See under Ecclesiastical. Syn. -- State, Situation, Condition. State is the generic term, and denotes in general the mode in which a thing stands or exists. The situation of a thing is its state in reference to external objects and influences; its condition is its internal state, or what it is in itself considered. Our situation is good or bad as outward things bear favorably or unfavorably upon us; our condition is good or bad according to the state we are actually in as respects our persons, families, property, and other things which comprise our sources of enjoyment. I do not, brother, Infer as if I thought my sister's state Secure without all doubt or controversy. Milton. We hoped to enjoy with ease what, in our situation, might be called the luxuries of life. Cock. And, O, what man's condition can be worse Than his whom plenty starves and blessings curse Cowley.  1. Stately. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. Belonging to the state, or body politic; public.  1. To set; to settle; to establish. [R.] I myself, though meanest stated, And in court now almost hated. Wither. Who calls the council, states the certain day. Pope. 2. To express the particulars of; to set down in detail or in gross; to represent fully in words; to narrate; to recite; as, to state the facts of a case, one's opinion, etc. To state it. To assume state or dignity. [Obs.] "Rarely dressed up, and taught to state it." Beau. & Fl.  A statement; also, a document containing a statement. [R.] Sir W. Scott.
doctor: 1. A teacher; one skilled in a profession, or branch of knowledge learned man. [Obs.] One of the doctors of Italy, Nicholas Macciavel. Bacon. 2. An academical title, originally meaning a men so well versed in his department as to be qualified to teach it. Hence: One who has taken the highest degree conferred by a university or college, or has received a diploma of the highest degree; as, a doctor of divinity, of law, of medicine, of music, or of philosophy. Such diplomas may confer an honorary title only. 3. One duly licensed to practice medicine; a member of the medical profession; a physician. By medicine life may be prolonged, yet death Will seize the doctor too. Shak. 4. Any mechanical contrivance intended to remedy a difficulty or serve some purpose in an exigency; as, the doctor of a calico- printing machine, which is a knife to remove superfluous coloring matter; the doctor, or auxiliary engine, called also donkey engine. 5. (Zoöl.)  The friar skate. [Prov. Eng.] Doctors' Commons. See under Commons. -- Doctor's stuff, physic, medicine. G. Eliot. -- Doctor fish (Zoöl.), any fish of the genus Acanthurus; the surgeon fish; -- so called from a sharp lancetlike spine on each side of the tail. Also called barber fish. See Surgeon fish.  1. To treat as a physician does; to apply remedies to; to repair; as, to doctor a sick man or a broken cart. [Colloq.] 2. To confer a doctorate upon; to make a doctor. 3. To tamper with and arrange for one's own purposes; to falsify; to adulterate; as, to doctor election returns; to doctor whisky. [Slang]  To practice physic. [Colloq.]
surprise: 1. The act of coming upon, or taking, unawares; the act of seizing unexpectedly; surprisal; as, the fort was taken by surprise. 2. The state of being surprised, or taken unawares, by some act or event which could not reasonably be foreseen; emotion excited by what is sudden and strange; a suddenly excited feeling of wonder or astonishment. Pure surprise and fear Made me to quit the house. Shak. 3. Anything that causes such a state or emotion. 4. A dish covered with a crust of raised paste, but with no other contents. [Obs.] King. Surprise party, a party of persons who assemble by mutual agreement, and without invitation, at the house of a common friend. [U.S.] Bartlett. Syn. -- Wonder; astonishment; amazement.  1. To come or fall suddenly and unexpectedly; to take unawares; to seize or capture by unexpected attack. Fearfulness hath surprised the hypocrites. Isa. xxxiii. 14. The castle of Macduff I will surprise. Shak. Who can speak The mingled passions that surprised his heart Thomson. 2. To strike with wonder, astonishment, or confusion, by something sudden, unexpected, or remarkable; to confound; as, his conduct surprised me. I am surprised with an uncouth fear. Shak. Up he starts, Discovered and surprised. Milton. 3. To lead (one) to do suddenly and without forethought; to bring (one) into some unexpected state; -- with into; as, to be surprised into an indiscretion; to be surprised into generosity. 4. To hold possession of; to hold. [Obs.] Not with me, That in my hands surprise the sovereignity. J. Webster. Syn. -- See Astonish.
led: of Lead. Led captain. An obsequious follower or attendant. [Obs.] Swift. -- Led horse, a sumpter horse, or a spare horse, that is led along.
possible: Capable of existing or occurring, or of being conceived or thought of; able to happen; capable of being done; not contrary to the nature of things; -- sometimes used to express extreme improbability; barely able to be, or to come to pass; as, possibly he is honest, as it is possible that Judas meant no wrong. With God all things are possible. Matt. xix. 26. Syn. -- Practicable; likely. See Practicable.
reason: 1. A thought or a consideration offered in support of a determination or an opinion; a just ground for a conclusion or an action; that which is offered or accepted as an explanation; the efficient cause of an occurrence or a phenomenon; a motive for an action or a determination; proof, more or less decisive, for an opinion or a conclusion; principle; efficient cause; final cause; ground of argument. I'll give him reasons for it. Shak. The reason of the motion of the balance in a wheel watch is by the motion of the next wheel. Sir M. Hale. This reason did the ancient fathers render, why the church was called "catholic." Bp. Pearson. Virtue and vice are not arbitrary things; but there is a natural and eternal reason for that goodness and virtue, and against vice and wickedness. Tillotson. 2. The faculty of capacity of the human mind by which it is distinguished from the intelligence of the inferior animals; the higher as distinguished from the lower cognitive faculties, sense, imagination, and memory, and in contrast to the feelings and desires. Reason comprises conception, judgment, reasoning, and the intuitional faculty. Specifically, it is the intuitional faculty, or the faculty of first truths, as distinguished from the understanding, which is called the discursive or ratiocinative faculty. We have no other faculties of perceiving or knowing anything divine or human, but by our five senses and our reason. P. Browne. In common and popular discourse, reason denotes that power by which we distinguish truth from falsehood, and right from wrong, and by which we are enabled to combine means for the attainment of particular ends. Stewart. Reason is used sometimes to express the whole of those powers which elevate man above the brutes, and constitute his rational nature, more especially, perhaps, his intellectual powers; sometimes to express the power of deduction or argumentation. Stewart. By the pure reason I mean the power by which we become possessed of principles. Coleridge. The sense perceives; the understanding, in its own peculiar operation, conceives; the reason, or rationalized understanding, comprehends. Coleridge. 3. Due exercise of the reasoning faculty; accordance with, or that which is accordant with and ratified by, the mind rightly exercised; right intellectual judgment; clear and fair deductions from true principles; that which is dictated or supported by the common sense of mankind; right conduct; right; propriety; justice. I was promised, on a time, To have reason for my rhyme. Spenser. But law in a free nation hath been ever public reason; the enacted reason of a parliament, which he denying to enact, denies to govern us by that which ought to be our law; interposing his own private reason, which to us is no law. Milton. The most probable way of bringing France to reason would be by the making an attempt on the Spanish West Indies. Addison. 4. (Math.)  Ratio; proportion. [Obs.] Barrow. By reason of, by means of; on account of; because of. "Spain is thin sown of people, partly by reason of the sterility of the soil." Bacon. In reason, In all reason, in justice; with rational ground; in a right view. When anything is proved by as good arguments as a thing of that kind is capable of, we ought not, in reason, to doubt of its existence. Tillotson. -- It is reason, it is reasonable; it is right. [Obs.] Yet it were great reason, that those that have children should have greatest care of future times. Bacon. Syn. -- Motive; argument; ground; consideration; principle; sake; account; object; purpose; design. See Motive, Sense.  1. To exercise the rational faculty; to deduce inferences from premises; to perform the process of deduction or of induction; to ratiocinate; to reach conclusions by a systematic comparison of facts. 2. Hence: To carry on a process of deduction or of induction, in order to convince or to confute; to formulate and set forth propositions and the inferences from them; to argue. Stand still, that I may reason with you, before the Lord, of all the righteous acts of the Lord. 1 Sam. xii. 7. 3. To converse; to compare opinions. Shak.  1. To arrange and present the reasons for or against; to examine or discuss by arguments; to debate or discuss; as, I reasoned the matter with my friend. When they are clearly discovered, well digested, and well reasoned in every part, there is beauty in such a theory. T. Burnet. 2. To support with reasons, as a request. [R.] Shak. 3. To persuade by reasoning or argument; as, to reason one into a belief; to reason one out of his plan. Men that will not be reasoned into their senses. L'Estrange. 4. To overcome or conquer by adducing reasons; -- with down; as, to reason down a passion. 5. To find by logical process; to explain or justify by reason or argument; -- usually with out; as, to reason out the causes of the librations of the moon.
miss: 1. A title of courtesy prefixed to the name of a girl or a woman who has not been married. See Mistress, 5. Note: There is diversity of usage in the application of this title to two or more persons of the same name. We may write either the Miss Browns or the Misses Brown. 2. A young unmarried woman or a girl; as, she is a miss of sixteen. Gay vanity, with smiles and kisses, Was busy 'mongst the maids and misses. Cawthorn. 3. A kept mistress. See Mistress, 4. [Obs.] Evelyn. 4. (Card Playing)  In the game of three-card loo, an extra hand, dealt on the table, which may be substituted for the hand dealt to a player.  1. To fail of hitting, reaching, getting, finding, seeing, hearing, etc.; as, to miss the mark one shoots at; to miss the train by being late; to miss opportunites of getting knowledge; to miss the point or meaning of something said. When a man misses his great end, happiness, he will acknowledge he judged not right. Locke. 2. To omit; to fail to have or to do; to get without; to dispense with; -- now seldom applied to persons. She would never miss, one day, A walk so fine, a sight so gay. Prior. We cannot miss him; he does make our fire, Fetch in our wood. Shak. 3. To discover the absence or omission of; to feel the want of; to mourn the loss of; to want. Shak. Neither missed we anything ... Nothing was missed of all that pertained unto him. 1 Sam. xxv. 15, 21. What by me thou hast lost, thou least shalt miss. Milton. To miss stays. (Naut.) See under Stay.  1. To fail to hit; to fly wide; to deviate from the true direction. Men observe when things hit, and not when they miss. Bacon. Flying bullets now, To execute his rage, appear too slow; They miss, or sweep but common souls away. Waller. 2. To fail to obtain, learn, or find; -- with of. Upon the least reflection, we can not miss of them. Atterbury. 3. To go wrong; to err. [Obs.] Amongst the angels, a whole legion Of wicked sprites did fall from happy bliss; What wonder then if one, of women all, did miss Spenser. 4. To be absent, deficient, or wanting. [Obs.] See Missing, a. What here shall miss, our toil shall strive to mend. Shak.  1. The act of missing; failure to hit, reach, find, obtain, etc. 2. Loss; want; felt absence. [Obs.] There will be no great miss of those which are lost. Locke. 3. Mistake; error; fault. Shak. He did without any great miss in the hardest points of grammar. Ascham. 4. Harm from mistake. [Obs.] Spenser.
chair: 1. A movable single seat with a back. 2. An official seat, as of a chief magistrate or a judge, but esp. that of a professor; hence, the office itself. The chair of a philosophical school. Whewell. A chair of philology. M. Arnold. 3. The presiding officer of an assembly; a chairman; as, to address the chair. 4. A vehicle for one person; either a sedan borne upon poles, or two- wheeled carriage, drawn by one horse; a gig. Shak. Think what an equipage thou hast in air, And view with scorn two pages and a chair. Pope. 5. An iron blok used on railways to support the rails and secure them to the sleepers. Chair days, days of repose and age. -- To put into the chair, to elect as president, or as chairman of a meeting. Macaulay. -- To take the chair, to assume the position of president, or of chairman of a meeting.  1. To place in a chair. 2. To carry publicly in a chair in triumph. [Eng.]
region: 1. One of the grand districts or quarters into which any space or surface, as of the earth or the heavens, is conceived of as divided; hence, in general, a portion of space or territory of indefinite extent; country; province; district; tract. If thence he 'scappe, into whatever world, Or unknown region. Milton. 2. Tract, part, or space, lying about and including anything; neighborhood; vicinity; sphere. "Though the fork invade the region of my heart." Shak. Philip, tetrarch of .. the region of Trachonitis. Luke iii. 1. 3. The upper air; the sky; the heavens. [Obs.] Anon the dreadful thunder Doth rend the region. Shak. 4. The inhabitants of a district. Matt. iii. 5. 5. Place; rank; station. [Obs. or R.] He is of too high a region. Shak.
slave: See Slav.  1. A person who is held in bondage to another; one who is wholly subject to the will of another; one who is held as a chattel; one who has no freedom of action, but whose person and services are wholly under the control of another. thou our slave, Our captive, at the public mill our drudge Milton. 2. One who has lost the power of resistance; one who surrenders himself to any power whatever; as, a slave to passion, to lust, to strong drink, to ambition. 3. A drudge; one who labors like a slave. 4. An abject person; a wretch. Shak. Slave ant (Zoöl.), any species of ants which is captured and enslaved by another species, especially Formica fusca of Europe and America, which is commonly enslaved by Formica sanguinea. -- Slave catcher, one who attempted to catch and bring back a fugitive slave to his master. -- Slave coast, part of the western coast of Africa to which slaves were brought to be sold to foreigners. -- Slave driver, one who superintends slaves at their work; hence, figuratively, a cruel taskmaster. -- Slave hunt. (a) A search after persons in order to reduce them to slavery. Barth. (b) A search after fugitive slaves, often conducted with bloodhounds. -- Slave ship, a vessel employed in the slave trade or used for transporting slaves; a slaver. -- Slave trade, the busines of dealing in slaves, especially of buying them for transportation from their homes to be sold elsewhere. -- Slave trader, one who traffics in slaves. Syn. -- Bond servant; bondman; bondslave; captive; henchman; vassal; dependent; drudge. See Serf.  To drudge; to toil; to labor as a slave.  To enslave. Marston.
fruit: 1. Whatever is produced for the nourishment or enjoyment of man or animals by the processes of vegetable growth, as corn, grass, cotton, flax, etc.; -- commonly used in the plural. Six years thou shalt sow thy land, and shalt gather in the fruits thereof. Ex. xxiii. 10. 2. (Hort.)  The pulpy, edible seed vessels of certain plants, especially those grown on branches above ground, as apples, oranges, grapes, melons, berries, etc. See 3. 3. (Bot.)  The ripened ovary of a flowering plant, with its contents and whatever parts are consolidated with it. Note: Fruits are classified as fleshy, drupaceous, and -dry. Fleshy fruits include berries, gourds, and melons, orangelike fruita and pomes; drupaceous fruits are stony within and fleshy without, as peaches, plums, and chercies;and dry fruits are further divided into achenes, follicles, legumes, capsules, nuts, and several other kinds. 4. (Bot.)  The spore cases or conceptacles of flowerless plants, as of ferns, mosses, algae, etc., with the spores contained in them. 6. The produce of animals; offspring; young; as, the fruit of the womb, of the loins, of the body. King Edward's fruit, true heir to the English crown. Shak. 6. That which is produced; the effect or consequence of any action; advantageous or desirable product or result; disadvantageous or evil consequence or effect; as, the fruits of labor, of self-denial, of intemperance. The fruit of rashness. Shak. What I obtained was the fruit of no bargain. Burke. They shall eat the fruit of their doings. Is. iii 10. The fruits of this education became visible. Macaulay. Note: Fruit is frequently used adjectively, signifying of, for, or pertaining to a fruit or fruits; as, fruit bud; fruit frame; fruit jar; fruit knife; fruit loft; fruit show; fruit stall; fruit tree; etc. Fruit bat (Zoöl.), one of the Frugivora; -- called also fruit- eating bat. -- Fruit bud (Bot.), a bud that produces fruit; -- in most oplants the same as the power bud. Fruit dot (Bot.), a collection of fruit cases, as in ferns. See Sorus. -- Fruit fly (Zoöl.), a small dipterous insect of the genus Drosophila, which lives in fruit, in the larval state. -- Fruit jar, a jar for holding preserved fruit, usually made of glass or earthenware. -- Fruit pigeon (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of pigeons of the family Carpophagidæ, inhabiting India, Australia, and the Pacific Islands. They feed largely upon fruit. and are noted for their beautiful colors. -- Fruit sugar (Chem.), a kind of sugar occurring, naturally formed, in many ripe fruits, and in honey; levulose. The name is also, though rarely, applied to invert sugar, or to the natural mixture or dextrose and levulose resembling it, and found in fruits and honey. -- Fruit tree (Hort.), a tree cultivated for its edible fruit. -- Fruit worm (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of insect larvæ: which live in the interior of fruit. They are mostly small species of Lepidoptera and Diptera. -- Small fruits (Hort.), currants, raspberries, strawberries, etc.  To bear fruit. Chesterfield.
stop: 1. To close, as an aperture, by filling or by obstructing; as, to stop the ears; hence, to stanch, as a wound. Shak. 2. To obstruct; to render impassable; as, to stop a way, road, or passage. 3. To arrest the progress of; to hinder; to impede; to shut in; as, to stop a traveler; to stop the course of a stream, or a flow of blood. 4. To hinder from acting or moving; to prevent the effect or efficiency of; to cause to cease; to repress; to restrain; to suppress; to interrupt; to suspend; as, to stop the execution of a decree, the progress of vice, the approaches of old age or infirmity. Whose disposition all the world well knows Will not be rubbed nor stopped. Shak. 5. (Mus.)  To regulate the sounds of, as musical strings, by pressing them against the finger board with the finger, or by shortening in any way the vibrating part. 6. To point, as a composition; to punctuate. [R.] If his sentences were properly stopped. Landor. 7. (Naut.)  To make fast; to stopper. Syn. -- To obstruct; hinder; impede; repress; suppress; restrain; discontinue; delay; interrupt. To stop off (Founding), to fill (a part of a mold) with sand, where a part of the cavity left by the pattern is not wanted for the casting. -- To stop the mouth. See under Mouth.  1. To cease to go on; to halt, or stand still; to come to a stop. He bites his lip, and starts; Stops on a sudden, looks upon the ground; Then lays his finger on his temple: strait Springs out into fast gait; then stops again. Shak. 2. To cease from any motion, or course of action. Stop, while ye may, suspend your mad career! Cowper. 3. To spend a short time; to reside temporarily; to stay; to tarry; as, to stop with a friend. [Colloq.] By stopping at home till the money was gone. R. D. Blackmore. To stop over, to stop at a station beyond the time of the departure of the train on which one came, with the purpose of continuing one's journey on a subsequent train; to break one's journey. [Railroad Cant, U.S.] stopover  1. The act of stopping, or the state of being stopped; hindrance of progress or of action; cessation; repression; interruption; check; obstruction. It is doubtful . . . whether it contributed anything to the stop of the infection. De Foe. Occult qualities put a stop to the improvement of natural philosophy. Sir I. Newton. It is a great step toward the mastery of our desires to give this stop to them. Locke. 2. That which stops, impedes, or obstructs; as obstacle; an impediment; an obstruction. A fatal stop traversed their headlong course. Daniel. So melancholy a prospect should inspire us with zeal to oppose some stop to the rising torrent. Rogers. 3. (Mach.)  A device, or piece, as a pin, block, pawl, etc., for arresting or limiting motion, or for determining the position to which another part shall be brought. 4. (Mus.) (a) The closing of an aperture in the air passage, or pressure of the finger upon the string, of an instrument of music, so as to modify the tone; hence, any contrivance by which the sounds of a musical instrument are regulated. The organ sound a time survives the stop. Daniel. (b) In the organ, one of the knobs or handles at each side of the organist, by which he can draw on or shut off any register or row of pipes; the register itself; as, the vox humana stop. 5. (Arch.)  A member, plain or molded, formed of a separate piece and fixed to a jamb, against which a door or window shuts. This takes the place, or answers the purpose, of a rebate. Also, a pin or block to prevent a drawer from sliding too far. 6. A point or mark in writing or printing intended to distinguish the sentences, parts of a sentence, or clauses; a mark of punctuation. See Punctuation. 7. (Opt.)  The diaphragm used in optical instruments to cut off the marginal portions of a beam of light passing through lenses. 8. (Zoöl.)  The depression in the face of a dog between the skull and the nasal bones. It is conspicuous in the bulldog, pug, and some other breeds. 9. (Phonetics)  Some part of the articulating organs, as the lips, or the tongue and palate, closed (a) so as to cut off the passage of breath or voice through the mouth and the nose (distinguished as a lip-stop, or a front-stop, etc., as in p, t, d, etc.), or (b) so as to obstruct, but not entirely cut off, the passage, as in l, n, etc.; also, any of the consonants so formed. H. Sweet. Stop bead (Arch.), the molding screwed to the inner side of a window frame, on the face of the pulley stile, completing the groove in which the inner sash is to slide. -- Stop motion (Mach.), an automatic device for arresting the motion of a machine, as when a certain operation is completed, or when an imperfection occurs in its performance or product, or in the material which is supplied to it, etc. -- Stop plank, one of a set of planks employed to form a sort of dam in some hydraulic works. -- Stop valve, a valve that can be closed or opened at will, as by hand, for preventing or regulating flow, as of a liquid in a pipe; -- in distinction from a valve which is operated by the action of the fluid it restrains. -- Stop watch, a watch the hands of which can be stopped in order to tell exactly the time that has passed, as in timing a race. See Independent seconds watch, under Independent, a. Syn. -- Cessation; check; obstruction; obstacle; hindrance; impediment; interruption.
was: The first and third persons singular of the verb be, in the indicative mood, preterit (imperfect) tense; as, I was; he was.
subtract: To withdraw, or take away, as a part from the whole; to deduct; as, subtract 5 from 9, and the remainder is 4.
and: 1. A particle which expresses the relation of connection or addition. It is used to conjoin a word with a word, a clause with a clause, or a sentence with a sentence. Note: (a) It is sometimes used emphatically; as, "there are women and women," that is, two very different sorts of women. (b) By a rhetorical figure, notions, one of which is modificatory of the other, are connected by and; as, "the tediousness and process of my travel," that is, the tedious process, etc.; "thy fair and outward character," that is, thy outwardly fair character, Schmidt's Shak. Lex. 2. In order to; -- used instead of the infinitival to, especially after try, come, go. At least to try and teach the erring soul. Milton. 3. It is sometimes, in old songs, a mere expletive. When that I was and a little tiny boy. Shak. 4. If; though. See An, conj. [Obs.] Chaucer. As they will set an house on fire, and it were but to roast their eggs. Bacon. And so forth, and others; and the rest; and similar things; and other things or ingredients. The abbreviation, etc. (et cetera), or &c., is usually read and so forth.
lay: of Lie, to recline.  1. Of or pertaining to the laity, as distinct from the clergy; as, a lay person; a lay preacher; a lay brother. 2. Not educated or cultivated; ignorant.[Obs.] 3. Not belonging to, or emanating from, a particular profession; unprofessional; as, a lay opinion regarding the nature of a disease. Lay baptism (Eccl.), baptism administered by a lay person. F. G. Lee. -- Lay brother (R. C. Ch.), one received into a convent of monks under the three vows, but not in holy orders. -- Lay clerk (Eccl.), a layman who leads the responses of the congregation, etc., in the church service. Hook. -- Lay days (Com.), time allowed in a charter party for taking in and discharging cargo. McElrath. -- Lay elder. See 2d Elder, 3, note.  The laity; the common people. [Obs.] The learned have no more privilege than the lay. B. Jonson.  A meadow. See Lea. [Obs.] Dryden.  1. Faith; creed; religious profession. [Obs.] Of the sect to which that he was born He kept his lay, to which that he was sworn. Chaucer. 2. A law. [Obs.] "Many goodly lays." Spenser. 3. An obligation; a vow. [Obs.] They bound themselves by a sacred lay and oath. Holland.  1. A song; a simple lyrical poem; a ballad. Spenser. Sir W. Scott. 2. A melody; any musical utterance. The throstle cock made eke his lay. Chaucer.  1. To cause to lie down, to be prostrate, or to lie against something; to put or set down; to deposit; as, to lay a book on the table; to lay a body in the grave; a shower lays the dust. A stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den. Dan. vi. 17. Soft on the flowery herb I found me laid. Milton. 2. To place in position; to establish firmly; to arrange with regularity; to dispose in ranks or tiers; as, to lay a corner stone; to lay bricks in a wall; to lay the covers on a table. 3. To prepare; to make ready; to contrive; to provide; as, to lay a snare, an ambush, or a plan. 4. To spread on a surface; as, to lay plaster or paint. 5. To cause to be still; to calm; to allay; to suppress; to exorcise, as an evil spirit. After a tempest when the winds are laid. Waller. 6. To cause to lie dead or dying. Brave Cæneus laid Ortygius on the plain, The victor Cæneus was by Turnus slain. Dryden. 7. To deposit, as a wager; to stake; to risk. I dare lay mine honor He will remain so. Shak. 8. To bring forth and deposit; as, to lay eggs. 9. To apply; to put. She layeth her hands to the spindle. Prov. xxxi. 19. 10. To impose, as a burden, suffering, or punishment; to assess, as a tax; as, to lay a tax on land. The Lord hath laid on him the iniquity of us all. Is. Iiii. 6. 11. To impute; to charge; to allege. God layeth not folly to them. Job xxiv. 12. Lay the fault on us. Shak. 12. To impose, as a command or a duty; as, to lay commands on one. 13. To present or offer; as, to lay an indictment in a particular county; to lay a scheme before one. 14. (Law)  To state; to allege; as, to lay the venue. Bouvier. 15. (Mil.)  To point; to aim; as, to lay a gun. 16. (Rope Making)  To put the strands of (a rope, a cable, etc.) in their proper places and twist or unite them; as, to lay a cable or rope. 17. (Print.) (a) To place and arrange (pages) for a form upon the imposing stone. (b) To place (new type) properly in the cases. To lay asleep, to put sleep; to make unobservant or careless. Bacon. -- To lay bare, to make bare; to strip. And laid those proud roofs bare to summer's rain. Byron. -- To lay before, to present to; to submit for consideration; as, the papers are laid before Congress. -- To lay by. (a) To save. (b) To discard. Let brave spirits . . . not be laid by. Bacon. -- To lay by the heels, to put in the stocks. Shak. -- To lay down. (a) To stake as a wager. (b) To yield; to relinquish; to surrender; as, to lay down one's life; to lay down one's arms. (c) To assert or advance, as a proposition or principle. -- To lay forth. (a) To extend at length; (reflexively) to exert one's self; to expatiate. [Obs.] (b) To lay out (as a corpse). [Obs.] Shak. -- To lay hands on, to seize. -- To lay hands on one's self, or To lay violent hands on one's self, to injure one's self; specif., to commit suicide. -- To lay heads together, to consult. -- To lay hold of, or To lay hold on, to seize; to catch. -- To lay in, to store; to provide. -- To lay it on, to apply without stint. Shak. -- To lay on, to apply with force; to inflict; as, to lay on blows. -- To lay on load, to lay on blows; to strike violently. [Obs. or Archaic] -- To lay one's self out, to strive earnestly. No selfish man will be concerned to lay out himself for the good of his country. Smalridge. -- To lay one's self open to, to expose one's self to, as to an accusation. -- To lay open, to open; to uncover; to expose; to reveal. -- To lay over, to spread over; to cover. -- To lay out. (a) To expend. Macaulay. (b) To display; to discover. (c) To plan in detail; to arrange; as, to lay out a garden. (d) To prepare for burial; as, to lay out a corpse. (e) To exert; as, to lay out all one's strength. -- To lay siege to. (a) To besiege; to encompass with an army. (b) To beset pertinaciously. -- To lay the course (Naut.), to sail toward the port intended without jibing. -- To lay the land (Naut.), to cause it to disappear below the horizon, by sailing away from it. -- To lay to (a) To charge upon; to impute. (b) To apply with vigor. (c) To attack or harass. [Obs.] Knolles. (d) (Naut.) To check the motion of (a vessel) and cause it to be stationary. -- To lay to heart, to feel deeply; to consider earnestly. -- To lay under, to subject to; as, to lay under obligation or restraint. -- To lay unto. (a) Same as To lay to (above). (b) To put before. Hos. xi. 4. -- To lay up. (a) To store; to reposit for future use. (b) To confine; to disable. (c) To dismantle, and retire from active service, as a ship. -- To lay wait for, to lie in ambush for. -- To lay waste, to destroy; to make desolate; as, to lay waste the land. Syn. -- See Put, v. t., and the Note under 4th Lie.  1. To produce and deposit eggs. 2. (Naut.)  To take a position; to come or go; as, to lay forward; to lay aloft. 3. To lay a wager; to bet. To lay about, or To lay about one, to strike vigorously in all directions. J. H. Newman. -- To lay at, to strike or strike at. Spenser. -- To lay for, to prepare to capture or assault; to lay wait for. [Colloq.] Bp Hall. -- To lay in for, to make overtures for; to engage or secure the possession of. [Obs.] "I have laid in for these." Dryden. -- To lay on, to strike; to beat; to attack. Shak. -- To lay out, to purpose; to plan; as, he lays out to make a journey.  1. That which lies or is laid or is conceived of as having been laid or placed in its position; a row; a stratum; a layer; as, a lay of stone or wood. Addison. A viol should have a lay of wire strings below. Bacon. Note: The lay of a rope is right-handed or left-handed according to the hemp or strands are laid up. See Lay, v. t., 16. The lay of land is its topographical situation, esp. its slope and its surface features. 2. A wager. "My fortunes against any lay worth naming." 3. (a) A job, price, or profit. [Prov. Eng.] Wright. (b) A share of the proceeds or profits of an enterprise; as, when a man ships for a whaling voyage, he agrees for a certain lay. [U. S.] 4. (Textile Manuf.) (a) A measure of yarn; a les. See 1st Lea (a). (b) The lathe of a loom. See Lathe, 8. 5. A plan; a scheme. [Slang] Dickens. Lay figure. (a) A jointed model of the human body that may be put in any attitude; -- used for showing the disposition of drapery, etc. (b) A mere puppet; one who serves the will of others without independent volition. -- Lay race, that part of a lay on which the shuttle travels in weaving; -- called also shuttle race.
speed: 1. Prosperity in an undertaking; favorable issue; success. "For common speed." Chaucer. O Lord God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send me good speed this day. Gen. xxiv. 12. 2. The act or state of moving swiftly; swiftness; velocity; rapidly; rate of motion; dispatch; as, the speed a horse or a vessel. Speed, to describe whose swiftness number fails. Milton. Note: In kinematics, speedis sometimes used to denote the amount of velocity without regard to direction of motion, while velocity is not regarded as known unless both the direction and the amount are known. 3. One who, or that which, causes or promotes speed or success. [Obs.] "Hercules be thy speed!" Shak. God speed, Good speed; prosperity. See Godspeed. -- Speed gauge, Speed indicator, and Speed recorder (Mach.), devices for indicating or recording the rate of a body's motion, as the number of revolutions of a shaft in a given time. -- Speed lathe (Mach.), a power lathe with a rapidly revolving spindle, for turning small objects, for polishing, etc.; a hand lathe. -- Speed pulley, a cone pulley with steps. Syn. -- Haste; swiftness; celerity; quickness; dispatch; expedition; hurry; acceleration. See Haste.  1. To go; to fare. [Obs.] To warn him now he is too farre sped. Remedy of Love. 2. To experience in going; to have any condition, good or ill; to fare. Shak. Ships heretofore in seas lke fishes sped; The mightiest still upon the smallest fed. Waller. 3. To fare well; to have success; to prosper. Save London, and send true lawyers their meed! For whoso wants money with them shall not speed! Lydgate. I told ye then he should prevail, and speed On his bad errand. Milton. 4. To make haste; to move with celerity. I have speeded hither with the very extremest inch of possibility. Shak. 5. To be expedient. [Obs.] Wyclif (2 Cor. xii. 1.)  1. To cause to be successful, or to prosper; hence, to aid; to favor. "Fortune speed us!" Shak. With rising gales that speed their happy flight. Dryden. 2. To cause to make haste; to dispatch with celerity; to drive at full speed; hence, to hasten; to hurry. He sped him thence home to his habitation. Fairfax. 3. To hasten to a conclusion; to expedite. Judicial acts . . . are sped in open court at the instance of one or both of the parties. Ayliffe. 4. To hurry to destruction; to put an end to; to ruin; to undo. "Sped with spavins." Shak. A dire dilemma! either way I 'm sped. If foes, they write, if friends, they read, me dead. Pope. 5. To wish success or god fortune to, in any undertaking, especially in setting out upon a journey. Welkome the coming, speed the parting guest. Pope. God speed you, them, etc., may God speed you; or, may you have good speed. Syn. -- To depatch; hasten; expedite; accelerate; hurry.
several: 1. Separate; distinct; particular; single. Each several ship a victory did gain. Dryden. Each might his several province well command, Would all but stoop to what they understand. Pope. 2. Diverse; different; various. Spenser. Habits and faculties, several, and to be distinguished. Bacon. Four several armies to the field are led. Dryden. 3. Consisting of a number more than two, but not very many; divers; sundry; as, several persons were present when the event took place.  By itself; severally. [Obs.] Every kind of thing is laid up several in barns or storehoudses. Robynson (More's Utopia).  1. Each particular taken singly; an item; a detail; an individual. [Obs.] There was not time enough to hear . . . The severals. Shak. 2. Persons oe objects, more than two, but not very many. Several of them neither rose from any conspicuous family, nor left any behind them. Addison. 3. An inclosed or separate place; inclosure. [Obs.] They had their several for heathen nations, their several for the people of their own nation. Hooker. In several, in a state of separation. [R.] "Where pastures in several be." Tusser.
week: A period of seven days, usually that reckoned from one Sabbath or Sunday to the next. I fast twice in the week. Luke xviii. 12. Note: Although it [the week] did not enter into the calendar of the Greeks, and was not introduced at Rome till after the reign of Theodesius, it has been employed from time immemorial in almost all Eastern countries. Encyc. Brit. Feast of Weeks. See Pentecost, 1. -- Prophetic week, a week of years, or seven years. Dan. ix. 24. -- Week day. See under Day.
arrange: 1. To put in proper order; to dispose (persons, or parts) in the manner intended, or best suited for the purpose; as, troops arranged for battle. So [they] came to the market place, and there he arranged his men in the streets. Berners. [They] were beginning to arrange their hampers. Boswell. A mechanism previously arranged. Paley. 2. To adjust or settle; to prepare; to determine; as, to arrange the preliminaries of an undertaking. Syn. -- Adjust; adapt; range; dispose; classify.
search: 1. To look over or through, for the purpose of finding something; to examine; to explore; as, to search the city. "Search the Scriptures." John v. 39. They are come to search the house. Shak. Search me, O God, and know my heart. Ps. cxxxix. 23. 2. To inquire after; to look for; to seek. I will both search my sheep, and seek them out. Ezek. xxxiv. 11. Enough is left besides to search and know. Milton. 3. To examine or explore by feeling with an instrument; to probe; as, to search a wound. 4. To examine; to try; to put to the test. To search out, to seek till found; to find by seeking; as, to search out truth. Syn. -- To explore; examine; scrutinize; seek; investigate; pry into; inquire.  To seek; to look for something; to make inquiry, exploration, or examination; to hunt. Once more search with me. Shak. It sufficeth that they have once with care sifted the matter, and searched into all the particulars. Locke.  The act of seeking or looking for something; quest; inquiry; pursuit for finding something; examination. Thus the orb he roamed With narrow search, and with inspection deep Considered every creature. Milton. Nor did my search of liberty begin Till my black hairs were changed upon my chin. Dryden. Right of search (Mar. Law), the right of the lawfully commissioned cruisers of belligerent nations to examine and search private merchant vessels on the high seas, for the enemy's property or for articles contraband of war. -- Search warrant (Law), a warrant legally issued, authorizing an examination or search of a house, or other place, for goods stolen, secreted, or concealed. Syn. -- Scrutiny; examination; exploration; investigation; research; inquiry; quest; pursuit.
money: 1. A piece of metal, as gold, silver, copper, etc., coined, or stamped, and issued by the sovereign authority as a medium of exchange in financial transactions between citizens and with government; also, any number of such pieces; coin. To prevent such abuses, ... it has been found necessary ... to affix a public stamp upon certain quantities of such particular metals, as were in those countries commonly made use of to purchase goods. Hence the origin of coined money, and of those public offices called mints. A. Smith. 2. Any written or stamped promise, certificate, or order, as a government note, a bank note, a certificate of deposit, etc., which is payable in standard coined money and is lawfully current in lieu of it; in a comprehensive sense, any currency usually and lawfully employed in buying and selling. Note: Whatever, among barbarous nations, is used as a medium of effecting exchanges of property, and in the terms of which values are reckoned, as sheep, wampum, copper rings, quills of salt or of gold dust, shovel blades, etc., is, in common language, called their money. 3. In general, wealth; property; as, he has much money in land, or in stocks; to make, or lose, money. The love of money is a root of all kinds of evil. 1 Tim vi. 10 (Rev. Ver. ). Money bill (Legislation), a bill for raising revenue. -- Money broker, a broker who deals in different kinds of money; one who buys and sells bills of exchange; -- called also money changer. -- Money cowrie (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Cypræa (esp. C. moneta) formerly much used as money by savage tribes. See Cowrie. -- Money of account, a denomination of value used in keeping accounts, for which there may, or may not, be an equivalent coin; e.g., the mill is a money of account in the United States, but not a coin. -- Money order, an order for the payment of money; specifically, a government order for the payment of money, issued at one post office as payable at another; -- called also postal money order. -- Money scrivener, a person who produces the loan of money to others. [Eng.] -- Money spider, Money spinner (Zoöl.), a small spider; -- so called as being popularly supposed to indicate that the person upon whom it crawls will be fortunate in money matters. -- Money's worth, a fair or full equivalent for the money which is paid. -- A piece of money, a single coin. -- Ready money, money held ready for payment, or actually paid, at the time of a transaction; cash. -- To make money, to gain or acquire money or property; to make a profit in dealings.  To supply with money. [Obs.]
two: One and one; twice one. "Two great lights." Gen. i. 16. "Two black clouds." Milton. Note: Two is often joined with other words, forming compounds signifying divided into, consisting of, or having, two parts, divisions, organs, or the like; as two-bladed, two-celled, two-eared, two-flowered, twohand, two-headed, two-horse, two-leafed or two- leaved, two-legged, two-lobed, two-masted, two-named, two-part, two- petaled, two-pronged, two-seeded, two-sided, two-story, two-stringed, two-foothed, two-valved, two-winged, and the like. One or two, a phrase often used indefinitely for a small number.  1. The sum of one; the number next greater than one, and next less than three; two units or objects. 2. A symbol representing two units, as 2, II., or ii. In two, asunder; into parts; in halves; in twain; as, cut in two.
until: 1. To; unto; towards; -- used of material objects. Chaucer. Taverners until them told the same. Piers Plowman. He roused himself full blithe, and hastened them until. Spenser. 2. To; up to; till; before; -- used of time; as, he staid until evening; he will not come back until the end of the month. He and his sons were priests to the tribe of Dan until the day of the captivity. Judg. xviii. 30. Note: In contracts and like documents until is construed as exclusive of the date mentioned unless it was the manifest intent of the parties to include it.  As far as; to the place or degree that; especially, up to the time that; till. See Till, conj. In open prospect nothing bounds our eye, Until the earth seems joined unto the sky. Dryden. But the rest of the dead lives not again until the thousand years were finished. Rev. xx. 5.
too: 1. Over; more than enough; -- noting excess; as, a thing is too long, too short, or too wide; too high; too many; too much. His will, too strong to bend, too proud to learn. Cowley. 2. Likewise; also; in addition. An honest courtier, yet a patriot too. Pope. Let those eyes that view The daring crime, behold the vengeance too. Pope. Too too, a duplication used to signify great excess. O that this too too solid flesh would melt. Shak. Such is not Charles his too too active age. Dryden. Syn. -- Also; likewise. See Also.
letter: One who lets or permits; one who lets anything for hire.  One who retards or hinders. [Archaic.]  1. A mark or character used as the representative of a sound, or of an articulation of the human organs of speech; a first element of written language. And a superscription also was written over him in letters of Greek, and Latin, and Hebrew. Luke xxiii. 38. 2. A written or printed communication; a message expressed in intelligible characters on something adapted to conveyance, as paper, parchment, etc.; an epistle. The style of letters ought to be free, easy, and natural. Walsh. 3. A writing; an inscription. [Obs.] None could expound what this letter meant. Chaucer. 4. Verbal expression; literal statement or meaning; exact signification or requirement. We must observe the letter of the law, without doing violence to the reason of the law and the intention of the lawgiver. Jer. Taylor. I broke the letter of it to keep the sense. Tennyson. 5. (Print.)  A single type; type, collectively; a style of type. Under these buildings . . . was the king's printing house, and that famous letter so much esteemed. Evelyn. 6. pl.  Learning; erudition; as, a man of letters. 7. pl.  A letter; an epistle. [Obs.] Chaucer. Dead letter, Drop letter, etc. See under Dead, Drop, etc. -- Letter book, a book in which copies of letters are kept. -- Letter box, a box for the reception of letters to be mailed or delivered. -- Letter carrier, a person who carries letters; a postman; specif., an officer of the post office who carries letters to the persons to whom they are addressed, and collects letters to be mailed. -- Letter cutter, one who engraves letters or letter punches. -- Letter lock, a lock that can not be opened when fastened, unless certain movable lettered rings or disks forming a part of in are in such a position (indicated by a particular combination of the letters) as to permit the bolt to be withdrawn. A strange lock that opens with AMEN. Beau. & Fl. -- Letter paper, paper for writing letters on; especially, a size of paper intermediate between note paper and foolscap. See Paper. -- Letter punch, a steel punch with a letter engraved on the end, used in making the matrices for type. -- Letters of administration (Law), the instrument by which an administrator or administratrix is authorized to administer the goods and estate of a deceased person. -- Letter of attorney, Letter of credit, etc. See under Attorney, Credit, etc. -- Letter of license, a paper by which creditors extend a debtor's time for paying his debts. -- Letters close or clause (Eng. Law.), letters or writs directed to particular persons for particular purposes, and hence closed or sealed on the outside; -- distinguished from letters patent. Burrill. -- Letters of orders (Eccl.), a document duly signed and sealed, by which a bishop makes it known that he has regularly ordained a certain person as priest, deacon, etc. -- Letters patent, overt, or open (Eng. Law), a writing executed and sealed, by which power and authority are granted to a person to do some act, or enjoy some right; as, letters patent under the seal of England. -- Letter-sheet envelope, a stamped sheet of letter paper issued by the government, prepared to be folded and sealed for transmission by mail without an envelope. -- Letters testamentary (Law), an instrument granted by the proper officer to an executor after probate of a will, authorizing him to act as executor. -- Letter writer. (a) One who writes letters. (b) A machine for copying letters. (c) A book giving directions and forms for the writing of letters.  To impress with letters; to mark with letters or words; as, a book gilt and lettered.
decimal: Of or pertaining to decimals; numbered or proceeding by tens; having a tenfold increase or decrease, each unit being ten times the unit next smaller; as, decimal notation; a decimal coinage. Decimal arithmetic, the common arithmetic, in which numeration proceeds by tens. -- Decimal fraction, a fraction in which the denominator is some power of 10, as -- Decimal point, a dot or full stop at the left of a decimal fraction. The figures at the left of the point represent units or whole numbers, as 1.05.  A number expressed in the scale of tens; specifically, and almost exclusively, used as synonymous with a decimal fraction. Circulating, or Circulatory, decimal, a decimal fraction in which the same figure, or set of figures, is constantly repeated; as, 0.354354354; -- called also recurring decimal, repeating decimal, and repetend.
art: The second person singular, indicative mode, present tense, of the substantive verb Be; but formed after the analogy of the plural are, with the ending -t, as in thou shalt, wilt, orig. an ending of the second person sing. pret. Cf. Be. Now used only in solemn or poetical style.  1. The employment of means to accomplish some desired end; the adaptation of things in the natural world to the uses of life; the application of knowledge or power to practical purposes. Blest with each grace of nature and of art. Pope. 2. A system of rules serving to facilitate the performance of certain actions; a system of principles and rules for attaining a desired end; method of doing well some special work; -- often contradistinguished from science or speculative principles; as, the art of building or engraving; the art of war; the art of navigation. Science is systematized knowledge . . . Art is knowledge made efficient by skill. J. F. Genung. 3. The systematic application of knowledge or skill in effecting a desired result. Also, an occupation or business requiring such knowledge or skill. The fishermen can't employ their art with so much success in so troubled a sea. Addison. 4. The application of skill to the production of the beautiful by imitation or design, or an occupation in which skill is so employed, as in painting and sculpture; one of the fine arts; as, he prefers art to literature. 5. pl.  Those branches of learning which are taught in the academical course of colleges; as, master of arts. In fearless youth we tempt the heights of arts. Pope. Four years spent in the arts (as they are called in colleges) is, perhaps, laying too laborious a foundation. Goldsmith. 6. Learning; study; applied knowledge, science, or letters. [Archaic] So vast is art, so narrow human wit. Pope. 7. Skill, dexterity, or the power of performing certain actions, asquired by experience, study, or observation; knack; a, a man has the art of managing his business to advantage. 8. Skillful plan; device. They employed every art to soothe . . . the discontented warriors. Macaulay. 9. Cunning; artifice; craft. Madam, I swear I use no art at all. Shak. Animals practice art when opposed to their superiors in strength. Crabb. 10 10  To black art; magic. [Obs.] Shak. Art and part (Scots Law), share or concern by aiding and abetting a criminal in the perpetration of a crime, whether by advice or by assistance in the execution; complicity. Note: The arts are divided into various classes. The useful, mechanical, or industrial arts are those in which the hands and body are concerned than the mind; as in making clothes and utensils. These are called trades. The fine arts are those which have primarily to do with imagination taste, and are applied to the production of what is beautiful. They include poetry, music, painting, engraving, sculpture, and architecture; but the term is often confined to painting, sculpture, and architecture. The liberal arts (artes liberales, the higher arts, which, among the Romans, only freemen were permitted to pursue) were, in the Middle Ages, these seven branches of learning, -- grammar, logic, rhetoric, arithmetic, geometry, music, and astronomy. In modern times the liberal arts include the sciences, philosophy, history, etc., which compose the course of academical or collegiate education. Hence, degrees in the arts; master and bachelor of arts. In America, literature and the elegant arts must grow up side by side with the coarser plants of daily necessity. Irving. Syn. -- Science; literature; aptitude; readiness; skill; dexterity; adroitness; contrivance; profession; business; trade; calling; cunning; artifice; duplicity. See Science.
real: A small Spanish silver coin; also, a denomination of money of account, formerly the unit of the Spanish monetary system. Note: A real of plate (coin) varied in value according to the time of its coinage, from 12real vellon, or money of account, was nearly equal to five cents, or 2  Royal; regal; kingly. [Obs.] "The blood real of Thebes." Chaucer.  1. Actually being or existing; not fictitious or imaginary; as, a description of real life. Whereat I waked, and found Before mine eyes all real, as the dream Had lively shadowed. Milton. 2. True; genuine; not artificial; counterfeit, or factitious; often opposed to ostensible; as, the real reason; real Madeira wine; real ginger. Whose perfection far excelled Hers in all real dignity. Milton. 5. Relating to things, not to persons. [Obs.] Many are perfect in men's humors that are not greatly capable of the real part of business. Bacon. 4. (Alg.)  Having an assignable arithmetical or numerical value or meaning; not imaginary. 5. (Law)  Pertaining to things fixed, permanent, or immovable, as to lands and tenements; as, real property, in distinction from personal or movable property. Chattels real (Law), such chattels as are annexed to, or savor of, the realty, as terms for years of land. See Chattel. -- Real action (Law), an action for the recovery of real property. -- Real assets (Law), lands or real estate in the hands of the heir, chargeable with the debts of the ancestor. -- Real composition (Eccl. Law), an agreement made between the owner of lands and the parson or vicar, with consent of the ordinary, that such lands shall be discharged from payment of tithes, in consequence of other land or recompense given to the parson in lieu and satisfaction thereof. Blackstone. -- Real estate or property, lands, tenements, and hereditaments; freehold interests in landed property; property in houses and land. Kent. Burrill. -- Real presence (R. C. Ch.), the actual presence of the body and blood of Christ in the eucharist, or the conversion of the substance of the bread and wine into the real body and blood of Christ; transubstantiation. In other churches there is a belief in a form of real presence, not however in the sense of transubstantiation. -- Real servitude, called also Predial servitude (Civil Law), a burden imposed upon one estate in favor of another estate of another proprietor. Erskine. Bouvier. Syn. -- Actual; true; genuine; authentic. -- Real, Actual. Real represents a thing to be a substantive existence; as, a real, not imaginary, occurrence. Actual refers to it as acted or performed; and, hence, when we wish to prove a thing real, we often say, "It actually exists," "It has actually been done." Thus its really is shown by its actually. Actual, from this reference to being acted, has recently received a new signification, namely, present; as, the actual posture of affairs; since what is now in action, or going on, has, of course, a present existence. An actual fact; a real sentiment. For he that but conceives a crime in thought, Contracts the danger of an actual fault. Dryden. Our simple ideas are all real; all agree to the reality of things. Locke.  A realist. [Obs.] Burton.
tire: A tier, row, or rank. See Tier. [Obs.] In posture to displode their second tire Of thunder. Milton.  1. Attire; apparel. [Archaic] "Having rich tire about you." Shak. 2. A covering for the head; a headdress. On her head she wore a tire of gold. Spenser. 3. A child's apron, covering the breast and having no sleeves; a pinafore; a tier. 4. Furniture; apparatus; equipment. [Obs.] "The tire of war." Philips. 5. Etym: [Probably the same word, and so called as being an attire or covering for the wheel.]  A hoop or band, as of metal, on the circumference of the wheel of a vehicle, to impart strength and receive the wear. Note: The iron tire of a wagon wheel or cart wheel binds the fellies together. The tire of a locomotive or railroad-car wheel is a heavy hoop of iron or steel shrunk tightly upon an iron central part. The wheel of a bicycle has a tire of India rubber.  To adorn; to attire; to dress. [Obs.] [Jezebel] painted her face, and tired her head. 2 Kings ix. 30.  1. To seize, pull, and tear prey, as a hawk does. [Obs.] Even as an empty eagle, sharp by fast, Tires with her beak on feathers, flesh, and bone. Shak. Ye dregs of baseness, vultures among men, That tire upon the hearts of generous spirits. B. Jonson. 2. To seize, rend, or tear something as prey; to be fixed upon, or engaged with, anything. [Obs.] Thus made she her remove, And left wrath tiring on her son. Chapman. Upon that were my thoughts tiring. Shak.  To become weary; to be fatigued; to have the strength fail; to have the patience exhausted; as, a feeble person soon tires.  To exhaust the strength of, as by toil or labor; to exhaust the patience of; to wear out (one's interest, attention, or the like); to weary; to fatigue; to jade. Shak. Tired with toil, all hopes of safety past. Dryden. To tire out, to weary or fatigue to exhaustion; to harass. Syn. -- To jade; weary; exhaust; harass. See Jade.
mark: A license of reprisals. See Marque.  1. An old weight and coin. See Marc. "Lend me a mark." Chaucer. 2. The unit of monetary account of the German Empire, equal to 23.8 cents of United States money; the equivalent of one hundred pfennigs. Also, a silver coin of this value.  1. A visible sign or impression made or left upon anything; esp., a line, point, stamp, figure, or the like, drawn or impressed, so as to attract the attention and convey some information or intimation; a token; a trace. The Lord set a mark upon Cain, lest any finding him should kill him. Gen. iv. 15. 2. Specifically: (a) A character or device put on an article of merchandise by the maker to show by whom it was made; a trade-mark. (b) A character (usually a cross) made as a substitute for a signature by one who can not write. The mark of the artisan is found upon the most ancient fabrics that have come to light. Knight. 3. A fixed object serving for guidance, as of a ship, a traveler, a surveyor, etc.; as, a seamark, a landmark. 4. A trace, dot, line, imprint, or discoloration, although not regarded as a token or sign; a scratch, scar, stain, etc.; as, this pencil makes a fine mark. I have some marks of yours upon my pate. Shak. 5. An evidence of presence, agency, or influence; a significative token; a symptom; a trace; specifically, a permanent impression of one's activity or character. The confusion of tongues was a mark of separation. Bacon. 6. That toward which a missile is directed; a thing aimed at; what one seeks to hit or reach. France was a fairer mark to shoot at than Ireland. Davies. Whate'er the motive, pleasure is the mark. Young. 7. Attention, regard, or respect. As much in mock as mark. Shak. 8. Limit or standard of action or fact; as, to be within the mark; to come up to the mark. 9. Badge or sign of honor, rank, or official station. In the official marks invested, you Anon do meet the Senate. Shak. 10. Preëminence; high position; as, particians of mark; a fellow of no mark. 11. (Logic)  A characteristic or essential attribute; a differential. 12. A number or other character used in registring; as, examination marks; a mark for tardiness. 13. Image; likeness; hence, those formed in one's image; children; descendants. [Obs.] "All the mark of Adam." Chaucer. 14. (Naut.)  One of the bits of leather or colored bunting which are placed upon a sounding line at intervals of from two to five fathoms. The unmarked fathoms are called "deeps." A man of mark, a conspicuous or eminent man. -- To make one's mark. (a) To sign, as a letter or other writing, by making a cross or other mark. (b) To make a distinct or lasting impression on the public mind, or on affairs; to gain distinction. Syn. -- Impress; impression; stamp; print; trace; vestige; track; characteristic; evidence; proof; token; badge; indication; symptom.  1. To put a mark upon; to affix a significant mark to; to make recognizable by a mark; as, to mark a box or bale of merchandise; to mark clothing. 2. To be a mark upon; to designate; to indicate; -- used literally and figuratively; as, this monument marks the spot where Wolfe died; his courage and energy marked him for a leader. 3. To leave a trace, scratch, scar, or other mark, upon, or any evidence of action; as, a pencil marks paper; his hobnails marked the floor. 4. To keep account of; to enumerate and register; as, to mark the points in a game of billiards or cards. 5. To notice or observe; to give attention to; to take note of; to remark; to heed; to regard. "Mark the perfect man." Ps. xxxvii. 37. To mark out. (a) To designate, as by a mark; to select; as, the ringleaders were marked out for punishment. (b) To obliterate or cancel with a mark; as, to mark out an item in an account. -- To mark time (Mil.), to keep the time of a marching step by moving the legs alternately without advancing. Syn. -- To note; remark; notice; observe; regard; heed; show; evince; indicate; point out; betoken; denote; characterize; stamp; imprint; impress; brand.  To take particular notice; to observe critically; to note; to remark. Mark, I pray you, and see how this man seeketh maschief. 1 Kings xx. 7.
self: Same; particular; very; identical. [Obs., except in the compound selfsame.] "On these self hills." Sir. W. Raleigh. To shoot another arrow that self way Which you did shoot the first. Shak. At that self moment enters Palamon. Dryden.  1. The individual as the object of his own reflective consciousness; the man viewed by his own cognition as the subject of all his mental phenomena, the agent in his own activities, the subject of his own feelings, and the possessor of capacities and character; a person as a distinct individual; a being regarded as having personality. "Those who liked their real selves." Addison. A man's self may be the worst fellow to converse with in the world. Pope. The self, the I, is recognized in every act of intelligence as the subject to which that act belongs. It is I that perceive, I that imagine, I that remember, I that attend, I that compare, I that feel, I that will, I that am conscious. Sir W. Hamilton. 2. Hence, personal interest, or love of private interest; selfishness; as, self is his whole aim. 3. Personification; embodiment. [Poetic.] She was beauty's self. Thomson. Note: Self is united to certain personal pronouns and pronominal adjectives to express emphasis or distinction. Thus, for emphasis; I myself will write; I will examine for myself; thou thyself shalt go; thou shalt see for thyself; you yourself shall write; you shall see for yourself; he himself shall write; he shall examine for himself; she herself shall write; she shall examine for herself; the child itself shall be carried; it shall be present itself. It is also used reflexively; as, I abhor myself; thou enrichest thyself; he loves himself; she admires herself; it pleases itself; we walue ourselves; ye hurry yourselves; they see themselves. Himself, herself, themselves, are used in the nominative case, as well as in the objective. "Jesus himself baptized not, but his disciples." John iv. 2. Note: Self is used in the formation of innumerable compounds, usually of obvious signification, in most of which it denotes either the agent or the object of the action expressed by the word with which it is joined, or the person in behalf of whom it is performed, or the person or thing to, for, or towards whom or which a quality, attribute, or feeling expressed by the following word belongs, is directed, or is exerted, or from which it proceeds; or it denotes the subject of, or object affected by, such action, quality, attribute, feeling, or the like; as, self-abandoning, self-abnegation, self- abhorring, self-absorbed, self-accusing, self-adjusting, self- balanced, self-boasting, self-canceled, self-combating, self- commendation, self-condemned, self-conflict, self-conquest, self- constituted, self-consumed, self-contempt, self-controlled, self- deceiving, self-denying, self-destroyed, self-disclosure, self- display, self-dominion, self-doomed, self-elected, self-evolved, self-exalting, self-excusing, self-exile, self-fed, self-fulfillment, self-governed, self-harming, self-helpless, self-humiliation, self- idolized, self-inflicted, self-improvement, self-instruction, self- invited, self-judging, self-justification, self-loathing, self- loving, self-maintenance, self-mastered, self-nourishment, self- perfect, self-perpetuation, self-pleasing, self-praising, self- preserving, self-questioned, self-relying, self-restraining, self- revelation, self-ruined, self-satisfaction, self-support, self- sustained, self-sustaining, self-tormenting, self-troubling, self- trust, self-tuition, self-upbraiding, self-valuing, self-worshiping, and many others.
cry: 1. To make a loud call or cry; to call or exclaim vehemently or earnestly; to shout; to vociferate; to proclaim; to pray; to implore. And about the ninth hour, Jesus cried with a loud voice. Matt. xxvii. 46. Clapping their hands, and crying with loud voice. Shak. Hear the voice of my supplications when I cry unto thee. Ps. xxviii. 2. The voice of him that crieth in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the Lord. Is. xl. 3. Some cried after him to return. Bunyan. 2. To utter lamentations; to lament audibly; to express pain, grief, or distress, by weeping and sobbing; to shed tears; to bawl, as a child. Ye shall cry for sorrow of heart. Is. lxv. 14. I could find it in my heart to disgrace my man's apparel and to cry like a woman. Shak. 3. To utter inarticulate sounds, as animals. The young ravens which cry. Ps. cxlvii. 9. In a cowslip's bell I lie There I couch when owls do cry. Shak. To cry on or upon, to call upon the name of; to beseech."No longer on Saint Denis will we cry." Shak. -- To cry out. (a) To exclaim; to vociferate; to scream; to clamor. (b) To complain loudly; to lament. -- To cry out against, to complain loudly of; to censure; to blame. -- To cry out on or upon, to denounce; to censure. "Cries out upon abuses." Shak. -- To cry to, to call on in prayer; to implore. -- To cry you mercy, to beg your pardon. "I cry you mercy, madam; was it you" Shak.  1. To utter loudly; to call out; to shout; to sound abroad; to declare publicly. All, all, cry shame against ye, yet I 'll speak. Shak. The man . . . ran on,crying, Life! life! Eternal life! Bunyan. 2. To cause to do something, or bring to some state, by crying or weeping; as, to cry one's self to sleep. 3. To make oral and public proclamation of; to declare publicly; to notify or advertise by outcry, especially things lost or found, goods to be sold, ets.; as, to cry goods, etc. Love is lost, and thus she cries him. Crashaw. 4. Hence, to publish the banns of, as for marriage. I should not be surprised if they were cried in church next Sabbath. Judd. To cry aim. See under Aim. -- To cry down, to decry; to depreciate; to dispraise; to condemn. Men of dissolute lives cry down religion, because they would not be under the restraints of it. Tillotson. -- To cry out, to proclaim; to shout."Your gesture cries it out." Shak. -- To cry quits, to propose, or declare, the abandonment of a contest. -- To cry up, to enhance the value or reputation of by public and noisy praise; to extol; to laud publicly or urgently.  1. A loud utterance; especially, the inarticulate sound produced by one of the lower animals; as, the cry of hounds; the cry of wolves. Milton. 2. Outcry; clamor; tumult; popular demand. Again that cry was found to have been as unreasonable as ever. Macaulay. 3. Any expression of grief, distress, etc., accompanied with tears or sobs; a loud sound, uttered in lamentation. There shall be a great cry throughout all the land. Ex. xi. 6. An infant crying in the night, An infant crying for the light; And with no language but a cry. Tennyson. 4. Loud expression of triumph or wonder or of popular acclamation or favor. Swift. The cry went once on thee. Shak. 5. Importunate supplication. O, the most piteous cry of the poor souls. Shak. 6. Public advertisement by outcry; proclamation, as by hawkers of their wares. The street cries of London. Mayhew. 7. Common report; fame. The cry goes that you shall marry her. Shak. 8. A word or phrase caught up by a party or faction and repeated for effect; as, the party cry of the Tories. All now depends upon a good cry. Beaconsfield. 9. A pack of hounds. Milton. A cry more tunable Was never hollaed to, nor cheered with horn. Shak. 10. A pack or company of persons; -- in contempt. Would not this . . . get me a fellowship in a cry of players Shak. 11. The cracklling noise made by block tin when it is bent back and forth. A far cry, a long distance; -- in allusion to the sending of criers or messengers through the territory of a Scottish clan with an announcement or summons.
five: Four and one added; one more than four. Five nations (Ethnol.), a confederacy of the Huron-Iroquois Indians, consisting of five tribes: Mohawks, Onondagas, Cayugas, Oneidas, and Senecas. They inhabited the region which is now the State of new York.  1. The number next greater than four, and less than six; five units or objects. Five of them were wise, and five were foolish. Matt. xxv. 2. 2. A symbol representing this number, as 5, or V.
clothe: 1. To put garments on; to cover with clothing; to dress. Go with me, to clothe you as becomes you. Shak. 2. To provide with clothes; as, to feed and clothe a family; to clothe one's self extravagantly. Drowsiness shall clothe a man with rags. Prov. xxiii. 21 The naked every day he clad, When he put on his clothes. Goldsmith. 3. Fig.: To cover or invest, as with a garment; as, to clothe one with authority or power. Language in which they can clothe their thoughts. Watts. His sides are clothed with waving wood. J. Dyer. Thus Belial, with with words clothed in reason's garb. Milton.  To wear clothes. [Poetic] Care no more to clothe eat. Shak.
suffix: 1. A letter, letters, syllable, or syllables added or appended to the end of a word or a root to modify the meaning; a postfix. 2. (Math.)  A subscript mark, number, or letter. See Subscript, a.  To add or annex to the end, as a letter or syllable to a word; to append.
egg: 1. (Popularly)  The oval or roundish body laid by domestic poultry and other birds, tortoises, etc. It consists of a yolk, usually surrounded by the "white" or albumen, and inclosed in a shell or strong membrane. 2. (Biol.)  A simple cell, from the development of which the young of animals are formed; ovum; germ cell. 3. Anything resembling an egg in form. Note: Egg is used adjectively, or as the first part of self- explaining compounds; as, egg beater or egg-beater, egg case, egg ladle, egg-shaped, etc. Egg and anchor (Arch.), an egg-shaped ornament, alternating with another in the form of a dart, used to enrich the ovolo; -- called also egg and dart, and egg and tongue. See Anchor, n., 5. Ogilvie. -- Egg cleavage (Biol.), a process of cleavage or segmentation, by which the egg undergoes endogenous division with formation of a mass of nearly similar cells, from the growth and differentiation of which the new organism is ultimately formed. See Segmentation of the ovum, under Segmentation. -- Egg development (Biol.), the process of the development of an egg, by which the embryo is formed. -- Egg mite (Zoöl.), any mite which devours the eggs of insects, as Nothrus ovivorus, which destroys those of the canker worm. -- Egg parasite (Zoöl.), any small hymenopterous insect, which, in the larval stage, lives within the eggs of other insects. Many genera and species are known.  To urge on; to instigate; to incite Adam and Eve he egged to ill. Piers Plowman. [She] did egg him on to tell How fair she was. Warner.
old: Open country. [Obs.] See World. Shak.  1. Not young; advanced far in years or life; having lived till toward the end of the ordinary term of living; as, an old man; an old age; an old horse; an old tree. Let not old age disgrace my high desire. Sir P. Sidney. The melancholy news that we grow old. Young. 2. Not new or fresh; not recently made or produced; having existed for a long time; as, old wine; an old friendship. "An old acquaintance." Camden. 3. Formerly existing; ancient; not modern; preceding; original; as, an old law; an old custom; an old promise. "The old schools of Greece." Milton. "The character of the old Ligurians." Addison. 4. Continued in life; advanced in the course of existence; having (a certain) length of existence; -- designating the age of a person or thing; as, an infant a few hours old; a cathedral centuries old. And Pharaoh said unto Jacob, How old art thou Cen. xlvii. 8. Note: In this use old regularly follows the noun that designates the age; as, she was eight years old. 5. Long practiced; hence, skilled; experienced; cunning; as, an old offender; old in vice. Vane, young in years, but in sage counsel old. Milton. 6. Long cultivated; as, an old farm; old land, as opposed to Ant: new land, that is, to land lately cleared. 7. Worn out; weakened or exhausted by use; past usefulness; as, old shoes; old clothes. 8. More than enough; abundant. [Obs.] If a man were porter of hell gate, he should have old turning the key. Shak. 9. Aged; antiquated; hence, wanting in the mental vigor or other qualities belonging to youth; -- used disparagingly as a term of reproach. 10. Old-fashioned; wonted; customary; as of old; as, the good old times; hence, colloquially, gay; jolly. 11. Used colloquially as a term of cordiality and familiarity. "Go thy ways, old lad." Shak. Old age, advanced years; the latter period of life. -- Old bachelor. See Bachelor, 1. -- Old Catholics. See under Catholic. -- Old English. See under English. n., 2. -- Old Nick, Old Scratch, the devil. -- Old lady (Zoöl.), a large European noctuid moth (Mormo maura). -- Old maid. (a) A woman, somewhat advanced in years, who has never been married; a spinster. (b) (Bot.) A West Indian name for the pink- flowered periwinkle (Vinca rosea). (c) A simple game of cards, played by matching them. The person with whom the odd card is left is the old maid. -- Old man's beard. (Bot.) (a) The traveler's joy (Clematis Vitalba). So named from the abundant long feathery awns of its fruit. (b) The Tillandsia usneoides. See Tillandsia. -- Old man's head (Bot.), a columnar cactus (Pilocereus senilis), native of Mexico, covered towards the top with long white hairs. -- Old red sandstone (Geol.), a series of red sandstone rocks situated below the rocks of the Carboniferous age and comprising various strata of siliceous sandstones and conglomerates. See Sandstone, and the Chart of Geology. -- Old school, a school or party belonging to a former time, or preserving the character, manner, or opinious of a former time; as, a gentleman of the old school; -- used also adjectively; as, Old-School Presbyterians. -- Old sledge, an old and well-known game of cards, called also all fours, and high, low, Jack, and the game. -- Old squaw (Zoöl.), a duck (Clangula hyemalis) inhabiting the northern parts of both hemispheres. The adult male is varied with black and white and is remarkable for the length of its tail. Called also longtailed duck, south southerly, callow, hareld, and old wife. -- Old style. (Chron.) See the Note under Style. -- Old Testament. See under Testament. -- Old wife. [In the senses b and cwritten also oldwife.] (a) A prating old woman; a gossip. Refuse profane and old wives' fables. 1 Tim. iv. 7. (b) (Zoöl.) The local name of various fishes, as the European black sea bream (Cantharus lineatus), the American alewife, etc. (c) (Zoöl.) A duck; the old squaw. -- Old World, the Eastern Hemisphere. Syn. -- Aged; ancient; pristine; primitive; antique; antiquated; old- fashioned; obsolete. See Ancient.
many: A retinue of servants; a household. [Obs.] Chaucer.  Consisting of a great number; numerous; not few. Thou shalt be a father of many nations. Gen. xvii. 4. Not many wise men after the flesh, not many mighty, not many noble, are called. 1 Cor. i. 26. Note: Many is freely prefixed to participles, forming compounds which need no special explanation; as, many-angled, many-celled, many-eyed, many-footed, many-handed, many-leaved, many-lettered, many-named, many-peopled, many-petaled, many-seeded, many-syllabled (polysyllabic), many-tongued, many-voiced, many-wived, and the like. Comparison is often expressed by many with as or so. "As many as were willing hearted . . . brought bracelets." Exod. xxxv. 22. "So many laws argue so many sins." Milton. Many stands with a singular substantive with a or an. Many a, a large number taken distributively; each one of many. "For thy sake have I shed many a tear." Shak. "Full many a gem of purest ray serene." Gray. -- Many one, many a one; many persons. BK. of Com. Prayer. -- The many, the majority; -- opposed to the few. See Many, n. -- Too many, too numerous; hence, too powerful; as, they are too many for us. L'Estrange. Syn. -- Numerous; multiplied; frequent; manifold; various; divers; sundry.  1. The populace; the common people; the majority of people, or of a community. After him the rascal many ran. Spenser. 2. A large or considerable number. A many of our bodies shall no doubt Find native graves. Shak. Seeing a great many in rich gowns. Addison. It will be concluded by manythat he lived like an honest man. Fielding. Note: In this sense, many is connected immediately with another substantive (without of) to show of what the many consists; as, a good many [of] people think so. He is liable to a great many inconveniences. Tillotson.
catch: 1. To lay hold on; to seize, especially with the hand; to grasp (anything) in motion, with the effect of holding; as, to catch a ball. 2. To seize after pursuing; to arrest; as, to catch a thief. "They pursued . . . and caught him." Judg. i. 6. 3. To take captive, as in a snare or net, or on a hook; as, to catch a bird or fish. 4. Hence: To insnare; to entangle. "To catch him in his words". Mark xii. 13. 5. To seize with the senses or the mind; to apprehend; as, to catch a melody. "Fiery thoughts . . . whereof I catch the issue." Tennyson. 6. To communicate to; to fasten upon; as, the fire caught the adjoining building. 7. To engage and attach; to please; to charm. The soothing arts that catch the fair. Dryden. 8. To get possession of; to attain. Torment myself to catch the English throne. Shak. 9. To take or receive; esp. to take by sympathy, contagion, infection, or exposure; as, to catch the spirit of an occasion; to catch the measles or smallpox; to catch cold; the house caught fire. 10. To come upon unexpectedly or by surprise; to find; as, to catch one in the act of stealing. 11. To reach in time; to come up with; as, to catch a train. To catch fire, to become inflamed or ignited. -- to catch it to get a scolding or beating; to suffer punishment. [Colloq.] -- To catch one's eye, to interrupt captiously while speaking. [Colloq.] "You catch me up so very short." Dickens. -- To catch up, to snatch; to take up suddenly.  1. To attain possession. [Obs.] Have is have, however men do catch. Shak. 2. To be held or impeded by entanglement or a light obstruction; as, a kite catches in a tree; a door catches so as not to open. 3. To take hold; as, the bolt does not catch. 4. To spread by, or as by, infecting; to communicate. Does the sedition catch from man to man Addison. To catch at, to attempt to seize; to be egger to get or use. "[To] catch at all opportunities of subverting the state." Addison. -- To catch up with, to come up with; to overtake.  1. Act of seizing; a grasp. Sir P. Sidney. 2. That by which anything is caught or temporarily fastened; as, the catch of a gate. 3. The posture of seizing; a state of preparation to lay hold of, or of watching he opportunity to seize; as, to lie on the catch. [Archaic] Addison. The common and the canon law . . . lie at catch, and wait advantages one againt another. T. Fuller. 4. That which is caught or taken; profit; gain; especially, the whole quantity caught or taken at one time; as, a good catch of fish. Hector shall have a great catch if he knock out either of your brains. Shak. 5. Something desirable to be caught, esp. a husband or wife in matrimony. [Colloq.] Marryat. 6. pl.  Passing opportunities seized; snatches. It has been writ by catches with many intervals. Locke. 7. A slight remembrance; a trace. We retain a catch of those pretty stories. Glanvill. 8. (Mus.)  A humorous canon or round, so contrived that the singers catch up each other's words.
wire: 1. A thread or slender rod of metal; a metallic substance formed to an even thread by being passed between grooved rollers, or drawn through holes in a plate of steel. Note: Wire is made of any desired form, as round, square, triangular, etc., by giving this shape to the hole in the drawplate, or between the rollers. 2. A telegraph wire or cable; hence, an electric telegraph; as, to send a message by wire. [Colloq.] Wire bed, Wire mattress, an elastic bed bottom or mattress made of wires interwoven or looped together in various ways. -- Wire bridge, a bridge suspended from wires, or cables made of wire. -- Wire cartridge, a shot cartridge having the shot inclosed in a wire cage. -- Wire cloth, a coarse cloth made of woven metallic wire, -- used for strainers, and for various other purposes. -- Wire edge, the thin, wirelike thread of metal sometimes formed on the edge of a tool by the stone in sharpening it. -- Wire fence, a fence consisting of posts with strained horizontal wires, wire netting, or other wirework, between. -- Wire gauge or gage. (a) A gauge for measuring the diameter of wire, thickness of sheet metal, etc., often consisting of a metal plate with a series of notches of various widths in its edge. (b) A standard series of sizes arbitrarily indicated, as by numbers, to which the diameter of wire or the thickness of sheet metal in usually made, and which is used in describing the size or thickness. There are many different standards for wire gauges, as in different countries, or for different kinds of metal, the Birmingham wire gauges and the American wire gauge being often used and designated by the abbreviations B. W.G. and A. W.G. respectively. -- Wire gauze, a texture of finely interwoven wire, resembling gauze. -- Wire grass (Bot.), either of the two common grasses Eleusine Indica, valuable for hay and pasture, and Poa compressa, or blue grass. See Blue grass. -- Wire grub (Zoöl.), a wireworm. -- Wire iron, wire rods of iron. -- Wire lathing, wire cloth or wire netting applied in the place of wooden lathing for holding plastering. -- Wire mattress. See Wire bed, above. -- Wire micrometer, a micrometer having spider lines, or fine wires, across the field of the instrument. -- Wire nail, a nail formed of a piece of wire which is headed and pointed. -- Wire netting, a texture of woven wire coarser than ordinary wire gauze. -- Wire rod, a metal rod from which wire is formed by drawing. -- Wire rope, a rope formed wholly, or in great part, of wires.  1. To bind with wire; to attach with wires; to apply wire to; as, to wire corks in bottling liquors. 2. To put upon a wire; as, to wire beads. 3. To snare by means of a wire or wires. 4. To send (a message) by telegraph. [Colloq.]  1. To pass like a wire; to flow in a wirelike form, or in a tenuous stream. [R.] P. Fletcher. 2. To send a telegraphic message. [Colloq.]
busy: 1. Engaged in some business; hard at work (either habitually or only for the time being); occupied with serious affairs; not idle nor at leisure; as, a busy merchant. Sir, my mistress sends you word THat she is busy, and she can not come. Shak. 2. Constantly at work; diligent; active. Busy hammers closing rivets up. Shak. Religious motives . . . are so busy in the heart. Addison. 3. Crowded with business or activities; -- said of places and times; as, a busy street. To-morrow is a busy day. Shak. 4. Officious; meddling; foolish active. On meddling monkey, or on busy ape. Shak. 5. Careful; anxious. [Obs.] Chaucer. Syn. -- Diligent; industrious; assiduous; active; occupied; engaged.  To make or keep busy; to employ; to engage or keep engaged; to occupy; as, to busy one's self with books. Be it thy course to busy giddy minds With foreign quarrels. Shak.
notice: 1. The act of noting, remarking, or observing; observation by the senses or intellect; cognizance; note. How ready is envy to mingle with the notices we take of other persons ! I. Watts. 2. Intelligence, by whatever means communicated; knowledge given or received; means of knowledge; express notification; announcement; warning. I . . . have given him notice that the Duke of Cornwall and Regan his duchess will be here. Shak. 3. An announcement, often accompanied by comments or remarks; as, book notices; theatrical notices. 4. A writing communicating information or warning. 5. Attention; respectful treatment; civility. To take notice of, to perceive especially; to observe or treat with particular attention. Syn. -- Attention; regard; remark; note; heed; consideration; respect; civility; intelligence; advice; news.  1. To observe; to see to mark; to take note of; to heed; to pay attention to. 2. To show that one has observed; to take public note of; remark upon; to make comments on; to refer to; as, to notice a book. This plant deserves to be noticed in this place. Tooke. Another circumstance was noticed in connection with the suggestion last discussed. Sir W. Hamilton. 3. To treat with attention and civility; as, to notice strangers. Syn. -- To remark; observe; perceive; see; mark; note; mind; regard; heed; mention. See Remark.
press: An East Indian insectivore (Tupaia ferruginea). It is arboreal in its habits, and has a bushy tail. The fur is soft, and varies from rusty red to maroon and to brownish black.  To force into service, particularly into naval service; to impress. To peaceful peasant to the wars is pressed. Dryden.  A commission to force men into public service, particularly into the navy. I have misused the king's press. Shak. Press gang, or Pressgang, a detachment of seamen under the command of an officer empowered to force men into the naval service. See Impress gang, under Impress. -- Press money, money paid to a man enlisted into public service. See Prest money, under Prest, a.  1. To urge, or act upon, with force, as weight; to act upon by pushing or thrusting, in distinction from pulling; to crowd or compel by a gradual and continued exertion; to bear upon; to squeeze; to compress; as, we press the ground with the feet when we walk; we press the couch on which we repose; we press substances with the hands, fingers, or arms; we are pressed in a crowd. Good measure, pressed down, and shaken together. Luke vi. 38. 2. To squeeze, in order to extract the juice or contents of; to squeeze out, or express, from something. From sweet kernels pressed, She tempers dulcet creams. Milton. And I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. Gen. xl. 11. 3. To squeeze in or with suitable instruments or apparatus, in order to compact, make dense, or smooth; as, to press cotton bales, paper, etc.; to smooth by ironing; as, to press clothes. 4. To embrace closely; to hug. Leucothoe shook at these alarms, And pressed Palemon closer in her arms. Pope. 5. To oppress; to bear hard upon. Press not a falling man too far. Shak. 6. To straiten; to distress; as, to be pressed with want or hunger. 7. To exercise very powerful or irresistible influence upon or over; to constrain; to force; to compel. Paul was pressed in the spirit, and testified to the Jews that Jesus was Christ. Acts xviii. 5. 8. To try to force (something upon some one); to urge or inculcate with earnestness or importunity; to enforce; as, to press divine truth on an audience. He pressed a letter upon me within this hour. Dryden. Be sure to press upon him every motive. Addison. 9. To drive with violence; to hurry; to urge on; to ply hard; as, to press a horse in a race. The posts . . . went cut, being hastened and pressed on, by the king's commandment. Esther viii. 14. Note: Press differs from drive and strike in usually denoting a slow or continued application of force; whereas drive and strike denote a sudden impulse of force. Pressed brick. See under Brick.  1. To exert pressure; to bear heavily; to push, crowd, or urge with steady force. 2. To move on with urging and crowding; to make one's way with violence or effort; to bear onward forcibly; to crowd; to throng; to encroach. They pressed upon him for to touch him. Mark iii. 10. 3. To urge with vehemence or importunity; to exert a strong or compelling influence; as, an argument presses upon the judgment.  1. An apparatus or machine by which any substance or body is pressed, squeezed, stamped, or shaped, or by which an impression of a body is taken; sometimes, the place or building containing a press or presses. Note: Presses are differently constructed for various purposes in the arts, their specific uses being commonly designated; as, a cotton press, a wine press, a cider press, a copying press, etc. See Drill press. 2. Specifically, a printing press. 3. The art or business of printing and publishing; hence, printed publications, taken collectively, more especially newspapers or the persons employed in writing for them; as, a free press is a blessing, a licentious press is a curse. 4. An upright case or closet for the safe keeping of articles; as, a clothes press. Shak. 5. The act of pressing or thronging forward. In their throng and press to that last hold. Shak. 6. Urgent demands of business or affairs; urgency; as, a press of engagements. 7. A multitude of individuals crowded together; They could not come nigh unto him for the press. Mark ii. 4. Cylinder press, a printing press in which the impression is produced by a revolving cylinder under which the form passes; also, one in which the form of type or plates is curved around a cylinder, instead of resting on a flat bed. Hydrostatic press. See under Hydrostatic. -- Liberty of the press, the free right of publishing books, pamphlets, or papers, without previous restraint or censorship, subject only to punishment for libelous, seditious, or morally pernicious matters. -- Press bed, a bed that may be folded, and inclosed, in a press or closet. Boswell. -- Press of sail, (Naut.), as much sail as the state of the wind will permit.
skill: 1. Discrimination; judgment; propriety; reason; cause. [Obs.] Shak. "As it was skill and right." Chaucer. For great skill is, he prove that he wrought. Chaucer. [For with good reason he should test what he created.] 2. Knowledge; understanding. [Obsoles.] That by his fellowship he color mightskill of any wight. Spenser. Nor want we skill or art. Milton. 3. The familiar knowledge of any art or science, united with readiness and dexterity in execution or performance, or in the application of the art or science to practical purposes; power to discern and execute; ability to perceive and perform; expertness; aptitude; as, the skill of a mathematician, physician, surgeon, mechanic, etc. Phocion, . . . by his great wisdom and skill at negotiations, diverted Alexander from the conquest of Athens. Swift. Where patience her sweet skill imparts. Keble. 4. Display of art; exercise of ability; contrivance; address. [Obs.] Richard . . . by a thousand princely skills, gathering so much corn as if he meant not to return. Fuller. 5. Any particular art. [Obs.] Learned in one skill, and in another kind of learning unskillful. Hooker. Syn. -- Dexterity; adroitness; expertness; art; aptitude; ability. -- Skill, Dexterity, Adroitness. Skill is more intelligent, denoting familiar knowledge united to readiness of performance. Dexterity, when applied to the body, is more mechanical, and refers to habitual ease of execution. Adroitness involves the same image with dexterity, and differs from it as implaying a general facility of movement (especially in avoidance of danger or in escaping from a difficalty). The same distinctions apply to the figurative sense of the words. A man is skillful in any employment when he understands both its theory and its practice. He is dexterous when he maneuvers with great lightness. He is adroit in the use od quick, sudden, and well- directed movements of the body or the mind, so as to effect the object he has in view.  To know; to understand. [Obs.] To skill the arts of expressing our mind. Barrow.  1. To be knowing; to have understanding; to be dexterous in performance. [Obs.] I can not skill of these thy ways. Herbert. 2. To make a difference; to signify; to matter; -- used impersonally. Spenser. What skills it, if a bag of stones or gold About thy neck do drown thee Herbert. It skills not talking of it. Sir W. Scott.
call: 1. To command or request to come or be present; to summon; as, to call a servant. Call hither Clifford; bid him come amain Shak. 2. To summon to the discharge of a particular duty; to designate for an office, or employment, especially of a religious character; -- often used of a divine summons; as, to be called to the ministry; sometimes, to invite; as, to call a minister to be the pastor of a church. Paul . . . called to be an apostle Rom. i. 1. The Holy Ghost said, Separate me Barnabas and Saul for the work whereunto I have called them. Acts xiii. 2. 3. To invite or command to meet; to convoke; -- often with together; as, the President called Congress together; to appoint and summon; as, to call a meeting of the Board of Aldermen. Now call we our high court of Parliament. Shak. 4. To give name to; to name; to address, or speak of, by a specifed name. If you would but call me Rosalind. Shak. And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. Gen. i. 5. 5. To regard or characterize as of a certain kind; to denominate; to designate. What God hath cleansed, that call not thou common. Acts x. 15. 6. To state, or estimate, approximately or loosely; to characterize without strict regard to fact; as, they call the distance ten miles; he called it a full day's work. [The] army is called seven hundred thousand men. Brougham. 7. To show or disclose the class, character, or nationality of. [Obs.] This speech calls him Spaniard. Beau. & Fl. 8. To utter in a loud or distinct voice; -- often with off; as, to call, or call off, the items of an account; to call the roll of a military company. No parish clerk who calls the psalm so clear. Gay. 9. To invoke; to appeal to. I call God for a witness. 2 Cor. i. 23 [Rev. Ver. ] 10. To rouse from sleep; to awaken. If thou canst awake by four o' the clock. I prithee call me. Sleep hath seized me wholly. Shak. To call a bond, to give notice that the amount of the bond will be paid. -- To call a party (Law), to cry aloud his name in open court, and command him to come in and perform some duty requiring his presence at the time on pain of what may befall him. -- To call back, to revoke or retract; to recall; to summon back. -- To call down, to pray for, as blessing or curses. -- To call forth, to bring or summon to action; as, to call forth all the faculties of the mind. -- To call in, (a) To collect; as, to call in debts or money; ar to withdraw from cirulation; as, to call in uncurrent coin. (b) To summon to one's side; to invite to come together; as, to call in neighbors. -- To call (any one) names, to apply contemptuous names (to any one). -- To call off, to summon away; to divert; as, to call off the attention; to call off workmen from their employment. -- To call out. (a) To summon to fight; to challenge. (b) To summon into service; as, to call out the militia. -- To call over, to recite separate particulars in order, as a roll of names. -- To call to account, to demand explanation of. -- To call to mind, to recollect; to revive in memory. -- To call to order, to request to come to order; as: (a) A public meeting, when opening it for business. (b) A person, when he is transgressing the rules of debate. -- To call to the bar, to admit to practice in courts of law. -- To call up. (a) To bring into view or recollection; as to call up the image of deceased friend. (b) To bring into action or discussion; to demand the consideration of; as, to call up a bill before a legislative body. Syn. -- To name; denominate; invite; bid; summon; convoke; assemble; collect; exhort; warn; proclaim; invoke; appeal to; designate. To Call, Convoke, Summon. Call is the generic term; as, to call a public meeting. To convoke is to require the assembling of some organized body of men by an act of authority; as, the king convoked Parliament. To summon is to require attendance by an act more or less stringent anthority; as, to summon a witness.  1. To speak in loud voice; to cry out; to address by name; -- sometimes with to. You must call to the nurse. Shak. The angel of God called to Hagar. Gen. xxi. 17. 2. To make a demand, requirement, or request. They called for rooms, and he showed them one. Bunyan. 3. To make a brief visit; also, to stop at some place designated, as for orders. He ordered her to call at the house once a week. Temple. To call for (a) To demand; to require; as, a crime calls for punishment; a survey, grant, or deed calls for the metes and bounds, or the quantity of land, etc., which it describes. (b) To give an order for; to request. "Whenever the coach stopped, the sailor called for more ale." Marryat. -- To call on, To call upon, (a) To make a short visit to; as, call on a friend. (b) To appeal to; to invite; to request earnestly; as, to call upon a person to make a speech. (c) To solicit payment, or make a demand, of a debt. (d) To invoke or play to; to worship; as, to call upon God. -- To call out To call or utter loudly; to brawl.  1. The act of calling; -- usually with the voice, but often otherwise, as by signs, the sound of some instrument, or by writing; a summons; an entreaty; an invitation; as, a call for help; the bugle's call. "Call of the trumpet." Shak. I rose as at thy call, but found thee not. Milton. 2. A signal, as on a drum, bugle, trumpet, or pipe, to summon soldiers or sailors to duty. 3. (Eccl.)  An invitation to take charge of or serve a church as its pastor. 4. A requirement or appeal arising from the circumstances of the case; a moral requirement or appeal. Dependence is a perpetual call upon hummanity. Addison. Running into danger without any call of duty. Macaulay. 5. A divine vocation or summons. St. Paul himself believed he did well, and that he had a call to it, when he persecuted the Christians. Locke. 6. Vocation; employment. Note: [In this sense, calling is generally used.] 7. A short visit; as, to make a call on a neighbor; also, the daily coming of a tradesman to solicit orders. The baker's punctual call. Cowper. 8. (Hunting)  A note blown on the horn to encourage the hounds. 9. (Naut.)  A whistle or pipe, used by the boatswain and his mate, to summon the sailors to duty. 10. (Fowling)  The cry of a bird; also a noise or cry in imitation of a bird; or a pipe to call birds by imitating their note or cry. 11. (Amer. Land Law)  A reference to, or statement of, an object, course, distance, or other matter of description in a survey or grant reguiring or calling for a carresponding object, etc., on the land. 12. The privilege to demand the delivery of stock, grain, or any commodity, at a fixed, price, at or within a certain time agreed on. [Brokers' Cant] 13. See Assessment, 4. At call, or On call, liable to be demanded at any moment without previous notice; as money on deposit. -- Call bird, a bird taught to allure others into a snare. -- Call boy (a) A boy who calls the actors in a theater; a boy who transmits the orders of the captain of a vessel to the engineer, helmsman, etc. (b) A waiting boy who answers a cal, or cames at the ringing of a bell; a bell boy. -- Call note, the note naturally used by the male bird to call the female. It is artifically applied by birdcatchers as a decoy. Latham. -- Call of the house (Legislative Bodies), a calling over the names of members, to discover who is absent, or for other purposes; a calling of names with a view to obtaining the ayes and noes from the persons named. -- Call to the bar, admission to practice in the courts.
fish: A counter, used in various games.  1. A name loosely applied in popular usage to many animals of diverse characteristics, living in the water. 2. (Zoöl.)  An oviparous, vertebrate animal usually having fins and a covering scales or plates. It breathes by means of gills, and lives almost entirely in the water. See Pisces. Note: The true fishes include the Teleostei (bony fishes), Ganoidei, Dipnoi, and Elasmobranchii or Selachians (sharks and skates). Formerly the leptocardia and Marsipobranciata were also included, but these are now generally regarded as two distinct classes, below the fishes. 3. pl.  The twelfth sign of the zodiac; Pisces. 4. The flesh of fish, used as food. 5. (Naut.) (a) A purchase used to fish the anchor. (b) A piece of timber, somewhat in the form of a fish, used to strengthen a mast or yard. Note: Fish is used adjectively or as part of a compound word; as, fish line, fish pole, fish spear, fish-bellied. Age of Fishes. See under Age, n., 8. -- Fish ball, fish (usually salted codfish) shared fine, mixed with mashed potato, and made into the form of a small, round cake. [U.S.] -- Fish bar. Same as Fish plate (below). -- Fish beam (Mech.), a beam one of whose sides (commonly the under one) swells out like the belly of a fish. Francis. -- Fish crow (Zoöl.), a species of crow (Corvus ossifragus), found on the Atlantic coast of the United States. It feeds largely on fish. -- Fish culture, the artifical breeding and rearing of fish; pisciculture. -- Fish davit. See Davit. -- Fish day, a day on which fish is eaten; a fast day. -- Fish duck (Zoöl.), any species of merganser. -- Fish fall, the tackle depending from the fish davit, used in hauling up the anchor to the gunwale of a ship. -- Fish garth, a dam or weir in a river for keeping fish or taking them easily. -- Fish glue. See Isinglass. -- Fish joint, a joint formed by a plate or pair of plates fastened upon two meeting beams, plates, etc., at their junction; -- used largely in connecting the rails of railroads. -- Fish kettle, a long kettle for boiling fish whole. -- Fish ladder, a dam with a series of steps which fish can leap in order to ascend falls in a river. -- Fish line, or Fishing line, a line made of twisted hair, silk, etc., used in angling. -- Fish louse (Zoöl.), any crustacean parasitic on fishes, esp. the parasitic Copepoda, belonging to Caligus, Argulus, and other related genera. See Branchiura. -- Fish maw (Zoöl.), the stomach of a fish; also, the air bladder, or sound. -- Fish meal, fish desiccated and ground fine, for use in soups, etc. -- Fish oil, oil obtained from the bodies of fish and marine animals, as whales, seals, sharks, from cods' livers, etc. -- Fish owl (Zoöl.), a fish-eating owl of the Old World genera Scotopelia and Ketupa, esp. a large East Indian species (K. Ceylonensis). -- Fish plate, one of the plates of a fish joint. -- Fish pot, a wicker basket, sunk, with a float attached, for catching crabs, lobsters, etc. -- Fish pound, a net attached to stakes, for entrapping and catching fish; a weir. [Local, U.S.] Bartlett. -- Fish slice, a broad knife for dividing fish at table; a fish trowel. -- Fish slide, an inclined box set in a stream at a small fall, or ripple, to catch fish descending the current. Knight. -- Fish sound, the air bladder of certain fishes, esp. those that are dried and used as food, or in the arts, as for the preparation of isinglass. -- Fish story, a story which taxes credulity; an extravagant or incredible narration. [Colloq. U.S.] Bartlett. -- Fish strainer. (a) A metal colander, with handles, for taking fish from a boiler. (b) A perforated earthenware slab at the bottom of a dish, to drain the water from a boiled fish. -- Fish trowel, a fish slice. -- Fish weir or wear, a weir set in a stream, for catching fish. -- Neither fish nor flesh (Fig.), neither one thing nor the other.  1. To attempt to catch fish; to be employed in taking fish, by any means, as by angling or drawing a net. 2. To seek to obtain by artifice, or indirectly to seek to draw forth; as, to fish for compliments. Any other fishing question. Sir W. Scott.  1. To catch; to draw out or up; as, to fish up an anchor. 2. To search by raking or sweeping. Swift. 3. To try with a fishing rod; to catch fish in; as, to fish a stream. Thackeray. 4. To strengthen (a beam, mast, etc.), or unite end to end (two timbers, railroad rails, etc.) by bolting a plank, timber, or plate to the beam, mast, or timbers, lengthwise on one or both sides. See Fish joint, under Fish, n. To fish the anchor. (Naut.) See under Anchor.
look: 1. To direct the eyes for the purpose of seeing something; to direct the eyes toward an object; to observe with the eyes while keeping them directed; -- with various prepositions, often in a special or figurative sense. See Phrases below. 2. To direct the attention (to something); to consider; to examine; as, to look at an action. 3. To seem; to appear; to have a particular appearance; as, the patient looks better; the clouds look rainy. It would look more like vanity than gratitude. Addison. Observe how such a practice looks in another person. I. Watts. 4. To have a particular direction or situation; to face; to front. The inner gate that looketh to north. Ezek. viii. 3. The east gate . . . which looketh eastward. Ezek. xi. 1. 5. In the imperative: see; behold; take notice; take care; observe; - - used to call attention. Look, how much we thus expel of sin, so much we expel of virtue. Milton. Note: Look, in the imperative, may be followed by a dependent sentence, but see is oftener so used. Look that ye bind them fast. Shak. Look if it be my daughter. Talfourd. 6. To show one's self in looking, as by leaning out of a window; as, look out of the window while I speak to you. Sometimes used figuratively. My toes look through the overleather. Shak. 7. To await the appearance of anything; to expect; to anticipate. Looking each hour into death's mouth to fall. Spenser. To look about, to look on all sides, or in different directions. -- To look about one, to be on the watch; to be vigilant; to be circumspect or guarded. -- To look after. (a) To attend to; to take care of; as, to look after children. (b) To expect; to be in a state of expectation. Men's hearts failing them for fear, and for looking after those things which are coming on the earth. Luke xxi. 26. (c) To seek; to search. My subject does not oblige me to look after the water, or point forth the place where to it is now retreated. Woodward. -- To look at, to direct the eyes toward so that one sees, or as if to see; as, to look at a star; hence, to observe, examine, consider; as, to look at a matter without prejudice. -- To look black, to frown; to scowl; to have a threatening appearance. The bishops thereat repined, and looked black. Holinshed. -- To look down on or upon, to treat with indifference or contempt; to regard as an inferior; to despise. -- To look for. (a) To expect; as, to look for news by the arrival of a ship. "Look now for no enchanting voice." Milton. (b) To seek for; to search for; as, to look for lost money, or lost cattle. -- To look forth. (a) To look out of something, as from a window. (b) To threaten to come out. Jer. vi. 1. (Rev. Ver.). -- To look into, to inspect closely; to observe narrowly; to examine; as, to look into the works of nature; to look into one's conduct or affairs. -- To look on. (a) To regard; to esteem. Her friends would look on her the worse. Prior. (b) To consider; to view; to conceive of; to think of. I looked on Virgil as a succinct, majestic writer. Dryden. (c) To be a mere spectator. I'll be a candleholder, and look on. Shak. -- To look out, to be on the watch; to be careful; as, the seaman looks out for breakers. -- To look through. (a) To see through. (b) To search; to examine with the eyes. -- To look to or unto. (a) To watch; to take care of. "Look well to thy herds." Prov. xxvii. 23. (b) To resort to with expectation of receiving something; to expect to receive from; as, the creditor may look to surety for payment. "Look unto me, and be ye saved." Is. xlv. 22. -- To look up, to search for or find out by looking; as, to look up the items of an account. -- To look up to, to respect; to regard with deference.  1. To look at; to turn the eyes toward. 2. To seek; to search for. [Obs.] Looking my love, I go from place to place. Spenser. 3. To expect. [Obs.] Shak. 4. To influence, overawe, or subdue by looks or presence as, to look down opposition. A spirit fit to start into an empire, And look the world to law. Dryden. 5. To express or manifest by a look. Soft eyes looked love to eyes which spake again. Byron. To look daggers. See under Dagger. -- To look in the face, to face or meet with boldness or confidence; hence, sometimes, to meet for combat. -- To look out, to seek for; as, prudent persons look out associates good reputation.  1. The act of looking; a glance; a sight; a view; -- often in certain phrases; as, to have, get, take, throw, or cast, a look. Threw many a northward look to see his father Bring up his powers; but he did long in vain. Shak. 2. Expression of the eyes and face; manner; as, a proud or defiant look. "Gentle looks." Shak. Up ! up! my friends, and clear your looks. Wordsworth. 3. Hence; Appearance; aspect; as, the house has a gloomy look; the affair has a bad look. Pain, disgrace, and poverty have frighted looks. Locke. There was something that reminded me of Dante's Hell in the look of this. Carlyle.
collect: 1. To gather into one body or place; to assemble or bring together; to obtain by gathering. A band of men Collected choicely from each country. Shak. 'Tis memory alone that enriches the mind, by preserving what our labor and industry daily collect. Watts. 2. To demand and obtain payment of, as an account, or other indebtedness; as, to collect taxes. 3. To infer from observed facts; to conclude from premises. [Archaic.] Shak. Which sequence, I conceive, is very ill collected. Locke. To collect one's self, to recover from surprise, embarrassment, or fear; to regain self-control. Syn. -- To gather; assemble; congregate; muster; accumulate; garner; aggregate; amass; infer; deduce.  1. To assemble together; as, the people collected in a crowd; to accumulate; as, snow collects in banks. 2. To infer; to conclude. [Archaic] Whence some collect that the former word imports a plurality of persons. South.  A short, comprehensive prayer, adapted to a particular day, occasion, or condition, and forming part of a liturgy. The noble poem on the massacres of Piedmont is strictly a collect in verse. Macaulay.
time: 1. Duration, considered independently of any system of measurement or any employment of terms which designate limited portions thereof. The time wasteth [i. e. passes away] night and day. Chaucer. I know of no ideas . . . that have a better claim to be accounted simple and original than those of space and time. Reid. 2. A particular period or part of duration, whether past, present, or future; a point or portion of duration; as, the time was, or has been; the time is, or will be. God, who at sundry times and in divers manners spake in time past unto the fathers by the prophets. Heb. i. 1. 3. The period at which any definite event occurred, or person lived; age; period; era; as, the Spanish Armada was destroyed in the time of Queen Elizabeth; -- often in the plural; as, ancient times; modern times. 4. The duration of one's life; the hours and days which a person has at his disposal. Believe me, your time is not your own; it belongs to God, to religion, to mankind. Buckminster. 5. A proper time; a season; an opportunity. There is . . . a time to every purpose. Eccl. iii. 1. The time of figs was not yet. Mark xi. 13. 6. Hour of travail, delivery, or parturition. She was within one month of her time. Clarendon. 7. Performance or occurrence of an action or event, considered with reference to repetition; addition of a number to itself; repetition; as, to double cloth four times; four times four, or sixteen. Summers three times eight save one. Milton. 8. The present life; existence in this world as contrasted with immortal life; definite, as contrasted with infinite, duration. Till time and sin together cease. Keble. 9. (Gram.)  Tense. 10. (Mus.)  The measured duration of sounds; measure; tempo; rate of movement; rhythmical division; as, common or triple time; the musician keeps good time. Some few lines set unto a solemn time. Beau. & Fl. Note: Time is often used in the formation of compounds, mostly self- explaining; as, time-battered, time-beguiling, time-consecrated, time-consuming, time-enduring, time-killing, time-sanctioned, time- scorner, time-wasting, time-worn, etc. Absolute time, time irrespective of local standards or epochs; as, all spectators see a lunar eclipse at the same instant of absolute time. -- Apparent time, the time of day reckoned by the sun, or so that 12 o'clock at the place is the instant of the transit of the sun's center over the meridian. -- Astronomical time, mean solar time reckoned by counting the hours continuously up to twenty-four from one noon to the next. -- At times, at distinct intervals of duration; now and then; as, at times he reads, at other times he rides. -- Civil time, time as reckoned for the purposes of common life in distinct periods, as years, months, days, hours, etc., the latter, among most modern nations, being divided into two series of twelve each, and reckoned, the first series from midnight to noon, the second, from noon to midnight. -- Common time (Mil.), the ordinary time of marching, in which ninety steps, each twenty-eight inches in length, are taken in one minute. -- Equation of time. See under Equation, n. -- In time. (a) In good season; sufficiently early; as, he arrived in time to see the exhibition. (b) After a considerable space of duration; eventually; finally; as, you will in time recover your health and strength. -- Mean time. See under 4th Mean. -- Quick time (Mil.), time of marching, in which one hundred and twenty steps, each thirty inches in length, are taken in one minute. -- Sidereal time. See under Sidereal. -- Standard time, the civil time that has been established by law or by general usage over a region or country. In England the standard time is Greenwich mean solar time. In the United States and Canada four kinds of standard time have been adopted by the railroads and accepted by the people, viz., Eastern, Central, Mountain, and Pacific time, corresponding severally to the mean local times of the 75th, 90th, 105th, and 120th meridians west from Greenwich, and being therefore five, six, seven, and eight hours slower than Greenwich time. -- Time ball, a ball arranged to drop from the summit of a pole, to indicate true midday time, as at Greenwich Observatory, England. Nichol. -- Time bargain (Com.), a contract made for the sale or purchase of merchandise, or of stock in the public funds, at a certain time in the future. -- Time bill. Same as Time-table. [Eng.] -- Time book, a book in which is kept a record of the time persons have worked. -- Time detector, a timepiece provided with a device for registering and indicating the exact time when a watchman visits certain stations in his beat. -- Time enough, in season; early enough. "Stanly at Bosworth field, . . . came time enough to save his life." Bacon. -- Time fuse, a fuse, as for an explosive projectile, which can be so arranged as to ignite the charge at a certain definite interval after being itself ignited. -- Time immemorial, or Time out of mind. (Eng. Law) See under Immemorial. -- Time lock, a lock having clockwork attached, which, when wound up, prevents the bolt from being withdrawn when locked, until a certain interval of time has elapsed. -- Time of day, salutation appropriate to the times of the day, as "good morning," "good evening," and the like; greeting. -- To kill time. See under Kill, v. t. -- To make time. (a) To gain time. (b) To occupy or use (a certain) time in doing something; as, the trotting horse made fast time. -- To move, run, or go, against time, to move, run, or go a given distance without a competitor, in the quickest possible time; or, to accomplish the greatest distance which can be passed over in a given time; as, the horse is to run against time. -- True time. (a) Mean time as kept by a clock going uniformly. (b) (Astron.) Apparent time as reckoned from the transit of the sun's center over the meridian.  1. To appoint the time for; to bring, begin, or perform at the proper season or time; as, he timed his appearance rightly. There is no greater wisdom than well to time the beginnings and onsets of things. Bacon. 2. To regulate as to time; to accompany, or agree with, in time of movement. Who overlooked the oars, and timed the stroke. Addison. He was a thing of blood, whose every motion Was timed with dying cries. Shak. 3. To ascertain or record the time, duration, or rate of; as, to time the speed of horses, or hours for workmen. 4. To measure, as in music or harmony.  1. To keep or beat time; to proceed or move in time. With oar strokes timing to their song. Whittier. 2. To pass time; to delay. [Obs.]
fight: 1. To strive or contened for victory, with armies or in single combat; to attempt to defeat, subdue, or destroy an enemy, either by blows or weapons; to contend in arms; -- followed by with or against. You do fight against your country's foes. Shak. To fight with thee no man of arms will deign. Milton. 2. To act in opposition to anything; to struggle against; to contend; to strive; to make resistance. To fight shy, to avoid meeting fairly or at close quarters; to keep out of reach.  1. To carry on, or wage, as a conflict, or battle; to win or gain by struggle, as one's way; to sustain by fighting, as a cause. He had to fight his way through the world. Macaulay. I have fought a good fight. 2 Tim. iv. 7. 2. To contend with in battle; to war against; as, they fought the enemy in two pitched battles; the sloop fought the frigate for three hours. 3. To cause to fight; to manage or maneuver in a fight; as, to fight cocks; to fight one's ship. To fight it out, to fight until a decisive and conclusive result is reached.  1. A battle; an engagement; a contest in arms; a combat; a violent conflict or struggle for victory, between individuals or between armies, ships, or navies, etc. Who now defies thee thrice to single fight. Milton. 2. A struggle or contest of any kind. 3. Strength or disposition for fighting; pugnacity; as, he has a great deal of fight in him. [Colloq.] 4. A screen for the combatants in ships. [Obs.] Up with your fights, and your nettings prepare. Dryden. Running fight, a fight in which the enemy is continually chased; also, one which continues without definite end or result. Syn. -- Combat; engagement; contest; struggle; encounter; fray; affray; action; conflict. See Battle.
door: 1. An opening in the wall of a house or of an apartment, by which to go in and out; an entrance way. To the same end, men several paths may tread, As many doors into one temple lead. Denham. 2. The frame or barrier of boards, or other material, usually turning on hinges, by which an entrance way into a house or apartment is closed and opened. At last he came unto an iron door That fast was locked. Spenser. 3. Passage; means of approach or access. I am the door; by me if any man enter in, he shall be saved. John x. 9. 4. An entrance way, but taken in the sense of the house or apartment to which it leads. Martin's office is now the second door in the street. Arbuthnot. Blank door, Blind door, etc. (Arch.) See under Blank, Blind, etc. -- In doors, or Within doors, within the house. -- Next door to, near to; bordering on. A riot unpunished is but next door to a tumult. L'Estrange. -- Out of doors, or Without doors, and, colloquially, Out doors, out of the house; in open air; abroad; away; lost. His imaginary title of fatherhood is out of doors. Locke. -- To lay (a fault, misfortune, etc.) at one's door, to charge one with a fault; to blame for. -- To lie at one's door, to be imputable or chargeable to. If I have failed, the fault lies wholly at my door. Dryden. Note: Door is used in an adjectival construction or as the first part of a compound (with or without the hyphen), as, door frame, doorbell or door bell, door knob or doorknob, door latch or doorlatch, door jamb, door handle, door mat, door panel.
smile: 1. To express amusement, pleasure, moderate joy, or love and kindness, by the features of the face; to laugh silently. He doth nothing but frown . . . He hears merry tales and smiles not. Shak. She led to see the doughty hero slain. Pope. When last I saw thy young blue eyes, they smiled. Byron. 2. To express slight contempt by a look implying sarcasm or pity; to sneer. 'T was what I said to Craggs and Child, Who praised my modesty, and smiled. Pope. 3. To look gay and joyous; to have an appearance suited to excite joy; as, smiling spring; smilimg plenty. The desert smiled, And paradise was opened in the wild. Pope. 4. To be propitious or favorable; to favor; to countenance; -- often with on; as, to smile on one's labors.  1. To express by a smile; as, to smile consent; to smile a welcome to visitors. 2. To affect in a certain way with a smile. [R.] And sharply smile prevailing folly dead. Young.  1. The act of smiling; a peculiar change or brightening of the face, which expresses pleasure, moderate joy, mirth, approbation, or kindness; -- opposed to frown. Sweet intercourse Of looks and smiles: for smiles from reason flow. Milton. 2. A somewhat similar expression of countenance, indicative of satisfaction combined with malevolent feelings, as contempt, scorn, etc; as, a scornful smile. 3. Favor; countenance; propitiousness; as, the smiles of Providence. "The smile of heaven." Shak. 4. Gay or joyous appearance; as, the smiles of spring. The brightness of their [the flowers'] smile was gone. Bryant.
path: 1. A trodden way; a footway. The dewy paths of meadows we will tread. Dryden. 2. A way, course, or track, in which anything moves or has moved; route; passage; an established way; as, the path of a meteor, of a caravan, of a storm, of a pestilence. Also used figuratively, of a course of life or action. All the paths of the Lord are mercy and truth. Ps. xxv. 10. The paths of glory lead but to the grave. Gray.  To make a path in, or on (something), or for (some one). [R.] "Pathing young Henry's unadvised ways." Drayton.  To walk or go. [R.] Shak.
fat: 1. A large tub, cistern, or vessel; a vat. [Obs.] The fats shall overflow with wine and oil. Joel ii. 24. 2. A measure of quantity, differing for different commodities. [Obs.] Hebert.  1. Abounding with fat; as: (a) Fleshy; characterized by fatness; plump; corpulent; not lean; as, a fat man; a fat ox. (b) Oily; greasy; unctuous; rich; -- said of food. 2. Exhibiting the qualities of a fat animal; coarse; heavy; gross; dull; stupid. Making our western wits fat and mean. Emerson. Make the heart of this people fat. Is. vi. 10. 3. Fertile; productive; as, a fat soil; a fat pasture. 4. Rich; producing a large income; desirable; as, a fat benefice; a fat office; a fat job. Now parson of Troston, a fat living in Suffolk. Carlyle. 5. Abounding in riches; affluent; fortunate. [Obs.] Persons grown fat and wealthy by long impostures. Swift. 6. (Typog.)  Of a character which enables the compositor to make large wages; -- said of matter containing blank, cuts, or many leads, etc.; as, a fat take; a fat page. Fat lute, a mixture of pipe clay and oil for filling joints.  1. (Physiol. Chem.)  An oily liquid or greasy substance making up the main bulk of the adipose tissue of animals, and widely distributed in the seeds of plants. See Adipose tissue, under Adipose. Note: Animal fats are composed mainly of three distinct fats, tristearin, tripalmitin, and triolein, mixed in varying proportions. As olein is liquid at ordinary temperatures, while the other two fats are solid, it follows that the consistency or hardness of fats depends upon the relative proportion of the three individual fats. During the life of an animal, the fat is mainly in a liquid state in the fat cells, owing to the solubility of the two solid fats in the more liquid olein at the body temperature. Chemically, fats are composed of fatty acid, as stearic, palmitic, oleic, etc., united with glyceryl. In butter fat, olein and palmitin predominate, mixed with another fat characteristic of butter, butyrin. In the vegetable kingdom many other fats or glycerides are to be found, as myristin from nutmegs, a glyceride of lauric acid in the fat of the bay tree, etc. 2. The best or richest productions; the best part; as, to live on the fat of the land. 3. (Typog.)  Work. containing much blank, or its equivalent, and, therefore, profitable to the compositor. Fat acid. (Chem.) See Sebacic acid, under Sebacic. -- Fat series, Fatty series (Chem.), the series of the paraffine hydrocarbons and their derivatives; the marsh gas or methane series. -- Natural fats (Chem.), the group of oily substances of natural occurrence, as butter, lard, tallow, etc., as distinguished from certain fatlike substance of artificial production, as paraffin. Most natural fats are essentially mixtures of triglycerides of fatty acids.  To make fat; to fatten; to make plump and fleshy with abundant food; as, to fat fowls or sheep. We fat all creatures else to fat us. Shak.  To grow fat, plump, and fleshy. An old ox fats as well, and is as good, as a young one. Mortimer.
west: 1. The point in the heavens where the sun is seen to set at the equinox; or, the corresponding point on the earth; that one of the four cardinal points of the compass which is in a direction at right angles to that of north and south, and on the left hand of a person facing north; the point directly opposite to east. And fresh from the west is the free wind's breath. Bryant. 2. A country, or region of country, which, with regard to some other country or region, is situated in the direction toward the west. 3. Specifically: (a) The Westen hemisphere, or the New World so called, it having been discovered by sailing westward from Europe; the Occident. (b) (U. S. Hist. & Geog.) Formerly, that part of the United States west of the Alleghany mountains; now, commonly, the whole region west of the Mississippi river; esp., that part which is north of the Indian Territory, New Mexico, etc. Usually with the definite article. West by north, West by south, according to the notation of the mariner's compass, that point which lies 11 -- West northwest, West southwest, that point which lies 22Illust. of Compass.  Lying toward the west; situated at the west, or in a western direction from the point of observation or reckoning; proceeding toward the west, or coming from the west; as, a west course is one toward the west; an east and west line; a west wind blows from the west. This shall be your west border. Num. xxxiv. 6. West end, the fashionable part of London, commencing from the east, at Charing Cross.  Westward.  1. To pass to the west; to set, as the sun. [Obs.] "The hot sun gan to west." Chaucer. 2. To turn or move toward the west; to veer from the north or south toward the west.
mount: 1. A mass of earth, or earth and rock, rising considerably above the common surface of the surrounding land; a mountain; a high hill; -- used always instead of mountain, when put before a proper name; as, Mount Washington; otherwise, chiefly in poetry. 2. A bulwark for offense or defense; a mound. [Obs.] Hew ye down trees, and cast a mount against Jerusalem. Jer. vi. 6. 3. Etym: [See Mont de piété.]  A bank; a fund. Mount of piety. See Mont de piété.  1. To rise on high; to go up; to be upraised or uplifted; to tower aloft; to ascend; -- often with up. Though Babylon should mount up to heaven. Jer. li. 53. The fire of trees and houses mounts on high. Cowley. 2. To get up on anything, as a platform or scaffold; especially, to seat one's self on a horse for riding. 3. To attain in value; to amount. Bring then these blessings to a strict account, Make fair deductions, see to what they mount. Pope.  1. To get upon; to ascend; to climb. Shall we mount again the rural throne Dryden. 2. To place one's self on, as a horse or other animal, or anything that one sits upon; to bestride. 3. To cause to mount; to put on horseback; to furnish with animals for riding; to furnish with horses. "To mount the Trojan troop." Dryden. 4. Hence: To put upon anything that sustains and fits for use, as a gun on a carriage, a map or picture on cloth or paper; to prepare for being worn or otherwise used, as a diamond by setting, or a sword blade by adding the hilt, scabbard, etc. 5. To raise aloft; to lift on high. What power is it which mounts my love so high Shak. Note: A fort or ship is said to mount cannon, when it has them arranged for use in or about it. To mount guard (Mil.), to go on guard; to march on guard; to do duty as a guard. -- To mount a play, to prepare and arrange the scenery, furniture, etc., used in the play.  That upon which a person or thing is mounted, as: (a) A horse. She had so good a seat and hand, she might be trusted with any mount. G. Eliot. (b) The cardboard or cloth on which a drawing, photograph, or the like is mounted; a mounting.
say: Saw. Chaucer.  1. Trial by sample; assay; sample; specimen; smack. [Obs.] if those principal works of God . . . be but certain tastes and saus, as if were, of that final benefit. Hooker. Thy tongue some say of breeding breathes. Shak. 2. Tried quality; temper; proof. [Obs.] he found a sword of better say. Spenser. 3. Essay; trial; attempt. [Obs.] To give a say at, to attempt. B. Jonson.  To try; to assay. [Obs.] B. Jonson.  1. A kind of silk or satin. [Obs.] Thou say, thou serge, nay, thou buckram lord! Shak. 2. A delicate kind of serge, or woolen cloth. [Obs.] His garment neither was of silk nor say. Spenser.  1. To utter or express in words; to tell; to speak; to declare; as, he said many wise things. Arise, and say how thou camest here. Shak. 2. To repeat; to rehearse; to recite; to pronounce; as, to say a lesson. Of my instruction hast thou nothing bated In what thou hadst to say Shak. After which shall be said or sung the following hymn. Bk. of Com. Prayer. 3. To announce as a decision or opinion; to state positively; to assert; hence, to form an opinion upon; to be sure about; to be determined in mind as to. But what it is, hard is to say. Milton. 4. To mention or suggest as an estimate, hypothesis, or approximation; hence, to suppose; -- in the imperative, followed sometimes by the subjunctive; as, he had, say fifty thousand dollars; the fox had run, say ten miles. Say, for nonpayment that the debt should double, Is twenty hundred kisses such a trouble Shak. It is said, or They say, it is commonly reported; it is rumored; people assert or maintain. -- That is to say, that is; in other words; otherwise.  To speak; to express an opinion; to make answer; to reply. You have said; but whether wisely or no, let the forest judge. Shak. To this argument we shall soon have said; for what concerns it us to hear a husband divulge his household privacies Milton.  A speech; something said; an expression of opinion; a current story; a maxim or proverb. [Archaic or Colloq.] He no sooner said out his say, but up rises a cunning snap. L'Estrange. That strange palmer's boding say, That fell so ominous and drear Full on the object of his fear. Sir W. Scott.
last: of Last, to endure, contracted from lasteth. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. Being after all the others, similarly classed or considered, in time, place, or order of succession; following all the rest; final; hindmost; farthest; as, the last year of a century; the last man in a line of soldiers; the last page in a book; his last chance. Also day by day, from the first day unto the last day, he read in the book of the law of God. Neh. viii. 18. Fairest of stars, last in the train of night. Milton. 2. Next before the present; as, I saw him last week. 3. Supreme; highest in degree; utmost. Contending for principles of the last importance. R. Hall . 4. Lowest in rank or degree; as, the last prize. Pope. 5. Farthest of all from a given quality, character, or condition; most unlikely; having least fitness; as, he is the last person to be accused of theft. At last, at the end of a certain period; after delay. "The duke of Savoy felt that the time had at last arrived." Motley. -- At the last. Etym: [Prob. fr. AS. on laste behind, following behind, fr. last race, track, footstep. See Last mold of the foot.] At the end; in the conclusion. [Obs.] "Gad, a troop shall overcome him; but he shall overcome at the last." Gen. xlix. 19. -- Last heir, the person to whom lands escheat for want of an heir. [Eng.] Abbott. -- On one's last legs, at, or near, the end of one's resources; hence, on the verge of failure or ruin, especially in a financial sense. [Colloq.] -- To breathe one's last, to die. -- To the last, to the end; till the conclusion. And blunder on in business to the last. Pope. Syn. -- At Last, At Length. These phrases both denote that some delayed end or result has been reached. At length implies that a long period was spent in so doing; as, after a voyage of more than three months, we at Length arrived safe. At last commonly implies that something has occurred (as interruptions, disappointments, etc.) which leads us to emphasize the idea of having reached the end; as, in spite of every obstacle, we have at last arrived.  1. At a time or on an occasion which is the latest of all those spoken of or which have occurred; the last time; as, I saw him last in New York. 2. In conclusion; finally.lastly Pleased with his idol, he commends, admires, Adores; and, last, the thing adored desires. Dryden. 3. At a time next preceding the present time. How long is't now since last yourself and I Were in a mask Shak.  1. To continue in time; to endure; to remain in existence. [I] proffered me to be slave in all that she me would ordain while my life lasted. Testament of Love. 2. To endure use, or continue in existence, without impairment or exhaustion; as, this cloth lasts better than that; the fuel will last through the winter.  A wooden block shaped like the human foot, on which boots and shoes are formed. The cobbler is not to go beyond his last. L'Estrange. Darning last, a smooth, hard body, often egg-shaped, put into a stocking to preserve its shape in darning.  To shape with a last; to fasten or fit to a last; to place smoothly on a last; as, to last a boot.  1. A load; a heavy burden; hence, a certain weight or measure, generally estimated at 4,000 lbs., but varying for different articles and in different countries. In England, a last of codfish, white herrings, meal, or ashes, is twelve barrels; a last of corn, ten quarters, or eighty bushels, in some parts of England, twenty-one quarters; of gunpowder, twenty-four barrels, each containing 100 lbs; of red herrings, twenty cades, or 20,000; of hides, twelve dozen; of leather, twenty dickers; of pitch and tar, fourteen barrels; of wool, twelve sacks; of flax or feathers, 1,700 lbs. 2. The burden of a ship; a cargo.
brother: 1. A male person who has the same father and mother with another person, or who has one of them only. In the latter case he is more definitely called a half brother, or brother of the half blood. Two of us in the churchyard lie, My sister and my brother. Wordsworth. 2. One related or closely united to another by some common tie or interest, as of rank, profession, membership in a society, toil, suffering, etc.; -- used among judges, clergymen, monks, physicians, lawers, professors of religion, etc. "A brother of your order." Shak. We few, we happy few, we band of brothers, For he to-day that sheds his blood with me Shall be my brother. Shak. 3. One who, or that which, resembles another in distinctive qualities or traits of character. He also that is slothful in his work is brother to him that is a great waster. Prov. xviii. 9. That April morn Of this the very brother. Wordsworth. Note: In Scripture, the term brother is applied to a kinsman by blood more remote than a son of the same parents, as in the case of Abraham and Lot, Jacob and Laban. In a more general sense, brother or brethren is used for fellow-man or fellow-men. For of whom such massacre Make they but of their brethren, men of men Milton. Brother Jonathan, a humorous designation for the people of the United States collectively. The phrase is said to have originated from Washington's referring to the patriotic Jonathan Trumbull, governor of Connecticut, as "Brother Jonathan." -- Blood brother. See under Blood.  To make a brother of; to call or treat as a brother; to admit to a brotherhood. Sir W. Scott.
be: 1. To exist actually, or in the world of fact; to have ex To be contents his natural desire. Pope. To be, or not to be: that is the question. Shak. 2. To exist in a certain manner or relation, -- whether as a reality or as a product of thought; to exist as the subject of a certain predicate, that is, as having a certain attribute, or as belonging to a certain sort, or as identical with what is specified, -- a word or words for the predicate being annexed; as, to be happy; to be here; to be large, or strong; to be an animal; to be a hero; to be a nonentity; three and two are five; annihilation is the cessation of existence; that is the man. 3. To take place; to happen; as, the meeting was on Thursday. 4. To signify; to represent or symbolize; to answer to. The field is the world. Matt. xiii. 38. The seven candlesticks which thou sawest are the seven churches. Rev. i. 20. Note: The verb to be (including the forms is, was, etc.) is used in forming the passive voice of other verbs; as, John has been struck by James. It is also used with the past participle of many intransitive verbs to express a state of the subject. But have is now more commonly used as the auxiliary, though expressing a different sense; as, "Ye have come too late -- but ye are come. " "The minstrel boy to the war is gone." The present and imperfect tenses form, with the infinitive, a particular future tense, which expresses necessity, duty, or purpose; as, government is to be supported; we are to pay our just debts; the deed is to be signed to-morrow. Note: Have or had been, followed by to, implies movement. "I have been to Paris." Sydney Smith. "Have you been to Franchard " R. L. Stevenson. Note: Been, or ben, was anciently the plural of the indicative present. "Ye ben light of the world." Wyclif, Matt. v. 14. Afterwards be was used, as in our Bible: "They that be with us are more than they that be with them." 2 Kings vi. 16. Ben was also the old infinitive: "To ben of such power." R. of Gloucester. Be is used as a form of the present subjunctive: "But if it be a question of words and names." Acts xviii. 15. But the indicative forms, is and are, with if, are more commonly used. Be it so, a phrase of supposition, equivalent to suppose it to be so; or of permission, signifying let it be so. Shak. -- If so be, in case. -- To be from, to have come from; as, from what place are you I am from Chicago. -- To let be, to omit, or leave untouched; to let alone. "Let be, therefore, my vengeance to dissuade." Spenser. Syn. -- To be, Exist. The verb to be, except in a few rare case, like that of Shakespeare's "To be, or not to be", is used simply as a copula, to connect a subject with its predicate; as, man is mortal; the soul is immortal. The verb to exist is never properly used as a mere copula, but points to things that stand forth, or have a substantive being; as, when the soul is freed from all corporeal alliance, then it truly exists. It is not, therefore, properly synonymous with to be when used as a copula, though occasionally made so by some writers for the sake of variety; as in the phrase "there exists [is] no reason for laying new taxes." We may, indeed, say, "a friendship has long existed between them," instead of saying, "there has long been a friendship between them;" but in this case, exist is not a mere copula. It is used in its appropriate sense to mark the friendship as having been long in existence.  A prefix, originally the same word as by; joined with verbs, it serves: (a) To intensify the meaning; as, bespatter, bestir. (b) To render an intransitive verb transitive; as, befall (to fall upon); bespeak (to speak for). (c) To make the action of a verb particular or definite; as, beget (to get as offspring); beset (to set around). Note: It is joined with certain substantives, and a few adjectives, to form verbs; as, bedew, befriend, benight, besot; belate (to make late); belittle (to make little). It also occurs in certain nouns, adverbs, and prepositions, often with something of the force of the preposition by, or about; as, belief (believe), behalf, bequest (bequeath); because, before, beneath, beside, between. In some words the original force of be is obscured or lost; as, in become, begin, behave, behoove, belong.
triangle: 1. (Geom.)  A figure bounded by three lines, and containing three angles. Note: A triangle is either plane, spherical, or curvilinear, according as its sides are straight lines, or arcs of great circles of a sphere, or any curved lines whatever. A plane triangle is designated as scalene, isosceles, or equilateral, according as it has no two sides equal, two sides equal, or all sides equal; and also as right-angled, or oblique-angled, according as it has one right angle, or none; and oblique-angled triangle is either acute-angled, or obtuse-angled, according as all the angles are acute, or one of them obtuse. The terms scalene, isosceles, equilateral, right-angled, acute-angled, and obtuse-angled, are applied to spherical triangles in the same sense as to plane triangles. 2. (Mus.)  An instrument of percussion, usually made of a rod of steel, bent into the form of a triangle, open at one angle, and sounded by being struck with a small metallic rod. 3. A draughtsman's square in the form of a right-angled triangle. 4. (Mus.)  A kind of frame formed of three poles stuck in the ground and united at the top, to which soldiers were bound when undergoing corporal punishment, -- now disused. 5. (Astron.) (a) A small constellation situated between Aries and Andromeda. (b) A small constellation near the South Pole, containing three bright stars. Triangle spider (Zoöl.), a small American spider (Hyptiotes Americanus) of the family Ciniflonidæ, living among the dead branches of evergreen trees. It constructs a triangular web, or net, usually composed of four radii crossed by a double elastic fiber. The spider holds the thread at the apex of the web and stretches it tight, but lets go and springs the net when an insect comes in contact with it.
million: 1. The number of ten hundred thousand, or a thousand thousand, -- written 1,000, 000. See the Note under Hundred 2. A very great number; an indefinitely large number. Millions of truths that a man is not concerned to know. Locke. 3. The mass of common people; -- with the article the. For the play, I remember, pleased not the million. Shak.
whose: The possessive case of who or which. See Who, and Which. Whose daughter art thou tell me, I pray thee. Gen. xxiv. 23. The question whose solution I require. Dryden.
ball: 1. Any round or roundish body or mass; a sphere or globe; as, a ball of twine; a ball of snow. 2. A spherical body of any substance or size used to play with, as by throwing, knocking, kicking, etc. 3. A general name for games in which a ball is thrown, kicked, or knocked. See Baseball, and Football. 4. Any solid spherical, cylindrical, or conical projectile of lead or iron, to be discharged from a firearm; as, a cannon ball; a rifball; -- often used collectively; as, powder and ball. Spherical balls for the smaller firearms are commonly called bullets. 5. (Pirotechnics & Mil.)  A flaming, roundish body shot into the air; a case filled with combustibles intended to burst and give light or set fire, or to produce smoke or stench; as, a fire ball; a stink ball. 6. (Print.)  A leather-covered cushion, fastened to a handle called a ballstock; -- formerly used by printers for inking the form, but now superseded by the roller. 7. A roundish protuberant portion of some part of the body; as, the ball of the thumb; the ball of the foot. 8. (Far.)  A large pill, a form in which medicine is commonly given to horses; a bolus. White. 9. The globe or earth. Pope. Move round the dark terrestrial ball. Addison. Ball and socket joint, a joint in which a ball moves within a socket, so as to admit of motion in every direction within certain limits. -- Ball bearings, a mechanical device for lessening the friction of axle bearings by means of small loose metal balls. -- Ball cartridge, a cartridge containing a ball, as distinguished from a blank cartridge, containing only powder. -- Ball cock, a faucet or valve which is opened or closed by the fall or rise of a ball floating in water at the end of a lever. -- Ball gudgeon, a pivot of a spherical form, which permits lateral deflection of the arbor or shaft, while retaining the pivot in its socket. Knight. -- Ball lever, the lever used in a ball cock. -- Ball of the eye, the eye itself, as distinguished from its lids and socket; -- formerly, the pupil of the eye. -- Ball valve (Mach.), a contrivance by which a ball, placed in a circular cup with a hole in its bottom, operates as a valve. -- Ball vein (Mining), a sort of iron ore, found in loose masses of a globular form, containing sparkling particles. -- Three balls, or Three golden balls, a pawnbroker's sign or shop. Syn. -- See Globe.  To gather balls which cling to the feet, as of damp snow or clay; to gather into balls; as, the horse balls; the snow balls.  1. (Metal.)  To heat in a furnace and form into balls for rolling. 2. To form or wind into a ball; as, to ball cotton.  A social assembly for the purpose of dancing.
move: 1. To cause to change place or posture in any manner; to set in motion; to carry, convey, draw, or push from one place to another; to impel; to stir; as, the wind moves a vessel; the horse moves a carriage. 2. (Chess, Checkers, etc.)  To transfer (a piece or man) from one space or position to another, according to the rules of the game; as, to move a king. 3. To excite to action by the presentation of motives; to rouse by representation, persuasion, or appeal; to influence. Minds desirous of revenge were not moved with gold. Knolles. No female arts his mind could move. Dryden. 4. To arouse the feelings or passions of; especially, to excite to tenderness or compassion; to touch pathetically; to excite, as an emotion. Shak. When he saw the multitudes, he was moved with compassion on them. Matt. ix. 36. [The use of images] in orations and poetry is to move pity or terror. Felton. 5. To propose; to recommend; specifically, to propose formally for consideration and determination, in a deliberative assembly; to submit, as a resolution to be adopted; as, to move to adjourn. Let me but move one question to your daughter. Shak. They are to be blamed alike who move and who decline war upon particular respects. Hayward. 6. To apply to, as for aid. [Obs.] Shak. Syn. -- To stir; agitate; trouble; affect; persuade; influence; actuate; impel; rouse; prompt; instigate; incite; induce; incline; propose; offer.  1. To change place or posture; to stir; to go, in any manner, from one place or position to another; as, a ship moves rapidly. The foundations also of the hills moved and were shaken, because he was wroth. Ps. xviii. 7. On the green bank I sat and listened long, ... Nor till her lay was ended could I move. Dryden. 2. To act; to take action; to stir; to begin to act; as, to move in a matter. 3. To change residence; to remove, as from one house, town, or state, to another. 4. (Chess, Checkers, etc.)  To change the place of a piece in accordance with the rules of the game.  1. The act of moving; a movement. 2. (Chess, Checkers, etc.)  The act of moving one of the pieces, from one position to another, in the progress of the game. 3. An act for the attainment of an object; a step in the execution of a plan or purpose. To make a move. (a) To take some action. (b) To move a piece, as in a game. -- To be on the move, to bustle or stir about. [Colloq.]
method: 1. An orderly procedure or process; regular manner of doing anything; hence, manner; way; mode; as, a method of teaching languages; a method of improving the mind. Addison. 2. Orderly arrangement, elucidation, development, or classification; clear and lucid exhibition; systematic arrangement peculiar to an individual. Though this be madness, yet there's method in it. Shak. All method is a rational progress, a progress toward an end. Sir W. Hamilton. 3. (Nat. Hist.)  Classification; a mode or system of classifying natural objects according to certain common characteristics; as, the method of Theophrastus; the method of Ray; the Linnæan method. Syn. -- Order; system; rule; regularity; way; manner; mode; course; process; means. -- Method, Mode, Manner. Method implies arrangement; mode, mere action or existence. Method is a way of reaching a given end by a series of acts which tend to secmode relates to a single action, or to the form which a series of acts, viewed as a whole, exhibits. Manner is literally the handling of a thing, and has a wider sense, embracing both method and mode. An instructor may adopt a good method of teaching to write; the scholar may acquire a bad mode of holding his pen; the manner in which he is corrected will greatly affect his success or failure.
rope: 1. A large, stout cord, usually one not less than an inch in circumference, made of strands twisted or braided together. It differs from cord, line, and string, only in its size. See Cordage. 2. A row or string consisting of a number of things united, as by braiding, twining, etc.; as, a rope of onions. 3. pl.  The small intestines; as, the ropes of birds. Rope ladder, a ladder made of ropes. -- Rope mat., a mat made of cordage, or strands of old rope. -- Rope of sand, something of no cohession or fiber; a feeble union or tie; something not to be relied upon. -- Rope pump, a pump in which a rapidly running endless rope raises water by the momentum communicated to the water by its adhesion to the rope. -- Rope transmission (Mach.), a method of transmitting power, as between distant places, by means of endless ropes running over grooved pulleys. -- Rope's end, a piece of rope; especially, one used as a lash in inflicting punishment. -- To give one rope, to give one liberty or license; to let one go at will uncheked.  To be formed into rope; to draw out or extend into a filament or thread, as by means of any glutinous or adhesive quality. Let us not hang like ropingicicles Upon our houses' thatch. Shak.  1. To bind, fasten, or tie with a rope or cord; as, to rope a bale of goods. Hence: -- 2. To connect or fasten together, as a party of mountain climbers, with a rope. 3. To partition, separate, or divide off, by means of a rope, so as to include or exclude something; as, to rope in, or rope off, a plot of ground; to rope out a crowd. 4. To lasso (a steer, horse). [Colloq. U.S.] 5. To draw, as with a rope; to entice; to inveigle; to decoy; as, to rope in customers or voters. [Slang, U.S.] 6. To prevent from winning (as a horse), by pulling or curbing. [Racing Slang, Eng.]
boy: A male child, from birth to the age of puberty; a lad; hence, a son. My only boy fell by the side of great Dundee. Sir W. Scott. Note: Boy is often used as a term of comradeship, as in college, or in the army or navy. In the plural used colloquially of members of an assosiaton, fraternity, or party. Boy bishop, a boy (usually a chorister) elected bishop, in old Christian sports, and invested with robes and other insignia. He practiced a kind of mimicry of the ceremonies in which the bishop usually officiated. The Old Boy, the Devil. [Slang] -- Yellow boys, guineas. [Slang, Eng.] -- Boy's love, a popular English name of Southernwood (Artemisia abrotonum);) -- called also lad's love. -- Boy's play, childish amusements; anything trifling.  To act as a boy; -- in allusion to the former practice of boys acting women's parts on the stage. I shall see Some squeaking Cleopatra boy my greatness. Shak.
farm: 1. The rent of land, -- originally paid by reservation of part of its products. [Obs.] 2. The term or tenure of a lease of land for cultivation; a leasehold. [Obs.] It is great willfulness in landlords to make any longer farms to their tenants. Spenser. 3. The land held under lease and by payment of rent for the purpose of cultivation. 4. Any tract of land devoted to agricultural purposes, under the management of a tenant or the owner. Note: In English the ideas of a lease, a term, and a rent, continue to be in a great degree inseparable, even from the popular meaning of a farm, as they are entirely so from the legal sense. Burrill. 5. A district of country leased (or farmed) out for the collection of the revenues of government. The province was devided into twelve farms. Burke. 6. (O. Eng. Law)  A lease of the imposts on particular goods; as, the sugar farm, the silk farm. Whereas G. H. held the farm of sugars upon a rent of 10,000 marks per annum. State Trials (1196).  1. To lease or let for an equivalent, as land for a rent; to yield the use of to proceeds. We are enforced to farm our royal realm. Shak. 2. To give up to another, as an estate, a business, the revenue, etc., on condition of receiving in return a percentage of what it yields; as, to farm the taxes. To farm their subjects and their duties toward these. Burke. 3. To take at a certain rent or rate. 4. To devote (land) to agriculture; to cultivate, as land; to till, as a farm. To farm let, To let to farm, to lease on rent.  To engage in the business of tilling the soil; to labor as a farmer.
tiny: Very small; little; puny. When that I was and a little tiny boy. Shak.
master: A vessel having (so many) masts; -- used only in compounds; as, a two-master.  1. A male person having another living being so far subject to his will, that he can, in the main, control his or its actions; -- formerly used with much more extensive application than now. (a) The employer of a servant. (b) The owner of a slave. (c) The person to whom an apprentice is articled. (d) A sovereign, prince, or feudal noble; a chief, or one exercising similar authority. (e) The head of a household. (f) The male head of a school or college. (g) A male teacher. (h) The director of a number of persons performing a ceremony or sharing a feast. (i) The owner of a docile brute, -- especially a dog or horse. (j) The controller of a familiar spirit or other supernatural being. 2. One who uses, or controls at will, anything inanimate; as, to be master of one's time. Shak. Master of a hundred thousand drachms. Addison. We are masters of the sea. Jowett (Thucyd. ). 3. One who has attained great skill in the use or application of anything; as, a master of oratorical art. Great masters of ridicule. Maccaulay. No care is taken to improve young men in their own language, that they may thoroughly understand and be masters of it. Locke. 4. A title given by courtesy, now commonly pronounced mìster, except when given to boys; -- sometimes written Mister, but usually abbreviated to Mr. 5. A young gentleman; a lad, or small boy. Where there are little masters and misses in a house, they are impediments to the diversions of the servants. Swift. 6. (Naut.)  The commander of a merchant vessel; -- usually called captain. Also, a commissioned officer in the navy ranking next above ensign and below lieutenant; formerly, an officer on a man-of-war who had immediate charge, under the commander, of sailing the vessel. 7. A person holding an office of authority among the Freemasons, esp. the presiding officer; also, a person holding a similar office in other civic societies. Little masters, certain German engravers of the 16th century, so called from the extreme smallness of their prints. -- Master in chancery, an officer of courts of equity, who acts as an assistant to the chancellor or judge, by inquiring into various matters referred to him, and reporting thereon to the court. -- Master of arts, one who takes the second degree at a university; also, the degree or title itself, indicated by the abbreviation M. A., or A. M. -- Master of the horse, the third great officer in the British court, having the management of the royal stables, etc. In ceremonial cavalcades he rides next to the sovereign. -- Master of the rolls, in England, an officer who has charge of the rolls and patents that pass the great seal, and of the records of the chancery, and acts as assistant judge of the court. Bouvier. Wharton. -- Past master, one who has held the office of master in a lodge of Freemasons or in a society similarly organized. -- The old masters, distinguished painters who preceded modern painters; especially, the celebrated painters of the 16th and 17th centuries. -- To be master of one's self, to have entire self-control; not to be governed by passion. -- To be one's own master, to be at liberty to act as one chooses without dictation from anybody. Note: Master, signifying chief, principal, masterly, superior, thoroughly skilled, etc., is often used adjiectively or in compounds; as, master builder or master-builder, master chord or master-chord, master mason or master-mason, master workman or master-workman, master mechanic, master mind, master spirit, master passion, etc. Throughout the city by the master gate. Chaucer. Master joint (Geol.), a quarryman's term for the more prominent and extended joints traversing a rock mass. -- Master key, a key adapted to open several locks differing somewhat from each other; figuratively, a rule or principle of general application in solving difficulties. -- Master lode (Mining), the principal vein of ore. -- Master mariner, an experienced and skilled seaman who is certified to be competent to command a merchant vessel. -- Master sinew (Far.), a large sinew that surrounds the hough of a horse, and divides it from the bone by a hollow place, where the windgalls are usually seated. -- Master singer. See Mastersinger. -- Master stroke, a capital performance; a masterly achievement; a consummate action; as, a master stroke of policy. -- Master tap (Mech.), a tap for forming the thread in a screw cutting die. -- Master touch. (a) The touch or skill of a master. Pope. (b) Some part of a performance which exhibits very skillful work or treatment. "Some master touches of this admirable piece." Tatler. -- Master work, the most important work accomplished by a skilled person, as in architecture, literature, etc.; also, a work which shows the skill of a master; a masterpiece. -- Master workman, a man specially skilled in any art, handicraft, or trade, or who is an overseer, foreman, or employer.  1. To become the master of; to subject to one's will, control, or authority; to conquer; to overpower; to subdue. Obstinacy and willful neglects must be mastered, even though it cost blows. Locke. 2. To gain the command of, so as to understand or apply; to become an adept in; as, to master a science. 3. To own; to posses. [Obs.] The wealth That the world masters. Shak.  To be skillful; to excel. [Obs.]
hat: Hot. [Obs.] Chaucer.  sing. pres. of Hote to be called. Cf. Hatte. [Obs.] "That one hat abstinence." Piers Plowman.  A covering for the head; esp., one with a crown and brim, made of various materials, and worn by men or women for protecting the head from the sun or weather, or for ornament. Hat block, a block on which hats are formed or dressed. -- To pass around the hat, to take up a collection of voluntary contributions, which are often received in a hat. [Collog.] Lowell.
stead: 1. Place, or spot, in general. [Obs., except in composition.] Chaucer. Fly, therefore, fly this fearful stead anon. Spenser. 2. Place or room which another had, has, or might have. "Stewards of your steads." Piers Plowman. In stead of bounds, he a pillar set. Chaucer. 3. A frame on which a bed is laid; a bedstead. [R.] The genial bed, Sallow the feet, the borders, and the stead. Dryden. 4. A farmhouse and offices. [Prov. Eng. & Scot.] Note: The word is now commonly used as the last part of a compound; as, farmstead, homestead, readstead, etc. In stead of, in place of. See Instead. -- To stand in stead, or To do stead, to be of use or great advantage. The smallest act . . . shall stand us in great stead. Atterbury. Here thy sword can do thee little stead. Milton.  1. To help; to support; to benefit; to assist. Perhaps my succour or advisement meet, Mote stead you much your purpose to subdue. Spenser. It nothing steads us To chide him from our eaves. Shak. 2. To fill place of. [Obs.] Shak.
swim: 1. To be supported by water or other fluid; not to sink; to float; as, any substance will swim, whose specific gravity is less than that of the fluid in which it is immersed. 2. To move progressively in water by means of strokes with the hands and feet, or the fins or the tail. Leap in with me into this angry flood, And swim to yonder point. Shak. 3. To be overflowed or drenched. Ps. vi. 6. Sudden the ditches swell, the meadows swim. Thomson. 4. Fig.: To be as if borne or floating in a fluid. [They] now swim in joy. Milton. 5. To be filled with swimming animals. [Obs.] [Streams] that swim full of small fishes. Chaucer.  1. To pass or move over or on by swimming; as, to swim a stream. Sometimes he thought to swim the stormy main. Dryden. 2. To cause or compel to swim; to make to float; as, to swim a horse across a river. 3. To immerse in water that the lighter parts may float; as, to swim wheat in order to select seed.  1. The act of swimming; a gliding motion, like that of one swimming. B. Jonson. 2. The sound, or air bladder, of a fish. 3. A part of a stream much frequented by fish. [Eng.] Swim bladder, an air bladder of a fish. -- To be in the swim, to be in a favored position; to be associated with others in active affairs. [Colloq.]  To be dizzy; to have an unsteady or reeling sensation; as, the head swims.
pretty: 1. Pleasing by delicacy or grace; attracting, but not striking or impressing; of a pleasing and attractive form a color; having slight or diminutive beauty; neat or elegant without elevation or grandeur; pleasingly, but not grandly, conceived or expressed; as, a pretty face; a pretty flower; a pretty poem. This is the prettiest lowborn lass that ever Ran on the greensward. Shak. 2. Moderately large; considerable; as, he had saved a pretty fortune. "Wavering a pretty while." Evelyn. 3. Affectedly nice; foppish; -- used in an ill sense. The pretty gentleman is the most complaisant in the world. Spectator. 4. Mean; despicable; contemptible; -- used ironically; as, a pretty trick; a pretty fellow. 5. Stout; strong and brave; intrepid; valiant. [Scot.] [He] observed they were pretty men, meaning not handsome. Sir W. Scott. Syn. -- Elegant; neat; fine. See Handsome.  In some degree; moderately; considerably; rather; almost; -- less emphatic than very; as, I am pretty sure of the fact; pretty cold weather. Pretty plainly professes himself a sincere Christian. Atterbury.
degree: 1. A step, stair, or staircase. [Obs.] By ladders, or else by degree. Rom. of R. 2. One of a series of progressive steps upward or downward, in quality, rank, acquirement, and the like; a stage in progression; grade; gradation; as, degrees of vice and virtue; to advance by slow degrees; degree of comparison. 3. The point or step of progression to which a person has arrived; rank or station in life; position. "A dame of high degree." Dryden. "A knight is your degree." Shak. "Lord or lady of high degree." Lowell. 4. Measure of advancement; quality; extent; as, tastes differ in kind as well as in degree. The degree of excellence which proclaims genius, is different in different times and different places. Sir. J. Reynolds. 5. Grade or rank to which scholars are admitted by a college or university, in recognition of their attainments; as, the degree of bachelor of arts, master, doctor, etc. Note: In the United States diplomas are usually given as the evidence of a degree conferred. In the humanities the first degree is that of bachelor of arts (B. A. or A. B.); the second that of master of arts (M. A. or A. M.). The degree of bachelor (of arts, science, divinity, law, etc.) is conferred upon those who complete a prescribed course of undergraduate study. The first degree in medicine is that of doctor of medicine (M. D.). The degrees of master and doctor are sometimes conferred, in course, upon those who have completed certain prescribed postgraduate studies, as doctor of philosophy (Ph. D.); but more frequently the degree of doctor is conferred as a complimentary recognition of eminent services in science or letters, or for public services or distinction (as doctor of laws (LL. D.) or doctor of divinity (D. D.), when they are called honorary degrees. The youth attained his bachelor's degree, and left the university. Macaulay. 5. (Genealogy)  A certain distance or remove in the line of descent, determining the proximity of blood; one remove in the chain of relationship; as, a relation in the third or fourth degree. In the 11th century an opinion began to gain ground in Italy, that third cousins might marry, being in the seventh degree according to the civil law. Hallam. 7. (Arith.)  Three figures taken together in numeration; thus, 140 is one degree, 222,140 two degrees. 8. (Algebra)  State as indicated by sum of exponents; more particularly, the degree of a term is indicated by the sum of the exponents of its literal factors; thus, a2b2c is a term of the sixth degree. The degree of a power, or radical, is denoted by its index, that of an equation by the greatest sum of the exponents of the unknown quantities in any term; thus, ax4 + bx2 = c, and mx2y2 + nyx = p, are both equations of the fourth degree. 9. (Trig.)  A 360th part of the circumference of a circle, which part is taken as the principal unit of measure for arcs and angles. The degree is divided into 60 minutes and the minute into 60 seconds. 10. A division, space, or interval, marked on a mathematical or other instrument, as on a thermometer. 11. (Mus.)  A line or space of the staff. Note: The short lines and their spaces are added degrees. Accumulation of degrees. (Eng. Univ.) See under Accumulation. -- By degrees, step by step; by little and little; by moderate advances. "I 'll leave by degrees." Shak. -- Degree of a curve or surface (Geom.), the number which expresses the degree of the equation of the curve or surface in rectilinear coördinates. A straight line will, in general, meet the curve or surface in a number of points equal to the degree of the curve or surface and no more. -- Degree of latitude (Geog.), on the earth, the distance on a meridian between two parallels of latitude whose latitudes differ from each other by one degree. This distance is not the same on different parts of a meridian, on account of the flattened figure of the earth, being 68.702 statute miles at the equator, and 69.396 at the poles. -- Degree of longitude, the distance on a parallel of latitude between two meridians that make an angle of one degree with each other at the poles -- a distance which varies as the cosine of the latitude, being at the equator 69.16 statute miles. -- To a degree, to an extreme; exceedingly; as, mendacious to a degree. It has been said that Scotsmen . . . are . . . grave to a degree on occasions when races more favored by nature are gladsome to excess. Prof. Wilson.
column: 1. (Arch.)  A kind of pillar; a cylindrical or polygonal support for a roof, ceiling, statue, etc., somewhat ornamented, and usually composed of base, shaft, and capital. See Order. 2. Anything resembling, in form or position, a column an architecture; an upright body or mass; a shaft or obelisk; as, a column of air, of water, of mercury, etc. ; the Column Vendôme; the spinal column. 3. (Mil.) (a) A body of troops formed in ranks, one behind the other; -- contradistinguished from line. Compare Ploy, and Deploy. (b) A small army. 4. (Naut.)  A number of ships so arranged as to follow one another in single or double file or in squadrons; -- in distinction from "line", where they are side by side. 5. (Print.)  A perpendicular set of lines, not extending across the page, and separated from other matter by a rule or blank space; as, a column in a newspaper. 6. (Arith.)  A perpendicular line of figures. 7. (Bot.)  The body formed by the union of the stamens in the Mallow family, or of the stamens and pistil in the orchids. Attached column. See under Attach, v. t. -- Clustered column. See under Cluster, v. t. -- Column rule, a thin strip of brass separating columns of type in the form, and making a line between them in printing.
star: 1. One of the innumerable luminous bodies seen in the heavens; any heavenly body other than the sun, moon, comets, and nebulæ. His eyen twinkled in his head aright, As do the stars in the frosty night. Chaucer. Note: The stars are distinguished as planets, and fixed stars. See Planet, Fixed stars under Fixed, and Magnitude of a star under Magnitude. 2. The polestar; the north star. Shak. 3. (Astrol.)  A planet supposed to influence one's destiny; (usually pl.) a configuration of the planets, supposed to influence fortune. O malignant and ill-brooding stars. Shak. Blesses his stars, and thinks it luxury. Addison. 4. That which resembles the figure of a star, as an ornament worn on the breast to indicate rank or honor. On whom . . . Lavish Honor showered all her stars. Tennyson. 5. Specifically, a radiated mark in writing or printing; an asterisk [thus, *]; -- used as a reference to a note, or to fill a blank where something is omitted, etc. 6. (Pyrotechny)  A composition of combustible matter used in the heading of rockets, in mines, etc., which, exploding of a air, presents a starlike appearance. 7. A person of brilliant and attractive qualities, especially on public occasions, as a distinguished orator, a leading theatrical performer, etc. Note: Star is used in the formation of compound words generally or obvious signification: as, star-aspiring, star-bespangled, star- bestudded, star-blasting, star-bright, star-crowned, star-directed, star-eyed, star-headed, star-paved, star-roofed; star-sprinkled, star-wreathed. Blazing star, Double star, Multiple star, Shooting star, etc. See under Blazing, Double, etc. -- Nebulous star (Astron.), a small well-defined circular nebula, having a bright nucleus at its center like a star. -- Star anise (Bot.), any plant of the genus Illicium; -- so called from its star-shaped capsules. -- Star apple (Bot.), a tropical American tree (Chrysophyllum Cainito), having a milky juice and oblong leaves with a silky-golden pubescence beneath. It bears an applelike fruit, the carpels of which present a starlike figure when cut across. The name is extended to the whole genus of about sixty species, and the natural order (Sapotaceæ) to which it belongs is called the Star-apple family. -- Star conner, one who cons, or studies, the stars; an astronomer or an astrologer. Gascoigne. -- Star coral (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of stony corals belonging to Astræa, Orbicella, and allied genera, in which the calicles are round or polygonal and contain conspicuous radiating septa. -- Star cucumber. (Bot.) See under Cucumber. -- Star flower. (Bot.) (a) A plant of the genus Ornithogalum; star- of-Bethlehem. (b) See Starwort (b). (c) An American plant of the genus Trientalis (Trientalis Americana). Gray. -- Star fort (Fort.), a fort surrounded on the exterior with projecting angles; -- whence the name. -- Star gauge (Ordnance), a long rod, with adjustable points projecting radially at its end, for measuring the size of different parts of the bore of a gun. -- Star grass. (Bot.) (a) A small grasslike plant (Hypoxis erecta) having star-shaped yellow flowers. (b) The colicroot. See Colicroot. -- Star hyacinth (Bot.), a bulbous plant of the genus Scilla (S. autumnalis); -- called also star-headed hyacinth. -- Star jelly (Bot.), any one of several gelatinous plants (Nostoc commune, N. edule, etc.). See Nostoc. -- Star lizard. (Zoöl.) Same as Stellion. -- Star-of-Bethlehem (Bot.), a bulbous liliaceous plant (Ornithogalum umbellatum) having a small white starlike flower. -- Star-of-the-earth (Bot.), a plant of the genus Plantago (P. coronopus), growing upon the seashore. -- Star polygon (Geom.), a polygon whose sides cut each other so as to form a star-shaped figure. -- Stars and Stripes, a popular name for the flag of the United States, which consists of thirteen horizontal stripes, alternately red and white, and a union having, in a blue field, white stars to represent the several States, one for each. With the old flag, the true American flag, the Eagle, and the Stars and Stripes, waving over the chamber in which we sit. D. Webster. -- Star showers. See Shooting star, under Shooting. -- Star thistle (Bot.), an annual composite plant (Centaurea solstitialis) having the involucre armed with radiating spines. -- Star wheel (Mach.), a star-shaped disk, used as a kind of ratchet wheel, in repeating watches and the feed motions of some machines. -- Star worm (Zoöl.), a gephyrean. -- Temporary star (Astron.), a star which appears suddenly, shines for a period, and then nearly or quite disappears. These stars are supposed by some astronometers to be variable stars of long and undetermined periods. -- Variable star (Astron.), a star whose brilliancy varies periodically, generally with regularity, but sometimes irregularly; - - called periodical star when its changes occur at fixed periods. -- Water star grass (Bot.), an aquatic plant (Schollera graminea) with small yellow starlike blossoms.  To set or adorn with stars, or bright, radiating bodies; to bespangle; as, a robe starred with gems. "A sable curtain starred with gold." Young.  To be bright, or attract attention, as a star; to shine like a star; to be brilliant or prominent; to play a part as a theatrical star. W. Irving.
think: 1. To seem or appear; -- used chiefly in the expressions methinketh or methinks, and methought. Note: These are genuine Anglo-Saxon expressions, equivalent to it seems to me, it seemed to me. In these expressions me is in the dative case. 2. To employ any of the intellectual powers except that of simple perception through the senses; to exercise the higher intellectual faculties. For that I am I know, because I think. Dryden. 3. Specifically: -- (a) To call anything to mind; to remember; as, I would have sent the books, but I did not think of it. Well thought upon; I have it here. Shak. (b) To reflect upon any subject; to muse; to meditate; to ponder; to consider; to deliberate. And when he thought thereon, he wept. Mark xiv. 72. He thought within himself, saying, What shall I do, because I have no room where to bestow my fruits Luke xii. 17. (c) To form an opinion by reasoning; to judge; to conclude; to believe; as, I think it will rain to-morrow. Let them marry to whom they think best. Num. xxxvi. 6. (d) To purpose; to intend; to design; to mean. I thought to promote thee unto great honor. Num. xxiv. 11. Thou thought'st to help me. Shak. (e) To presume; to venture. Think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father. Matt. iii. 9. Note: To think, in a philosophical use as yet somewhat limited, designates the higher intellectual acts, the acts preëminently rational; to judge; to compare; to reason. Thinking is employed by Hamilton as "comprehending all our collective energies." It is defined by Mansel as "the act of knowing or judging by means of concepts,"by Lotze as "the reaction of the mind on the material supplied by external influences." See Thought. To think better of. See under Better. -- To think much of, or To think well of, to hold in esteem; to esteem highly. Syn. -- To expect; guess; cogitate; reflect; ponder; contemplate; meditate; muse; imagine; suppose; believe. See Expect, Guess.  1. To conceive; to imagine. Charity . . . thinketh no evil. 1 Cor. xiii. 4,5. 2. To plan or design; to plot; to compass. [Obs.] So little womanhood And natural goodness, as to think the death Of her own son. Beau. & Fl. 3. To believe; to consider; to esteem. Nor think superfluous other's aid. Milton. To think much, to esteem a great matter; to grudge. [Obs.] "[He] thought not much to clothe his enemies." Milton. -- To think scorn. (a) To disdain. [Obs.] "He thought scorn to lay hands on Mordecai alone." Esther iii. 6. (b) To feel indignation. [Obs.]
must: 1. To be obliged; to be necessitated; -- expressing either physical or moral necessity; as, a man must eat for nourishment; we must submit to the laws. 2. To be morally required; to be necessary or essential to a certain quality, character, end, or result; as, he must reconsider the matter; he must have been insane. Likewise must the deacons be grave. 1 Tim. iii. 8. Morover, he [a bishop] must have a good report of them which are without. 1 Tim. iii. 7. Note: The principal verb, if easy supplied by the mind, was formerly often omitted when must was used; as, I must away. "I must to Coventry." Shak.  1. The expressed juice of the grape, or other fruit, before fermentation. "These men ben full of must." Wyclif (Acts ii. 13. ). No fermenting must fills ... the deep vats. Longfellow. 2. Etym: [Cf. Musty.]  Mustiness.  To make musty; to become musty.
count: 1. To tell or name one by one, or by groups, for the purpose of ascertaining the whole number of units in a collection; to number; to enumerate; to compute; to reckon. Who can count the dust of Jacob Num. xxiii. 10. In a journey of forty miles, Avaux counted only three miserable cabins. Macaulay. 2. To place to an account; to ascribe or impute; to consider or esteem as belonging. Abracham believed God, and it was counted unto him for righteousness. Rom. iv. 3. 3. To esteem; to account; to reckon; to think, judge, or consider. I count myself in nothing else so happy As in a soul remembering my good friends. Shak. To count out. (a) To exclude (one) will not particapate or cannot be depended upon. (b) (House of Commons) To declare adjourned, as a sitting of the House, when it is ascertained that a quorum is not present. (c) To prevent the accession of (a person) to office, by a fraudulent return or count of the votes cast; -- said of a candidate really elected. [Colloq.] Syn. -- To calculate; number; reckon; compute; enumerate. See Calculate.  1. To number or be counted; to possess value or carry weight; hence, to increase or add to the strength or influence of some party or interest; as, every vote counts; accidents count for nothing. This excellent man . . . counted among the best and wisest of English statesmen. J. A. Symonds. 2. To reckon; to rely; to depend; -- with on or upon. He was brewer to the palace; and it was apprehended that the government counted on his voice. Macaulay. I think it a great error to count upon the genius of a nation as a standing argument in all ages. Swift. 3. To take account or note; -- with of. [Obs.] "No man counts of her beauty." Shak. 4. (Eng. Law)  To plead orally; to argue a matter in court; to recite a count. Burrill.  1. The act of numbering; reckoning; also, the number ascertained by counting. Of blessed saints for to increase the count. Spenser. By this count, I shall be much in years. Shak. 2. An object of interest or account; value; estimation. [Obs.] "All his care and count." Spenser. 3. (Law)  A formal statement of the plaintiff's case in court; in a more technical and correct sense, a particular allegation or charge in a declaration or indictment, separately setting forth the cause of action or prosecution. Wharton. Note: In the old law books, count was used synonymously with declaration. When the plaintiff has but a single cause of action, and makes but one statement of it, that statement is called indifferently count or declaration, most generally, however, the latter. But where the suit embraces several causes, or the plaintiff makes several different statements of the same cause of action, each statement is called a count, and all of them combined, a declaration. Bouvier. Wharton.  A nobleman on the continent of Europe, equal in rank to an English earl. Note: Though the tittle Count has never been introduced into Britain, the wives of Earls have, from the earliest period of its history, been designated as Countesses. Brande & C. Count palatine. (a) Formerly, the proprietor of a county who possessed royal prerogatives within his county, as did the Earl of Chester, the Bishop of Durham, and the Duke of Lancaster. [Eng.] See County palatine, under County. (b) Originally, a high judicial officer of the German emperors; afterward, the holder of a fief, to whom was granted the right to exercise certain imperial powers within his own domains. [Germany]
help: 1. To furnish with strength or means for the successful performance of any action or the attainment of any object; to aid; to assist; as, to help a man in his work; to help one to remember; -- the following infinitive is commonly used without to; as, "Help me scale yon balcony." Longfellow. 2. To furnish with the means of deliverance from trouble; as, to help one in distress; to help one out of prison. "God help, poor souls, how idly do they talk!" Shak. 3. To furnish with relief, as in pain or disease; to be of avail against; -- sometimes with of before a word designating the pain or disease, and sometimes having such a word for the direct object. "To help him of his blindness." in is used for that function; -- "to help him in his misery" Shak. The true calamus helps coughs. Gerarde. 4. To change for the better; to remedy. Cease to lament for what thou canst not help. Shak. 5. To prevent; to hinder; as, the evil approaches, and who can help it Swift. 6. To forbear; to avoid. I can not help remarking the resemblance betwixt him and our author. Pope. 7. To wait upon, as the guests at table, by carving and passing food. To help forward, to assist in advancing. -- To help off, to help to go or pass away, as time; to assist in removing. Locke. -- To help on, to forward; to promote by aid. -- To help out, to aid, as in delivering from a difficulty, or to aid in completing a design or task. The god of learning and of light Would want a god himself to help him out. Swift. -- To help over, to enable to surmount; as, to help one over an obstacle. -- To help to, to supply with; to furnish with; as, to help one to soup. -- To help up, to help (one) to get up; to assist in rising, as after a fall, and the like. "A man is well holp up that trusts to you." Shak. Syn. -- To aid; assist; succor; relieve; serve; support; sustain; befriend. -- To Help, Aid, Assist. These words all agree in the idea of affording relief or support to a person under difficulties. Help turns attention especially to the source of relief. If I fall into a pit, I call for help; and he who helps me out does it by an act of his own. Aid turns attention to the other side, and supposes coöperation on the part of him who is relieved; as, he aided me in getting out of the pit; I got out by the aid of a ladder which he brought. Assist has a primary reference to relief afforded by a person who "stands by" in order to relieve. It denotes both help and aid. Thus, we say of a person who is weak, I assisted him upstairs, or, he mounted the stairs by my assistance. When help is used as a noun, it points less distinctively and exclusively to the source of relief, or, in other words, agrees more closely with aid. Thus we say, I got out of a pit by the help of my friend.  To lend aid or assistance; to contribute strength or means; to avail or be of use; to assist. A generous present helps to persuade, as well as an agreeable person. Garth. To help out, to lend aid; to bring a supply.  1. Strength or means furnished toward promoting an object, or deliverance from difficulty or distress; aid; ^; also, the person or thing furnishing the aid; as, he gave me a help of fifty dollars. Give us help from trouble, for vain is the help of man. Ps. lx. 11. God is . . . a very present help in trouble. Ps. xlvi. 1. Virtue is a friend and a help to nature. South. 2. Remedy; relief; as, there is no help for it. 3. A helper; one hired to help another; also, thew hole force of hired helpers in any business. 4. Specifically, a domestic servant, man or woman. [Local, U. S.]
where: Whether. [Sometimes written whe'r.] [Obs.] Piers Plowman. Men must enquire (this is mine assent), Wher she be wise or sober or dronkelewe. Chaucer.  1. At or in what place; hence, in what situation, position, or circumstances; -- used interrogatively. God called unto Adam, . . . Where art thou Gen. iii. 9. Note: See the Note under What, pron., 1. 2. At or in which place; at the place in which; hence, in the case or instance in which; -- used relatively. She visited that place where first she was so happy. Sir P. Sidney. Where I thought the remnant of mine age Should have been cherished by her childlike duty. Shak. Where one on his side fights, thousands will fly. Shak. But where he rode one mile, the dwarf ran four. Sir W. Scott. 3. To what or which place; hence, to what goal, result, or issue; whither; -- used interrogatively and relatively; as, where are you going But where does this tend Goldsmith. Lodged in sunny cleft, Where the gold breezes come not. Bryant. Note: Where is often used pronominally with or without a preposition, in elliptical sentences for a place in which, the place in which, or what place. The star . . . stood over where the young child was. Matt. ii. 9. The Son of man hath not where to lay his head. Matt. viii. 20. Within about twenty paces of where we were. Goldsmith. Where did the minstrels come from Dickens. Note: Where is much used in composition with preposition, and then is equivalent to a pronoun. Cf. Whereat, Whereby, Wherefore, Wherein, etc. Where away (Naut.), in what direction; as, where away is the land Syn. -- See Whither.  Whereas. And flight and die is death destroying death; Where fearing dying pays death servile breath. Shak.  Place; situation. [Obs. or Colloq.] Finding the nymph asleep in secret where. Spenser.
sentence: 1. Sense; meaning; significance. [Obs.] Tales of best sentence and most solace. Chaucer. The discourse itself, voluble enough, and full of sentence. Milton. 2. (a) An opinion; a decision; a determination; a judgment, especially one of an unfavorable nature. My sentence is for open war. Milton. That by them [Luther's works] we may pass sentence upon his doctrines. Atterbury. (b) A philosophical or theological opinion; a dogma; as, Summary of the Sentences; Book of the Sentences. 3. (Law)  In civil and admiralty law, the judgment of a court pronounced in a cause; in criminal and ecclesiastical courts, a judgment passed on a criminal by a court or judge; condemnation pronounced by a judgical tribunal; doom. In common law, the term is exclusively used to denote the judgment in criminal cases. Received the sentence of the law. Shak. 4. A short saying, usually containing moral instruction; a maxim; an axiom; a saw. Broome. 5. (Gram.)  A combination of words which is complete as expressing a thought, and in writing is marked at the close by a period, or full point. See Proposition, 4. Note: Sentences are simple or compound. A simple sentence consists of one subject and one finite verb; as, "The Lord reigns." A compound sentence contains two or more subjects and finite verbs, as in this verse: - He fills, he bounds, connects, and equals all. Pope. Dark sentence, a saving not easily explained. A king . . . understanding dark sentences. Dan. vii. 23.  1. To pass or pronounce judgment upon; to doom; to condemn to punishment; to prescribe the punishment of. Nature herself is sentenced in your doom. Dryden. 2. To decree or announce as a sentence. [Obs.] Shak. 3. To utter sentenciously. [Obs.] Feltham.
plan: 1. A draught or form; properly, a representation drawn on a plane, as a map or a chart; especially, a top view, as of a machine, or the representation or delineation of a horizontal section of anything, as of a building; a graphic representation; a diagram. 2. A scheme devised; a method of action or procedure expressed or described in language; a project; as, the plan of a constitution; the plan of an expedition. God's plans like lines pure and white unfold. M. R. Smith. 3. A method; a way of procedure; a custom. The simple plan, That they should take who have the power, And they should keep who can. Wordsworth. Body plan, Floor plan, etc. See under Body, Floor, etc. Syn. -- Scheme; draught; delineation; plot; sketch; project; design; contrivance; device. See Scheme.  1. To form a delineation of; to draught; to represent, as by a diagram. 2. To scheme; to devise; to contrive; to form in design; as, to plan the conquest of a country. Even in penance, planning sins anew. Goldsmith.
would: Commonly used as an auxiliary verb, either in the past tense or in the conditional or optative present. See 2d & 3d Will. Note: Would was formerly used also as the past participle of Will. Right as our Lord hath would. Chaucer.  See 2d Weld.
it: The neuter pronoun of the third person, corresponding to the masculine pronoun he and the feminine she, and having the same plural (they, their of theirs, them). Note: The possessive form its is modern, being rarely found in the writings of Shakespeare and Milton, and not at all in the original King James's version of the Bible. During the transition from the regular his to the anomalous its, it was to some extent employed in the possessive without the case ending. See His, and He. In Dryden's time its had become quite established as the regular form. The day present hath ever inough to do with it owne grief. Genevan Test. Do, child, go to it grandam, child. Shak. It knighthood shall do worse. It shall fright all it friends with borrowing letters. B. Jonson. Note: In the course of time, the nature of the neuter sign i in it, the form being found in but a few words, became misunderstood. Instead of being looked upon as an affix, it passed for part of the original word. Hence was formed from it the anomalous genitive it, superseding the Saxon his. Latham. The fruit tree yielding fruit after his (its) kind. Gen. i. 11. It is used, -- 1. As a substance for any noun of the neuter gender; as, here is the book, take it home. 2. As a demonstrative, especially at the beginning of a sentence, pointing to that which is about to be stated, named, or mentioned, or referring to that which apparent or well known; as, I saw it was John. It is I; be not afraid. Matt. xiv. 27. Peter heard that it was the Lord. John xxi. 7. Often, in such cases, as a substitute for a sentence or clause; as, it is thought he will come; it is wrong to do this. 3. As an indefinite nominative for a impersonal verb; as, it snows; it rains. 4. As a substitute for such general terms as, the state of affairs, the condition of things, and the like; as, how is it with the sick man Think on me when it shall be well with thee. Gen. xl. 14. 5. As an indefinite object after some intransitive verbs, or after a substantive used humorously as a verb; as, to foot it (i. e., to walk). The Lacedemonians, at the Straits of Thermopylæ, when their arms failed them, fought it out with nails and teeth. Dryden. Whether the charmer sinner it, or saint it, If folly grows romantic, I must paint it. Pope. Its self. See Itself.
life: 1. The state of being which begins with generation, birth, or germination, and ends with death; also, the time during which this state continues; that state of an animal or plant in which all or any of its organs are capable of performing all or any of their functions; -- used of all animal and vegetable organisms. 2. Of human being: The union of the soul and body; also, the duration of their union; sometimes, the deathless quality or existence of the soul; as, man is a creature having an immortal life. She shows a body rather than a life. Shak. 3. (Philos)  The potential principle, or force, by which the organs of animals and plants are started and continued in the performance of their several and coöperative functions; the vital force, whether regarded as physical or spiritual. 4. Figuratively: The potential or animating principle, also, the period of duration, of anything that is conceived of as resembling a natural organism in structure or functions; as, the life of a state, a machine, or a book; authority is the life of government. 5. A certain way or manner of living with respect to conditions, circumstances, character, conduct, occupation, etc.; hence, human affairs; also, lives, considered collectively, as a distinct class or type; as, low life; a good or evil life; the life of Indians, or of miners. That which before us lies in daily life. Milton. By experience of life abroad in the world. Ascham. Lives of great men all remind us We can make our lives sublime. Longfellow. 'T is from high life high characters are drawn. Pope 6. Animation; spirit; vivacity; vigor; energy. No notion of life and fire in fancy and in words. Felton. That gives thy gestures grace and life. Wordsworth. 7. That which imparts or excites spirit or vigor; that upon which enjoyment or success depends; as, he was the life of the company, or of the enterprise. 8. The living or actual form, person, thing, or state; as, a picture or a description from, the life. 9. A person; a living being, usually a human being; as, many lives were sacrificed. 10. The system of animal nature; animals in general, or considered collectively. Full nature swarms with life. Thomson. 11. An essential constituent of life, esp: the blood. The words that I speak unto you . . . they are life. John vi. 63. The warm life came issuing through the wound. Pope 12. A history of the acts and events of a life; a biography; as, Johnson wrote the life of Milton. 13. Enjoyment in the right use of the powers; especially, a spiritual existence; happiness in the favor of God; heavenly felicity. 14. Something dear to one as one's existence; a darling; -- used as a term of endearment. Note: Life forms the first part of many compounds, for the most part of obvious meaning; as, life-giving, life-sustaining, etc. Life annuity, an annuity payable during one's life. -- Life arrow, Life rocket, Life shot, an arrow, rocket, or shot, for carrying an attached line to a vessel in distress in order to save life. -- Life assurance. See Life insurance, below. -- Life buoy. See Buoy. -- Life car, a water-tight boat or box, traveling on a line from a wrecked vessel to the shore. In it person are hauled through the waves and surf. -- Life drop, a drop of vital blood. Byron. -- Life estate (Law), an estate which is held during the term of some certain person's life, but does not pass by inheritance. -- Life everlasting (Bot.), a plant with white or yellow persistent scales about the heads of the flowers, as Antennaria, and Gnaphalium; cudweed. -- Life of an execution (Law), the period when an execution is in force, or before it expires. -- Life guard. (Mil.) See under Guard. -- Life insurance, the act or system of insuring against death; a contract by which the insurer undertakes, in consideration of the payment of a premium (usually at stated periods), to pay a stipulated sum in the event of the death of the insured or of a third person in whose life the insured has an interest. -- Life interest, an estate or interest which lasts during one's life, or the life of another person, but does not pass by inheritance. -- Life land (Law), land held by lease for the term of a life or lives. -- Life line. (a) (Naut.) A line along any part of a vessel for the security of sailors. (b) A line attached to a life boat, or to any life saving apparatus, to be grasped by a person in the water. -- Life rate, rate of premium for insuring a life. -- Life rent, the rent of a life estate; rent or property to which one is entitled during one's life. -- Life school, a school for artists in which they model, paint, or draw from living models. -- Lifetable, a table showing the probability of life at different ages. -- To lose one's life, to die. -- To seek the life of, to seek to kill. -- To the life, so as closely to resemble the living person or the subject; as, the portrait was drawn to the life.
cross: 1. A gibbet, cosisting of two pieces of timber placed transversely upon one another, in various forms, as a T, or +, with the horizontal piece below the upper end of the upright, or as an X. It was anciently used in the execution of criminals. Nailed to the cross By his own nation. Milton. 2. The sign or mark of the cross, made with the finger, or in ink, etc., or actually represented in some material; the symbol of Christ's death; the ensign and chosen symbol of Christianity, of a Christian people, and of Christendom. The custom of making the sign of the cross with the hand or finger, as a means of conferring blessing or preserving from evil, is very old. Schaff-Herzog Encyc. Before the cross has waned the crescent's ray. Sir W. Scott. Tis where the cross is preached. Cowper. 3. Affiction regarded as a test of patience or virtue; trial; disappointment; opposition; misfortune. Heaven prepares a good man with crosses. B. Jonson. 4. A piece of money stamped with the figure of a cross, also, that side of such a piece on which the cross is stamped; hence, money in general. I should bear no cross if I did bear you; for I think you have no money in your purse. Shak. 5. An appendage or ornament or anything in the form of a cross; a badge or ornamental device of the general shape of a cross; hence, such an ornament, even when varying considerably from that form; thus, the Cross of the British Order of St. George and St. Michael consist of a central medallion with seven arms radiating from it. 6. (Arch.)  A monument in the form of a cross, or surmounted bu a cross, set up in a public place; as, a market cross; a boundary cross; Charing Cross in London. Dun-Edin's Cross, a pillared stone, Rose on a turret octagon. Sir W. Scott. 7. (Her.)  A common heraldic bearing, of which there are many varieties. See the Illustration, above. 8. The crosslike mark or symbol used instead of a signature by those unable to write. Five Kentish abbesses . . . .subscribed their names and crosses. Fuller. 9. Church lands. [Ireland] [Obs.] Sir J. Davies. 10. A line drawn across or through another line. 11. Hence: A mixing of breeds or stock, especially in cattle breeding; or the product of such intermixture; a hybrid of any kind. Toning down the ancient Viking into a sort of a cross between Paul Jones and Jeremy Diddler. Lord Dufferin. 12. (Surveying)  An instrument for laying of offsets perpendicular to the main course. 13. (Mech.)  A pipe-fitting with four branches the axes of which usually form's right angle. Cross and pile, a game with money, at which it is put to chance whether a coin shall fall with that side up which bears the cross, or the other, which is called pile, or reverse; the game called heads or tails. -- Cross bottony or bottoné. See under Bottony. -- Cross estoilé (Her.). a cross, each of whose arms is pointed like the ray of a star; that is, a star having four long points only. -- Cross of Calvary. See Calvary, 3. -- Southern cross. (Astron.) See under Southern. -- To do a thing on the cross, to act dishonestly; -- opposed to acting on the square. [Slang] -- To take up the cross, to bear troubles and afflictions with patience from love to Christ.  1. Not parallel; lying or falling athwart; transverse; oblique; intersecting. The cross refraction of the second prism. Sir I. Newton. 2. Not accordant with what is wished or expected; interrupting; adverse; contrary; thwarting; perverse. "A cross fortune." Jer. Taylor. The cross and unlucky issue of my design. Glanvill. The article of the resurrection seems to lie marvelously cross to the common experience of mankind. South. We are both love's captives, but with fates so cross, One must be happy by the other's loss. Dryden. 3. Characterized by, or in a state of, peevishness, fretfullness, or ill humor; as, a cross man or woman. He had received a cross answer from his mistress. Jer. Taylor. 4. Made in an opposite direction, or an inverse relation; mutually inverse; interchanged; as, cross interrogatories; cross marriages, as when a brother and sister marry persons standing in the same relation to each other. Cross action (Law), an action brought by a party who is sued against the person who has sued him, upon the same subject matter, as upon the same contract. Burrill. -- Cross aisle (Arch.), a transept; the lateral divisions of a cruciform church. -- Cross axie. (a) (Mach.) A shaft, windlass, or roller, worked by levers at opposite ends, as in the copperplate printing press. (b) A driving axle. with cranks set at an angle of 90º with each other. -- Cross bedding (Geol.), oblique lamination of horizontal beds, -- Cross bill. See in the Vocabulary. -- Cross bitt. Same as Crosspiece. -- Cross bond, a form of bricklaying, in which the joints of one stretcher course come midway between those of the stretcher courses above and below, a course of headers and stretchers intervening. See Bond, n., 8. -- Cross breed. See in the Vocabulary. -- Cross breeding. See under Breeding. -- Cross buttock, a particular throw in wrestling; hence, an unexpected defeat or repulse. Smollet. -- Cross country, across the country; not by the road. "The cross- country ride." Cowper. -- Cross fertilization, the fertilization of the female products of one physiological individual by the male products of another, -- as the fertilization of the ovules of one plant by pollen from another. See Fertilization. -- Cross file, a double convex file, used in dressing out the arms or crosses of fine wheells. -- Cross fire (Mil.), lines of fire, from two or more points or places, crossing each other. -- Cross forked. (Her.) See under Forked. -- Cross frog. See under Frog. -- Cross furrow, a furrow or trench cut across other furrows to receive the water running in them and conduct it to the side of the field. -- Cross handle, a handle attached transversely to the axis of a tool, as in the augur. Knight. -- Cross lode (Mining), a vein intersecting the true or principal lode. -- Cross purpose. See Cross-purpose, in the Vocabulary. -- Cross reference, a reference made from one part of a book or register to another part, where the same or an allied subject is treated of. -- Cross sea (Naut.), a chopping sea, in which the waves run in contrary directions. -- Cross stroke, a line or stroke across something, as across the letter t. -- Cross wind, a side wind; an unfavorable wind. -- Cross wires, fine wires made to traverse the field of view in a telescope, and moved by a screw with a graduated head, used for delicate astronomical observations; spider lines. Fixed cross wires are also used in microscopes, etc. Syn. -- Fretful; peevish. See Fretful.  Athwart; across. [Archaic or Colloq.] A fox was taking a walk one night cross a village. L'Estrange. To go cross lots, to go across the fields; totake a short cut. [Colloq.]  1. To put across or athwart; to cause to intersect; as, to cross the arms. 2. To lay or draw something, as a line, across; as, to cross the letter t. 3. To pass from one side to the other of; to pass or move over; to traverse; as, to cross a stream. A hunted hare . . . crosses and confounds her former track. I. Watts. 4. To pass, as objects going in an opposite direction at the same time. "Your kind letter crossed mine." J. D. Forbes. 5. To run counter to; to thwart; to obstruct; to hinder; to clash or interfere with. In each thing give him way; cross him in nothing. Shak. An oyster may be crossed onlove. Sheridan. 6. To interfere and cut off; to debar. [Obs.] To cross me from the golden time I look for. Shak. 7. To make the sign of the cross upon; -- followed by the reflexive pronoun; as, he crossed himself. 8. To cancel by marking crosses on or over, or drawing a line across; to erase; -- usually with out, off, or over; as, to cross out a name. 9. To cause to interbreed; -- said of different stoocks or races; to mix the breed of. To cross one's path, to oppose one's plans. Macualay.  1. To lie or be athwart. 2. To move or pass from one side to the other, or from place to place; to make a transit; as, to cross from New York to Liverpool. 3. To be inconsistent. [Obs.] Men's actions do not always cross with reason. Sir P. Sidney. 4. To interbreed, as races; to mix distinct breeds. If two individuals of distinct races cross, a third is invariably produced different from either. Coleridge.
pull: 1. To draw, or attempt to draw, toward one; to draw forcibly. Ne'er pull your hat upon your brows. Shak. He put forth his hand . . . and pulled her in. Gen. viii. 9. 2. To draw apart; to tear; to rend. He hath turned aside my ways, and pulled me in pieces; he hath made me desolate. Lam. iii. 11. 3. To gather with the hand, or by drawing toward one; to pluck; as, to pull fruit; to pull flax; to pull a finch. 4. To move or operate by the motion of drawing towards one; as, to pull a bell; to pull an oar. 5. (Horse Racing)  To hold back, and so prevent from winning; as, the favorite was pulled. 6. (Print.)  To take or make, as a proof or impression; -- hand presses being worked by pulling a lever. 7. (Cricket)  To strike the ball in a particular manner. See Pull, n., 8. Never pull a straight fast ball to leg. R. H. Lyttelton. To pull and haul, to draw hither and thither. " Both are equally pulled and hauled to do that which they are unable to do. " South. -- To pull down, to demolish; to destroy; to degrade; as, to pull down a house. " In political affairs, as well as mechanical, it is easier to pull down than build up." Howell. " To raise the wretched, and pull down the proud." Roscommon. To pull a finch. See under Finch. To pull off, take or draw off.  To exert one's self in an act or motion of drawing or hauling; to tug; as, to pull at a rope. To pull apart, to become separated by pulling; as, a rope will pull apart. -- To pull up, to draw the reins; to stop; to halt. To pull through, to come successfully to the end of a difficult undertaking, a dangerous sickness, or the like.  1. The act of pulling or drawing with force; an effort to move something by drawing toward one. I awakened with a violent pull upon the ring which was fastened at the top of my box. Swift. 2. A contest; a struggle; as, a wrestling pull. Carew. 3. A pluck; loss or violence suffered. [Poetic] Two pulls at once; His lady banished, and a limb lopped off. Shak. 4. A knob, handle, or lever, etc., by which anything is pulled; as, a drawer pull; a bell pull. 5. The act of rowing; as, a pull on the river. [Colloq.] 6. The act of drinking; as, to take a pull at the beer, or the mug. [Slang] Dickens. 7. Something in one's favor in a comparison or a contest; an advantage; means of influencing; as, in weights the favorite had the pull. [Slang] 8. (Cricket)  A kind of stroke by which a leg ball is sent to the off side, or an off ball to the side. The pull is not a legitimate stroke, but bad cricket. R. A. Proctor.
arrive: 1. To come to the shore or bank. In present usage: To come in progress by water, or by traveling on land; to reach by water or by land; -- followed by at (formerly sometimes by to), also by in and from. "Arrived in Padua." Shak. [Æneas] sailing with a fleet from Sicily, arrived . . . and landed in the country of Laurentum. Holland. There was no outbreak till the regiment arrived at Ipswich. Macaulay. 2. To reach a point by progressive motion; to gain or compass an object by effort, practice, study, inquiry, reasoning, or experiment. To arrive at, or attain to. When he arrived at manhood. Rogers. We arrive at knowledge of a law of nature by the generalization of facts. McCosh. If at great things thou wouldst arrive. Milton. 3. To come; said of time; as, the time arrived. 4. To happen or occur. [Archaic] Happy! to whom this glorious death arrives. Waller.  1. To bring to shore. [Obs.] And made the sea-trod ship arrive them. Chapman. 2. To reach; to come to. [Archaic] Ere he arrive the happy isle. Milton. Ere we could arrive the point proposed. Shak. Arrive at last the blessed goal. Tennyson.  Arrival. [Obs.] Chaucer. How should I joy of thy arrive to hear! Drayton.
me: One. See Men, pron. [Obs.] Chaucer.  The person speaking, regarded as an object; myself; a pronoun of the first person used as the objective and dative case of the pronoum I; as, he struck me; he gave me the money, or he gave the money to me; he got me a hat, or he got a hat for me. Note: In methinks, me is properly in the dative case, and the verb is impersonal, the construction being, it appears to me. In early use me was often placed before forms of the verb to be with an adjective; as, me were lief. Me rather had my heart might frrl your love Than my unpleased eye see your courtesy. Shak.
character: 1. A distinctive mark; a letter, figure, or symbol. It were much to be wished that there were throughout the world but one sort of character for each letter to express it to the eye. Holder. 2. Style of writing or printing; handwriting; the peculiar form of letters used by a particular person or people; as, an inscription in the Runic character. You know the character to be your brother's Shak. 3. The peculiar quality, or the sum of qualities, by which a person or a thing is distinguished from others; the stamp impressed by nature, education, or habit; that which a person or thing really is; nature; disposition. The character or that dominion. Milton. Know well each Ancient's proper character; His fable, subject, scope in every page; Religion, Country, genius of his Age. Pope. A man of . . . thoroughly subservient character. Motley. 4. Strength of mind; resolution; independence; individuality; as, he has a great deal of character. 5. Moral quality; the principles and motives that control the life; as, a man of character; his character saves him from suspicion. 6. Quality, position, rank, or capacity; quality or conduct with respect to a certain office or duty; as, in the miserable character of a slave; in his character as a magistrate; her character as a daughter. 7. The estimate, individual or general, put upon a person or thing; reputation; as, a man's character for truth and veracity; to give one a bad character. This subterraneous passage is much mended since Seneca gave so bad a character of it. Addison. 8. A written statement as to behavior, competency, etc., given to a servant. [Colloq.] 9. A unique or extraordinary individuality; a person characterized by peculiar or notable traits; a person who illustrates certain phases of character; as, Randolph was a character; Cæsar is a great historical character. 10. One of the persons of a drama or novel. Note: "It would be well if character and reputation were used distinctively. In truth, character is what a person is; reputation is what he is supposed to be. Character is in himself, reputation is in the minds of others. Character is injured by temptations, and by wrongdoing; reputation by slanders, and libels. Character endures throughout defamation in every form, but perishes when there is a voluntary transgression; reputation may last through numerous transgressions, but be destroyed by a single, and even an unfounded, accusation or aspersion." Abbott.  1. To engrave; to inscribe. [R.] These trees shall be my books. And in their barks my thoughts I 'll character. Shak. 2. To distinguish by particular marks or traits; to describe; to characterize. [R.] Mitford.
leave: To send out leaves; to leaf; -- often with out. G. Fletcher.  To raise; to levy. [Obs.] An army strong she leaved. Spenser.  1. Liberty granted by which restraint or illegality is removed; permission; allowance; license. David earnestly asked leave of me. 1 Sam. xx. 6. No friend has leave to bear away the dead. Dryden. 2. The act of leaving or departing; a formal parting; a leaving; farewell; adieu; -- used chiefly in the phrase, to take leave, i. e., literally, to take permission to go. A double blessing is a'double grace; Occasion smiles upon a second leave. Shak. And Paul after this tarried there yet a good while, and then took his leave of the brethren. Acts xviii. 18. French leave. See under French. Syn. -- See Liberty.  1. To withdraw one's self from; to go away from; to depart from; as, to leave the house. Therefore shall a man leave his father and his mother, and shall cleave unto his wife. Gen. ii. 24. 2. To let remain unremoved or undone; to let stay or continue, in distinction from what is removed or changed. If grape gatherers come to thee, would they not leave some gleaning grapes Jer. xlix. 9. These ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. Matt. xxiii. 23. Besides it leaveth a suspicion, as if more might be said than is expressed. Bacon. 3. To cease from; to desist from; to abstain from. Now leave complaining and begin your tea. Pope. 4. To desert; to abandon; to forsake; hence, to give up; to relinquish. Lo, we have left all, and have followed thee. Mark x. 28. The heresies that men do leave. Shak. 5. To let be or do without interference; as, I left him to his reflections; I leave my hearers to judge. I will leave you now to your gossiplike humor. Shak. 6. To put; to place; to deposit; to deliver; to commit; to submit -- with a sense of withdrawing one's self from; as, leave your hat in the hall; we left our cards; to leave the matter to arbitrators. Leave there thy gift before the altar and go thy way. Matt. v. 24. The foot That leaves the print of blood where'er it walks. Shak. 7. To have remaining at death; hence, to bequeath; as, he left a large estate; he left a good name; he left a legacy to his niece. To leave alone. (a) To leave in solitude. (b) To desist or refrain from having to do with; as, to leave dangerous chemicals alone. -- To leave off. (a) To desist from; to forbear; to stop; as, to leave off work at six o'clock. (b) To cease wearing or using; to omit to put in the usual position; as, to leave off a garment; to leave off the tablecloth. (c) To forsake; as, to leave off a bad habit. -- To leave out, to omit; as, to leave out a word or name in writing. -- To leave to one's self, to let (one) be alone; to cease caring for (one). Syn. - To quit; depart from; forsake; abandon; relinquish; deliver; bequeath; give up; forego; resign; surrender; forbear. See Quit.  1. To depart; to set out. [Colloq.] By the time I left for Scotland. Carlyle. 2. To cease; to desist; to leave off. "He . . . began at the eldest, and left at the youngest." Gen. xliv. 12. To leave off, to cease; to desist; to stop. Leave off, and for another summons wait. Roscommon.
talk: 1. To utter words; esp., to converse familiarly; to speak, as in familiar discourse, when two or more persons interchange thoughts. I will buy with you, sell with you, talk with you, walk with you, and so following, but I will not eat with you. Shak. 2. To confer; to reason; to consult. Let me talk with thee of thy judgments. Jer. xii. 1. 3. To prate; to speak impertinently. [Colloq.] To talk of, to relate; to tell; to give an account of; as, authors talk of the wonderful remains of Palmyra. "The natural histories of Switzerland talk much of the fall of these rocks, and the great damage done." Addison. -- To talk to, to advise or exhort, or to reprove gently; as, I will talk to my son respecting his conduct. [Colloq.]  1. To speak freely; to use for conversing or communicating; as, to talk French. 2. To deliver in talking; to speak; to utter; to make a subject of conversation; as, to talk nonsense; to talk politics. 3. To consume or spend in talking; -- often followed by away; as, to talk away an evening. 4. To cause to be or become by talking. "They would talk themselves mad." Shak. To talk over. (a) To talk about; to have conference respecting; to deliberate upon; to discuss; as, to talk over a matter or plan. (b) To change the mind or opinion of by talking; to convince; as, to talk over an opponent.  1. The act of talking; especially, familiar converse; mutual discourse; that which is uttered, especially in familiar conversation, or the mutual converse of two or more. In various talk the instructive hours they passed. Pope. Their talk, when it was not made up of nautical phrases, was too commonly made up of oaths and curses. Macaulay. 2. Report; rumor; as, to hear talk of war. I hear a talk up and down of raising our money. Locke. 3. Subject of discourse; as, his achievment is the talk of the town. Syn. -- Conversation; colloquy; discourse; chat; dialogue; conference; communication. See Conversation.
camp: 1. The ground or spot on which tents, huts, etc., are erected for shelter, as for an army or for lumbermen, etc. Shzk. 2. A collection of tents, huts, etc., for shelter, commonly arranged in an orderly manner. Forming a camp in the neighborhood of Boston. W. Irving. 3. A single hut or shelter; as, a hunter's camp. 4. The company or body of persons encamped, as of soldiers, of surveyors, of lumbermen, etc. The camp broke up with the confusion of a flight. Macaulay. 5. (Agric.)  A mound of earth in which potatoes and other vegetables are stored for protection against frost; -- called also burrow and pie. [Prov. Eng.] 6. Etym: [Cf. OE. & AS. camp contest, battle. See champion.]  An ancient game of football, played in some parts of England. Halliwell. Camp bedstead, a light bedstead that can be folded up onto a small space for easy transportation. -- camp ceiling (Arch.), a kind ceiling often used in attics or garrets, in which the side walls are inclined inward at the top, following the slope of the rafters, to meet the plane surface of the upper ceiling. -- Camp chair, a light chair that can be folded up compactly for easy transportation; the seat and back are often made of strips or pieces of carpet. -- Camp fever, typhus fever. -- Camp follower, a civilian accompanying an army, as a sutler, servant, etc. -- Camp meeting, a religious gathering for open-air preaching, held in some retired spot, chiefty by Methodists. It usualy last for several days, during which those present lodge in tents, temporary houses, or cottages. -- Camp stool, the same as camp chair, except that the stool has no back. -- Flying camp (Mil.), a camp or body of troops formed for rapid motion from one place to another. Farrow. -- To pitch (a) camp, to set up the tents or huts of a camp. -- To strike camp, to take down the tents or huts of a camp.  To afford rest or lodging for, as an army or travelers. Had our great palace the capacity To camp this host, we all would sup together. Shak.  1. To pitch or prepare a camp; to encamp; to lodge in a camp; -- often with out. They camped out at night, under the stars. W. Irving. 2. Etym: [See Camp, n., 6]  To play the game called camp. [Prov. Eng.] Tusser.
energy: 1. Internal or inherent power; capacity of acting, operating, or producing an effect, whether exerted or not; as, men possessing energies may suffer them to lie inactive. The great energies of nature are known to us only by their effects. Paley. 2. Power efficiently and forcibly exerted; vigorous or effectual operation; as, the energy of a magistrate. 3. Strength of expression; force of utterance; power to impress the mind and arouse the feelings; life; spirit; -- said of speech, language, words, style; as, a style full of energy. 4. (Physics)  Capacity for performing work. Note: The kinetic energy of a body is the energy it has in virtue of being in motion. It is measured by one half of the product of the mass of each element of the body multiplied by the square of the velocity of the element, relative to some given body or point. The available kinetic energy of a material system unconnected with any other system is that energy which is due to the motions of the parts of the system relative to its center of mass. The potential energy of a body or system is that energy which is not kinetic; -- energy due to configuration. Kinetic energy is sometimes called actual energy. Kinetic energy is exemplified in the vis viva of moving bodies, in heat, electric currents, etc.; potential energy, in a bent spring, or a body suspended a given distance above the earth and acted on by gravity. Accumulation, Conservation, Correlation, and Degradation of energy, etc. (Physics) See under Accumulation, Conservation, Correlation, etc. Syn. -- Force; power; potency; vigor; strength; spirit; efficiency; resolution.
certain: 1. Assured in mind; having no doubts; free from suspicions concerning. To make her certain of the sad event. Dryden. I myself am certain of you. Wyclif. 2. Determined; resolved; -- used with an infinitive. However, I with thee have fixed my lot, Certain to undergo like doom. Milton. 3. Not to be doubted or denied; established as a fact. The dream is certain, and the interpretation thereof sure. Dan. ii. 45. 4. Actually existing; sure to happen; inevitable. Virtue that directs our ways Through certain dangers to uncertain praise. Dryden. Death, as the Psalmist saith, is certain to all. Shak. 5. Unfailing; infallible. I have often wished that I knew as certain a remedy for any other distemper. Mead. 6. Fixed or stated; regular; determinate. The people go out and gather a certain rate every day. Ex. xvi. 4. 7. Not specifically named; indeterminate; indefinite; one or some; -- sometimes used independenty as a noun, and meaning certain persons. It came to pass when he was in a certain city. Luke. v. 12. About everything he wrote there was a certain natural grace und decorum. Macaulay. For certain, assuredly. -- Of a certain, certainly. Syn. -- Bound; sure; true; undeniable; unquestionable; undoubted; plain; indubitable; indisputable; incontrovertible; unhesitating; undoubting; fixed; stated.  1. Certainty. [Obs.] Gower. 2. A certain number or quantity. [Obs.] Chaucer.  Certainly. [Obs.] Milton.
who: 1. Originally, an interrogative pronoun, later, a relative pronoun also; -- used always substantively, and either as singular or plural. See the Note under What, pron., 1. As interrogative pronouns, who and whom ask the question: What or which person or persons Who and whom, as relative pronouns (in the sense of that), are properly used of persons (corresponding to which, as applied to things), but are sometimes, less properly and now rarely, used of animals, plants, etc. Who and whom, as compound relatives, are also used especially of persons, meaning the person that; the persons that; the one that; whosoever. "Let who will be President." Macaulay. [He] should not tell whose children they were. Chaucer. There thou tell'st of kings, and who aspire; Who fall, who rise, who triumph, who do moan. Daniel. Adders who with cloven tongues Do hiss into madness. Shak. Whom I could pity thus forlorn. Milton. How hard is our fate, who serve in the state. Addison. Who cheapens life, abates the fear of death. Young. The brace of large greyhounds, who were the companions of his sports. Sir W. Scott. 2. One; any; one. [Obs., except in the archaic phrase, as who should say.] As who should say, it were a very dangerous matter if a man in any point should be found wiser than his forefathers were. Robynson (More's Utopia).
girl: 1. A young person of either sex; a child. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. A female child, from birth to the age of puberty; a young maiden. 3. A female servant; a maidservant. [U. S.] 4. (Zoöl.)  A roebuck two years old. [Prov. Eng.]
smell: 1. To perceive by the olfactory nerves, or organs of smell; to have a sensation of, excited through the nasal organs when affected by the appropriate materials or qualities; to obtain the scent of; as, to smell a rose; to smell perfumes. 2. To detect or perceive, as if by the sense of smell; to scent out; -- often with out. "I smell a device." Shak. Can you smell him out by that Shak. 3. To give heed to. [Obs.] From that time forward I began to smellthe Word of God, and forsook the school doctors. Latimer. To smell a rat, to have a sense of something wrong, not clearly evident; to have reason for suspicion. [Colloq.] -- To smell out, to find out by sagacity. [Colloq.]  1. To affect the olfactory nerves; to have an odor or scent; -- often followed by of; as, to smell of smoke, or of musk. 2. To have a particular tincture or smack of any quality; to savor; as, a report smells of calumny. Praises in an enemy are superfluous, or smell of craft. Milton. 3. To exercise the sense of smell. Ex. xxx. 38. 4. To exercise sagacity. Shak.  1. The sense or faculty by which certain qualities of bodies are perceived through the instrumentally of the olfactory nerves. See Sense. 2. The quality of any thing or substance, or emanation therefrom, which affects the olfactory organs; odor; scent; fragrance; perfume; as, the smell of mint. Breathing the smell of field and grove. Milton. That which, above all others, yields the sweetest smell in the air, is the violent. Bacon. Syn. -- Scent; odor; perfume; fragrance.
wave: See Wave. Sir H. Wotton. Burke.  1. To play loosely; to move like a wave, one way and the other; to float; to flutter; to undulate. His purple robes waved careless to the winds. Trumbull. Where the flags of three nations has successively waved. Hawthorne. 2. To be moved to and fro as a signal. B. Jonson. 3. To fluctuate; to waver; to be in an unsettled state; to vacillate. [Obs.] He waved indifferently 'twixt doing them neither good nor harm. Shak.  1. To move one way and the other; to brandish. "[Æneas] waved his fatal sword." Dryden. 2. To raise into inequalities of surface; to give an undulating form a surface to. Horns whelked and waved like the enridged sea. Shak. 3. To move like a wave, or by floating; to waft. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne. 4. To call attention to, or give a direction or command to, by a waving motion, as of the hand; to signify by waving; to beckon; to signal; to indicate. Look, with what courteous action It waves you to a more removed ground. Shak. She spoke, and bowing waved Dismissal. Tennyson.  1. An advancing ridge or swell on the surface of a liquid, as of the sea, resulting from the oscillatory motion of the particles composing it when disturbed by any force their position of rest; an undulation. The wave behind impels the wave before. Pope. 2. (Physics)  A vibration propagated from particle to particle through a body or elastic medium, as in the transmission of sound; an assemblage of vibrating molecules in all phases of a vibration, with no phase repeated; a wave of vibration; an undulation. See Undulation. 3. Water; a body of water. [Poetic] "Deep drank Lord Marmion of the wave." Sir W. Scott. Build a ship to save thee from the flood, I 'll furnish thee with fresh wave, bread, and wine. Chapman. 4. Unevenness; inequality of surface. Sir I. Newton. 5. A waving or undulating motion; a signal made with the hand, a flag, etc. 6. The undulating line or streak of luster on cloth watered, or calendered, or on damask steel. 7. Fig.: A swelling or excitement of thought, feeling, or energy; a tide; as, waves of enthusiasm. Wave front (Physics), the surface of initial displacement of the particles in a medium, as a wave of vibration advances. -- Wave length (Physics), the space, reckoned in the direction of propagation, occupied by a complete wave or undulation, as of light, sound, etc.; the distance from a point or phase in a wave to the nearest point at which the same phase occurs. -- Wave line (Shipbuilding), a line of a vessel's hull, shaped in accordance with the wave-line system. -- Wave-line system, Wave-line theory (Shipbuilding), a system or theory of designing the lines of a vessel, which takes into consideration the length and shape of a wave which travels at a certain speed. -- Wave loaf, a loaf for a wave offering. Lev. viii. 27. -- Wave moth (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of small geometrid moths belonging to Acidalia and allied genera; -- so called from the wavelike color markings on the wings. -- Wave offering, an offering made in the Jewish services by waving the object, as a loaf of bread, toward the four cardinal points. Num. xviii. 11. -- Wave of vibration (Physics), a wave which consists in, or is occasioned by, the production and transmission of a vibratory state from particle to particle through a body. -- Wave surface. (a) (Physics) A surface of simultaneous and equal displacement of the particles composing a wave of vibration. (b) (Geom.) A mathematical surface of the fourth order which, upon certain hypotheses, is the locus of a wave surface of light in the interior of crystals. It is used in explaining the phenomena of double refraction. See under Refraction. -- Wave theory. (Physics) See Undulatory theory, under Undulatory.
they: The plural of he, she, or it. They is never used adjectively, but always as a pronoun proper, and sometimes refers to persons without an antecedent expressed. Jolif and glad they went unto here [their] rest And casten hem [them] full early for to sail. Chaucer. They of Italy salute you. Heb. xiii. 24. Blessed are they which do hunger and thirst after righteousness. Matt. v. 6. Note: They is used indefinitely, as our ancestors used man, and as the French use on; as, they say (French on dit), that is, it is said by persons not specified.
enough: Satisfying desire; giving content; adequate to meet the want; sufficient; -- usually, and more elegantly, following the noun to which it belongs. How many hired servants of my father's have bread enough and to spare! Luke xv. 17.  1. In a degree or quantity that satisfies; to satisfaction; sufficiently. 2. Fully; quite; -- used to express slight augmentation of the positive degree, and sometimes equivalent to very; as, he is ready enough to embrace the offer. I know you well enough; you are Signior Antonio. Shak. Thou knowest well enough . . . that this is no time to lend money. Shak. 3. In a tolerable degree; -- used to express mere acceptableness or acquiescence, and implying a degree or quantity rather less than is desired; as, the song was well enough. Note: Enough usually follows the word it modifies.  A sufficiency; a quantity which satisfies desire, is adequate to the want, or is equal to the power or ability; as, he had enough to do take care of himself. "Enough is as good as a feast." And Esau said, I have enough, my brother. Gen. xxxiii. 9.  An exclamation denoting sufficiency, being a shortened form of it is enough.
foot: 1. (Anat.)  The terminal part of the leg of man or an animal; esp., the part below the ankle or wrist; that part of an animal upon which it rests when standing, or moves. See Manus, and Pes. 2. (Zoöl.)  The muscular locomotive organ of a mollusk. It is a median organ arising from the ventral region of body, often in the form of a flat disk, as in snails. See Illust. of Buccinum. 3. That which corresponds to the foot of a man or animal; as, the foot of a table; the foot of a stocking. 4. The lowest part or base; the ground part; the bottom, as of a mountain or column; also, the last of a row or series; the end or extremity, esp. if associated with inferiority; as, the foot of a hill; the foot of the procession; the foot of a class; the foot of the bed. And now at foot Of heaven's ascent they lift their feet. Milton. 5. Fundamental principle; basis; plan; -- used only in the singular. Answer directly upon the foot of dry reason. Berkeley. 6. Recognized condition; rank; footing; -- used only in the singular. [R.] As to his being on the foot of a servant. Walpole. 7. A measure of length equivalent to twelve inches; one third of a yard. See Yard. Note: This measure is supposed to be taken from the length of a man's foot. It differs in length in different countries. In the United States and in England it is 304.8 millimeters. 8. (Mil.)  Soldiers who march and fight on foot; the infantry, usually designated as the foot, in distinction from the cavalry. "Both horse and foot." Milton. 9. (Pros.)  A combination of syllables consisting a metrical element of a verse, the syllables being formerly distinguished by their quantity or length, but in modern poetry by the accent. 10. (Naut.)  The lower edge of a sail. Note: Foot is often used adjectively, signifying of or pertaining to a foot or the feet, or to the base or lower part. It is also much used as the first of compounds. Foot artillery. (Mil.) (a) Artillery soldiers serving in foot. (b) Heavy artillery. Farrow. -- Foot bank (Fort.), a raised way within a parapet. -- Foot barracks (Mil.), barracks for infantery. -- Foot bellows, a bellows worked by a treadle. Knight. -- Foot company (Mil.), a company of infantry. Milton. -- Foot gear, covering for the feet, as stocking, shoes, or boots. -- Foot hammer (Mach.), a small tilt hammer moved by a treadle. -- Foot iron. (a) The step of a carriage. (b) A fetter. -- Foot jaw. (Zoöl.) See Maxilliped. -- Foot key (Mus.), an organ pedal. -- Foot level (Gunnery), a form of level used in giving any proposed angle of elevation to a piece of ordnance. Farrow. -- Foot mantle, a long garment to protect the dress in riding; a riding skirt. [Obs.] -- Foot page, an errand boy; an attendant. [Obs.] -- Foot passenger, one who passes on foot, as over a road or bridge. -- Foot pavement, a paved way for foot passengers; a footway; a trottoir. -- Foot poet, an inferior poet; a poetaster. [R.] Dryden. -- Foot post. (a) A letter carrier who travels on foot. (b) A mail delivery by means of such carriers. -- Fot pound, and Foot poundal. (Mech.) See Foot pound and Foot poundal, in the Vocabulary. -- Foot press (Mach.), a cutting, embossing, or printing press, moved by a treadle. -- Foot race, a race run by persons on foot. Cowper. -- Foot rail, a railroad rail, with a wide flat flange on the lower side. -- Foot rot, an ulcer in the feet of sheep; claw sickness. -- Foot rule, a rule or measure twelve inches long. -- Foot screw, an adjusting screw which forms a foot, and serves to give a machine or table a level standing on an uneven place. -- Foot secretion. (Zoöl.) See Sclerobase. -- Foot soldier, a soldier who serves on foot. -- Foot stick (Printing), a beveled piece of furniture placed against the foot of the page, to hold the type in place. -- Foot stove, a small box, with an iron pan, to hold hot coals for warming the feet. -- Foot tubercle. (Zoöl.) See Parapodium. -- Foot valve (Steam Engine), the valve that opens to the air pump from the condenser. -- Foot vise, a kind of vise the jaws of which are operated by a treadle. -- Foot waling (Naut.), the inside planks or lining of a vessel over the floor timbers. Totten. -- Foot wall (Mining), the under wall of an inclosed vein. By foot, or On foot, by walking; as, to pass a stream on foot. -- Cubic foot. See under Cubic. -- Foot and mouth disease, a contagious disease (Eczema epizoötica) of cattle, sheep, swine, etc., characterized by the formation of vesicles and ulcers in the mouth and about the hoofs. -- Foot of the fine (Law), the concluding portion of an acknowledgment in court by which, formerly, the title of land was conveyed. See Fine of land, under Fine, n.; also Chirograph. (b). -- Square foot. See under Square. -- To be on foot, to be in motion, action, or process of execution. -- To keep the foot (Script.), to preserve decorum. "Keep thy foot when thou goest to the house of God." Eccl. v. 1. -- To put one's foot down, to take a resolute stand; to be determined. [Colloq.] -- To put the best foot foremost, to make a good appearance; to do one's best. [Colloq.] -- To set on foot, to put in motion; to originate; as, to set on foot a subscription. -- To put, or set, one on his feet, to put one in a position to go on; to assist to start. -- Under foot. (a) Under the feet; (Fig.) at one's mercy; as, to trample under foot. Gibbon. (b) Below par. [Obs.] "They would be forced to sell . . . far under foot." Bacon.  1. To tread to measure or music; to dance; to trip; to skip. Dryden. 2. To walk; -- opposed to ride or fly. Shak.  1. To kick with the foot; to spurn. Shak. 2. To set on foot; to establish; to land. [Obs.] What confederacy have you with the traitors Late footed in the kingdom Shak. 3. To tread; as, to foot the green. Tickell. 4. To sum up, as the numbers in a column; -- sometimes with up; as, to foot (or foot up) an account. 5. The size or strike with the talon. [Poet.] Shak. 6. To renew the foot of, as of stocking. Shak. To foot a bill, to pay it. [Colloq.] -- To foot it, to walk; also, to dance. If you are for a merry jaunt, I'll try, for once, who can foot it farthest. Dryden.
but: 1. Except with; unless with; without. [Obs.] So insolent that he could not go but either spurning equals or trampling on his inferiors. Fuller. Touch not the cat but a glove. Motto of the Mackintoshes. 2. Except; besides; save. Who can it be, ye gods! but perjured Lycon E. Smith. Note: In this sense, but is often used with other particles; as, but for, without, had it not been for. "Uncreated but for love divine." Young. 3. Excepting or excluding the fact that; save that; were it not that; unless; -- elliptical, for but that. And but my noble Moor is true of mind . . . it were enough to put him to ill thinking. Shak. 4. Otherwise than that; that not; -- commonly, after a negative, with that. It cannot be but nature hath some director, of infinite power, to guide her in all her ways. Hooker. There is no question but the king of Spain will reform most of the abuses. Addison. 5. Only; solely; merely. Observe but how their own principles combat one another. Milton. If they kill us, we shall but die. 2 Kings vii. 4. A formidable man but to his friends. Dryden. 6. On the contrary; on the other hand; only; yet; still; however; nevertheless; more; further; -- as connective of sentences or clauses of a sentence, in a sense more or less exceptive or adversative; as, the House of Representatives passed the bill, but the Senate dissented; our wants are many, but quite of another kind. Now abideth faith hope, charity, these three; but the greatest of these is charity. 1 Cor. xiii. 13. When pride cometh, then cometh shame; but with the lowly is wisdom. Prov. xi. 2. All but. See under All. -- But and if, but if; an attempt on the part of King James's translators of the Bible to express the conjunctive and adversative force of the Greek But and if that servant say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; . . . the lord of that servant will come in a day when he looketh not for him. Luke xii. 45, 46. But if, unless. [Obs.] Chaucer. But this I read, that but if remedy Thou her afford, full shortly I her dead shall see. Spenser. Syn. -- But, However, Still. These conjunctions mark opposition in passing from one thought or topic to another. But marks the opposition with a medium degree of strength; as, this is not winter, but it is almost as cold; he requested my assistance, but I shall not aid him at present. However is weaker, and throws the opposition (as it were) into the background; as, this is not winter; it is, however, almost as cold; he required my assistance; at present, however, I shall not afford him aid. The plan, however, is still under consideration, and may yet be adopted. Still is stronger than but, and marks the opposition more emphatically; as, your arguments are weighty; still they do not convince me. See Except, However. Note: "The chief error with but is to use it where and is enough; an error springing from the tendency to use strong words without sufficient occasio,." Bain.  The outer apartment or kitchen of a two-roomed house; -- opposed to ben, the inner room. [Scot.]  1. A limit; a boundary. 2. The end; esp. the larger or thicker end, or the blunt, in distinction from the sharp, end. See 1st Butt. But end, the larger or thicker end; as, the but end of a log; the but end of a musket. See Butt, n.  See Butt, v., and Abut, v.  1. A limit; a bound; a goal; the extreme bound; the end. Here is my journey's end, here my butt And very sea mark of my utmost sail. Shak. Note: As applied to land, the word is nearly synonymous with mete, and signifies properly the end line or boundary; the abuttal. 2. The thicker end of anything. See But. 3. A mark to be shot at; a target. Sir W. Scott. The groom his fellow groom at butts defies, And bends his bow, and levels with his eyes. Dryden. 4. A person at whom ridicule, jest, or contempt is directed; as, the butt of the company. I played a sentence or two at my butt, which I thought very smart. Addison. 5. A push, thrust, or sudden blow, given by the head of an animal; as, the butt of a ram. 6. A thrust in fencing. To prove who gave the fairer butt, John shows the chalk on Robert's coat. Prior. 7. A piece of land left unplowed at the end of a field. The hay was growing upon headlands and butts in cornfields. Burrill. 8. (Mech.) (a) A joint where the ends of two objects come squarely together without scrafing or chamfering; -- also called butt joint. (b) The end of a connecting rod or other like piece, to which the boxing is attached by the strap, cotter, and gib. (c) The portion of a half-coupling fastened to the end of a hose. 9. (Shipbuilding)  The joint where two planks in a strake meet. 10. (Carp.)  A kind of hinge used in hanging doors, etc.; -- so named because fastened on the edge of the door, which butts against the casing, instead of on its face, like the strap hinge; also called butt hinge. 11. (Leather Trade)  The thickest and stoutest part of tanned oxhides, used for soles of boots, harness, trunks. 12. The hut or shelter of the person who attends to the targets in rifle practice. Butt chain (Saddlery), a short chain attached to the end of a tug. -- Butt end. The thicker end of anything. See But end, under 2d But. Amen; and make me die a good old man! That's the butt end of a mother's blessing. Shak. A butt's length, the ordinary distance from the place of shooting to the butt, or mark. -- Butts and bounds (Conveyancing), abuttals and boundaries. In lands of the ordinary rectangular shape, butts are the lines at the ends (F. bouts), and bounds are those on the sides, or sidings, as they were formerly termed. Burrill. -- Bead and butt. See under Bead. -- Butt and butt, joining end to end without overlapping, as planks. -- Butt weld (Mech.), a butt joint, made by welding together the flat ends, or edges, of a piece of iron or steel, or of separate pieces, without having them overlap. See Weld. -- Full butt, headfirst with full force. [Colloq.] "The corporal . . . ran full butt at the lieutenant." Marryat.
air: 1. The fluid which we breathe, and which surrounds the earth; the atmosphere. It is invisible, inodorous, insipid, transparent, compressible, elastic, and ponderable. Note: By the ancient philosophers, air was regarded as an element; but modern science has shown that it is essentially a mixture of oxygen and nitrogen, with a small amount of carbon dioxide, the average proportions being, by volume: oxygen, 20.96 per cent.; nitrogen, 79.00 per cent.; carbon dioxide, 0.04 per cent. These proportions are subject to a very slight variability. Air also always contains some vapor of water. 2. Symbolically: Something unsubstantial, light, or volatile. "Charm ache with air." Shak. He was still all air and fire. Macaulay . [Air and fire being the finer and quicker elements as opposed to earth and water.] 3. A particular state of the atmosphere, as respects heat, cold, moisture, etc., or as affecting the sensations; as, a smoky air, a damp air, the morning air, etc. 4. Any aëriform body; a gas; as, oxygen was formerly called vital air. [Obs.] 5. Air in motion; a light breeze; a gentle wind. Let vernal airs through trembling osiers play. Pope. 6. Odoriferous or contaminated air. 7. That which surrounds and influences. The keen, the wholesome air of poverty. Wordsworth. 8. Utterance abroad; publicity; vent. You gave it air before me. Dryden. 9. Intelligence; information. [Obs.] Bacon. 10. (Mus.) (a) A musical idea, or motive, rhythmically developed in consecutive single tones, so as to form a symmetrical and balanced whole, which may be sung by a single voice to the stanzas of a hymn or song, or even to plain prose, or played upon an instrument; a melody; a tune; an aria. (b) In harmonized chorals, psalmody, part songs, etc., the part which bears the tune or melody -- in modern harmony usually the upper part -- is sometimes called the air. 11. The peculiar look, appearance, and bearing of a person; mien; demeanor; as, the air of a youth; a heavy air; a lofty air. "His very air." Shak. 12. Peculiar appearance; apparent character; semblance; manner; style. It was communicated with the air of a secret. Pope. 12. pl.  An artificial or affected manner; show of pride or vanity; haughtiness; as, it is said of a person, he puts on airs. Thackeray. 14. (Paint.) (a) The representation or reproduction of the effect of the atmospheric medium through which every object in nature is viewed. New Am. Cyc. (b) Carriage; attitude; action; movement; as, the head of that portrait has a good air. Fairholt. 15. (Man.)  The artificial motion or carriage of a horse. Note: Air is much used adjectively or as the first part of a compound term. In most cases it might be written indifferently, as a separate limiting word, or as the first element of the compound term, with or without the hyphen; as, air bladder, air-bladder, or airbladder; air cell, air-cell, or aircell; air-pump, or airpump. Air balloon. See Balloon. -- Air bath. (a) An apparatus for the application of air to the body. (b) An arrangement for drying substances in air of any desired temperature. -- Air castle. See Castle in the air, under Castle. -- Air compressor, a machine for compressing air to be used as a motive power. -- Air crossing, a passage for air in a mine. -- Air cushion, an air-tight cushion which can be inflated; also, a device for arresting motion without shock by confined air. -- Air fountain, a contrivance for producing a jet of water by the force of compressed air. -- Air furnace, a furnace which depends on a natural draft and not on blast. -- Air line, a straight line; a bee line. Hence Air-line, adj.; as, air-line road. -- Air lock (Hydr. Engin.), an intermediate chamber between the outer air and the compressed-air chamber of a pneumatic caisson. Knight. -- Air port (Nav.), a scuttle or porthole in a ship to admit air. -- Air spring, a spring in which the elasticity of air is utilized. -- Air thermometer, a form of thermometer in which the contraction and expansion of air is made to measure changes of temperature. -- Air threads, gossamer. -- Air trap, a contrivance for shutting off foul air or gas from drains, sewers, etc.; a stench trap. -- Air trunk, a pipe or shaft for conducting foul or heated air from a room. -- Air valve, a valve to regulate the admission or egress of air; esp. a valve which opens inwardly in a steam boiler and allows air to enter. -- Air way, a passage for a current of air; as the air way of an air pump; an air way in a mine. -- In the air. (a) Prevalent without traceable origin or authority, as rumors. (b) Not in a fixed or stable position; unsettled. (c) (Mil.) Unsupported and liable to be turned or taken in flank; as, the army had its wing in the air. -- To take air, to be divulged; to be made public. -- To take the air, to go abroad; to walk or ride out.  1. To expose to the air for the purpose of cooling, refreshing, or purifying; to ventilate; as, to air a room. It were good wisdom . . . that the jail were aired. Bacon. Were you but riding forth to air yourself. Shak. 2. To expose for the sake of public notice; to display ostentatiously; as, to air one's opinion. Airing a snowy hand and signet gem. Tennyson. 3. To expose to heat, for the purpose of expelling dampness, or of warming; as, to air linen; to air liquors.
design: 1. To draw preliminary outline or main features of; to sketch for a pattern or model; to delineate; to trace out; to draw. Dryden. 2. To mark out and exhibit; to designate; to indicate; to show; to point out; to appoint. We shall see Justice design the victor's chivalry. Shak. Meet me to-morrow where the master And this fraternity shall design. Beau. & Fl. 3. To create or produce, as a work of art; to form a plan or scheme of; to form in idea; to invent; to project; to lay out in the mind; as, a man designs an essay, a poem, a statue, or a cathedral. 4. To intend or purpose; -- usually with for before the remote object, but sometimes with to. Ask of politicians the end for which laws were originally designed. Burke. He was designed to the study of the law. Dryden. Syn. -- To sketch; plan; purpose; intend; propose; project; mean.  To form a design or designs; to plan. Design for, to intend to go to. [Obs.] "From this city she designed for Collin [Cologne]." Evelyn.  1. A preliminary sketch; an outline or pattern of the main features of something to be executed, as of a picture, a building, or a decoration; a delineation; a plan. 2. A plan or scheme formed in the mind of something to be done; preliminary conception; idea intended to be expressed in a visible form or carried into action; intention; purpose; -- often used in a bad sense for evil intention or purpose; scheme; plot. The vast design and purposTennyson. The leaders of that assembly who withstood the designs of a besotted woman. Hallam. A . . . settled design upon another man's life. Locke. How little he could guess the secret designs of the court! Macaulay. 3. Specifically, intention or purpose as revealed or inferred from the adaptation of means to an end; as, the argument from design. 4. The realization of an inventive or decorative plan; esp., a work of decorative art considered as a new creation; conception or plan shown in completed work; as, this carved panel is a fine design, or of a fine design. 5. (Mus.)  The invention and conduct of the subject; the disposition of every part, and the general order of the whole. Arts of design, those into which the designing of artistic forms and figures enters as a principal part, as architecture, painting, engraving, sculpture. -- School of design, one in which are taught the invention and delineation of artistic or decorative figures, patterns, and the like. Syn. -- Intention; purpose; scheme; project; plan; idea. -- Design, Intention, Purpose. Design has reference to something definitely aimed at. Intention points to the feelings or desires with which a thing is sought. Purpose has reference to a settled choice or determination for its attainment. "I had no design to injure you," means it was no part of my aim or object. "I had no intention to injure you," means, I had no wish or desire of that kind. "My purpose was directly the reverse," makes the case still stronger. Is he a prudent man . . . that lays designs only for a day, without any prospect to the remaining part of his life Tillotson. I wish others the same intention, and greater successes. Sir W. Temple. It is the purpose that makes strong the vow. Shak.
steel: 1. (Metal)  A variety of iron intermediate in composition and properties between wrought iron and cast iron (containing between one half of one per cent and one and a half per cent of carbon), and consisting of an alloy of iron with an iron carbide. Steel, unlike wrought iron, can be tempered, and retains magnetism. Its malleability decreases, and fusibility increases, with an increase in carbon. 2. An instrument or implement made of steel; as: -- (a) A weapon, as a sword, dagger, etc. "Brave Macbeth . . . with his brandished steel." Shak. While doubting thus he stood, Received the steel bathed in his brother's blood. Dryden. (b) An instrument of steel (usually a round rod) for sharpening knives. (c) A piece of steel for striking sparks from flint. 3. Fig.: Anything of extreme hardness; that which is characterized by sternness or rigor. "Heads of steel." Johnson. "Manhood's heart of steel." Byron. 4. (Med.)  A chalybeate medicine. Dunglison. Note: Steel is often used in the formation of compounds, generally of obvious meaning; as, steel-clad, steel-girt, steel-hearted, steel- plated, steel-pointed, etc. Bessemer steel (Metal.) See in the Vocabulary. -- Blister steel. (Metal.) See under Blister. -- Cast steel (Metal.), a fine variety of steel, originally made by smelting blister or cementation steel; hence, ordinarily, steel of any process of production when remelted and cast. -- Cromium steel (Metal.), a hard, tenacious variety containing a little cromium, and somewhat resembling tungsten steel. -- Mild steel (Metal.), a kind of steel having a lower proportion of carbon than ordinary steel, rendering it softer and more malleable. -- Puddled steel (Metal.), a variety of steel produced from cast iron by the puddling process. -- Steel duck (Zoöl.), the goosander, or merganser. [Prov. Eng.] -- Steel mill. (a) (Firearms) See Wheel lock, under Wheel. (b) A mill which has steel grinding surfaces. (c) A mill where steel is manufactured. -- Steel trap, a trap for catching wild animals. It consists of two iron jaws, which close by means of a powerful steel spring when the animal disturbs the catch, or tongue, by which they are kept open. -- Steel wine, wine, usually sherry, in which steel filings have been placed for a considerable time, -- used as a medicine. -- Tincture of steel (Med.), an alcoholic solution of the chloride of iron. -- Tungsten steel (Metal.), a variety of steel containing a small amount of tungsten, and noted for its tenacity and hardness, as well as for its malleability and tempering qualities. It is also noted for its magnetic properties.  1. To overlay, point, or edge with steel; as, to steel a razor; to steel an ax. 2. To make hard or strong; hence, to make insensible or obdurate. Lies well steeled with weighty arguments. Shak. O God of battles! steel my soldier's hearts. Shak. Why will you fight against so sweet a passion, And steel your heart to such a world of charms Addison. 3. Fig.: To cause to resemble steel, as in smoothness, polish, or other qualities. These waters, steeled By breezeless air to smoothest polish. Wordsworth. 4. (Elec.)  To cover, as an electrotype plate, with a thin layer of iron by electrolysis. The iron thus deposited is very hard, like steel.
lone: A lane. See Loanin. [Prov. Eng.]  1. Being without a companion; being by one's self; also, sad from lack of companionship; lonely; as, a lone traveler or watcher. When I have on those pathless wilds a appeared, And the lone wanderer with my presence cheered. Shenstone. 2. Single; unmarried, or in widowhood. [Archaic] Queen Elizabeth being a lone woman. Collection of Records (1642). A hundred mark is a long one for a poor lone woman to bear. Shak. 3. Being apart from other things of the kind; being by itself; also, apart from human dwellings and resort; as, a lone house. " A lone isle." Pope. By a lone well a lonelier column rears. Byron. 4. Unfrequented by human beings; solitary. Thus vanish scepters, coronets, and balls, And leave you on lone woods, or empty walls. Pope.
feed: 1. To give food to; to supply with nourishment; to satisfy the physical huger of. If thine enemy hunger, feed him. Rom. xii. 20. Unreasonable reatures feed their young. Shak. 2. To satisfy; grafity or minister to, as any sense, talent, taste, or desire. I will feed fat the ancient grudge I bear him. Shak. Feeding him with the hope of liberty. Knolles. 3. To fill the wants of; to supply with that which is used or wasted; as, springs feed ponds; the hopper feeds the mill; to feed a furnace with coal. 4. To nourish, in a general sense; to foster, strengthen, develop, and guard. Thou shalt feed people Israel. 2 Sam. v. 2. Mightiest powers by deepest calms are feed. B. Cornwall. 5. To graze; to cause to be cropped by feeding, as herbage by cattle; as, if grain is too forward in autumn, feed it with sheep. Once in three years feed your mowing lands. Mortimer. 6. To give for food, especially to animals; to furnish for consumption; as, to feed out turnips to the cows; to feed water to a steam boiler. 7. (Mach.) (a) To supply (the material to be operated upon) to a machine; as, to feed paper to a printing press. (b) To produce progressive operation upon or with (as in wood and metal working machines, so that the work moves to the cutting tool, or the tool to the work).  1. To take food; to eat. Her kid . . . which I afterwards killed because it would not feed. De Foe. 2. To subject by eating; to satisfy the appetite; to feed one's self (upon something); to prey; -- with on or upon. Leaving thy trunk for crows to feed upon. Shak. 3. To be nourished, strengthened, or satisfied, as if by food. "He feeds upon the cooling shade." Spenser. 4. To place cattle to feed; to pasture; to graze. If a man . . . shall put in his beast, and shall feed in anotheEx. xxii. 5.  1. That which is eaten; esp., food for beasts; fodder; pasture; hay; grain, ground or whole; as, the best feed for sheep. 2. A grazing or pasture ground. Shak. 3. An allowance of provender given to a horse, cow, etc.; a meal; as, a feed of corn or oats. 4. A meal, or the act of eating. [R.] For such pleasure till that hour At feed or fountain never had I found. Milton. 5. The water supplied to steam boilers. 6. (Mach.) (a) The motion, or act, of carrying forward the stuff to be operated upon, as cloth to the needle in a sewing machine; or of producing progressive operation upon any material or object in a machine, as, in a turning lathe, by moving the cutting tool along or in the work. (b) The supply of material to a machine, as water to a steam boiler, coal to a furnace, or grain to a run of stones. (c) The mechanism by which the action of feeding is produced; a feed motion. Feed bag, a nose bag containing feed for a horse or mule. -- Feed cloth, an apron for leading cotton, wool, or other fiber, into a machine, as for carding, etc. -- Feed door, a door to a furnace, by which to supply coal. -- Feed head. (a) A cistern for feeding water by gravity to a steam boiler. (b) (Founding) An excess of metal above a mold, which serves to render the casting more compact by its pressure; -- also called a riser, deadhead, or simply feed or head Knight. -- Feed heater. (a) (Steam Engine) A vessel in which the feed water for the boiler is heated, usually by exhaust steam. (b) A boiler or kettle in which is heated food for stock. -- Feed motion, or Feed gear (Mach.), the train of mechanism that gives motion to the part that directly produces the feed in a machine. -- Feed pipe, a pipe for supplying the boiler of a steam engine, etc., with water. -- Feed pump, a force pump for supplying water to a steam boiler, etc. -- Feed regulator, a device for graduating the operation of a feeder. Knight. -- Feed screw, in lathes, a long screw employed to impart a regular motion to a tool rest or tool, or to the work. -- Feed water, water supplied to a steam boiler, etc. -- Feed wheel (Mach.), a kind of feeder. See Feeder, n., 8.
above: 1. In or to a higher place; higher than; on or over the upper surface; over; -- opposed to below or beneath. Fowl that may fly above the earth. Gen. i. 20. 2. Figuratively, higher than; superior to in any respect; surpassing; beyond; higher in measure or degree than; as, things above comprehension; above mean actions; conduct above reproach. "Thy worth . . . is actions above my gifts." Marlowe. I saw in the way a light from heaven above the brightness of the sun. Acts xxxvi. 13. 3. Surpassing in number or quantity; more than; as, above a hundred. (Passing into the adverbial sense. See Above, adv., 4.) above all, before every other consideration; chiefly; in preference to other things. Over and above, prep. or adv., besides; in addition to.  1. In a higher place; overhead; into or from heaven; as, the clouds above. 2. Earlier in order; higher in the same page; hence, in a foregoing page. "That was said above." Dryden. 3. Higher in rank or power; as, he appealed to the court above. 4. More than; as, above five hundred were present. Note: Above is often used elliptically as an adjective by omitting the word mentioned, quoted, or the like; as, the above observations, the above reference, the above articles. -- Above is also used substantively. "The waters that come down from above." Josh. iii. 13. It is also used as the first part of a compound in the sense of before, previously; as, above-cited, above- described, above-mentioned, above-named, abovesaid, abovespecified, above-written, above-given.
neighbor: 1. A person who lives near another; one whose abode is not far off. Chaucer. Masters, my good friends, mine honest neighbors. Shak. 2. One who is near in sympathy or confidence. Buckingham No more shall be the neighbor to my counsel. Shak. 3. One entitled to, or exhibiting, neighborly kindness; hence, one of the human race; a fellow being. Which now of these three, thinkest thou, was neighbor unto him that fell among the thieves Luke x. 36. The gospel allows no such term as "stranger;" makes every man my neighbor. South.  Near to another; adjoining; adjacent; next; neighboring. "The neighbor cities." Jer. l. 40. "The neighbor room." Shak.  1. To adjoin; to border on; tobe near to. Leisurely ascending hills that neighbor the shore. Sandys. 2. To associate intimately with. [Obs.] Shak.  To dwell in the vicinity; to be a neighbor, or in the neighborhood; to be near. [Obs.] A copse that neighbors by. Shak.
determine: 1. To fix the boundaries of; to mark off and separate. [God] hath determined the times before appointed. Acts xvii. 26. 2. To set bounds to; to fix the determination of; to limit; to bound; to bring to an end; to finish. The knowledge of men hitherto hath been determined by the view or sight. Bacon. Now, where is he that will not stay so long Till his friend sickness hath determined me Shak. 3. To fix the form or character of; to shape; to prescribe imperatively; to regulate; to settle. The character of the soul is determined by the character of its God. J. Edwards. Something divinely beautiful . . . that at some time or other might influence or even determine her course of life. W. Black. 4. To fix the course of; to impel and direct; -- with a remoter object preceded by to; as, another's will determined me to this course. 5. To ascertain definitely; to find out the specific character or name of; to assign to its true place in a system; as, to determine an unknown or a newly discovered plant or its name. 6. To bring to a conclusion, as a question or controversy; to settle authoritative or judicial sentence; to decide; as, the court has determined the cause. 7. To resolve on; to have a fixed intention of; also, to cause to come to a conclusion or decision; to lead; as, this determined him to go immediately. 8. (Logic)  To define or limit by adding a differentia. 9. (Physical Sciences)  To ascertain the presence, quantity, or amount of; as, to determine the parallax; to determine the salt in sea water.  1. To come to an end; to end; to terminate. [Obs.] He who has vented a pernicious doctrine or published an ill book must know that his life determine not together. South. Estates may determine on future contingencies. Blackstone. 2. To come to a decision; to decide; to resolve; -- often with on. "Determine on some course." Shak. He shall pay as the judges determine. Ex. xxi. 22.
them: The objective case of they. See They. Go ye rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves. Matt. xxv. 9. Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father. Matt. xxv. 34. Note: Them is poetically used for themselves, as him for himself, etc. Little stars may hide them when they list. Shak.
small: 1. Having little size, compared with other things of the same kind; little in quantity or degree; diminutive; not large or extended in dimension; not great; not much; inconsiderable; as, a small man; a small river. To compare Great things with small. Milton. 2. Being of slight consequence; feeble in influence or importance; unimportant; trivial; insignificant; as, a small fault; a small business. 3. Envincing little worth or ability; not large-minded; -- sometimes, in reproach, paltry; mean. A true delineation of the smallest man is capable of interesting the reatest man. Carlyle. 4. Not prolonged in duration; not extended in time; short; as, after a small space. Shak. 5. Weak; slender; fine; gentle; soft; not loud. "A still, small voice." 1 Kings xix. 12. Great and small,of all ranks or degrees; -- used especially of persons. "His quests, great and small." Chaucer. -- Small arms, muskets, rifles, pistols, etc., in distinction from cannon. -- Small beer. See under Beer. -- Small coal. (a) Little coals of wood formerly used to light fires. Gay. (b) Coal about the size of a hazelnut, separated from the coarser parts by screening. -- Small craft (Naut.), a vessel, or vessels in general, of a small size. -- Small fruits. See under Fruit. -- Small hand, a certain size of paper. See under Paper. -- Small hours. See under Hour. -- Small letter. (Print.), a lower-case letter. See Lower-case, and Capital letter, under Capital, a. -- Small piece, a Scotch coin worth about 2 -- Small register. See the Note under 1st Register, 7. -- Small stuff (Naut.), spun yarn, marline, and the smallest kinds of rope. R. H. Dana, Jr. -- Small talk, light or trifling conversation; chitchat. -- Small wares (Com.), various small textile articles, as tapes, braid, tringe, and the like. M`Culloch.  1. In or to small extent, quantity, or degree; little; slightly. [Obs.] "I wept but small." Chaucer. "It small avails my mood." Shak. 2. Not loudly; faintly; timidly. [Obs. or Humorous] You may speak as small as you will. Shak.  1. The small or slender part of a thing; as, the small of the leg or of the back. 2. pl.  Smallclothes. [Colloq.] Hood. Dickens. 3. pl.  Same as Little go. See under Little, a.  To make little or less. [Obs.]
sell: Self. [Obs. or Scot.] B. Jonson.  A sill. [Obs.] Chaucer.  A cell; a house. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. A saddle for a horse. [Obs.] He left his lofty steed with golden self. Spenser. 2. A throne or lofty seat. [Obs.] Fairfax.  1. To transfer to another for an equivalent; to give up for a valuable consideration; to dispose of in return for something, especially for money. If thou wilt be perfect, go and sell that thou hast, and give to the poor. Matt. xix. 21. I am changed; I'll go sell all my land. Shak. Note: Sell is corellative to buy, as one party buys what the other sells. It is distinguished usually from exchange or barter, in which one commodity is given for another; whereas in selling the consideration is usually money, or its representative in current notes. 2. To make a matter of bargain and sale of; to accept a price or reward for, as for a breach of duty, trust, or the like; to betray. You would have sold your king to slaughter. Shak. 3. To impose upon; to trick; to deceive; to make a fool of; to cheat. [Slang] Dickens. To sell one's life dearly, to cause much loss to those who take one's life, as by killing a number of one's assailants. -- To sell (anything) out, to dispose of it wholly or entirely; as, he had sold out his corn, or his interest in a business.  1. To practice selling commodities. I will buy with you, sell with you; . . . but I will not eat with you. Shak. 2. To be sold; as, corn sells at a good price. To sell out, to sell one's whole stockk in trade or one's entire interest in a property or a business.  An imposition; a cheat; a hoax. [Colloq.]
care: 1. A burdensome sense of responsibility; trouble caused by onerous duties; anxiety; concern; solicitude. Care keeps his wath in every old man's eye, And where care lodges, sleep will never lie. Shak. 2. Charge, oversight, or management, implying responsibility for safety and prosperity. The care of all the churches. 2 Car. xi. 28 Him thy care must be to find. Milton. Perlexed with a thousand cares. Shak. 3. Attention or heed; caution; regard; heedfulness; watchfulness; as, take care; have a care. I thank thee for thy care and honest pains. Shak. 4. The object of watchful attention or anxiety. Right sorrowfully mourning her bereaved cares. Spenser. Syn. -- Anxiety; solicitude; concern; caution; regard; management; direction; oversight. -- Care, Anxiety, Solicitude, Concern. These words express mental pain in different degress. Care belongs primarily to the intellect, and becomes painful from overburdened thought. Anxiety denotes a state of distressing uneasiness fron the dread of evil. Solicitude expresses the same feeling in a diminished dagree. Concern is opposed to indifference, and implies exercise of anxious thought more or less intense. We are careful about the means, solicitous and anxious about the end; we are solicitous to obtain a good, axious to avoid an evil.  To be anxious or solictous; to be concerned; to have regard or interest; -- sometimes followed by an objective of measure. I would not care a pin, if the other three were in. Shak. Master, carest thou not that we perish Mark. iv. 38. To care for. (a) To have under watchful attention; to take care of. (b) To have regard or affection for; to like or love. He cared not for the affection of the house. Tennyson.
behind: 1. On the side opposite the front or nearest part; on the back side of; at the back of; on the other side of; as, behind a door; behind a hill. A tall Brabanter, behind whom I stood. Bp. Hall. 2. Left after the departure of, whether this be by removing to a distance or by death. A small part of what he left behind him. Pope. 3. Left a distance by, in progress of improvement Hence: Inferior to in dignity, rank, knowledge, or excellence, or in any achievement. I was not a whit behind the very chiefest apostles. 2 Cor. xi. 5.  1. At the back part; in the rear. "I shall not lag behind." Milton. 2. Toward the back part or rear; backward; as, to look behind. 3. Not yet brought forward, produced, or exhibited to view; out of sight; remaining. We can not be sure that there is no evidence behind. Locke. 4. Backward in time or order of succession; past. Forgetting those things which are behind. Phil. ii. 13. 5. After the departure of another; as, to stay behind. Leave not a rack behind. Shak.  The backside; the rump. [Low]
there: 1. In or at that place. "[They] there left me and my man, both bound together." Shak. The Lord God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put the man whom he had formed. Ge. ii. 8. Note: In distinction from here, there usually signifies a place farther off. "Darkness there might well seem twilight here." Milton. 2. In that matter, relation, etc.; at that point, stage, etc., regarded as a distinct place; as, he did not stop there, but continued his speech. The law that theaten'd death becomes thy friend And turns it to exile; there art thou happy. Shak. 3. To or into that place; thither. The rarest that e'er came there. Shak. Note: There is sometimes used by way of exclamation, calling the attention to something, especially to something distant; as, there, there! see there! look there! There is often used as an expletive, and in this use, when it introduces a sentence or clause, the verb precedes its subject. A knight there was, and that a worthy man. Chaucer. There is a path which no fowl knoweth. Job xxviii. 7. Wherever there is a sense or perception, there some idea is actually produced. Locke. There have been that have delivered themselves from their ills by their good fortune or virtue. Suckling. Note: There is much used in composition, and often has the sense of a pronoun. See Thereabout, Thereafter, Therefrom, etc. Note: There was formerly used in the sense of where. Spend their good there it is reasonable. Chaucer. Here and there, in one place and another. Syn. -- See Thither.
lost: 1. Parted with unwillingly or unintentionally; not to be found; missing; as, a lost book or sheep. 2. Parted with; no longer held or possessed; as, a lost limb; lost honor. 3. Not employed or enjoyed; thrown away; employed ineffectually; wasted; squandered; as, a lost day; a lost opportunity or benefit. 5. Having wandered from, or unable to find, the way; bewildered; perplexed; as, a child lost in the woods; a stranger lost in London. 6. Ruined or destroyed, either physically or morally; past help or hope; as, a ship lost at sea; a woman lost to virtue; a lost soul. 7. Hardened beyond sensibility or recovery; alienated; insensible; as, lost to shame; lost to all sense of honor. 8. Not perceptible to the senses; no longer visible; as, an island lost in a fog; a person lost in a crowd. 9. Occupied with, or under the influence of, something, so as to be insensible of external things; as, to be lost in thought. Lost motion (Mach.), the difference between the motion of a driver and that of a follower, due to the yielding of parts or looseness of joints.
all: 1. The whole quantity, extent, duration, amount, quality, or degree of; the whole; the whole number of; any whatever; every; as, all the wheat; all the land; all the year; all the strength; all happiness; all abundance; loss of all power; beyond all doubt; you will see us all (or all of us). Prove all things: hold fast that which is good. 1 Thess. v. 21. 2. Any. [Obs.] "Without all remedy." Shak. Note: When the definite article "the," or a possessive or a demonstrative pronoun, is joined to the noun that all qualifies, all precedes the article or the pronoun; as, all the cattle; all my labor; all his wealth; all our families; all your citizens; all their property; all other joys. Note: This word, not only in popular language, but in the Scriptures, often signifies, indefinitely, a large portion or number, or a great part. Thus, all the cattle in Egypt died, all Judea and all the region round about Jordan, all men held John as a prophet, are not to be understood in a literal sense, but as including a large part, or very great numbers. 3. Only; alone; nothing but. I was born to speak all mirth and no matter. Shak. All the whole, the whole (emphatically). [Obs.] "All the whole army." Shak.  1. Wholly; completely; altogether; entirely; quite; very; as, all bedewed; my friend is all for amusement. "And cheeks all pale." Byron. Note: In the ancient phrases, all too dear, all too much, all so long, etc., this word retains its appropriate sense or becomes intensive. 2. Even; just. (Often a mere intensive adjunct.) [Obs. or Poet.] All as his straying flock he fed. Spenser. A damsel lay deploring All on a rock reclined. Gay. All to, or All-to. In such phrases as "all to rent," "all to break," "all-to frozen," etc., which are of frequent occurrence in our old authors, the all and the to have commonly been regarded as forming a compound adverb, equivalent in meaning to entirely, completely, altogether. But the sense of entireness lies wholly in the word all (as it does in "all forlorn," and similar expressions), and the to properly belongs to the following word, being a kind of intensive prefix (orig. meaning asunder and answering to the LG. ter-, HG. zer- ). It is frequently to be met with in old books, used without the all. Thus Wyclif says, "The vail of the temple was to rent:" and of Judas, "He was hanged and to-burst the middle:" i. e., burst in two, or asunder. -- All along. See under Along. -- All and some, individually and collectively, one and all. [Obs.] "Displeased all and some." Fairfax. -- All but. (a) Scarcely; not even. [Obs.] Shak. (b) Almost; nearly. "The fine arts were all but proscribed." Macaulay. -- All hollow, entirely, completely; as, to beat any one all hollow. [Low] -- All one, the same thing in effect; that is, wholly the same thing. -- All over, over the whole extent; thoroughly; wholly; as, she is her mother all over. [Colloq.] -- All the better, wholly the better; that is, better by the whole difference. -- All the same, nevertheless. "There they [certain phenomena] remain rooted all the same, whether we recognize them or not." J. C. Shairp. "But Rugby is a very nice place all the same." T. Arnold. -- See also under All, n.  The whole number, quantity, or amount; the entire thing; everything included or concerned; the aggregate; the whole; totality; everything or every person; as, our all is at stake. Death, as the Psalmist saith, is certain to all. Shak. All that thou seest is mine. Gen. xxxi. 43. Note: All is used with of, like a partitive; as, all of a thing, all of us. After all, after considering everything to the contrary; nevertheless. -- All in all, a phrase which signifies all things to a person, or everything desired; (also adverbially) wholly; altogether. Thou shalt be all in all, and I in thee, Forever. Milton. Trust me not at all, or all in all. Tennyson. -- All in the wind (Naut.), a phrase denoting that the sails are parallel with the course of the wind, so as to shake. -- All told, all counted; in all. -- And all, and the rest; and everything connected. "Bring our crown and all." Shak. -- At all. (a) In every respect; wholly; thoroughly. [Obs.] "She is a shrew at al(l)." Chaucer. (b) A phrase much used by way of enforcement or emphasis, usually in negative or interrogative sentences, and signifying in any way or respect; in the least degree or to the least extent; in the least; under any circumstances; as, he has no ambition at all; has he any property at all "Nothing at all. " Shak. "It thy father at all miss me." 1 Sam. xx. 6. -- Over all, everywhere. [Obs.] Chaucer. Note: All is much used in composition to enlarge the meaning, or add force to a word. In some instances, it is completely incorporated into words, and its final consonant is dropped, as in almighty, already, always: but, in most instances, it is an adverb prefixed to adjectives or participles, but usually with a hyphen, as, all- bountiful, all-glorious, allimportant, all-surrounding, etc. In others it is an adjective; as, allpower, all-giver. Anciently many words, as, alabout, alaground, etc., were compounded with all, which are now written separately.  Although; albeit. [Obs.] All they were wondrous loth. Spenser.
wind: 1. To turn completely, or with repeated turns; especially, to turn about something fixed; to cause to form convolutions about anything; to coil; to twine; to twist; to wreathe; as, to wind thread on a spool or into a ball. Whether to wind The woodbine round this arbor. Milton. 2. To entwist; to infold; to encircle. Sleep, and I will wind thee in arms. Shak. 3. To have complete control over; to turn and bend at one's pleasure; to vary or alter or will; to regulate; to govern. "To turn and wind a fiery Pegasus." Shak. In his terms so he would him wind. Chaucer. Gifts blind the wise, and bribes do please And wind all other witnesses. Herrick. Were our legislature vested in the prince, he might wind and turn our constitution at his pleasure. Addison. 4. To introduce by insinuation; to insinuate. You have contrived . . . to wind Yourself into a power tyrannical. Shak. Little arts and dexterities they have to wind in such things into discourse. Gov. of Tongue. 5. To cover or surround with something coiled about; as, to wind a rope with twine. To wind off, to unwind; to uncoil. -- To wind out, to extricate. [Obs.] Clarendon. -- To wind up. (a) To coil into a ball or small compass, as a skein of thread; to coil completely. (b) To bring to a conclusion or settlement; as, to wind up one's affairs; to wind up an argument. (c) To put in a state of renewed or continued motion, as a clock, a watch, etc., by winding the spring, or that which carries the weight; hence, to prepare for continued movement or action; to put in order anew. "Fate seemed to wind him up for fourscore years." Dryden. "Thus they wound up his temper to a pitch." Atterbury. (d) To tighten (the strings) of a musical instrument, so as to tune it. "Wind up the slackened strings of thy lute." Waller.  1. To turn completely or repeatedly; to become coiled about anything; to assume a convolved or spiral form; as, vines wind round a pole. So swift your judgments turn and wind. Dryden. 2. To have a circular course or direction; to crook; to bend; to meander; as, to wind in and out among trees. And where the valley winded out below, The murmuring main was heard, and scarcely heard, to flow. Thomson. He therefore turned him to the steep and rocky path which . . . winded through the thickets of wild boxwood and other low aromatic shrubs. Sir W. Scott. 3. To go to the one side or the other; to move this way and that; to double on one's course; as, a hare pursued turns and winds. The lowing herd wind Gray. To wind out, to extricate one's self; to escape. Long struggling underneath are they could wind Out of such prison. Milton.  The act of winding or turning; a turn; a bend; a twist; a winding.  1. Air naturally in motion with any degree of velocity; a current of air. Except wind stands as never it stood, It is an ill wind that turns none to good. Tusser . Winds were soft, and woods were green. Longfellow. 2. Air artificially put in motion by any force or action; as, the wind of a cannon ball; the wind of a bellows. 3. Breath modulated by the respiratory and vocal organs, or by an instrument. Their instruments were various in their kind, Some for the bow, and some for breathing wind. Dryden. 4. Power of respiration; breath. If my wind were but long enough to say my prayers, I would repent. Shak. 5. Air or gas generated in the stomach or bowels; flatulence; as, to be troubled with wind. 6. Air impregnated with an odor or scent. A pack of dogfish had him in the wind. Swift. 7. A direction from which the wind may blow; a point of the compass; especially, one of the cardinal points, which are often called the four winds. Come from the four winds, O breath, and breathe upon these slain. Ezek. xxxvii. 9. Note: This sense seems to have had its origin in the East. The Hebrews gave to each of the four cardinal points the name of wind. 8. (Far.)  A disease of sheep, in which the intestines are distended with air, or rather affected with a violent inflammation. It occurs immediately after shearing. 9. Mere breath or talk; empty effort; idle words. Nor think thou with wind Of airy threats to awe. Milton. 10. (Zoöl.)  The dotterel. [Prov. Eng.] Note: Wind is often used adjectively, or as the first part of compound words. All in the wind. (Naut.) See under All, n. -- Before the wind. (Naut.) See under Before. -- Between wind and water (Naut.), in that part of a ship's side or bottom which is frequently brought above water by the rolling of the ship, or fluctuation of the water's surface. Hence, colloquially, (as an injury to that part of a vessel, in an engagement, is particularly dangerous) the vulnerable part or point of anything. -- Cardinal winds. See under Cardinal, a. -- Down the wind. (a) In the direction of, and moving with, the wind; as, birds fly swiftly down the wind. (b) Decaying; declining; in a state of decay. [Obs.] "He went down the wind still." L'Estrange. -- In the wind's eye (Naut.), directly toward the point from which the wind blows. -- Three sheets in the wind, unsteady from drink. [Sailors' Slang] - - To be in the wind, to be suggested or expected; to be a matter of suspicion or surmise. [Colloq.] -- To carry the wind (Man.), to toss the nose as high as the ears, as a horse. -- To raise the wind, to procure money. [Colloq.] -- To take, or have, the wind, to gain or have the advantage. Bacon. -- To take the wind out of one's sails, to cause one to stop, or lose way, as when a vessel intercepts the wind of another. [Colloq.] -- To take wind, or To get wind, to be divulged; to become public; as, the story got wind, or took wind. -- Wind band (Mus.), a band of wind instruments; a military band; the wind instruments of an orchestra. -- Wind chest (Mus.), a chest or reservoir of wind in an organ. -- Wind dropsy. (Med.) (a) Tympanites. (b) Emphysema of the subcutaneous areolar tissue. -- Wind egg, an imperfect, unimpregnated, or addled egg. -- Wind furnace. See the Note under Furnace. -- Wind gauge. See under Gauge. -- Wind gun. Same as Air gun. -- Wind hatch (Mining), the opening or place where the ore is taken out of the earth. -- Wind instrument (Mus.), an instrument of music sounded by means of wind, especially by means of the breath, as a flute, a clarinet, etc. -- Wind pump, a pump moved by a windmill. -- Wind rose, a table of the points of the compass, giving the states of the barometer, etc., connected with winds from the different directions. -- Wind sail. (a) (Naut.) A wide tube or funnel of canvas, used to convey a stream of air for ventilation into the lower compartments of a vessel. (b) The sail or vane of a windmill. -- Wind shake, a crack or incoherence in timber produced by violent winds while the timber was growing. -- Wind shock, a wind shake. -- Wind side, the side next the wind; the windward side. [R.] Mrs. Browning. -- Wind rush (Zoöl.), the redwing. [Prov. Eng.] -- Wind wheel, a motor consisting of a wheel moved by wind. -- Wood wind (Mus.), the flutes and reed instruments of an orchestra, collectively.  1. To expose to the wind; to winnow; to ventilate. 2. To perceive or follow by the scent; to scent; to nose; as, the hounds winded the game. 3. (a) To drive hard, or force to violent exertion, as a horse, so as to render scant of wind; to put out of breath. (b) To rest, as a horse, in order to allow the breath to be recovered; to breathe. To wind a ship (Naut.), to turn it end for end, so that the wind strikes it on the opposite side.  To blow; to sound by blowing; esp., to sound with prolonged and mutually involved notes. "Hunters who wound their horns." Pennant. Ye vigorous swains, while youth ferments your blood, . . . Wind the shrill horn. Pope. That blast was winded by the king. Sir W. Scott.
let: To retard; to hinder; to impede; to oppose. [Archaic] He was so strong that no man might him let. Chaucer. He who now letteth will let, until he be taken out of the way. 2. Thess. ii. 7. Mine ancient wound is hardly whole, And lets me from the saddle. Tennyson.  1. A retarding; hindrance; obstacle; impediment; delay; -- common in the phrase without let or hindrance, but elsewhere archaic. Keats. Consider whether your doings be to the let of your salvation or not. Latimer. 2. (Lawn Tennis)  A stroke in which a ball touches the top of the net in passing over.  1. To leave; to relinquish; to abandon. [Obs. or Archaic, except when followed by alone or be.] He . . . prayed him his voyage for to let Chaucer. Yet neither spins nor cards, ne cares nor frets, But to her mother Nature all her care she lets. Spenser. Let me alone in choosing of my wife. Chaucer. 2. To consider; to think; to esteem. [Obs.] Chaucer. 3. To cause; to make; -- used with the infinitive in the active form but in the passive sense; as, let make, i. e., cause to be made; let bring, i. e., cause to be brought. [Obs.] This irous, cursed wretch Let this knight's son anon before him fetch. Chaucer. He . . . thus let do slay hem all three. Chaucer. Anon he let two coffers make. Gower. 4. To permit; to allow; to suffer; -- either affirmatively, by positive act, or negatively, by neglecting to restrain or prevent. Note: In this sense, when followed by an infinitive, the latter is commonly without the sign to; as to let us walk, i. e., to permit or suffer us to walk. Sometimes there is entire omission of the verb; as, to let [to be or to go] loose. Pharaoh said, I will let you go Ex. viii. 28. If your name be Horatio, as I am let to know it is. Shak. 5. To allow to be used or occupied for a compensation; to lease; to rent; to hire out; -- often with out; as, to let a farm; to let a house; to let out horses. 6. To give, grant, or assign, as a work, privilege, or contract; -- often with out; as, to let the building of a bridge; to let out the lathing and the plastering. Note: The active form of the infinitive of let, as of many other English verbs, is often used in a passive sense; as, a house to let (i. e., for letting, or to be let). This form of expression conforms to the use of the Anglo-Saxon gerund with to (dative infinitive) which was commonly so employed. See Gerund, 2. " Your elegant house in Harley Street is to let." Thackeray. In the imperative mood, before the first person plural, let has a hortative force. " Rise up, let us go." Mark xiv. 42. " Let us seek out some desolate shade." Shak. To let alone, to leave; to withdraw from; to refrain from interfering with. -- To let blood, to cause blood to flow; to bleed. -- To let down. (a) To lower. (b) To soften in tempering; as to let down tools, cutlery, and the like. -- To let drive or fly, to discharge with violence, as a blow, an arrow, or stone. See under Drive, and Fly. -- To let in or into. (a) To permit or suffer to enter; to admit. (b) To insert, or imbed, as a piece of wood, in a recess formed in a surface for the purpose. To let loose, to remove restraint from; to permit to wander at large. -- To let off (a) To discharge; to let fly, as an arrow; to fire the charge of, as a gun. (b) To release, as from an engagement or obligation. [Colloq.] To let out. (a) To allow to go forth; as, to let out a prisoner. (b) To extend or loosen, as the folds of a garment; to enlarge; to suffer to run out, as a cord. (c) To lease; to give out for performance by contract, as a job. (d) To divulge. -- To let slide, to let go; to cease to care for. [Colloq.] " Let the world slide." Shak.  1. To forbear. [Obs.] Bacon. 2. To be let or leased; as, the farm lets for $500 a year. See note under Left, v. i. To let on, to tell; to tattle; to divulge something. [Low] -- To let up, to become less severe; to diminish; to cease; as, when the storm lets up. [Colloq.]
sheet: In general, a large, broad piece of anything thin, as paper, cloth, etc.; a broad, thin portion of any substance; an expanded superficies. Specifically: (a) A broad piece of cloth, usually linen or cotton, used for wrapping the body or for a covering; especially, one used as an article of bedding next to the body. He fell into a trance, and saw heaven opened, and a certain vessel descending unto him, as it had been a great sheet knit at the four corners. Acts x. 10, 11. If I do die before thee, prithee, shroud me In one of those same sheets. Shak. (b) A broad piece of paper, whether folded or unfolded, whether blank or written or printed upon; hence, a letter; a newspaper, etc. (c) A single signature of a book or a pamphlet; in pl., the book itself. To this the following sheets are intended for a full and distinct answer. Waterland. (d) A broad, thinly expanded portion of metal or other substance; as, a sheet of copper, of glass, or the like; a plate; a leaf. (e) A broad expanse of water, or the like. "The two beautiful sheets of water." Macaulay. (f) A sail. Dryden. (g) (Geol.) An extensive bed of an eruptive rock intruded between, or overlying, other strata. 2. Etym: [AS. sceáta. See the Etymology above.] (Naut.) (a) A rope or chain which regulates the angle of adjustment of a sail in relation in relation to the wind; -- usually attached to the lower corner of a sail, or to a yard or a boom. (b) pl.  The space in the forward or the after part of a boat where there are no rowers; as, fore sheets; stern sheets. Note: Sheet is often used adjectively, or in combination, to denote that the substance to the name of which it is prefixed is in the form of sheets, or thin plates or leaves; as, sheet brass, or sheet-brass; sheet glass, or sheet-glass; sheet gold, or sheet-gold; sheet iron, or sheet-iron, etc. A sheet in the wind, half drunk. [Sailors' Slang] -- Both sheets in the wind, very drunk. [Sailors' Slang] -- In sheets, lying flat or expanded; not folded, or folded but not bound; -- said especially of printed sheets. -- Sheet bend (Naut.), a bend or hitch used for temporarily fastening a rope to the bight of another rope or to an eye. -- Sheet lightning, Sheet piling, etc. See under Lightning, Piling, etc.  1. To furnish with a sheet or sheets; to wrap in, or cover with, a sheet, or as with a sheet. "The sheeted dead." "When snow the pasture sheets." Shak. 2. To expand, as a sheet. The star shot flew from the welkin blue, As it fell from the sheeted sky. J. R. Drake. To sheet home (Naut.), to haul upon a sheet until the sail is as flat, and the clew as near the wind, as possible.
keep: 1. To care; to desire. [Obs.] I kepe not of armes for to yelp [boast]. Chaucer. 2. To hold; to restrain from departure or removal; not to let go of; to retain in one's power or possession; not to lose; to retain; to detain. If we lose the field, We can not keep the town. Shak. That I may know what keeps me here with you. Dryden. If we would weigh and keep in our minds what we are considering, that would instruct us. Locke. 3. To cause to remain in a given situation or condition; to maintain unchanged; to hold or preserve in any state or tenor. His loyalty he kept, his love, his zeal. Milton. Keep a stiff rein, and move but gently on. Addison. Note: In this sense it is often used with prepositions and adverbs, as to keep away, to keep down, to keep from, to keep in, out, or off, etc. "To keep off impertinence and solicitation from his superior." Addison. 4. To have in custody; to have in some place for preservation; to take charge of. The crown of Stephanus, first king of Hungary, was always kept in the castle of Vicegrade. Knolles. 5. To preserve from danger, harm, or loss; to guard. Behold, I am with thee, and will keep thee. Gen. xxviii. 15. 6. To preserve from discovery or publicity; not to communicate, reveal, or betray, as a secret. Great are thy virtues . . . though kept from man. Milton. 7. To attend upon; to have the care of; to tend. And the Lord God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden, to dress it and to keep it. Gen. ii. 15. In her girlish age, she kept sheep on the moor. Carew. 8. To record transactions, accounts, or events in; as, to keep books, a journal, etc. ; also, to enter (as accounts, records, etc. ) in a book. 9. To maintain, as an establishment, institution, or the like; to conduct; to manage; as, to keep store. Like a pedant that keeps a school. Shak. Every one of them kept house by himself. Hayward. 10. To supply with necessaries of life; to entertain; as, to keep boarders. 11. To have in one's service; to have and maintain, as an assistant, a servant, a mistress, a horse, etc. I keep but three men and a boy. Shak. 12. To have habitually in stock for sale. 13. To continue in, as a course or mode of action; not to intermit or fall from; to hold to; to maintain; as, to keep silence; to keep one's word; to keep possession. Both day and night did we keep company. Shak. Within this portal as I kept my watch. Smollett. 14. To observe; to adhere to; to fulfill; not to swerve from or violate; to practice or perform, as duty; not to neglect; to be faithful to. I have kept the faith. 2 Tim. iv. 7. Him whom to love is to obey, and keep His great command. Milton. 15. To confine one's self to; not to quit; to remain in; as, to keep one's house, room, bed, etc. ; hence, to haunt; to frequent. Shak. 'Tis hallowed ground; Fairies, and fawns, and satyrs do it keep. J. Fletcher. 16. To observe duty, as a festival, etc. ; to celebrate; to solemnize; as, to keep a feast. I went with them to the house of God . . . with a multitude that kept holyday. Ps. xlii. 4. To keep at arm's length. See under Arm, n. -- To keep back. (a) To reserve; to withhold. "I will keep nothing back from you." Jer. xlii. 4. (b) To restrain; to hold back. "Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins." Ps. xix. 13. -- To keep company with. (a) To frequent the society of; to associate with; as, let youth keep company with the wise and good. (b) To accompany; to go with; as, to keep company with one on a voyage; also, to pay court to, or accept attentions from, with a view to marriage. [Colloq.] -- To keep counsel. See under Counsel, n. -- To keep down. (a) To hold in subjection; to restrain; to hinder. (b) (Fine Arts) To subdue in tint or tone, as a portion of a picture, so that the spectator's attention may not be diverted from the more important parts of the work. -- To keep good (or bad) hours, to be customarily early (or late) in returning home or in retiring to rest. -- To keep house. (a) To occupy a separate house or establishment, as with one's family, as distinguished from boarding; to manage domestic affairs. (b) (Eng. Bankrupt Law) To seclude one's self in one's house in order to evade the demands of creditors. -- To keep one's hand in, to keep in practice. -- To keep open house, to be hospitable. -- To keep the peace (Law), to avoid or to prevent a breach of the peace. -- To keep school, to govern, manage and instruct or teach a school, as a preceptor. -- To keep a stiff upper lip, to keep up one's courage. [Slang] -- To keep term. (a) (Eng. Universities) To reside during a term. (b) (Inns of Court) To eat a sufficient number of dinners in hall to make the term count for the purpose of being called to the bar. [Eng.] Mozley & W. -- To keep touch. See under Touch, n. -- To keep under, to hold in subjection; hence, to oppress. -- To keep up. (a) To maintain; to prevent from falling or diminution; as, to keep up the price of goods; to keep up one's credit. (b) To maintain; to continue; to prevent from ceasing. "In joy, that which keeps up the action is the desire to continue it." Locke. Syn. -- To retain; detain; reserve; preserve; hold; restrain; maintain; sustain; support; withhold. -- To Keep. Retain, Preserve. Keep is the generic term, and is often used where retain or preserve would too much restrict the meaning; as, to keep silence, etc. Retain denotes that we keep or hold things, as against influences which might deprive us of them, or reasons which might lead us to give them up; as, to retain vivacity in old age; to retain counsel in a lawsuit; to retain one's servant after a reverse of fortune. Preserve denotes that we keep a thing against agencies which might lead to its being destroyed or broken in upon; as, to preserve one's health; to preserve appearances.  1. To remain in any position or state; to continue; to abide; to stay; as, to keep at a distance; to keep aloft; to keep near; to keep in the house; to keep before or behind; to keep in favor; to keep out of company, or out reach. 2. To last; to endure; to remain unimpaired. If the malt be not thoroughly dried, the ale it makes will not keep. Mortimer. 3. To reside for a time; to lodge; to dwell. [Now disused except locally or colloquially.] Knock at his study, where, they say, he keeps. Shak. 4. To take care; to be solicitous; to watch. [Obs.] Keep that the lusts choke not the word of God that is in us. Tyndale. 5. To be in session; as, school keeps to-day. [Colloq.] To keep from, to abstain or refrain from. -- To keep in with, to keep on good terms with; as, to keep in with an opponent. -- To keep on, to go forward; to proceed; to continue to advance. -- To keep to, to adhere strictly to; not to neglect or deviate from; as, to keep to old customs; to keep to a rule; to keep to one's word or promise. -- To keep up, to remain unsubdued; also, not to be confined to one's bed.  1. The act or office of keeping; custody; guard; care; heed; charge. Chaucer. Pan, thou god of shepherds all, Which of our tender lambkins takest keep. Spenser. 2. The state of being kept; hence, the resulting condition; case; as, to be in good keep. 3. The means or provisions by which one is kept; maintenance; support; as, the keep of a horse. Grass equal to the keep of seven cows. Carlyle. I performed some services to the college in return for my keep. T. Hughes. 4. That which keeps or protects; a stronghold; a fortress; a castle; specifically, the strongest and securest part of a castle, often used as a place of residence by the lord of the castle, especially during a siege; the donjon. See Illust. of Castle. The prison strong, Within whose keep the captive knights were laid. Dryden. The lower chambers of those gloomy keeps. Hallam. I think . . . the keep, or principal part of a castle, was so called because the lord and his domestic circle kept, abode, or lived there. M. A. Lower. 5. That which is kept in charge; a charge. [Obs.] Often he used of his keep A sacrifice to bring. Spenser. 6. (Mach.)  A cap for retaining anything, as a journal box, in place. To take keep, to take care; to heed. [Obs.] Chaucer.
east: 1. The point in the heavens where the sun is seen to rise at the equinox, or the corresponding point on the earth; that one of the four cardinal points of the compass which is in a direction at right angles to that of north and south, and which is toward the right hand of one who faces the north; the point directly opposite to the west. The east began kindle. E. Everett. 2. The eastern parts of the earth; the regions or countries which lie east of Europe; the orient. In this indefinite sense, the word is applied to Asia Minor, Syria, Chaldea, Persia, India, China, etc.; as, the riches of the East; the diamonds and pearls of the East; the kings of the East. The gorgeous East, with richest hand, Showers on her kings barbaric pearl and gold. Milton. 3. (U. S. Hist. and Geog.)  Formerly, the part of the United States east of the Alleghany Mountains, esp. the Eastern, or New England, States; now, commonly, the whole region east of the Mississippi River, esp. that which is north of Maryland and the Ohio River; -- usually with the definite article; as, the commerce of the East is not independent of the agriculture of the West. East by north, East by south, according to the notation of the mariner's compass, that point which lies 11 -- East-northeast, East-southeast, that which lie 22Illust. of Compass.  Toward the rising sun; or toward the point where the sun rises when in the equinoctial; as, the east gate; the east border; the east side; the east wind is a wind that blows from the east.  Eastward.  To move toward the east; to veer from the north or south toward the east; to orientate.
bring: 1. To convey to the place where the speaker is or is to be; to bear from a more distant to a nearer place; to fetch. And as she was going to fetch it, he called to her, and said, Bring me, I pray thee, a morsel of bread. 1 Kings xvii. 11. To France shall we convey you safe, And bring you back. Shak. 2. To cause the accession or obtaining of; to procure; to make to come; to produce; to draw to. There is nothing will bring you more honor . . . than to do what right in justice you may. Bacon. 3. To convey; to move; to carry or conduct. In distillation, the water . . . brings over with it some part of the oil of vitriol. Sir I. Newton. 4. To persuade; to induce; to draw; to lead; to guide. It seems so preposterous a thing . . . that they do not easily bring themselves to it. Locke. The nature of the things . . . would not suffer him to think otherwise, how, or whensoever, he is brought to reflect on them. Locke. 5. To produce in exchange; to sell for; to fetch; as, what does coal bring per ton To bring about, to bring to pass; to effect; to accomplish. -- To bring back. (a) To recall. (b) To restore, as something borrowed, to its owner. -- To bring by the lee (Naut.), to incline so rapidly to leeward of the course, when a ship sails large, as to bring the lee side suddenly to the windward, any by laying the sails aback, expose her to danger of upsetting. -- To bring down. (a) To cause to come down. (b) To humble or abase; as, to bring down high looks. -- To bring down the house, to cause tremendous applause. [Colloq.] -- To bring forth. (a) To produce, as young fruit. (b) To bring to light; to make manifest. -- To bring forward (a) To exhibit; to introduce; to produce to view. (b) To hasten; to promote; to forward. (c) To propose; to adduce; as, to bring forward arguments. -- To bring home. (a) To bring to one's house. (b) To prove conclusively; as, to bring home a charge of treason. (c) To cause one to feel or appreciate by personal experience. (d) (Naut.) To lift of its place, as an anchor. -- To bring in. (a) To fetch from without; to import. (b) To introduce, as a bill in a deliberative assembly. (c) To return or repot to, or lay before, a court or other body; to render; as, to bring in a verdict or a report. (d) To take to an appointed place of deposit or collection; as, to bring in provisions or money for a specified object. (e) To produce, as income. (f) To induce to join. -- To bring off, to bear or convey away; to clear from condemnation; to cause to escape. -- To bring on. (a) To cause to begin. (b) To originate or cause to exist; as, to bring on a disease. -- To bring one on one's way, to accompany, guide, or attend one. -- To bring out, to expose; to detect; to bring to light from concealment. -- To bring over. (a) To fetch or bear across. (b) To convert by persuasion or other means; to cause to change sides or an opinion. -- To bring to. (a) To resuscitate; to bring back to consciousness or life, as a fainting person. (b) (Naut.) To check the course of, as of a ship, by dropping the anchor, or by counterbracing the sails so as to keep her nearly stationary (she is then said to lie to). (c) To cause (a vessel) to lie to, as by firing across her course. (d) To apply a rope to the capstan. -- To bring to light, to disclose; to discover; to make clear; to reveal. -- To bring a sail to (Naut.), to bend it to the yard. -- To bring to pass, to accomplish to effect. "Trust also in Him; and He shall bring it to pass." Ps. xxxvii. 5. -- To bring under, to subdue; to restrain; to reduce to obedience. -- To bring up. (a) To carry upward; to nurse; to rear; to educate. (b) To cause to stop suddenly. (c) Note: [v. i. by dropping the reflexive pronoun] To stop suddenly; to come to a standstill. [Colloq.] -- To bring up (any one) with a round turn, to cause (any one) to stop abruptly. [Colloq.] -- To be brought to bed. See under Bed. Syn. -- To fetch; bear; carry; convey; transport; import; procure; produce; cause; adduce; induce.
top: 1. A child's toy, commonly in the form of a conoid or pear, made to spin on its point, usually by drawing off a string wound round its surface or stem, the motion being sometimes continued by means of a whip. 2. (Rope Making)  A plug, or conical block of wood, with longitudital grooves on its surface, in which the strands of the rope slide in the process of twisting.  1. The highest part of anything; the upper end, edge, or extremity; the upper side or surface; summit; apex; vertex; cover; lid; as, the top of a spire; the top of a house; the top of a mountain; the top of the ground. The star that bids the shepherd fold, Now the top of heaven doth hold. Milton. 2. The utmost degree; the acme; the summit. The top of my ambition is to contribute to that work. Pope. 3. The highest rank; the most honorable position; the utmost attainable place; as, to be at the top of one's class, or at the top of the school. And wears upon hisbaby brow the round And top of sovereignty. Shak. 4. The chief person; the most prominent one. Other . . . aspired to be the top of zealots. Milton. 5. The crown of the head, or the hair upon it; the head. "From top to toe" Spenser. All the stored vengeance of Heaven fall On her ungrateful top ! Shak. 6. The head, or upper part, of a plant. The buds . . . are called heads, or tops, as cabbageheads. I. Watts. 7. (Naut.)  A platform surrounding the head of the lower mast and projecting on all sudes. It serves to spead the topmast rigging, thus strengheningthe mast, and also furnishes a convenient standing place for the men aloft. Totten. 8. (Wool Manuf.)  A bundle or ball of slivers of comkbed wool, from which the noils, or dust, have been taken out. 9. Eve; verge; point. [R.] "He was upon the top of his marriage with Magdaleine." Knolles. 10. The part of a cut gem between the girdle, or circumference, and the table, or flat upper surface. Knight. 11. pl.  Top-boots. [Slang] Dickens. Note: Top is often used adjectively or as the first part of compound words, usually self-explaining; as, top stone, or topstone; top- boots, or top boots; top soil, or top-soil. Top and but (Shipbuilding), a phrase used to denote a method of working long tapering planks by bringing the but of one plank to the top of the other to make up a constant breadth in two layers. -- Top minnow (Zoöl.), a small viviparous fresh-water fish (Gambusia patruelis) abundant in the Southern United States. Also applied to other similar species.  1. To rise aloft; to be eminent; to tower; as, lofty ridges and topping mountains. Derham. 2. To predominate; as, topping passions. "Influenced by topping uneasiness." Locke. 3. To excel; to rise above others. But write thy, and top. Dryden.  1. To cover on the top; to tip; to cap; -- chiefly used in the past participle. Like moving mountains topped with snow. Waller. A mount Of alabaster, topped with golden spires. Milton. 2. To rise above; to excel; to outgo; to surpass. Topping all others in boasting. Shak. Edmund the base shall top the legitimate. Shak. 3. To rise to the top of; to go over the top of. But wind about till thou hast topped the hill. Denham. 4. To take off the or upper part of; to crop. Top your rose trees a little with your knife. Evelyn. 5. To perform eminently, or better than before. From endeavoring universally to top their parts, they will go universally beyond them. Jeffrey. 6. (Naut.)  To raise one end of, as a yard, so that that end becomes higher than the other. To top off, to complete by putting on, or finishing, the top or uppermost part of; as, to top off a stack of hay; hence, to complete; to finish; to adorn.
if: 1. In case that; granting, allowing, or supposing that; -- introducing a condition or supposition. Tisiphone, that oft hast heard my prayer, Assist, if OEdipus deserve thy care. Pope. If thou be the Son of God, command that these stones be made bread. Matt. iv. 3. 2. Whether; -- in dependent questions. Uncertain if by augury or chance. Dryden. She doubts if two and two make four. Prior. As if, But if. See under As, But. I' FAITH I' faith"  . In faith; indeed; truly. Shak.
fall: 1. To Descend, either suddenly or gradually; particularly, to descend by the force of gravity; to drop; to sink; as, the apple falls; the tide falls; the mercury falls in the barometer. I beheld Satan as lightning fall from heaven. Luke x. 18. 2. To cease to be erect; to take suddenly a recumbent posture; to become prostrate; to drop; as, a child totters and falls; a tree falls; a worshiper falls on his knees. I fell at his feet to worship him. Rev. xix. 10. 3. To find a final outlet; to discharge its waters; to empty; -- with into; as, the river Rhone falls into the Mediterranean. 4. To become prostrate and dead; to die; especially, to die by violence, as in battle. A thousand shall fall at thy side. Ps. xci. 7. He rushed into the field, and, foremost fighting, fell. Byron. 5. To cease to be active or strong; to die away; to lose strength; to subside; to become less intense; as, the wind falls. 6. To issue forth into life; to be brought forth; -- said of the young of certain animals. Shak. 7. To decline in power, glory, wealth, or importance; to become insignificant; to lose rank or position; to decline in weight, value, price etc.; to become less; as, the falls; stocks fell two points. I am a poor falle man, unworthy now To be thy lord and master. Shak. The greatness of these Irish lords suddenly fell and vanished. Sir J. Davies. 8. To be overthrown or captured; to be destroyed. Heaven and earth will witness, If Rome must fall, that we are innocent. Addison. 9. To descend in character or reputation; to become degraded; to sink into vice, error, or sin; to depart from the faith; to apostatize; to sin. Let us labor therefore to enter into that rest, lest any man fall after the same example of unbelief. Heb. iv. 11. 10. To become insnared or embarrassed; to be entrapped; to be worse off than before; asm to fall into error; to fall into difficulties. 11. To assume a look of shame or disappointment; to become or appear dejected; -- said of the countenance. Cain was very wroth, and his countenance fell. Gen. iv. 5. I have observed of late thy looks are fallen. Addison. 12. To sink; to languish; to become feeble or faint; as, our spirits rise and fall with our fortunes. 13. To pass somewha suddenly, and passively, into a new state of body or mind; to become; as, to fall asleep; to fall into a passion; to fall in love; to fall into temptation. 14. To happen; to to come to pass; to light; to befall; to issue; to terminate. The Romans fell on this model by chance. Swift. Sit still, my daughter, until thou know how the matter will fall. Ruth. iii. 18. They do not make laws, they fall into customs. H. Spencer. 15. To come; to occur; to arrive. The vernal equinox, which at the Nicene Council fell on the 21st of March, falls now [1694] about ten days sooner. Holder. 16. To begin with haste, ardor, or vehemence; to rush or hurry; as, they fell to blows. They now no longer doubted, but fell to work heart and soul. Jowett (Thucyd. ). 17. To pass or be transferred by chance, lot, distribution, inheritance, or otherwise; as, the estate fell to his brother; the kingdom fell into the hands of his rivals. 18. To belong or appertain. If to her share some female errors fall, Look on her face, and you'll forget them all. Pope. 19. To be dropped or uttered carelessly; as, an unguarded expression fell from his lips; not a murmur fell from him. To fall abroad of (Naut.), to strike against; -- applied to one vessel coming into collision with another. -- To fall among, to come among accidentally or unexpectedly. -- To fall astern (Naut.), to move or be driven backward; to be left behind; as, a ship falls astern by the force of a current, or when outsailed by another. -- To fall away. (a) To lose flesh; to become lean or emaciated; to pine. (b) To renounce or desert allegiance; to revolt or rebel. (c) To renounce or desert the faith; to apostatize. "These . . . for a while believe, and in time of temptation fall away." Luke viii. 13. (d) To perish; to vanish; to be lost. "How . . . can the soul . . . fall away into nothing" Addison. (e) To decline gradually; to fade; to languish, or become faint. "One color falls away by just degrees, and another rises insensibly." Addison. -- To fall back. (a) To recede or retreat; to give way. (b) To fail of performing a promise or purpose; not to fulfill. -- To fall back upon. (a) (Mil.) To retreat for safety to (a stronger position in the rear, as to a fort or a supporting body of troops). (b) To have recourse to (a reserved fund, or some available expedient or support). -- To fall calm, to cease to blow; to become calm. -- To fall down. (a) To prostrate one's self in worship. "All kings shall fall down before him." Ps. lxxii. 11. (b) To sink; to come to the ground. "Down fell the beauteous youth." Dryden. (c) To bend or bow, as a suppliant. (d) (Naut.) To sail or drift toward the mouth of a river or other outlet. -- To fall flat, to produce no response or result; to fail of the intended effect; as, his speech fell flat. -- To fall foul of. (a) (Naut.) To have a collision with; to become entangled with (b) To attack; to make an assault upon. -- To fall from, to recede or depart from; not to adhere to; as, to fall from an agreement or engagement; to fall from allegiance or duty. -- To fall from grace (M. E. Ch.), to sin; to withdraw from the faith. -- To fall home (Ship Carp.), to curve inward; -- said of the timbers or upper parts of a ship's side which are much within a perpendicular. -- To fall in. (a) To sink inwards; as, the roof fell in. (b) (Mil.) To take one's proper or assigned place in line; as, to fall in on the right. (c) To come to an end; to terminate; to lapse; as, on the death of Mr. B., the annuuity, which he had so long received, fell in. (d) To become operative. "The reversion, to which he had been nominated twenty years before, fell in." Macaulay. -- To fall into one's hands, to pass, often suddenly or unexpectedly, into one's ownership or control; as, to spike cannon when they are likely to fall into the hands of the enemy. -- To fall in with. (a) To meet with accidentally; as, to fall in with a friend. (b) (Naut.) To meet, as a ship; also, to discover or come near, as land. (c) To concur with; to agree with; as, the measure falls in with popular opinion. (d) To comply; to yield to. "You will find it difficult to persuade learned men to fall in with your projects." Addison. -- To fall off. (a) To drop; as, fruits fall off when ripe. (b) To withdraw; to separate; to become detached; as, friends fall off in adversity. "Love cools, friendship falls off, brothers divide." Shak. (c) To perish; to die away; as, words fall off by disuse. (d) To apostatize; to forsake; to withdraw from the faith, or from allegiance or duty. Those captive tribes . . . fell off From God to worship calves. Milton. (e) To forsake; to abandon; as, his customers fell off. (f) To depreciate; to change for the worse; to deteriorate; to become less valuable, abundant, or interesting; as, a falling off in the wheat crop; the magazine or the review falls off. "O Hamlet, what a falling off was there!" Shak. (g) (Naut.) To deviate or trend to the leeward of the point to which the head of the ship was before directed; to fall to leeward. -- To fall on. (a) To meet with; to light upon; as, we have fallen on evil days. (b) To begin suddenly and eagerly. "Fall on, and try the appetite to eat." Dryden. (c) To begin an attack; to assault; to assail. "Fall on, fall on, and hear him not." Dryden. (d) To drop on; to descend on. -- To fall out. (a) To quarrel; to begin to contend. A soul exasperated in ills falls out With everything, its friend, itself. Addison. (b) To happen; to befall; to chance. "There fell out a bloody quarrel betwixt the frogs and the mice." L'Estrange. (c) (Mil.) To leave the ranks, as a soldier. -- To fall over. (a) To revolt; to desert from one side to another. (b) To fall beyond. Shak. -- To fall short, to be deficient; as, the corn falls short; they all fall short in duty. -- To fall through, to come to nothing; to fail; as, the engageent has fallen through. -- To fall to, to begin. "Fall to, with eager joy, on homely food." Dryden. -- To fall under. (a) To come under, or within the limits of; to be subjected to; as, they fell under the jurisdiction of the emperor. (b) To come under; to become the subject of; as, this point did not fall under the cognizance or deliberations of the court; these things do not fall under human sight or observation. (c) To come within; to be ranged or reckoned with; to be subordinate to in the way of classification; as, these substances fall under a different class or order. -- To fall upon. (a) To attack. [See To fall on.] (b) To attempt; to have recourse to. "I do not intend to fall upon nice disquisitions." Holder. (c) To rush against. Note: Fall primarily denotes descending motion, either in a perpendicular or inclined direction, and, in most of its applications, implies, literally or figuratively, velocity, haste, suddenness, or violence. Its use is so various, and so mush diversified by modifying words, that it is not easy to enumerate its senses in all its applications.  1. To let fall; to drop. [Obs.] For every tear he falls, a Trojan bleeds. Shak. 2. To sink; to depress; as, to fall the voice. [Obs.] 3. To diminish; to lessen or lower. [Obs.] Upon lessening interest to four per cent, you fall the price of your native commodities. Locke. 4. To bring forth; as, to fall lambs. [R.] Shak. 5. To fell; to cut down; as, to fall a tree. [Prov. Eng. & Local, U.S.]  1. The act of falling; a dropping or descending be the force of gravity; descent; as, a fall from a horse, or from the yard of ship. 2. The act of dropping or tumbling from an erect posture; as, he was walking on ice, and had a fall. 3. Death; destruction; overthrow; ruin. They thy fall conspire. Denham. Pride goeth before destruction, and a haughty spirit before a fall. Prov. xvi. 18. 4. Downfall; degradation; loss of greatness or office; termination of greatness, power, or dominion; ruin; overthrow; as, the fall of the Roman empire. Beholds thee glorious only in thy fall. Pope. 5. The surrender of a besieged fortress or town ; as, the fall of Sebastopol. 6. Diminution or decrease in price or value; depreciation; as, the fall of prices; the fall of rents. 7. A sinking of tone; cadence; as, the fall of the voice at the close of a sentence. 8. Declivity; the descent of land or a hill; a slope. 9. Descent of water; a cascade; a cataract; a rush of water down a precipice or steep; -- usually in the plural, sometimes in the singular; as, the falls of Niagara. 10. The discharge of a river or current of water into the ocean, or into a lake or pond; as, the fall of the Po into the Gulf of Venice. Addison. 11. Extent of descent; the distance which anything falls; as, the water of a stream has a fall of five feet. 12. The season when leaves fall from trees; autumn. What crowds of patients the town doctor kills, Or how, last fall, he raised the weekly bills. Dryden. 13. That which falls; a falling; as, a fall of rain; a heavy fall of snow. 14. The act of felling or cutting down. "The fall of timber." Johnson. 15. Lapse or declinsion from innocence or goodness. Specifically: The first apostasy; the act of our first parents in eating the forbidden fruit; also, the apostasy of the rebellious angels. 16. Formerly, a kind of ruff or band for the neck; a falling band; a faule. B. Jonson. 17. That part (as one of the ropes) of a tackle to which the power is applied in hoisting. Fall herring (Zoöl.), a herring of the Atlantic (Clupea mediocris); -- also called tailor herring, and hickory shad. -- To try a fall, to try a bout at wrestling. Shak.
connect: 1. To join, or fasten together, as by something intervening; to associate; to combine; to unite or link together; to establish a bond or relation between. He fills, he bounds, connect and equals all. Pope. A man must the connection of each intermediate idea with those that it connects before he can use it in a syllogism. Locke. 2. To associate (a person or thing, or one's self) with another person, thing, business, or affair. Connecting rod (Mach.), a rod or bar joined to, and connecting, two or more moving parts; esp. a rod connecting a crank wrist with a beam, crosshead, piston rod, or piston, as in a steam engine.  To join, unite, or cohere; to have a close relation; as, one line of railroad connects with another; one argument connect with another.
enter: 1. To come or go into; to pass into the interior of; to pass within the outer cover or shell of; to penetrate; to pierce; as, to enter a house, a closet, a country, a door, etc.; the river enters the sea. That darksome cave they enter. Spenser. I, . . . with the multitude of my redeemed, Shall enter heaven, long absent. Milton. 2. To unite in; to join; to be admitted to; to become a member of; as, to enter an association, a college, an army. 3. To engage in; to become occupied with; as, to enter the legal profession, the book trade, etc. 4. To pass within the limits of; to attain; to begin; to commence upon; as, to enter one's teens, a new era, a new dispensation. 5. To cause to go (into), or to be received (into); to put in; to insert; to cause to be admitted; as, to enter a knife into a piece of wood, a wedge into a log; to enter a boy at college, a horse for a race, etc. 6. To inscribe; to enroll; to record; as, to enter a name, or a date, in a book, or a book in a catalogue; to enter the particulars of a sale in an account, a manifest of a ship or of merchandise at the customhouse. 7. (Law) (a) To go into or upon, as lands, and take actual possession of them. (b) To place in regular form before the court, usually in writing; to put upon record in proper from and order; as, to enter a writ, appearance, rule, or judgment. Burrill. 8. To make report of (a vessel or her cargo) at the customhouse; to submit a statement of (imported goods), with the original invoices, to the proper officer of the customs for estimating the duties. See Entry, 4. 9. To file or inscribe upon the records of the land office the required particulars concerning (a quantity of public land) in order to entitle a person to a right pf preëmption. [U.S.] Abbott. 10. To deposit for copyright the title or description of (a book, picture, map, etc.); as, "entered according to act of Congress." 11. To initiate; to introduce favorably. [Obs.] Shak.  1. To go or come in; -- often with in used pleonastically; also, to begin; to take the first steps. "The year entering." Evelyn. No evil thing approach nor enter in. Milton. Truth is fallen in the street, and equity can not enter. Is. lix. 14. For we which have believed do enter into rest. Heb. iv. 3. 2. To get admission; to introduce one's self; to penetrate; to form or constitute a part; to become a partaker or participant; to share; to engage; -- usually with into; sometimes with on or upon; as, a ball enters into the body; water enters into a ship; he enters into the plan; to enter into a quarrel; a merchant enters into partnership with some one; to enter upon another's land; the boy enters on his tenth year; to enter upon a task; lead enters into the composition of pewter. 3. To penetrate mentally; to consider attentively; -- with into. He is particularly pleased with . . . Sallust for his entering into internal principles of action. Addison.
minute: 1. The sixtieth part of an hour; sixty seconds. (Abbrev. m.; as, 4 h. 30 m.) Four minutes, that is to say, minutes of an hour. Chaucer. 2. The sixtieth part of a degree; sixty seconds (Marked thus (`); as, 10º 20`.) 3. A nautical or a geographic mile. 4. A coin; a half farthing. [Obs.] Wyclif (Mark xii. 42) 5. A very small part of anything, or anything very small; a jot; a tittle. [Obs.] Minutes and circumstances of his passion. Jer. Taylor. 6. A point of time; a moment. I go this minute to attend the king. Dryden. 7. The memorandum; a record; a note to preserve the memory of anything; as, to take minutes of a contract; to take minutes of a conversation or debate. 8. (Arch.)  A fixed part of a module. See Module. Note: Different writers take as the minute one twelfth, one eighteenth, one thirtieth, or one sixtieth part of the module.  Of or pertaining to a minute or minutes; occurring at or marking successive minutes. Minute bell, a bell tolled at intervals of a minute, as to give notice of a death or a funeral. -- Minute book, a book in which written minutes are entered. -- Minute glass, a glass measuring a minute or minutes by the running of sand. -- Minute gun, a discharge of a cannon repeated every minute as a sign of distress or mourning. -- Minute hand, the long hand of a watch or clock, which makes the circuit of the dial in an hour, and marks the minutes.  To set down a short sketch or note of; to jot down; to make a minute or a brief summary of. The Empress of Russia, with her own hand, minuted an edict for universal tolerance. Bancroft.  1. Very small; little; tiny; fine; slight; slender; inconsiderable. "Minute drops." Milton. 2. Attentive to small things; paying attention to details; critical; particular; precise; as, a minute observer; minute observation. Syn. -- Little; diminutive; fine; critical; exact; circumstantial; particular; detailed. -- Minute, Circumstantial, Particular. A circumstantial account embraces all the leading events; a particular account includes each event and movement, though of but little importance; a minute account goes further still, and omits nothing as to person, time, place, adjuncts, etc.
give: 1. To bestow without receiving a return; to confer without compensation; to impart, as a possession; to grant, as authority or permission; to yield up or allow. For generous lords had rather give than pay. Young. 2. To yield possesion of; to deliver over, as property, in exchange for something; to pay; as, we give the value of what we buy. What shall a man give in exchange for his soul Matt. xvi. 26. 3. To yield; to furnish; to produce; to emit; as, flint and steel give sparks. 4. To communicate or announce, as advice, tidings, etc.; to pronounce; to render or utter, as an opinion, a judgment, a sentence, a shout, etc. 5. To grant power or license to; to permit; to allow; to license; to commission. It is given me once again to behold my friend. Rowe. Then give thy friend to shed the sacred wine. Pope. 6. To exhibit as a product or result; to produce; to show; as, the number of men, divided by the number of ships, gives four hundred to each ship. 7. To devote; to apply; used reflexively, to devote or apply one's self; as, the soldiers give themselves to plunder; also in this sense used very frequently in the past participle; as, the people are given to luxury and pleasure; the youth is given to study. 8. (Logic & Math.)  To set forth as a known quantity or a known relation, or as a premise from which to reason; -- used principally in the passive form given. 9. To allow or admit by way of supposition. I give not heaven for lost. Mlton. 10. To attribute; to assign; to adjudge. I don't wonder at people's giving him to me as a lover. Sheridan. 11. To excite or cause to exist, as a sensation; as, to give offense; to give pleasure or pain. 12. To pledge; as, to give one's word. 13. To cause; to make; -- with the infinitive; as, to give one to understand, to know, etc. But there the duke was given to understand That in a gondola were seen together Lorenzo and his amorous Jessica. Shak. To give away, to make over to another; to transfer. Whatsoever we employ in charitable uses during our lives, is given away from ourselves. Atterbury. -- To give back, to return; to restore. Atterbury. -- To give the bag, to cheat. [Obs.] I fear our ears have given us the bag. J. Webster. -- To give birth to. (a) To bear or bring forth, as a child. (b) To originate; to give existence to, as an enterprise, idea. -- To give chase, to pursue. -- To give ear to. See under Ear. -- To give forth, to give out; to publish; to tell. Hayward. -- To give ground. See under Ground, n. -- To give the hand, to pledge friendship or faith. -- To give the hand of, to espouse; to bestow in marriage. -- To give the head. See under Head, n. -- To give in. (a) To abate; to deduct. (b) To declare; to make known; to announce; to tender; as, to give in one's adhesion to a party. -- To give the lie to (a person), to tell (him) that he lies. -- To give line. See under Line. -- To give off, to emit, as steam, vapor, odor, etc. -- To give one's self away, to make an inconsiderate surrender of one's cause, an unintentional disclosure of one's purposes, or the like. [Colloq.] -- To give out. (a) To utter publicly; to report; to announce or declare. One that gives out himself Prince Florizel. Shak. Give out you are of Epidamnum. Shak. (b) To send out; to emit; to distribute; as, a substance gives out steam or odors. -- To give over. (a) To yield completely; to quit; to abandon. (b) To despair of. (c) To addict, resign, or apply (one's self). The Babylonians had given themselves over to all manner of vice. Grew. -- To give place, to withdraw; to yield one's claim. -- To give points. (a) In games of skill, to equalize chances by conceding a certain advantage; to allow a handicap. (b) To give useful suggestions. [Colloq.] -- To give rein. See under Rein, n. -- To give the sack . Same as To give the bag. -- To give and take. (a) To average gains and losses. (b) To exchange freely, as blows, sarcasms, etc. -- To give time (Law), to accord extension or forbearance to a debtor. Abbott. -- To give the time of day, to salute one with the compliment appropriate to the hour, as "good morning." "good evening", etc. -- To give tongue, in hunter's phrase, to bark; -- said of dogs. -- To give up. (a) To abandon; to surrender. "Don't give up the ship." He has . . . given up For certain drops of salt, your city Rome. Shak. (b) To make public; to reveal. I'll not state them By giving up their characters. Beau. & Fl. (c) (Used also reflexively.) -- To give up the ghost. See under Ghost. -- To give one's self up, to abandon hope; to despair; to surrender one's self. -- To give way. (a) To withdraw; to give place. (b) To yield to force or pressure; as, the scaffolding gave way. (c) (Naut.) To begin to row; or to row with increased energy. (d) (Stock Exchange). To depreciate or decline in value; as, railroad securities gave way two per cent. -- To give way together, to row in time; to keep stroke. Syn. -- To Give, Confer, Grant. To give is the generic word, embracing all the rest. To confer was originally used of persons in power, who gave permanent grants or privileges; as, to confer the order of knighthood; and hence it still denotes the giving of something which might have been withheld; as, to confer a favor. To grant is to give in answer to a petition or request, or to one who is in some way dependent or inferior.  1. To give a gift or gifts. 2. To yield to force or pressure; to relax; to become less rigid; as, the earth gives under the feet. 3. To become soft or moist. [Obs.] Bacon . 4. To move; to recede. Now back he gives, then rushes on amain. Daniel. 5. To shed tears; to weep. [Obs.] Whose eyes do never give But through lust and laughter. Shak. 6. To have a misgiving. [Obs.] My mind gives ye're reserved To rob poor market women. J. Webster. 7. To open; to lead. [A Gallicism] This, yielding, gave into a grassy walk. Tennyson. To give back, to recede; to retire; to retreat. They gave back and came no farther. Bunyan. -- To give in, to yield; to succumb; to acknowledge one's self beaten; to cease opposition. The Scots battalion was enforced to give in. Hayward. This consideration may induce a translator to give in to those general phrases. Pope. -- To give off, to cease; to forbear. [Obs.] Locke. -- To give on or upon. (a) To rush; to fall upon. [Obs.] (b) To have a view of; to be in sight of; to overlook; to look toward; to open upon; to front; to face. [A Gallicism: cf. Fr. donner sur.] Rooms which gave upon a pillared porch. Tennyson. The gloomy staircase on which the grating gave. Dickens. -- To give out. (a) To expend all one's strength. Hence: (b) To cease from exertion; to fail; to be exhausted; as, my feet being to give out; the flour has given out. -- To give over, to cease; to discontinue; to desist. It would be well for all authors, if they knew when to give over, and to desist from any further pursuits after fame. Addison. -- To give up, to cease from effort; to yield; to despair; as, he would never give up.
warm: 1. Having heat in a moderate degree; not cold as, warm milk. "Whose blood is warm within." Shak. Warm and still is the summer night. Longfellow. 2. Having a sensation of heat, esp. of gentle heat; glowing. 3. Subject to heat; having prevalence of heat, or little or no cold weather; as, the warm climate of Egypt. 4. Fig.: Not cool, indifferent, lukewarm, or the like, in spirit or temper; zealous; ardent; fervent; excited; sprightly; irritable; excitable. Mirth, and youth, and warm desire! Milton. Each warm wish springs mutual from the heart. Pope. They say he's warm man and does not care to be madAddison. I had been none of the warmest of partisans. Hawthor 5. Violent; vehement; furious; excited; passionate; as, a warm contest; a warm debate. Welcome, daylight; we shall have warm work on't. Dryden. 6. Being well off as to property, or in good circumstances; forehanded; rich. [Colloq.] Warm householders, every one of them. W. Irving. You shall have a draft upon him, payable at sight: and let me tell you he as warm a man as any within five miles round him. Goldsmith. 7. In children's games, being near the object sought for; hence, being close to the discovery of some person, thing, or fact concealed. [Colloq.] Here, indeed, young Mr. Dowse was getting "warm," Black. 8. (Paint.)  Having yellow or red for a basis, or in their composition; -- said of colors, and opposed to cold which is of blue and its compounds. Syn. -- Ardent; zealous; fervent; glowing; enthusiastic; cordial; keen; violent; furious; hot.  1. To communicate a moderate degree of heat to; to render warm; to supply or furnish heat to; as, a stove warms an apartment. Then shall it [an ash tree] be for a man to burn; for he will take thereof and warm himself. Isa. xliv 15 Enough to warm, but not enough to burn. Longfellow. 2. To make engaged or earnest; to interest; to engage; to excite ardor or zeal; to enliven. I formerly warmed my head with reading controversial writings. Pope. Bright hopes, that erst bosom warmed. Keble.  1. To become warm, or moderately heated; as, the earth soon warms in a clear day summer. There shall not be a coal to warm at. Isa. xlvii. 14. 2. To become ardent or animated; as, the speakewarms as he proceeds.  The act of warming, or the state of being warmed; a warming; a heating. [Colloq.] Dickens.
pair: 1. A number of things resembling one another, or belonging together; a set; as, a pair or flight of stairs. "A pair of beads." Chaucer. Beau. & Fl. "Four pair of stairs." Macaulay. Note: [Now mostly or quite disused, except as to stairs.] Two crowns in my pocket, two pair of cards. Beau. & Fl. 2. Two things of a kind, similar in form, suited to each other, and intended to be used together; as, a pair of gloves or stockings; a pair of shoes. 3. Two of a sort; a span; a yoke; a couple; a brace; as, a pair of horses; a pair of oxen. 4. A married couple; a man and wife. "A happy pair." Dryden. "The hapless pair." Milton. 5. A single thing, composed of two pieces fitted to each other and used together; as, a pair of scissors; a pair of tongs; a pair of bellows. 6. Two members of opposite parties or opinion, as in a parliamentary body, who mutually agree not to vote on a given question, or on issues of a party nature during a specified time; as, there were two pairs on the final vote. [Parliamentary Cant] 7. (Kinematics)  In a mechanism, two elements, or bodies, which are so applied to each other as to mutually constrain relative motion. Note: Pairs are named in accordance with the kind of motion they permit; thus, a journal and its bearing form a turning pair, a cylinder and its piston a sliding pair, a screw and its nut a twisting pair, etc. Any pair in which the constraining contact is along lines or at points only (as a cam and roller acting together), is designated a higher pair; any pair having constraining surfaces which fit each other (as a cylindrical pin and eye, a screw and its nut, etc.), is called a lower pair. Pair royal (pl. Pairs Royal) three things of a sort; -- used especially of playing cards in some games, as cribbage; as three kings, three "eight spots" etc. Four of a kind are called a double pair royal. "Something in his face gave me as much pleasure as a pair royal of naturals in my own hand." Goldsmith. "That great pair royal of adamantine sisters [the Fates]." Quarles. [Written corruptly parial and prial.] Syn. -- Pair, Flight, Set. Originally, pair was not confined to two things, but was applied to any number of equal things (pares), that go together. Ben Jonson speaks of a pair (set) of chessmen; also, he and Lord Bacon speak of a pair (pack) of cards. A "pair of stairs" is still in popular use, as well as the later expression, "flight of stairs."  1. To be joined in paris; to couple; to mate, as for breeding. 2. To suit; to fit, as a counterpart. My heart was made to fit and pair with thine. Rowe. 3. Same as To pair off. See phrase below. To pair off, to separate from a company in pairs or couples; specif. (Parliamentary Cant), to agree with one of the opposite party or opinion to abstain from voting on specified questions or issues. See Pair, n., 6.  1. To unite in couples; to form a pair of; to bring together, as things which belong together, or which complement, or are adapted to one another. Glossy jet is paired with shining white. Pope. 2. To engage (one's self) with another of opposite opinions not to vote on a particular question or class of questions. [Parliamentary Cant] Paired fins. (Zoöl.) See under Fin.  To impair. [Obs.] Spenser.
system: 1. An assemblage of objects arranged in regular subordination, or after some distinct method, usually logical or scientific; a complete whole of objects related by some common law, principle, or end; a complete exhibition of essential principles or facts, arranged in a rational dependence or connection; a regular union of principles or parts forming one entire thing; as, a system of philosophy; a system of government; a system of divinity; a system of botany or chemistry; a military system; the solar system. The best way to learn any science, is to begin with a regular system, or a short and plain scheme of that science well drawn up into a narrow compass. I. Watts. 2. Hence, the whole scheme of created things regarded as forming one complete plan of whole; the universe. "The great system of the world." Boyle. 3. Regular method or order; formal arrangement; plan; as, to have a system in one's business. 4. (Mus.)  The collection of staves which form a full score. See Score, n. 5. (Biol.)  An assemblage of parts or organs, either in animal or plant, essential to the performance of some particular function or functions which as a rule are of greater complexity than those manifested by a single organ; as, the capillary system, the muscular system, the digestive system, etc.; hence, the whole body as a functional unity. 6. (Zoöl.)  One of the stellate or irregular clusters of intimately united zooids which are imbedded in, or scattered over, the surface of the common tissue of many compound ascidians. Block system, Conservative system, etc. See under Block, Conservative, etc.
add: 1. To give by way of increased possession (to any one); to bestow (on). The Lord shall add to me another son. Gen. xxx. 24. 2. To join or unite, as one thing to another, or as several particulars, so as to increase the number, augment the quantity, enlarge the magnitude, or so as to form into one aggregate. Hence: To sum up; to put together mentally; as, to add numbers; to add up a column. Back to thy punishment, False fugitive, and to thy speed add wings. Milton. As easily as he can add together the ideas of two days or two years. Locke. 3. To append, as a statement; to say further. He added that he would willingly consent to the entire abolition of the tax. Macaulay. Syn. -- To Add, Join, Annex, Unite, Coalesce. We add by bringing things together so as to form a whole. We join by putting one thing to another in close or continuos connection. We annex by attaching some adjunct to a larger body. We unite by bringing things together so that their parts adhere or intermingle. Things coalesce by coming together or mingling so as to form one organization. To add quantities; to join houses; to annex territory; to unite kingdoms; to make parties coalesce.  1. To make an addition. To add to, to augment; to increase; as, it adds to our anxiety. "I will add to your yoke." 1 Kings xii. 14. 2. To perform the arithmetical operation of addition; as, he adds rapidly.
flat: 1. Having an even and horizontal surface, or nearly so, without prominences or depressions; level without inclination; plane. Though sun and moon Were in the flat sea sunk. Milton. 2. Lying at full length, or spread out, upon the ground; level with the ground or earth; prostrate; as, to lie flat on the ground; hence, fallen; laid low; ruined; destroyed. What ruins kingdoms, and lays cities flat! Milton. I feel . . . my hopes all flat. Milton. 3. (Fine Arts)  Wanting relief; destitute of variety; without points of prominence and striking interest. A large part of the work is, to me, very flat. Coleridge. 4. Tasteless; stale; vapid; insipid; dead; as, fruit or drink flat to the taste. 5. Unanimated; dull; uninteresting; without point or spirit; monotonous; as, a flat speech or composition. How weary, stale, flat, and unprofitable Seem to me all the uses of this world. Shak. 6. Lacking liveliness of commercial exchange and dealings; depressed; dull; as, the market is flat. 7. Clear; unmistakable; peremptory; absolute; positive; downright. Flat burglary as ever was committed. Shak. A great tobacco taker too, -- that's flat. Marston. 8. (Mus.) (a) Below the true pitch; hence, as applied to intervals, minor, or lower by a half step; as, a flat seventh; A flat. (b) Not sharp or shrill; not acute; as, a flat sound. 9. (Phonetics)  Sonant; vocal; -- applied to any one of the sonant or vocal consonants, as distinguished from a nonsonant (or sharp) consonant. Flat arch. (Arch.) See under Arch, n., 2. (b). -- Flat cap, cap paper, not folded. See under Paper. -- Flat chasing, in fine art metal working, a mode of ornamenting silverware, etc., producing figures by dots and lines made with a punching tool. Knight. -- Flat chisel, a sculptor's chisel for smoothing. -- Flat file, a file wider than its thickness, and of rectangular section. See File. -- Flat nail, a small, sharp-pointed, wrought nail, with a flat, thin head, larger than a tack. Knight. -- Flat paper, paper which has not been folded. -- Flat rail, a railroad rail consisting of a simple flat bar spiked to a longitudinal sleeper. -- Flat rods (Mining), horizontal or inclined connecting rods, for transmitting motion to pump rods at a distance. Raymond. -- Flat rope, a rope made by plaiting instead of twisting; gasket; sennit. Note: Some flat hoisting ropes, as for mining shafts, are made by sewing together a number of ropes, making a wide, flat band. Knight. -- Flat space. (Geom.) See Euclidian space. -- Flat stitch, the process of wood engraving. [Obs.] -- Flat tint (Painting), a coat of water color of one uniform shade. -- To fall flat (Fig.), to produce no effect; to fail in the intended effect; as, his speech fell flat. Of all who fell by saber or by shot, Not one fell half so flat as Walter Scott. Lord Erskine.  1. In a flat manner; directly; flatly. Sin is flat opposite to the Almighty. Herbert. 2. (Stock Exchange)  Without allowance for accrued interest. [Broker's Cant]  1. A level surface, without elevation, relief, or prominences; an extended plain; specifically, in the United States, a level tract along the along the banks of a river; as, the Mohawk Flats. Envy is as the sunbeams that beat hotter upon a bank, or steep rising ground, than upon a flat. Bacon. 2. A level tract lying at little depth below the surface of water, or alternately covered and left bare by the tide; a shoal; a shallow; a strand. Half my power, this night Passing these flats, are taken by the tide. Shak. 3. Something broad and flat in form; as: (a) A flat-bottomed boat, without keel, and of small draught. (b) A straw hat, broad-brimmed and low-crowned. (c) (Railroad Mach.) A car without a roof, the body of which is a platform without sides; a platform car. (d) A platform on wheel, upon which emblematic designs, etc., are carried in processions. 4. The flat part, or side, of anything; as, the broad side of a blade, as distinguished from its edge. 5. (Arch.)  A floor, loft, or story in a building; especially, a floor of a house, which forms a complete residence in itself. 6. (Mining)  A horizontal vein or ore deposit auxiliary to a main vein; also, any horizontal portion of a vein not elsewhere horizontal. Raymond. 7. A dull fellow; a simpleton; a numskull. [Colloq.] Or if you can not make a speech, Because you are a flat. Holmes. 8. (Mus.)  A character [] before a note, indicating a tone which is a half step or semitone lower. 9. (Geom.)  A homaloid space or extension.  1. To make flat; to flatten; to level. 2. To render dull, insipid, or spiritless; to depress. Passions are allayed, appetites are flatted. Barrow. 3. To depress in tone, as a musical note; especially, to lower in pitch by half a tone.  1. To become flat, or flattened; to sink or fal to an even surface. Sir W. Temple. 2. (Mus.)  To fall form the pitch. To flat out, to fail from a promising beginning; to make a bad ending; to disappoint expectations. [Colloq.]
rock: See Roc.  A distaff used in spinning; the staff or frame about which flax is arranged, and from which the thread is drawn in spinning. Chapman. Sad Clotho held the rocke, the whiles the thread By grisly Lachesis was spun with pain, That cruel Atropos eftsoon undid. Spenser.  1. A large concreted mass of stony material; a large fixed stone or crag. See Stone. Come one, come all! this rock shall fly From its firm base as soon as I. Sir W. Scott. 2. (Geol.)  Any natural deposit forming a part of the earth's crust, whether consolidated or not, including sand, earth, clay, etc., when in natural beds. 3. That which resembles a rock in firmness; a defense; a support; a refuge. The Lord is my rock, and my fortress. 2 Sam. xxii. 2. 4. Fig.: Anything which causes a disaster or wreck resembling the wreck of a vessel upon a rock. 5. (Zoöl.)  The striped bass. See under Bass. Note: This word is frequently used in the formation of self- explaining compounds; as, rock-bound, rock-built, rock-ribbed, rock- roofed, and the like. Rock alum. Etym: [Probably so called by confusion with F. roche a rock.] Same as Roche alum. -- Rock barnacle (Zoöl.), a barnacle (Balanus balanoides) very abundant on rocks washed by tides. -- Rock bass. (Zoöl.) (a) The stripped bass. See under Bass. (b) The goggle-eye. (c) The cabrilla. Other species are also locally called rock bass. -- Rock builder (Zoöl.), any species of animal whose remains contribute to the formation of rocks, especially the corals and Foraminifera. -- Rock butter (Min.), native alum mixed with clay and oxide of iron, usually in soft masses of a yellowish white color, occuring in cavities and fissures in argillaceous slate. -- Rock candy, a form of candy consisting of crystals of pure sugar which are very hard, whence the name. -- Rock cavy. (Zoöl.) See Moco. -- Rock cod (Zoöl.) (a) A small, often reddish or brown, variety of the cod found about rocks andledges. (b) A California rockfish. -- Rock cook. (Zoöl.) (a) A European wrasse (Centrolabrus exoletus). (b) A rockling. -- Rock cork (Min.), a variety of asbestus the fibers of which are loosely interlaced. It resembles cork in its texture. -- Rock crab (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large crabs of the genus Cancer, as the two species of the New England coast (C. irroratus and C. borealis). See Illust. under Cancer. -- Rock cress (Bot.), a name of several plants of the cress kind found on rocks, as Arabis petræa, A. lyrata, etc. -- Rock crystal (Min.), limpid quartz. See Quartz, and under Crystal. -- Rock dove (Zoöl.), the rock pigeon; -- called also rock doo. -- Rock drill, an implement for drilling holes in rock; esp., a machine impelled by steam or compressed air, for drilling holes for blasting, etc. -- Rock duck (Zoöl.), the harlequin duck. -- Rock eel. (Zoöl.) See Gunnel. -- Rock goat (Zoöl.), a wild goat, or ibex. -- Rock hopper (Zoöl.), a penguin of the genus Catarractes. See under Penguin. -- Rock kangaroo. (Zoöl.) See Kangaroo, and Petrogale. -- Rock lobster (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large spinose lobsters of the genera Panulirus and Palinurus. They have no large claws. Called also spiny lobster, and sea crayfish. -- Rock meal (Min.), a light powdery variety of calcite occuring as an efflorescence. -- Rock milk. (Min.) See Agaric mineral, under Agaric. -- Rock moss, a kind of lichen; the cudbear. See Cudbear. -- Rock oil. See Petroleum. -- Rock parrakeet (Zoöl.), a small Australian parrakeet (Euphema petrophila), which nests in holes among the rocks of high cliffs. Its general color is yellowish olive green; a frontal band and the outer edge of the wing quills are deep blue, and the central tail feathers bluish green. -- Rock pigeon (Zoöl.), the wild pigeon (Columba livia) Of Europe and Asia, from which the domestic pigeon was derived. See Illust. under Pigeon. -- Rock pipit. (Zoöl.) See the Note under Pipit. -- Rock plover. (Zoöl.) (a) The black-bellied, or whistling, plover. (b) The rock snipe. -- Rock ptarmigan (Zoöl.), an arctic American ptarmigan (Lagopus rupestris), which in winter is white, with the tail and lores black. In summer the males are grayish brown, coarsely vermiculated with black, and have black patches on the back. -- Rock rabbit (Zoöl.), the hyrax. See Cony, and Daman. -- Rock ruby (Min.), a fine reddish variety of garnet. -- Rock salt (Min.), cloride of sodium (common salt) occuring in rocklike masses in mines; mineral salt; salt dug from the earth. In the United States this name is sometimes given to salt in large crystals, formed by evaporation from sea water in large basins or cavities. -- Rock seal (Zoöl.), the harbor seal. See Seal. -- Rock shell (Zoöl.), any species of Murex, Purpura, and allied genera. -- Rock snake (Zoöl.), any one of several large pythons; as, the royal rock snake (Python regia) of Africa, and the rock snake of India (P. molurus). The Australian rock snakes mostly belong to the allied genus Morelia. -- Rock snipe (Zoöl.), the purple sandpiper (Tringa maritima); -- called also rock bird, rock plover, winter snipe. -- Rock soap (Min.), a kind of clay having a smooth, greasy feel, and adhering to the tongue. -- Rock sparrow. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of several species of Old World sparrows of the genus Petronia, as P. stulla, of Europe. (b) A North American sparrow (Pucæa ruficeps). -- Rock tar, petroleum. -- Rock thrush (Zoöl.), any Old World thrush of the genus Monticola, or Petrocossyphus; as, the European rock thrush (M. saxatilis), and the blue rock thrush of India (M. cyaneus), in which the male is blue throughout. -- Rock tripe (Bot.), a kind of lichen (Umbilicaria Dillenii) growing on rocks in the northen parts of America, and forming broad, flat, coriaceous, dark fuscous or blackish expansions. It has been used as food in cases of extremity. -- Rock trout (Zoöl.), any one of several species of marine food fishes of the genus Hexagrammus, family Chiradæ, native of the North Pacific coasts; -- called also sea trout, boregat, bodieron, and starling. -- Rock warbler (Zoöl.), a small Australian singing bird (Origma rubricata) which frequents rocky ravines and water courses; -- called also cataract bird. -- Rock wren (Zoöl.), any one of several species of wrens of the genus Salpinctes, native of the arid plains of Lower California and Mexico.  1. To cause to sway backward and forward, as a body resting on a support beneath; as, to rock a cradle or chair; to cause to vibrate; to cause to reel or totter. A rising earthquake rocked the ground. Dryden. 2. To move as in a cradle; hence, to put to sleep by rocking; to still; to quiet. "Sleep rock thy brain." Shak. Note: Rock differs from shake, as denoting a slower, less violent, and more uniform motion, or larger movements. It differs from swing, which expresses a vibratory motion of something suspended.  1. To move or be moved backward and forward; to be violently agitated; to reel; to totter. The rocking town Supplants their footsteps. J. Philips . 2. To roll or saway backward and forward upon a support; as, to rock in a rocking-chair.
why: 1. For what cause, reason, or purpose; on what account; wherefore; -- used interrogatively. See the Note under What, pron., 1. Turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of Israel Ezek. xxxiii. 11. 2. For which; on account of which; -- used relatively. No ground of enmity between us known Why he should mean me ill or seek to harm. Milton. Turn the discourse; I have a reason why I would not have you speak so tenderly. Dryden. 3. The reason or cause for which; that on account of which; on what account; as, I know not why he left town so suddenly; -- used as a compound relative. Note: Why is sometimes used as an interjection or an expletive in expression of surprise or content at a turn of affairs; used also in calling. "Why, Jessica!" Shak. If her chill heart I can not move, Why, I'll enjoy the very love. Cowley. Sometimes, also, it is used as a noun. The how and the why and the where. Goldsmith. For why, because; why. See Forwhy. [Obs. or Colloq.]  A young heifer. [Prov. Eng.] Grose.
carry: 1. To convey or transport in any manner from one place to another; to bear; -- often with away or off. When he dieth he small carry nothing away. Ps. xiix. 17. Devout men carried Stephen to his burial. Acts viii, 2. Another carried the intelligence to Russell. Macaulay. The sound will be carried, at the least, twenty miles. Bacon. 2. To have or hold as a burden, while moving from place to place; to have upon or about one's person; to bear; as, to carry a wound; to carry an unborn child. If the ideas . . . were carried along with us in our minds. Locke. 3. To move; to convey by force; to impel; to conduct; to lead or guide. Go, carry Sir John Falstaff to the Fleet. Shak. He carried away all his cattle. Gen. xxxi. 18. Passion and revenge will carry them too far. Locke. 4. To transfer from one place (as a country, book, or column) to another; as, to carry the war from Greece into Asia; to carry an account to the ledger; to carry a number in adding figures. 5. To convey by extension or continuance; to extend; as, to carry the chimney through the roof; to carry a road ten miles farther. 6. To bear or uphold successfully through conflict, as a leader or principle; hence, to succeed in, as in a contest; to bring to a successful issue; to win; as, to carry an election. "The greater part carries it." Shak. The carrying of our main point. Addison. 7. To get possession of by force; to capture. The town would have been carried in the end. Bacon. 8. To contain; to comprise; to bear the aspect of ; to show or exhibit; to imply. He thought it carried something of argument in it. Watts. It carries too great an imputation of ignorance. Lacke. 9. To bear (one's self); to behave, to conduct or demean; -- with the refexive pronouns. He carried himself so insolently in the house, and out of the house, to all persons, that he became odious. Clarendon. 10. To bear the charges or burden of holding or having, as stocks, merchandise, etc., from one time to another; as, a merchant is carrying a large stock; a farm carries a mortgage; a broker carries stock for a customer; to carry a life insurance. Carry arms (Mil. Drill), a command of the Manual of Arms directing the soldier to hold his piece in the right hand, the barrel resting against the hollow of the shoulder in a nearly perpendicular position. In this position the soldier is said to stand, and the musket to be held, at carry. -- To carry all before one, to overcome all obstacles; to have uninterrupted success. -- To carry arms (a) To bear weapons. (b) To serve as a soldier. -- To carry away. (a) (Naut.) to break off; to lose; as, to carry away a fore-topmast. (b) To take possession of the mind; to charm; to delude; as, to be carried by music, or by temptation. -- To carry coals, to bear indignities tamely, a phrase used by early dramatists, perhaps from the mean nature of the occupation. Halliwell. -- To carry coals to Newcastle, to take things to a place where they already abound; to lose one's labor. -- To carry off (a) To remove to a distance. (b) To bear away as from the power or grasp of others. (c) To remove from life; as, the plague carried off thousands. -- To carry on (a) To carry farther; to advance, or help forward; to continue; as, to carry on a design. (b) To manage, conduct, or prosecute; as, to carry on husbandry or trade. -- To carry out. (a) To bear from within. (b) To put into execution; to bring to a successful issue. (c) To sustain to the end; to continue to the end. -- To carry through. (a) To convey through the midst of. (b) To support to the end; to sustain, or keep from falling, or being subdued. "Grace will carry us . . . through all difficulties." Hammond. (c) To complete; to bring to a succesful issue; to succeed. -- To carry up, to convey or extend in an upward course or direction; to build. -- To carry weight. (a) To be handicapped; to have an extra burden, as when one rides or runs. "He carries weight, he rides a race" Cowper. (b) To have influence.  1. To act as a bearer; to convey anything; as, to fetch and carry. 2. To have propulsive power; to propel; as, a gun or mortar carries well. 3. To hold the head; -- said of a horse; as, to carry well i. e., to hold the head high, with arching neck. 4. (Hunting)  To have earth or frost stick to the feet when running, as a hare. Johnson. To carry on, to behave in a wild, rude, or romping manner. [Colloq.]  A tract of land, over which boats or goods are carried between two bodies of navigable water; a carrying place; a portage. Etym: [U.S.]
plain: To lament; to bewail; to complain. [Archaic & Poetic] Milton. We with piteous heart unto you pleyne. Chaucer.  To lament; to mourn over; as, to plain a loss. [Archaic & Poetic] Sir J. Harrington.  1. Without elevations or depressions; flat; level; smooth; even. See Plane. The crooked shall be made straight, and the rough places plain. Isa. xl. 4. 2. Open; clear; unencumbered; equal; fair. Our troops beat an army in plain fight. Felton. 3. Not intricate or difficult; evident; manifest; obvious; clear; unmistakable. "'T is a plain case." Shak. 4. (a) Void of extraneous beauty or ornament; without conspicious embellishment; not rich; simple. (b) Not highly cultivated; unsophisticated; free from show or pretension; simple; natural; homely; common. "Plain yet pious Christians." Hammond. "The plain people." A. Lincoln. (c) Free from affectation or disguise; candid; sincere; artless; honest; frank. "An honest mind, and plain." Shak. (d) Not luxurious; not highly seasoned; simple; as, plain food. (e) Without beauty; not handsome; homely; as, a plain woman. (f) Not variegated, dyed, or figured; as, plain muslin. (g) Not much varied by modulations; as, a plain tune. Plain battle, open battle; pitched battle. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Plain chant (Mus.) Same as Plain song, below. -- Plain chart (Naut.), a chart laid down on Mercator's projection. -- Plain dealer. (a) One who practices plain dealing. (b) A simpleton. [Obs.] Shak. -- Plain dealing. See under Dealing. -- Plain molding (Join.), molding of which the surfaces are plain figures. -- Plain sewing, sewing of seams by simple and common stitches, in distinct from fancy work, embroidery, etc.; -- distinguished also from designing and fitting garments. -- Plain song. (a) The Gregorian chant, or canto fermo; the prescribed melody of the Roman Catholic service, sung in unison, in tones of equal length, and rarely extending beyond the compass of an octave. (b) A simple melody. -- Plain speaking, plainness or bluntness of speech. Syn. -- Level; flat; smooth; open; artless; unaffected; undisguised; frank; sincere; honest; candid; ingenuous; unembellished; downright; blunt; clear; simple; distinct; manifest; obvious; apparent. See Manifest.  In a plain manner; plainly. "To speak short and pleyn." Chaucer. "To tell you plain." Shak.  1. Level land; usually, an open field or a broad stretch of land with an even surface, or a surface little varied by inequalities; as, the plain of Jordan; the American plains, or prairies. Descending fro the mountain into playn. Chaucer. Him the Ammonite Worshiped in Rabba and her watery plain. Milton. 2. A field of battle. [Obs.] Arbuthnot. Lead forth my soldiers to the plain. Shak.  1. To plane or level; to make plain or even on the surface. [R.] We would rake Europe rather, plain the East. Wither. 2. To make plain or manifest; to explain. What's dumb in show, I'll plain in speech. Shak.
big: 1. Having largeness of size; of much bulk or magnitude; of great size; large. "He's too big to go in there." Shak. 2. Great with young; pregnant; swelling; ready to give birth or produce; -- often figuratively. [Day] big with the fate of Cato and of Rome. Addison. 3. Having greatness, fullness, importance, inflation, distention, etc., whether in a good or a bad sense; as, a big heart; a big voice; big looks; to look big. As applied to looks, it indicates haughtiness or pride. God hath not in heaven a bigger argument. Jer. Taylor. Note: Big is often used in self-explaining compounds; as, big-boned; big-sounding; big-named; big-voiced. To talk big, to talk loudly, arrogantly, or pretentiously. I talked big to them at first. De Foe. Syn. -- Bulky; large; great; massive; gross.  Barley, especially the hardy four-rowed kind. "Bear interchanges in local use, now with barley, now with bigg." New English Dict.  To build. [Scot. & North of Eng. Dial.] Sir W. Scott.
cow: A chimney cap; a cowl  1. The mature female of bovine animals. 2. The female of certain large mammals, as whales, seals, etc.  To depress with fear; to daunt the spirits or courage of; to overawe. To vanquish a people already cowed. Shak. THe French king was cowed. J. R. Green.  A wedge, or brake, to check the motion of a machine or car; a chock. Knight.
mix: 1. To cause a promiscuous interpenetration of the parts of, as of two or more substances with each other, or of one substance with others; to unite or blend into one mass or compound, as by stirring together; to mingle; to blend; as, to mix flour and salt; to mix wines. Fair persuasions mixed with sugared words. Shak. 2. To unite with in company; to join; to associate. Ephraim, he hath mixed himself among the people. Hos. vii. 8. 3. To form by mingling; to produce by the stirring together of ingredients; to compound of different parts. Hast thou no poison mixed Shak. I have chosen an argument mixed of religious and civil considerations. Bacon.  1. To become united into a compound; to be blended promiscuously together. 2. To associate; to mingle. He had mixed Again in fancied safety with his kind. Byron.
bad: of Bid. Bade. [Obs.] Dryden.  Wanting good qualities, whether physical or moral; injurious, hurtful, inconvenient, offensive, painful, unfavorable, or defective, either physically or morally; evil; vicious; wicked; -- the opposite of good; as a bad man; bad conduct; bad habits; bad soil; bad health; bad crop; bad news. Note: Sometimes used substantively. The strong antipathy of good to bad. Pope. Syn. -- Pernicious; deleterious; noxious; baneful; injurious; hurtful; evil; vile; wretched; corrupt; wicked; vicious; imperfect.
atom: 1. (Physics) (a) An ultimate indivisible particle of matter. (b) An ultimate particle of matter not necessarily indivisible; a molecule. (c) A constituent particle of matter, or a molecule supposed to be made up of subordinate particles. Note: These three definitions correspond to different views of the nature of the ultimate particles of matter. In the case of the last two, the particles are more correctly called molecules. Dana. 2. (Chem.)  The smallest particle of matter that can enter into combination; one of the elementary constituents of a molecule. 3. Anything extremely small; a particle; a whit. There was not an atom of water. Sir J. Ross.  To reduce to atoms. [Obs.] Feltham.
numeral: 1. Of or pertaining to number; consisting of number or numerals. A long train of numeral progressions. Locke. 2. Expressing number; representing number; as, numeral letters or characters, as X or 10 for ten.  1. A figure or character used to express a number; as, the Arabic numerals, 1, 2, 3, etc.; the Roman numerals, I, V, X, L, etc. 2. A word expressing a number.
shall: 1. To owe; to be under obligation for. [Obs.] "By the faith I shall to God" Court of Love. 2. To be obliged; must. [Obs.] "Me athinketh [I am sorry] that I shall rehearse it her." Chaucer. 3. As an auxiliary, shall indicates a duty or necessity whose obligation is derived from the person speaking; as, you shall go; he shall go; that is, I order or promise your going. It thus ordinarily expresses, in the second and third persons, a command, a threat, or a promise. If the auxillary be emphasized, the command is made more imperative, the promise or that more positive and sure. It is also employed in the language of prophecy; as, "the day shall come when . . . , " since a promise or threat and an authoritative prophecy nearly coincide in significance. In shall with the first person, the necessity of the action is sometimes implied as residing elsewhere than in the speaker; as, I shall suffer; we shall see; and there is always a less distinct and positive assertion of his volition than is indicated by will. "I shall go" implies nearly a simple futurity; more exactly, a foretelling or an expectation of my going, in which, naturally enough, a certain degree of plan or intention may be included; emphasize the shall, and the event is described as certain to occur, and the expression approximates in meaning to our emphatic "I will go." In a question, the relation of speaker and source of obligation is of course transferred to the person addressed; as, "Shall you go" (answer, "I shall go"); "Shall he go" i. e., "Do you require or promise his going" (answer, "He shall go".) The same relation is transferred to either second or third person in such phrases as "You say, or think, you shall go;" "He says, or thinks, he shall go." After a conditional conjunction (as if, whether) shall is used in all persons to express futurity simply; as, if I, you, or he shall say they are right. Should is everywhere used in the same connection and the same senses as shall, as its imperfect. It also expresses duty or moral obligation; as, he should do it whether he will or not. In the early English, and hence in our English Bible, shall is the auxiliary mainly used, in all the persons, to express simple futurity. (Cf. Will, v. t.) Shall may be used elliptically; thus, with an adverb or other word expressive of motion go may be omitted. "He to England shall along with you." Shak. Note: Shall and will are often confounded by inaccurate speakers and writers. Say: I shall be glad to see you. Shall I do this Shall I help you (not Will I do this) See Will.
garden: 1. A piece of ground appropriates to the cultivation of herbs, fruits, flowers, or vegetables. 2. A rich, well-cultivated spot or tract of country. I am arrived from fruitful Lombardy, The pleasant garden of great Italy. Shak. Note: Garden is often used adjectively or in self-explaining compounds; as, garden flowers, garden tools, garden walk, garden wall, garden house or gardenhouse. Garden balsam, an ornamental plant (Impatiens Balsamina). -- Garden engine, a wheelbarrow tank and pump for watering gardens. -- Garden glass. (a) A bell glass for covering plants. (b) A globe of dark-colored glass, mounted on a pedestal, to reflect surrounding objects; -- much used as an ornament in gardens in Germany. -- Garden house (a) A summer house. Beau & Fl. (b) A privy. [Southern U.S.] -- Garden husbandry, the raising on a small scale of seeds, fruits, vegetables, etc., for sale. -- Garden mold or mould, rich, mellow earth which is fit for a garden. Mortimer. -- Garden nail, a cast nail used, for fastening vines to brick walls. Knight. -- Garden net, a net for covering fruits trees, vines, etc., to protect them from birds. -- Garden party, a social party held out of doors, within the grounds or garden attached to a private residence. -- Garden plot, a plot appropriated to a garden. Garden pot, a watering pot. -- Garden pump, a garden engine; a barrow pump. -- Garden shears, large shears, for clipping trees and hedges, pruning, etc. -- Garden spider, (Zoöl.), the diadem spider (Epeira diadema), common in gardens, both in Europe and America. It spins a geometrical web. See Geometric spider, and Spider web. -- Garden stand, a stand for flower pots. -- Garden stuff, vegetables raised in a garden. [Colloq.] -- Garden syringe, a syringe for watering plants, sprinkling them with solutions for destroying insects, etc. -- Garden truck, vegetables raised for the market. [Colloq.] -- Garden ware, garden truck. [Obs.] Mortimer. -- Bear garden, Botanic garden, etc. See under Bear, etc. -- Hanging garden. See under Hanging. -- Kitchen garden, a garden where vegetables are cultivated for household use. -- Market garden, a piece of ground where vegetable are cultivated to be sold in the markets for table use.  To lay out or cultivate a garden; to labor in a garden; to practice horticulture.  To cultivate as a garden.
general: 1. Relating to a genus or kind; pertaining to a whole class or order; as, a general law of animal or vegetable economy. 2. Comprehending many species or individuals; not special or particular; including all particulars; as, a general inference or conclusion. 3. Not restrained or limited to a precise import; not specific; vague; indefinite; lax in signification; as, a loose and general expression. 4. Common to many, or the greatest number; widely spread; prevalent; extensive, though not universal; as, a general opinion; a general custom. This general applause and cheerful sShak. 5. Having a relation to all; common to the whole; as, Adam, our general sire. Milton. 6. As a whole; in gross; for the most part. His general behavior vain, ridiculous. Shak. 7. Usual; common, on most occasions; as, his general habit or method. Note: The word general, annexed to a name of office, usually denotes chief or superior; as, attorney-general; adjutant general; commissary general; quartermaster general; vicar-general, etc. General agent (Law), an agent whom a principal employs to transact all his business of a particular kind, or to act in his affairs generally. -- General assembly. See the Note under Assembly. -- General average, General Court. See under Average, Court. -- General court-martial (Mil.), the highest military and naval judicial tribunal. -- General dealer (Com.), a shopkeeper who deals in all articles in common use. -- General demurrer (Law), a demurrer which objects to a pleading in general terms, as insufficient, without specifying the defects. Abbott. -- General epistle, a canonical epistle. -- General guides (Mil.), two sergeants (called the right, and the left, general guide) posted opposite the right and left flanks of an infantry battalion, to preserve accuracy in marching. Farrow. -- General hospitals (Mil.), hospitals established to receive sick and wounded sent from the field hospitals. Farrow. General issue (Law), an issue made by a general plea, which traverses the whole declaration or indictment at once, without offering any special matter to evade it. Bouvier. Burrill. -- General lien (Law), a right to detain a chattel, etc., until payment is made of any balance due on a general account. -- General officer (Mil.), any officer having a rank above that of colonel. -- General orders (Mil.), orders from headquarters published to the whole command. -- General practitioner, in the United States, one who practices medicine in all its branches without confining himself to any specialty; in England, one who practices both as physician and as surgeon. -- General ship, a ship not chartered or let to particular parties. -- General term (Logic), a term which is the sign of a general conception or notion. -- General verdict (Law), the ordinary comprehensive verdict in civil actions, "for the plaintiff" or "for the defendant". Burrill. -- General warrant (Law), a warrant, now illegal, to apprehend suspected persons, without naming individuals. Syn. General, Common, Universal. Common denotes primarily that in which many share; and hence, that which is often met with. General is stronger, denoting that which pertains to a majority of the individuals which compose a genus, or whole. Universal, that which pertains to all without exception. To be able to read and write is so common an attainment in the United States, that we may pronounce it general, though by no means universal. Syn: Gen"er*al, n. Etym: [F. général. See General., a.] 1. The whole; the total; that which comprehends or relates to all, or the chief part; -- opposed to particular. In particulars our knowledge begins, and so spreads itself by degrees to generals. Locke. 2. (Mil.)  One of the chief military officers of a government or country; the commander of an army, of a body of men not less than a brigade. In European armies, the highest military rank next below field marshal. Note: In the United States the office of General of the Army has been created by temporary laws, and has been held only by Generals U. S. Grant, W. T. Sherman, and P. H. Sheridan. Popularly, the title General is given to various general officers, as General, Lieutenant general, Major general, Brigadier general, Commissary general, etc. See Brigadier general, Lieutenant general, Major general, in the Vocabulary. 3. (Mil.)  The roll of the drum which calls the troops together; as, to beat the general. 4. (Eccl.)  The chief of an order of monks, or of all the houses or congregations under the same rule. 5. The public; the people; the vulgar. [Obs.] Shak. In general, in the main; for the most part.
her: The form of the objective and the possessive case of the personal pronoun she; as, I saw her with her purse out. Note: The possessive her takes the form hers when the noun with which in agrees is not given, but implied. "And what his fortune wanted, hers could mend." Dryden.  Of them; their. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. On here bare knees adown they fall. Chaucer.
compare: 1. To examine the character or qualities of, as of two or more persons or things, for the purpose of discovering their resemblances or differences; to bring into comparison; to regard with discriminating attention. Compare dead happiness with living woe. Shak. The place he found beyond expression bright, Compared with aught on earth. Milton. Compare our faces and be judge yourself. Shak. To compare great things with small. Milton. 2. To represent as similar, for the purpose of illustration; to liken. Solon compared the people unto the sea, and orators and counselors to the winds; for that the sea would be calm and quiet if the winds did not trouble it. Bacon. 3. (Gram.)  To inflect according to the degrees of comparison; to state positive, comparative, and superlative forms of; as, most adjectives of one syllable are compared by affixing "-er" and "-est" to the positive form; as, black, blacker, blackest; those of more than one syllable are usually compared by prefixing "more" and "most", or "less" and "least", to the positive; as, beautiful, more beautiful, most beautiful. Syn. -- To Compare, Compare with, Compare to. Things are compared with each other in order to learn their relative value or excellence. Thus we compare Cicero with Demosthenes, for the sake of deciding which was the greater orator. One thing is compared to another because of a real or fanciful likeness or similarity which exists between them. Thus it has been common to compare the eloquence of Demosthenes to a thunderbolt, on account of its force, and the eloquence of Cicero to a conflagration, on account of its splendor. Burke compares the parks of London to the lungs of the human body.  1. To be like or equal; to admit, or be worthy of, comparison; as, his later work does not compare with his earlier. I should compare with him in excellence. Shak. 2. To vie; to assume a likeness or equality. Shall pack horses . . . compare with Cæsars Shak.  1. Comparison. [Archaic] His mighty champion, strong beyond compare. Milton. Their small galleys may not hold compare With our tall ships. Waller. 2. Illustration by comprison; simile. [Obs.] Rhymes full of protest, of oath, and big compare. Shak. Beyond compare. See Beyond comparison, under Comparison.  To get; to procure; to obtain; to acquire [Obs.] To fill his bags, and richesse to compare. Spenser.
take: Taken. Chaucer.  1. In an active sense; To lay hold of; to seize with the hands, or otherwise; to grasp; to get into one's hold or possession; to procure; to seize and carry away; to convey. Hence, specifically: -- (a) To obtain possession of by force or artifice; to get the custody or control of; to reduce into subjection to one's power or will; to capture; to seize; to make prisoner; as, to take am army, a city, or a ship; also, to come upon or befall; to fasten on; to attack; to seize; -- said of a disease, misfortune, or the like. This man was taken of the Jews. Acts xxiii. 27. Men in their loose, unguarded hours they take; Not that themselves are wise, but others weak. Pope. They that come abroad after these showers are commonly taken with sickness. Bacon. There he blasts the tree and takes the cattle And makes milch kine yield blood. Shak. (b) To gain or secure the interest or affection of; to captivate; to engage; to interest; to charm. Neither let her take thee with her eyelids. Prov. vi. 25. Cleombroutus was so taken with this prospect, that he had no patience. Wake. I know not why, but there was a something in those half-seen features, -- a charm in the very shadow that hung over their imagined beauty, -- which took me more than all the outshining loveliness of her companions. Moore. (c) To make selection of; to choose; also, to turn to; to have recourse to; as, to take the road to the right. Saul said, Cast lots between me and Jonathan my son. And Jonathan was taken. 1 Sam. xiv. 42. The violence of storming is the course which God is forced to take for the destroying . . . of sinners. Hammond. (d) To employ; to use; to occupy; hence, to demand; to require; as, it takes so much cloth to make a coat. This man always takes time . . . before he passes his judgments. I. Watts. (e) To form a likeness of; to copy; to delineate; to picture; as, to take picture of a person. Beauty alone could beauty take so right. Dryden. (f) To draw; to deduce; to derive. [R.] The firm belief of a future judgment is the most forcible motive to a good life, because taken from this consideration of the most lasting happiness and misery. Tillotson. (g) To assume; to adopt; to acquire, as shape; to permit to one's self; to indulge or engage in; to yield to; to have or feel; to enjoy or experience, as rest, revenge, delight, shame; to form and adopt, as a resolution; -- used in general senses, limited by a following complement, in many idiomatic phrases; as, to take a resolution; I take the liberty to say. (h) To lead; to conduct; as, to take a child to church. (i) To carry; to convey; to deliver to another; to hand over; as, he took the book to the bindery. He took me certain gold, I wot it well. Chaucer. (k) To remove; to withdraw; to deduct; -- with from; as, to take the breath from one; to take two from four. 2. In a somewhat passive sense, to receive; to bear; to endure; to acknowledge; to accept. Specifically: -- (a) To accept, as something offered; to receive; not to refuse or reject; to admit. Ye shall take no satisfaction for the life of a murderer. Num. xxxv. 31. Let not a widow be taken into the number under threescore. 1 Tim. v. 10. (b) To receive as something to be eaten or dronk; to partake of; to swallow; as, to take food or wine. (c) Not to refuse or balk at; to undertake readily; to clear; as, to take a hedge or fence. (d) To bear without ill humor or resentment; to submit to; to tolerate; to endure; as, to take a joke; he will take an affront from no man. (e) To admit, as, something presented to the mind; not to dispute; to allow; to accept; to receive in thought; to entertain in opinion; to understand; to interpret; to regard or look upon; to consider; to suppose; as, to take a thing for granted; this I take to be man's motive; to take men for spies. You take me right. Bacon. Charity, taken in its largest extent, is nothing else but the science love of God and our neighbor. Wake. [He] took that for virtue and affection which was nothing but vice in a disguise. South. You'd doubt his sex, and take him for a girl. Tate. (f) To accept the word or offer of; to receive and accept; to bear; to submit to; to enter into agreement with; -- used in general senses; as, to take a form or shape. I take thee at thy word. Rowe. Yet thy moist clay is pliant to command; . . . Not take the mold. Dryden. To be taken aback, To take advantage of, To take air, etc. See under Aback, Advantage, etc. -- To take aim, to direct the eye or weapon; to aim. -- To take along, to carry, lead, or convey. -- To take arms, to commence war or hostilities. -- To take away, to carry off; to remove; to cause deprivation of; to do away with; as, a bill for taking away the votes of bishops. "By your own law, I take your life away." Dryden. -- To take breath, to stop, as from labor, in order to breathe or rest; to recruit or refresh one's self. -- To take care, to exercise care or vigilance; to be solicitous. "Doth God take care for oxen" 1 Cor. ix. 9. -- To take care of, to have the charge or care of; to care for; to superintend or oversee. -- To take down. (a) To reduce; to bring down, as from a high, or higher, place; as, to take down a book; hence, to bring lower; to depress; to abase or humble; as, to take down pride, or the proud. "I never attempted to be impudent yet, that I was not taken down." Goldsmith. (b) To swallow; as, to take down a potion. (c) To pull down; to pull to pieces; as, to take down a house or a scaffold. (d) To record; to write down; as, to take down a man's words at the time he utters them. -- To take effect, To take fire. See under Effect, and Fire. -- To take ground to the right or to the left (Mil.), to extend the line to the right or left; to move, as troops, to the right or left. -- To take heart, to gain confidence or courage; to be encouraged. -- To take heed, to be careful or cautious. "Take heed what doom against yourself you give." Dryden. -- To take heed to, to attend with care, as, take heed to thy ways. -- To take hold of, to seize; to fix on. -- To take horse, to mount and ride a horse. -- To take in. (a) To inclose; to fence. (b) To encompass or embrace; to comprise; to comprehend. (c) To draw into a smaller compass; to contract; to brail or furl; as, to take in sail. (d) To cheat; to circumvent; to gull; to deceive. [Colloq.] (e) To admit; to receive; as, a leaky vessel will take in water. (f) To win by conquest. [Obs.] For now Troy's broad-wayed town He shall take in. Chapman. (g) To receive into the mind or understanding. "Some bright genius can take in a long train of propositions." I. Watts. (h) To receive regularly, as a periodical work or newspaper; to take. [Eng.] -- To take in hand. See under Hand. -- To take in vain, to employ or utter as in an oath. "Thou shalt not take the name of the Lord thy God in vain." Ex. xx. 7. -- To take issue. See under Issue. -- To take leave. See Leave, n., 2. -- To take a newspaper, magazine, or the like, to receive it regularly, as on paying the price of subscription. -- To take notice, to observe, or to observe with particular attention. -- To take notice of. See under Notice. -- To take oath, to swear with solemnity, or in a judicial manner. -- To take off. (a) To remove, as from the surface or outside; to remove from the top of anything; as, to take off a load; to take off one's hat. (b) To cut off; as, to take off the head, or a limb. (c) To destroy; as, to take off life. (d) To remove; to invalidate; as, to take off the force of an argument. (e) To withdraw; to call or draw away. Locke. (f) To swallow; as, to take off a glass of wine. (g) To purchase; to take in trade. "The Spaniards having no commodities that we will take off." Locke. (h) To copy; to reproduce. "Take off all their models in wood." Addison. (i) To imitate; to mimic; to personate. (k) To find place for; to dispose of; as, more scholars than preferments can take off. [R.] Bacon. -- To take on, to assume; to take upon one's self; as, to take on a character or responsibility. -- To take one's own course, to act one's pleasure; to pursue the measures of one's own choice. -- To take order for. See under Order. -- To take order with, to check; to hinder; to repress. [Obs.] Bacon. -- To take orders. (a) To receive directions or commands. (b) (Eccl.) To enter some grade of the ministry. See Order, n., 10. -- To take out. (a) To remove from within a place; to separate; to deduct. (b) To draw out; to remove; to clear or cleanse from; as, to take out a stain or spot from cloth. (c) To produce for one's self; as, to take out a patent. (d) To put an end to; as, to take the conceit out of a man. (e) To escort; as, to take out to dinner. -- To take over, to undertake; to take the management of. [Eng.] Cross (Life of G. Eliot). -- To take part, to share; as, they take part in our rejoicing. -- To take part with, to unite with; to join with. -- To take place, root, sides, stock, etc. See under Place, Root, Side, etc. -- To take the air. (a) (Falconry) To seek to escape by trying to rise higher than the falcon; -- said of a bird. (b) See under Air. -- To take the field. (Mil.) See under Field. -- To take thought, to be concerned or anxious; to be solicitous. Matt. vi. 25, 27. -- To take to heart. See under Heart. -- To take to task, to reprove; to censure. -- to take to the air, to take off. To take up. (a) To lift; to raise. Hood. (b) To buy or borrow; as, to take up goods to a large amount; to take up money at the bank. (c) To begin; as, to take up a lamentation. Ezek. xix. 1. (d) To gather together; to bind up; to fasten or to replace; as, to take up raveled stitches; specifically (Surg.), to fasten with a ligature. (e) To engross; to employ; to occupy or fill; as, to take up the time; to take up a great deal of room. (f) To take permanently. "Arnobius asserts that men of the finest parts . . . took up their rest in the Christian religion." Addison. (g) To seize; to catch; to arrest; as, to take up a thief; to take up vagabonds. (h) To admit; to believe; to receive. [Obs.] The ancients took up experiments upon credit. Bacon. (i) To answer by reproof; to reprimand; to berate. One of his relations took him up roundly. L'Estrange. (k) To begin where another left off; to keep up in continuous succession. Soon as the evening shades prevail, The moon takes up the wondrous tale. Addison. (l) To assume; to adopt as one's own; to carry on or manage; as, to take up the quarrels of our neighbors; to take up current opinions. "They take up our old trade of conquering." Dryden. (m) To comprise; to include. "The noble poem of Palemon and Arcite . . . takes up seven years." Dryden. (n) To receive, accept, or adopt for the purpose of assisting; to espouse the cause of; to favor. Ps. xxvii. 10. (o) To collect; to exact, as a tax; to levy; as, to take up a contribution. "Take up commodities upon our bills." Shak. (p) To pay and receive; as, to take up a note at the bank. (q) (Mach.) To remove, as by an adjustment of parts; as, to take up lost motion, as in a bearing; also, to make tight, as by winding, or drawing; as, to take up slack thread in sewing. (r) To make up; to compose; to settle; as, to take up a quarrel. [Obs.] Shak. -- To take up arms. Same as To take arms, above. -- To take upon one's self. (a) To assume; to undertake; as, he takes upon himself to assert that the fact is capable of proof. (b) To appropriate to one's self; to allow to be imputed to, or inflicted upon, one's self; as, to take upon one's self a punishment. -- To take up the gauntlet. See under Gauntlet.  1. To take hold; to fix upon anything; to have the natural or intended effect; to accomplish a purpose; as, he was inoculated, but the virus did not take. Shak. When flame taketh and openeth, it giveth a noise. Bacon. In impressions from mind to mind, the impression taketh, but is overcome . . . before it work any manifest effect. Bacon. 2. To please; to gain reception; to succeed. Each wit may praise it for his own dear sake, And hint he writ it, if the thing should take. Addison. 3. To move or direct the course; to resort; to betake one's self; to proceed; to go; -- usually with to; as, the fox, being hard pressed, took to the hedge. 4. To admit of being pictured, as in a photograph; as, his face does not take well. To take after. (a) To learn to follow; to copy; to imitate; as, he takes after a good pattern. (b) To resemble; as, the son takes after his father. -- To take in with, to resort to. [Obs.] Bacon. -- To take on, to be violently affected; to express grief or pain in a violent manner. -- To take to. (a) To apply one's self to; to be fond of; to become attached to; as, to take to evil practices. "If he does but take to you, . . . you will contract a great friendship with him." Walpole. (b) To resort to; to betake one's self to. "Men of learning, who take to business, discharge it generally with greater honesty than men of the world." Addison. -- To take up. (a) To stop. [Obs.] "Sinners at last take up and settle in a contempt of religion." Tillotson. (b) To reform. [Obs.] Locke. -- To take up with. (a) To be contended to receive; to receive without opposition; to put up with; as, to take up with plain fare. "In affairs which may have an extensive influence on our future happiness, we should not take up with probabilities." I. Watts. (b) To lodge with; to dwell with. [Obs.] L'Estrange. -- To take with, to please. Bacon.  1. That which is taken; especially, the quantity of fish captured at one haul or catch. 2. (Print.)  The quantity or copy given to a compositor at one time.
set: 1. To cause to sit; to make to assume a specified position or attitude; to give site or place to; to place; to put; to fix; as, to set a house on a stone foundation; to set a book on a shelf; to set a dish on a table; to set a chest or trunk on its bottom or on end. I do set my bow in the cloud. Gen. ix. 13. 2. Hence, to attach or affix (something) to something else, or in or upon a certain place. Set your affection on things above. Col. iii. 2. The Lord set a mark upon Cain. Gen. iv. 15. 3. To make to assume specified place, condition, or occupation; to put in a certain condition or state (described by the accompanying words); to cause to be. The Lord thy God will set thee on hihg. Deut. xxviii. 1. I am come to set a man at variance against his father, and the daughter against her mother. Matt. x. 35. Every incident sets him thinking. Coleridge. 4. To fix firmly; to make fast, permanent, or stable; to render motionless; to give an unchanging place, form, or condition to. Specifically: -- (a) To cause to stop or stick; to obstruct; to fsten to a spot; hence, to occasion difficulty to; to embarrass; as, to set a coach in the mud. They show how hard they are set in this particular. Addison. (b) To fix beforehand; to determine; hence, to make unyielding or obstinate; to render stiff, unpliant, or rigid; as, to set one's countenance. His eyes were set by reason of his age. 1 Kings xiv. 4. On these three objects his heart was set. Macaulay. Make my heart as a millstone, set my face as a flint. Tennyson. (c) To fix in the ground, as a post or a tree; to plant; as, to set pear trees in an orchard. (d) To fix, as a precious stone, in a border of metal; to place in a setting; hence, to place in or amid something which serves as a setting; as, to set glass in a sash. And him too rich a jewel to be set In vulgar metal for a vulgar use. Dryden. (e) To render stiff or solid; especially, to convert into curd; to curdle; as, to set milk for cheese. 5. To put into a desired position or condition; to adjust; to regulate; to adapt. Specifically: -- (a) To put in order in a particular manner; to prepare; as, to set (that is, to hone) a razor; to set a saw. Tables for to sette, and beddes make. Chaucer. (b) To extend and bring into position; to spread; as, to set the sails of a ship. (c) To give a pitch to, as a tune; to start by fixing the keynote; as, to set a psalm. Fielding. (d) To reduce from a dislocated or fractured state; to replace; as, to set a broken bone. (e) To make to agree with some standard; as, to set a watch or a clock. (f) (Masonry) To lower into place and fix silidly, as the blocks of cut stone in a structure. 6. To stake at play; to wager; to risk. I have set my life upon a cast, And I will stand the hazard of the die. Shak. 7. To fit with music; to adapt, as words to notes; to prepare for singing. Set thy own songs, and sing them to thy lute. Dryden. 8. To determine; to appoint; to assign; to fix; as, to set a time for a meeting; to set a price on a horse. 9. To adorn with something infixed or affixed; to stud; to variegate with objects placed here and there. High on their heads, with jewels richly set, Each lady wore a radiant coronet. Dryden. Pastoral dales thin set with modern farms. Wordsworth. 10. To value; to rate; -- with at. Be you contented, wearing now the garland, To have a son set your decrees at naught. Shak. I do not set my life at a pin's fee. Shak. 11. To point out the seat or position of, as birds, or other game; -- said of hunting dogs. 12. To establish as a rule; to furnish; to prescribe; to assign; as, to set an example; to set lessons to be learned. 13. To suit; to become; as, it sets him ill. [Scot.] 14. (Print.)  To compose; to arrange in words, lines, etc.; as, to set type; to set a page. To set abroach. See Abroach. [Obs.] Shak. -- To set against, to oppose; to set in comparison with, or to oppose to, as an equivalent in exchange; as, to set one thing against another. -- To set agoing, to cause to move. -- To set apart, to separate to a particular use; to separate from the rest; to reserve. -- To set a saw, to bend each tooth a little, every alternate one being bent to one side, and the intermediate ones to the other side, so that the opening made by the saw may be a little wider than the thickness of the back, to prevent the saw from sticking. -- To set aside. (a) To leave out of account; to pass by; to omit; to neglect; to reject; to annul. Setting aside all other considerations, I will endeavor to know the truth, and yield to that. Tillotson. (b) To set apart; to reserve; as, to set aside part of one's income. (c) (Law) See under Aside. -- To set at defiance, to defy. -- To set at ease, to quiet; to tranquilize; as, to set the heart at ease. -- To set at naught, to undervalue; to contemn; to despise. "Ye have set at naught all my counsel." Prov. i. 25. -- To set a trap, snare, or gin, to put it in a proper condition or position to catch prey; hence, to lay a plan to deceive and draw another into one's power. -- To set at work, or To set to work. (a) To cause to enter on work or action, or to direct how tu enter on work. (b) To apply one's self; -- used reflexively. -- To set before. (a) To bring out to view before; to exhibit. (b) To propose for choice to; to offer to. -- To set by. (a) To set apart or on one side; to reject. (b) To attach the value of (anything) to. "I set not a straw by thy dreamings." Chaucer. -- To set by the compass, to observe and note the bearing or situation of by the compass. -- To set case, to suppose; to assume. Cf. Put case, under Put, v. t. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To set down. (a) To enter in writing; to register. Some rules were to be set down for the government of the army. Clarendon. (b) To fix; to establish; to ordain. This law we may name eternal, being that order which God . . . hath set down with himself, for himself to do all things by. Hooker. (c) To humiliate. -- To set eyes on, to see; to behold; to fasten the eyes on. -- To set fire to, or To set on fire, to communicate fire to; fig., to inflame; to enkindle the passions of; to irritate. -- To set flying (Naut.), to hook to halyards, sheets, etc., instead of extending with rings or the like on a stay; -- said of a sail. -- To set forth. (a) To manifest; to offer or present to view; to exhibt; to display. (b) To publish; to promulgate; to make appear. Waller. (c) To send out; to prepare and send. [Obs.] The Venetian admiral had a fleet of sixty galleys, set forth by the Venetians. Knolles. -- To set forward. (a) To cause to advance. (b) To promote. -- To set free, to release from confinement, imprisonment, or bondage; to liberate; to emancipate. -- To set in, to put in the way; to begin; to give a start to. [Obs.] If you please to assist and set me in, I will recollect myself. Collier. -- To set in order, to adjust or arrange; to reduce to method. "The rest will I set in order when I come." 1 Cor. xi. 34. -- To set milk. (a) To expose it in open dishes in order that the cream may rise to the surface. (b) To cause it to become curdled as by the action of rennet. See 4 (e). -- To set much, or little, by, to care much, or little, for. -- To set of, to value; to set by. [Obs.] "I set not an haw of his proverbs." Chaucer. -- To set off. (a) To separate from a whole; to assign to a particular purpose; to portion off; as, to set off a portion of an estate. (b) To adorn; to decorate; to embellish. They . . . set off the worst faces with the best airs. Addison. (c) To give a flattering description of. -- To set off against, to place against as an equivalent; as, to set off one man's services against another's. -- To set on or upon. (a) To incite; to instigate. "Thou, traitor, hast set on thy wife to this." Shak. (b) To employ, as in a task. " Set on thy wife to observe." Shak. (c) To fix upon; to attach strongly to; as, to set one's heart or affections on some object. See definition 2, above. -- To set one's cap for. See under Cap, n. -- To set one's self against, to place one's self in a state of enmity or opposition to. -- To set one's teeth, to press them together tightly. -- To set on foot, to set going; to put in motion; to start. -- To set out. (a) To assign; to allot; to mark off; to limit; as, to set out the share of each proprietor or heir of an estate; to set out the widow's thirds. (b) To publish, as a proclamation. [Obs.] (c) To adorn; to embellish. An ugly woman, in rich habit set out with jewels, nothing can become. Dryden. (d) To raise, equip, and send forth; to furnish. [R.] The Venetians pretend they could set out, in case of great necessity, thirty men-of-war. Addison. (e) To show; to display; to recommend; to set off. I could set out that best side of Luther. Atterbury. (f) To show; to prove. [R.] "Those very reasons set out how heinous his sin was." Atterbury. (g) (Law) To recite; to state at large. -- To set over. (a) To appoint or constitute as supervisor, inspector, ruler, or commander. (b) To assign; to transfer; to convey. -- To set right, to correct; to put in order. -- To set sail. (Naut.) See under Sail, n. -- To set store by, to consider valuable. -- To set the fashion, to determine what shall be the fashion; to establish the mode. -- To set the teeth on edge, to affect the teeth with a disagreeable sensation, as when acids are brought in contact with them. -- To set the watch (Naut.), to place the starboard or port watch on duty. -- To set to, to attach to; to affix to. "He . . . hath set to his seal that God is true." John iii. 33. -- To set up. (a) To erect; to raise; to elevate; as, to set up a building, or a machine; to set up a post, a wall, a pillar. (b) Hence, to exalt; to put in power. "I will . . . set up the throne of David over Israel." 2 Sam. iii. 10. (c) To begin, as a new institution; to institute; to establish; to found; as, to set up a manufactory; to set up a school. (d) To enable to commence a new business; as, to set up a son in trade. (e) To place in view; as, to set up a mark. (f) To raise; to utter loudly; as, to set up the voice. I'll set up such a note as she shall hear. Dryden. (g) To advance; to propose as truth or for reception; as, to set up a new opinion or doctrine. T. Burnet. (h) To raise from depression, or to a sufficient fortune; as, this good fortune quite set him up. (i) To intoxicate. [Slang] (j) (Print.) To put in type; as, to set up copy; to arrange in words, lines, etc., ready for printing; as, to set up type. -- To set up the rigging (Naut.), to make it taut by means of tackles. R. H. Dana, Jr. Syn. -- See Put.  1. To pass below the horizon; to go down; to decline; to sink out of sight; to come to an end. Ere the weary sun set in the west. Shak. Thus this century sets with little mirth, and the next is likely to arise with more mourning. Fuller. 2. To fit music to words. [Obs.] Shak. 3. To place plants or shoots in the ground; to plant. "To sow dry, and set wet." Old Proverb. 4. To be fixed for growth; to strike root; to begin to germinate or form; as, cuttings set well; the fruit has set well (i. e., not blasted in the blossom). 5. To become fixed or rigid; to be fastened. A gathering and serring of the spirits together to resist, maketh the teeth to set hard one against another. Bacon. 6. To congeal; to concrete; to solidify. That fluid substance in a few minutes begins to set. Boyle. 7. To have a certain direction in motion; to flow; to move on; to tend; as, the current sets to the north; the tide sets to the windward. 8. To begin to move; to go out or forth; to start; -- now followed by out. The king is set from London. Shak. 9. To indicate the position of game; -- said of a dog; as, the dog sets well; also, to hunt game by the aid of a setter. 10. To apply one's self; to undertake earnestly; -- now followed by out. If he sets industriously and sincerely to perform the commands of Christ, he can have no ground of doubting but it shall prove successful to him. Hammond. 11. To fit or suit one; to sit; as, the coat sets well. Note: [Colloquially used, but improperly, for sit.] Note: The use of the verb set for sit in such expressions as, the hen is setting on thirteen eggs; a setting hen, etc., although colloquially common, and sometimes tolerated in serious writing, is not to be approved. To set about, to commence; to begin. -- To set forward, to move or march; to begin to march; to advance. -- To set forth, to begin a journey. -- To set in. (a) To begin; to enter upon a particular state; as, winter set in early. (b) To settle one's self; to become established. "When the weather was set in to be very bad." Addyson. (c) To flow toward the shore; -- said of the tide. -- To set off. (a) To enter upon a journey; to start. (b) (Typog.) To deface or soil the next sheet; -- said of the ink on a freshly printed sheet, when another sheet comes in contract with it before it has had time to dry. -- To set on or upon. (a) To begin, as a journey or enterprise; to set about. He that would seriously set upon the search of truth. Locke. (b) To assault; to make an attack. Bacon. Cassio hath here been set on in the dark. Shak. -- To set out, to begin a journey or course; as, to set out for London, or from London; to set out in business;to set out in life or the world. -- To set to, to apply one's self to. -- To set up. (a) To begin business or a scheme of life; as, to set up in trade; to set up for one's self. (b) To profess openly; to make pretensions. Those men who set up for mortality without regard to religion, are generally but virtuous in part. Swift.  1. Fixed in position; immovable; rigid; as, a set line; a set countenance. 2. Firm; unchanging; obstinate; as, set opinions or prejudices. 3. Regular; uniform; formal; as, a set discourse; a set battle. "The set phrase of peace." Shak. 4. Established; prescribed; as, set forms of prayer. 5. Adjusted; arranged; formed; adapted. Set hammer. (a) A hammer the head of which is not tightly fastened upon the handle, but may be reversed. Knight. (b) A hammer with a concave face which forms a die for shaping anything, as the end of a bolt, rivet, etc. -- Set line, a line to which a number of baited hooks are attached, and which, supported by floats and properly secured, may be left unguarded during the absence of the fisherman. -- Set nut, a jam nut or lock nut. See under Nut. -- Set screw (Mach.), a screw, sometimes cupped or printed at one end, and screwed through one part, as of a machine, tightly upon another part, to prevent the one from slipping upon the other. -- Set speech, a speech carefully prepared before it is delivered in public; a formal or methodical speech.  1. The act of setting, as of the sun or other heavenly body; descent; hence, the close; termination. "Locking at the set of day." Tennyson. The weary sun hath made a golden set. Shak. 2. That which is set, placed, or fixed. Specifically: -- (a) A young plant for growth; as, a set of white thorn. (b) That which is staked; a wager; a venture; a stake; hence, a game at venture. [Obs. or R.] We will in France, by God's grace, play a set Shall strike his father's crown into the hazard. Shak. That was but civil war, an equal set. Dryden. (c) (Mech.)  Permanent change of figure in consequence of excessive strain, as from compression, tension, bending, twisting, etc.; as, the set of a spring. (d) A kind of punch used for bending, indenting, or giving shape to, metal; as, a saw set. (e) (Pile Driving)  A piece placed temporarily upon the head of a pile when the latter cannot be reached by the weight, or hammer, except by means of such an intervening piece. [Often incorrectly written sett.] (f) (Carp.)  A short steel spike used for driving the head of a nail below the surface. 3. Etym: [Perhaps due to confusion with sect, sept.]  A number of things of the same kind, ordinarily used or classed together; a collection of articles which naturally complement each other, and usually go together; an assortment; a suit; as, a set of chairs, of china, of surgical or mathematical instruments, of books, etc. [In this sense, sometimes incorrectly written sett.] 4. A number of persons associated by custom, office, common opinion, quality, or the like; a division; a group; a clique. "Others of our set." Tennyson. This falls into different divisions, or sets, of nations connected under particular religions. R. P. Ward. 5. Direction or course; as, the set of the wind, or of a current. 6. In dancing, the number of persons necessary to execute a quadrille; also, the series of figures or movements executed. 7. The deflection of a tooth, or of the teeth, of a saw, which causes the the saw to cut a kerf, or make an opening, wider than the blade. 8. (a) A young oyster when first attached. (b) Collectively, the crop of young oysters in any locality. 9. (Tennis)  A series of as many games as may be necessary to enable one side to win six. If at the end of the tenth game the score is a tie, the set is usually called a deuce set, and decided by an application of the rules for playing off deuce in a game. See Deuce. 10. (Type Founding)  That dimension of the body of a type called by printers the width. Dead set. (a) The act of a setter dog when it discovers the game, and remains intently fixed in pointing it out. (b) A fixed or stationary condition arising from obstacle or hindrance; a deadlock; as, to be at a dead set. (c) A concerted scheme to defraud by gaming; a determined onset. -- To make a dead set, to make a determined onset, literally or figuratively. Syn. -- Collection; series; group. See Pair.
far: A young pig, or a litter of pigs.  1. Distant in any direction; not near; remote; mutually separated by a wide space or extent. They said, . . . We be come from a far country. Josh. ix. 6. The nations far and near contend in choice. Dryden. 2. Remote from purpose; contrary to design or wishes; as, far be it from me to justify cruelty. 3. Remote in affection or obedience; at a distance, morally or spiritually; t enmity with; alienated. They that are far from thee ahsll perish. Ps. lxxiii. 27. 4. Widely different in nature or quality; opposite in character. He was far from ill looking, though he thought himself still farther. F. Anstey. 5. The more distant of two; as, the far side (called also off side) of a horse, that is, the right side, or the one opposite to the rider when he mounts. Note: The distinction between the adjectival and adverbial use of far is sometimes not easily discriminated. By far, by much; by a great difference. -- Far between, with a long distance (of space or time) between; at long intervals. "The examinations are few and far between." Farrar.  1. To a great extent or distance of space; widely; as, we are separated far from each other. 2. To a great distance in time from any point; remotely; as, he pushed his researches far into antiquity. 3. In great part; as, the day is far spent. 4. In a great proportion; by many degrees; very much; deeply; greatly. Who can find a virtuous woman for her price is far above rubies. Prov. xxxi. 10. As far as, to the extent, or degree, that. See As far as, under As. -- Far off. (a) At a great distance, absolutely or relatively. (b) Distant in sympathy or affection; alienated. "But now, in Christ Jesus, ye who some time were far off are made nigh by the blood of Christ." Eph. ii. 13. -- Far other, different by a great degree; not the same; quite unlike. Pope. -- Far and near, at a distance and close by; throughout a whole region. -- Far and wide, distantly and broadly; comprehensively. "Far and wide his eye commands." Milton. -- From far, from a great distance; from a remote place. Note: Far often occurs in self-explaining compounds, such as far- extended, far-reaching, far-spread.
condition: 1. Mode or state of being; state or situation with regard to external circumstances or influences, or to physical or mental integrity, health, strength, etc.; predicament; rank; position, estate. I am in my condition A prince, Miranda; I do think, a king. Shak. And O, what man's condition can be worse Than his whom plenty starves and blessings curse Cowley. The new conditions of life. Darwin. 2. Essential quality; property; attribute. It seemed to us a condition and property of divine powers and beings to be hidden and unseen to others. Bacon. 3. Temperament; disposition; character. [Obs.] The condition of a saint and the complexion of a devil. Shak. 4. That which must exist as the occasion or concomitant of something else; that which is requisite in order that something else should take effect; an essential qualification; stipulation; terms specified. I had as lief take her dowry with this condition, to be whipped at the high cross every morning. Shak. Many are apt to believe remission of sins, but they believe it without the condition of repentance. Jer. Taylor. 5. (Law)  A clause in a contract, or agreement, which has for its object to suspend, to defeat, or in some way to modify, the principal obligation; or, in case of a will, to suspend, revoke, or modify a devise or bequest. It is also the case of a future uncertain event, which may or may not happen, and on the occurrence or non-occurrence of which, the accomplishment, recission, or modification of an obligation or testamentary disposition is made to depend. Blount. Tomlins. Bouvier. Wharton. Equation of condition. (Math.) See under Equation. -- On or Upon condition (that), used for if in introducing conditional sentences. "Upon condition thou wilt swear to pay him tribute . . . thou shalt be placed as viceroy under him." Shak. -- Conditions of sale, the terms on which it is proposed to sell property by auction; also, the instrument containing or expressing these terms. Syn. -- State; situation; circumstances; station; case; mode; plight; predicament; stipulation; qualification; requisite; article; provision; arrangement. See State.  1. To make terms; to stipulate. Pay me back my credit, And I'll condition with ye. Beau. & Fl. 2. (Metaph.)  To impose upon an object those relations or conditions without which knowledge and thought are alleged to be impossible. To think of a thing is to condition. Sir W. Hamilton.  1. To invest with, or limit by, conditions; to burden or qualify by a condition; to impose or be imposed as the condition of. Seas, that daily gain upon the shore, Have ebb and flow conditioning their march. Tennyson. 2. To contract; to stipulate; to agree. It was conditioned between Saturn and Titan, that Saturn should put to death all his male children. Sir W. Raleigh. 3. (U. S. Colleges)  To put under conditions; to require to pass a new examination or to make up a specified study, as a condition of remaining in one's class or in college; as, to condition a student who has failed in some branch of study. 4. To test or assay, as silk (to ascertain the proportion of moisture it contains). McElrath.  train; acclimate.
feet: See Foot.  Fact; performance. [Obs.]
write: 1. To set down, as legible characters; to form the conveyance of meaning; to inscribe on any material by a suitable instrument; as, to write the characters called letters; to write figures. 2. To set down for reading; to express in legible or intelligible characters; to inscribe; as, to write a deed; to write a bill of divorcement; hence, specifically, to set down in an epistle; to communicate by letter. Last night she enjoined me to write some lines to one she loves. Shak. I chose to write the thing I durst not speak To her I loved. Prior. 3. Hence, to compose or produce, as an author. I purpose to write the history of England from the accession of King James the Second down to a time within the memory of men still living. Macaulay. 4. To impress durably; to imprint; to engrave; as, truth written on the heart. 5. To make known by writing; to record; to prove by one's own written testimony; -- often used reflexively. He who writes himself by his own inscription is like an ill painter, who, by writing on a shapeless picture which he hath drawn, is fain to tell passengers what shape it is, which else no man could imagine. Milton. To write to, to communicate by a written document to. -- Written laws, laws deriving their force from express legislative enactment, as contradistinguished from unwritten, or common, law. See the Note under Law, and Common law, under Common, a.  1. To form characters, letters, or figures, as representative of sounds or ideas; to express words and sentences by written signs. Chaucer. So it stead you, I will write, Please you command. Shak. 2. To be regularly employed or occupied in writing, copying, or accounting; to act as clerk or amanuensis; as, he writes in one of the public offices. 3. To frame or combine ideas, and express them in written words; to play the author; to recite or relate in books; to compose. They can write up to the dignity and character of the authors. Felton. 4. To compose or send letters. He wrote for all the Jews that went out of his realm up into Jewry concerning their freedom. 1 Esdras iv. 49.
gather: 1. To bring together; to collect, as a number of separate things, into one place, or into one aggregate body; to assemble; to muster; to congregate. And Belgium's capital had gathered them Her beauty and her chivalry. Byron. When he had gathered all the chief priests and scribes of the people together. Matt. ii. 4. 2. To pick out and bring together from among what is of less value; to collect, as a harvest; to harvest; to cull; to pick off; to pluck. A rose just gathered from the stalk. Dryden. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or figs of thistles Matt. vii. 16. Gather us from among the heathen. Ps. cvi. 47. 3. To accumulate by collecting and saving little by little; to amass; to gain; to heap up. He that by usury and unjust gain increaseth his substance, he shall gather it for him that will pity the poor. Prov. xxviii. 8. To pay the creditor . . . he must gather up money by degrees. Locke. 4. To bring closely together the parts or particles of; to contract; to compress; to bring together in folds or plaits, as a garment; also, to draw together, as a piece of cloth by a thread; to pucker; to plait; as, to gather a ruffle. Gathering his flowing robe, he seemed to stand In act to speak, and graceful stretched his hand. Pope. 5. To derive, or deduce, as an inference; to collect, as a conclusion, from circumstances that suggest, or arguments that prove; to infer; to conclude. Let me say no moreGather the sequel by that went before. Shak. 6. To gain; to win. [Obs.] He gathers ground upon her in the chase. Dryden. 7. (Arch.)  To bring together, or nearer together, in masonry, as where the width of a fireplace is rapidly diminished to the width of the flue, or the like. 8. (Naut.)  To haul in; to take up; as, to gather the slack of a rope. To be gathered to one's people, or to one's fathers to die. Gen. xxv. 8. -- To gather breath, to recover normal breathing after being out of breath; to get breath; to rest. Spenser. -- To gather one's self together, to collect and dispose one's powers for a great effort, as a beast crouches preparatory to a leap. -- To gather way (Naut.), to begin to move; to move with increasing speed.  1. To come together; to collect; to unite; to become assembled; to congregate. When small humors gather to a gout. Pope. Tears from the depth of some divine despair Rise in the heart, and gather to the eyes. Tennyson. 2. To grow larger by accretion; to increase. Their snowball did not gather as it went. Bacon. 3. To concentrate; to come to a head, as a sore, and generate pus; as, a boil has gathered. 4. To collect or bring things together. Thou knewest that I reap where I sowed not, and gather where I have not strewed. Matt. xxv. 26.  1. A plait or fold in cloth, made by drawing a thread through it; a pucker. 2. (Carriage Making)  The inclination forward of the axle journals to keep the wheels from working outward. 3. (Arch.)  The soffit or under surface of the masonry required in gathering. See Gather, v. t., 7.
fear: A variant of Fere, a mate, a companion. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. A painful emotion or passion excited by the expectation of evil, or the apprehension of impending danger; apprehension; anxiety; solicitude; alarm; dread. Note: The degrees of this passion, beginning with the most moderate, may be thus expressed, -- apprehension, fear, dread, fright, terror. Fear is an uneasiness of the mind, upon the thought of future evil likely to befall us. Locke. Where no hope is left, is left no fear. Milton. 2. (Script.) (a) Apprehension of incurring, or solicitude to avoid, God's wrath; the trembling and awful reverence felt toward the Supreme Belng. (b) Respectful reverence for men of authority or worth. I will put my fear in their hearts. Jer. xxxii. 40. I will teach you the fear of the Lord. Ps. xxxiv. 11. render therefore to all their dues; tribute to whom tribute is due . . . fear to whom fear. Rom. xiii. 7. 3. That which causes, or which is the object of, apprehension or alarm; source or occasion of terror; danger; dreadfulness. There were they in great fear, where no fear was. Ps. liii. 5. The fear of your adventure would counsel you to a more equal enterprise. Shak. For fear, in apprehension lest. "For fear you ne'er see chain nor money more." Shak.  1. To feel a painful apprehension of; to be afraid of; to consider or expect with emotion of alarm or solicitude. I will fear no evil, for thou art with me. Ps. xxiii. 4. Note: With subordinate clause. I greatly fear my money is not safe. Shak. I almost fear to quit your hand. D. Jerrold. 2. To have a reverential awe of; to solicitous to avoid the displeasure of. Leave them to God above; him serve and fear. Milton. 3. To be anxious or solicitous for. [R.] The sins of the father are to be laid upon the children, therefore . . . I fear you. Shak. 4. To suspect; to doubt. [Obs.] Ay what else, fear you not her courage Shak. 5. To affright; to terrify; to drive away or prevent approach of by fear. z2 fera their people from doing evil. Robynsin (More's utopia). Tush, tush! fear boys with bugs. Shak. Syn. -- To apprehend; drad; reverence; venerate.  To be in apprehension of evil; to be afraid; to feel anxiety on account of some expected evil. I exceedingly fear and quake. Heb. xii. 21.
hunt: 1. To search for or follow after, as game or wild animals; to chase; to pursue for the purpose of catching or killing; to follow with dogs or guns for sport or exercise; as, to hunt a deer. Like a dog, he hunts in dreams. Tennyson. 2. To search diligently after; to seek; to pursue; to follow; -- often with out or up; as, to hunt up the facts; to hunt out evidence. Evil shall hunt the violent man to overthrow him. Ps. cxl. 11. 3. To drive; to chase; -- with down, from, away, etc.; as, to hunt down a criminal; he was hunted from the parish. 4. To use or manage in the chase, as hounds. He hunts a pack of dogs. Addison. 5. To use or traverse in pursuit of game; as, he hunts the woods, or the country.  1. To follow the chase; to go out in pursuit of game; to course with hounds. Esau went to the field to hunt for venison. Gen. xxvii. 5. 2. To seek; to pursue; to search; -- with for or after. He after honor hunts, I after love. Shak. To hunt counter, to trace the scent backward in hunting, as a hound to go back on one's steps. [Obs.] Shak.  1. The act or practice of chasing wild animals; chase; pursuit; search. The hunt is up; the morn is bright and gray. Shak. 2. The game secured in the hunt. [Obs.] Shak. 3. A pack of hounds. [Obs.] 4. An association of huntsmen. 5. A district of country hunted over. Every landowner within the hunt. London Field.
bright: See Brite, v. i.  1. Radiating or reflecting light; shedding or having much light; shining; luminous; not dark. The sun was bright o'erhead. Longfellow. The earth was dark, but the heavens were bright. Drake. The public places were as bright as at noonday. Macaulay. 2. Transmitting light; clear; transparent. From the brightest wines He 'd turn abhorrent. Thomson. 3. Having qualities that render conspicuous or attractive, or that affect the mind as light does the eye; resplendent with charms; as, bright beauty. Bright as an angel new-dropped from the sky. Parnell. 4. Having a clear, quick intellect; intelligent. 5. Sparkling with wit; lively; vivacious; shedding cheerfulness and joy around; cheerful; cheery. Be bright and jovial among your guests. Shak. 6. Illustrious; glorious. In the brightest annals of a female reign. Cotton. 7. Manifest to the mind, as light is to the eyes; clear; evident; plain. That he may with more ease, with brighter evidence, and with surer success, draw the bearner on. I. Watts. 8. Of brilliant color; of lively hue or appearance. Here the bright crocus and blue violet grew. Pope. Note: Bright is used in composition in the sense of brilliant, clear, sunny, etc.; as, bright-eyed, bright-haired, bright-hued. Syn. -- Shining; splending; luminous; lustrous; brilliant; resplendent; effulgent; refulgent; radiant; sparkling; glittering; lucid; beamy; clear; transparent; illustrious; witty; clear; vivacious; sunny.  Splendor; brightness. [Poetic] Dark with excessive bright thy skirts appear. Milton.  Brightly. Chaucer. I say it is the moon that shines so bright. Shak.  To be or become overripe, as wheat, barley, or hops. [Prov. Eng.]
least: Smallest, either in size or degree; shortest; lowest; most unimportant; as, the least insect; the least mercy; the least space. Note: Least is often used with the, as if a noun. I am the least of the apostles. 1 Cor. xv. 9. At least, or At the least, at the least estimate, consideration, chance, etc.; hence, at any rate; at all events; even. See However. He who tempts, though in vain, at least asperses The tempted with dishonor. Milton. Upon the mast they saw a young man, at least if he were a man, who sat as on horseback. Sir P. Sidney. -- In least, or In the least, in the least degree, manner, etc. "He that is unjust in the least is unjust also in much." Luke xvi. 10. -- Least squares (Math.), a method of deducing from a number of carefully made yet slightly discordant observations of a phenomenon the most probable values of the unknown quantities. Note: It takes as its fundamental principle that the most probable values are those which make the sum of the squares of the residual errors of the observation a minimum.  In the smallest or lowest degree; in a degree below all others; as, to reward those who least deserve it.  See Lest, conj. [Obs.] Spenser.
field: 1. Cleared land; land suitable for tillage or pasture; cultivated ground; the open country. 2. A piece of land of considerable size; esp., a piece inclosed for tillage or pasture. Fields which promise corn and wine. Byron. 3. A place where a battle is fought; also, the battle itself. In this glorious and well-foughten field. Shak. What though the field be lost Milton. 4. An open space; an extent; an expanse. Esp.: (a) Any blank space or ground on which figures are drawn or projected. (b) The space covered by an optical instrument at one view. Without covering, save yon field of stars. Shak. Ask of yonder argent fields above. Pope. 5. (Her.)  The whole surface of an escutcheon; also, so much of it is shown unconcealed by the different bearings upon it. See Illust. of Fess, where the field is represented as gules (red), while the fess is argent (silver). 6. An unresticted or favorable opportunity for action, operation, or achievement; province; room. Afforded a clear field for moral experiments. Macaulay. 7. A collective term for all the competitors in any outdoor contest or trial, or for all except the favorites in the betting. 8. (Baseball)  That part of the grounds reserved for the players which is outside of the diamond; -- called also outfield. Note: Field is often used adjectively in the sense of belonging to, or used in, the fields; especially with reference to the operations and equipments of an army during a campaign away from permanent camps and fortifications. In most cases such use of the word is sufficiently clear; as, field battery; field fortification; field gun; field hospital, etc. A field geologist, naturalist, etc., is one who makes investigations or collections out of doors. A survey uses a field book for recording field notes, i.e., measurment, observations, etc., made in field work (outdoor operations). A farmer or planter employs field hands, and may use a field roller or a field derrick. Field sports are hunting, fishing, athletic games, etc. Coal field (Geol.) See under Coal. -- Field artillery, light ordnance mounted on wheels, for the use of a marching army. -- Field basil (Bot.), a plant of the Mint family (Calamintha Acinos); -- called also basil thyme. -- Field colors (Mil.), small flags for marking out the positions for squadrons and battalions; camp colors. -- Field cricket (Zoöl.), a large European cricket (Gryllus campestric), remarkable for its loud notes. -- Field day. (a) A day in the fields. (b) (Mil.) A day when troops are taken into the field for instruction in evolutions. Farrow. (c) A day of unusual exertion or display; a gala day. -- Field driver, in New England, an officer charged with the driving of stray cattle to the pound. -- Field duck (Zoöl.), the little bustard (Otis tetrax), found in Southern Europe. -- Field glass. (Optics) (a) A binocular telescope of compact form; a lorgnette; a race glass. (b) A small achromatic telescope, from 20 to 24 inches long, and having 3 to 6 draws. (c) See Field lens. -- Field lark. (Zoöl.) (a) The skylark. (b) The tree pipit. -- Field lens (Optics), that one of the two lenses forming the eyepiece of an astronomical telescope or compound microscope which is nearer the object glass; -- called also field glass. -- Field madder (Bot.), a plant (Sherardia arvensis) used in dyeing. -- Field marshal (Mil.), the highest military rank conferred in the British and other European armies. -- Field mouse (Zoöl.), a mouse inhabiting fields, as the campagnol and the deer mouse. See Campagnol, and Deer mouse. -- Field officer (Mil.), an officer above the rank of captain and below that of general. -- Field officer's court (U.S.Army), a court-martial consisting of one field officer empowered to try all cases, in time of war, subject to jurisdiction of garrison and regimental courts. Farrow. -- Field plover (Zoöl.), the black-bellied plover (Charadrius squatarola); also sometimes applied to the Bartramian sandpiper (Bartramia longicauda). -- Field spaniel (Zoöl.), a small spaniel used in hunting small game. -- Field sparrow. (Zoöl.) (a) A small American sparrow (Spizella pusilla). (b) The hedge sparrow. [Eng.] -- Field staff (Mil.), a staff formerly used by gunners to hold a lighted match for discharging a gun. -- Field vole (Zoöl.), the European meadow mouse. -- Field of ice, a large body of floating ice; a pack. -- Field, or Field of view, in a telescope or microscope, the entire space within which objects are seen. -- Field magnet. see under Magnet. -- Magnetic field. See Magnetic. -- To back the field, or To bet on the field. See under Back, v. t. -- To keep the field. (a) (Mil.) To continue a campaign. (b) To maintain one's ground against all comers. -- To lay, or back, against the field, to bet on (a horse, etc.) against all comers. -- To take the field (Mil.), to enter upon a campaign.  1. To take the field. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. (Ball Playing)  To stand out in the field, ready to catch, stop, or throw the ball.  To catch, stop, throw, etc. (the ball), as a fielder.
cause: 1. That which produces or effects a result; that from which anything proceeds, and without which it would not exist. Cause is substance exerting its power into act, to make one thing begin to be. Locke. 2. That which is the occasion of an action or state; ground; reason; motive; as, cause for rejoicing. 3. Sake; interest; advantage. [Obs.] I did it not for his cause. 2 Cor. vii. 12. 4. (Law)  A suit or action in court; any legal process by which a party endeavors to obtain his claim, or what he regards as his right; case; ground of action. 5. Any subject of discussion or debate; matter; question; affair in general. What counsel give you in this weighty cause! Shak. 6. The side of a question, which is espoused, advocated, and upheld by a person or party; a principle which is advocated; that which a person or party seeks to attain. God befriend us, as our cause is just. Shak. The part they take against me is from zeal to the cause. Burke. Efficient cause, the agent or force that produces a change or redult. -- Final cause, the end, design, or object, for which anything is done. -- Formal cause, the elements of a conception which make the conception or the thing conceived to be what it is; or the idea viewed as a formative principle and coöperating with the matter. -- Material cause, that of which anything is made. -- Proximate cause. See under Proximate. -- To make common cause with, to join with in purposes and aims. Macaulay. Syn. -- Origin; source; mainspring; motive; reason; incitement; inducement; purpose; object; suit; action.  To effect as an agent; to produce; to be the occasion of; to bring about; to bring into existence; to make; -- usually followed by an infinitive, sometimes by that with a finite verb. I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty days. Gen. vii. 4. Cause that it be read also in the church of the Laodiceans. Col. iv. 16. Syn. -- To create; produce; beget; effect; occasion; originate; induce; bring about.  To assign or show cause; to give a reason; to make excuse. [Obs.] Spenser.  Abbreviation of Because. B. Jonson.
seat: 1. The place or thing upon which one sits; hence; anything made to be sat in or upon, as a chair, bench, stool, saddle, or the like. And Jesus . . . overthrew the tables of the money changers, and the seats of them that sold doves. Matt. xxi. 12. 2. The place occupied by anything, or where any person or thing is situated, resides, or abides; a site; an abode, a station; a post; a situation. Where thou dwellest, even where Satan's seat is. Rev. ii. 13. He that builds a fair house upon an ill seat committeth himself to prison. Bacon. A seat of plenty, content, and tranquillity. Macaulay. 3. That part of a thing on which a person sits; as, the seat of a chair or saddle; the seat of a pair of pantaloons. 4. A sitting; a right to sit; regular or appropriate place of sitting; as, a seat in a church; a seat for the season in the opera house. 5. Posture, or way of sitting, on horseback. She had so good a seat and hand she might be trusted with any mount. G. Eliot. 6. (Mach.)  A part or surface on which another part or surface rests; as, a valve seat. Seat worm (Zoöl.), the pinworm.  1. To place on a seat; to cause to sit down; as, to seat one's self. The guests were no sooner seated but they entered into a warm debate. Arbuthnot. 2. To cause to occupy a post, site, situation, or the like; to station; to establish; to fix; to settle. Thus high . . . is King Richard seated. Shak. They had seated themselves in New Guiana. Sir W. Raleigh. 3. To assign a seat to, or the seats of; to give a sitting to; as, to seat a church, or persons in a church. 4. To fix; to set firm. From their foundations, loosening to and fro, They plucked the seated hills. Milton. 5. To settle; to plant with inhabitants; as to seat a country. [Obs.] W. Stith. 6. To put a seat or bottom in; as, to seat a chair.  To rest; to lie down. [Obs.] Spenser.
usual: Such as is in common use; such as occurs in ordinary practice, or in the ordinary course of events; customary; ordinary; habitual; common. Consultation with oracles was a thing very usual and frequent in their times. Hooker. We can make friends of these usual enemies. Baxter. -- U"su*al*ly, adv. -- U"su*al*ness, n.
grew: imp. of Grow.
mine: See Mien. [Obs.]  Belonging to me; my. Used as a pronominal to me; my. Used as a pronominal adjective in the predicate; as, "Vengeance is mine; I will repay." Rom. xii. 19. Also, in the old style, used attributively, instead of my, before a noun beginning with a vowel. I kept myself from mine iniquity. Ps. xviii. 23. Note: Mine is often used absolutely, the thing possessed being understood; as, his son is in the army, mine in the navy. When a man deceives me once, says the Italian proverb, it is his fault; when twice, it is mine. Bp. Horne. This title honors me and mine. Shak. She shall have me and mine. Shak.  1. To dig a mine or pit in the earth; to get ore, metals, coal, or precious stones, out of the earth; to dig in the earth for minerals; to dig a passage or cavity under anything in order to overthrow it by explosives or otherwise. 2. To form subterraneous tunnel or hole; to form a burrow or lodge in the earth; as, the mining cony.  1. To dig away, or otherwise remove, the substratum or foundation of; to lay a mine under; to sap; to undermine; hence, to ruin or destroy by slow degrees or secret means. They mined the walls. Hayward. Too lazy to cut down these immense trees, the spoilers... had mined them, and placed a quantity of gunpowder in the cavity. Sir W. Scott. 2. To dig into, for ore or metal. Lead veins have been traced... but they have not been mined. Ure. 3. To get, as metals, out of the earth by digging. The principal ore mined there is the bituminous cinnabar. Ure.  1. A subterranean cavity or passage; especially: (a) A pit or excavation in the earth, from which metallic ores, precious stones, coal, or other mineral substances are taken by digging; -- distinguished from the pits from which stones for architectural purposes are taken, and which are called quarries. (b) (Mil.) A cavity or tunnel made under a fortification or other work, for the purpose of blowing up the superstructure with some explosive agent. 2. Any place where ore, metals, or precious stones are got by digging or washing the soil; as, a placer mine.gold mine 3. Fig.: A rich source of wealth or other good. Shak. Mine dial, a form of magnetic compass used by miners. -- Mine pig, pig iron made wholly from ore; in distinction from cinder pig, which is made from ore mixed with forge or mill cinder. Raymond.
bar: 1. A piece of wood, metal, or other material, long in proportion to its breadth or thickness, used as a lever and for various other purposes, but especially for a hindrance, obstruction, or fastening; as, the bars of a fence or gate; the bar of a door. Thou shalt make bars of shittim wood. Ex. xxvi. 26. 2. An indefinite quantity of some substance, so shaped as to be long in proportion to its breadth and thickness; as, a bar of gold or of lead; a bar of soap. 3. Anything which obstructs, hinders, or prevents; an obstruction; a barrier. Must I new bars to my own joy create Dryden. 4. A bank of sand, gravel, or other matter, esp. at the mouth of a river or harbor, obstructing navigation. 5. Any railing that divides a room, or office, or hall of assembly, in order to reserve a space for those having special privileges; as, the bar of the House of Commons. 6. (Law) (a) The railing that incloses the place which counsel occupy in courts of justice. Hence, the phrase at the bar of the court signifies in open court. (b) The place in court where prisoners are stationed for arraignment, trial, or sentence. (c) The whole body of lawyers licensed in a court or district; the legal profession. (d) A special plea constituting a sufficient answer to plaintiff's action. 7. Any tribunal; as, the bar of public opinion; the bar of God. 8. A barrier or counter, over which liquors and food are passed to customers; hence, the portion of the room behind the counter where liquors for sale are kept. 9. (Her.)  An ordinary, like a fess but narrower, occupying only one fifth part of the field. 10. A broad shaft, or band, or stripe; as, a bar of light; a bar of color. 11. (Mus.)  A vertical line across the staff. Bars divide the staff into spaces which represent measures, and are themselves called measures. Note: A double bar marks the end of a strain or main division of a movement, or of a whole piece of music; in psalmody, it marks the end of a line of poetry. The term bar is very often loosely used for measure, i.e., for such length of music, or of silence, as is included between one bar and the next; as, a passage of eight bars; two bars' rest. 12. (Far.) pl. (a) The space between the tusks and grinders in the upper jaw of a horse, in which the bit is placed. (b) The part of the crust of a horse's hoof which is bent inwards towards the frog at the heel on each side, and extends into the center of the sole. 13. (Mining) (a) A drilling or tamping rod. (b) A vein or dike crossing a lode. 14. (Arch.) (a) A gatehouse of a castle or fortified town. (b) A slender strip of wood which divides and supports the glass of a window; a sash bar. Bar shoe (Far.), a kind of horseshoe having a bar across the usual opening at the heel, to protect a tender frog from injury. -- Bar shot, a double headed shot, consisting of a bar, with a ball or half ball at each end; -- formerly used for destroying the masts or rigging in naval combat. -- Bar sinister (Her.), a term popularly but erroneously used for baton, a mark of illegitimacy. See Baton. -- Bar tracery (Arch.), ornamental stonework resembling bars of iron twisted into the forms required. -- Blank bar (Law). See Blank. -- Case at bar (Law), a case presently before the court; a case under argument. -- In bar of, as a sufficient reason against; to prevent. -- Matter in bar, or Defence in bar, a plea which is a final defense in an action. -- Plea in bar, a plea which goes to bar or defeat the plaintiff's action absolutely and entirely. -- Trial at bar (Eng. Law), a trial before all the judges of one the superior courts of Westminster, or before a quorum representing the full court.  1. To fasten with a bar; as, to bar a door or gate. 2. To restrict or confine, as if by a bar; to hinder; to obstruct; to prevent; to prohibit; as, to bar the entrance of evil; distance bars our intercourse; the statute bars my right; the right is barred by time; a release bars the plaintiff's recovery; -- sometimes with up. He barely looked the idea in the face, and hastened to bar it in its dungeon. Hawthorne. 3. To except; to exclude by exception. Nay, but I bar to-night: you shall not gauge me By what we do to- night. Shak. 4. To cross with one or more stripes or lines. For the sake of distinguishing the feet more clearly, I have barred them singly. Burney.
put: A pit. [Obs.] Chaucer.  3d pers. sing. pres. of Put, contracted from putteth. Chaucer.  A rustic; a clown; an awkward or uncouth person. Queer country puts extol Queen Bess's reign. Bramston. What droll puts the citizens seem in it all. F. Harrison.  1. To move in any direction; to impel; to thrust; to push; -- nearly obsolete, except with adverbs, as with by (to put by = to thrust aside; to divert); or with forth (to put forth = to thrust out). His chief designs are . . . to put thee by from thy spiritual employment. Jer. Taylor. 2. To bring to a position or place; to place; to lay; to set; figuratively, to cause to be or exist in a specified relation, condition, or the like; to bring to a stated mental or moral condition; as, to put one in fear; to put a theory in practice; to put an enemy to fight. This present dignity, In which that I have put you. Chaucer. I will put enmity between thee and the woman. Gen. iii. 15. He put no trust in his servants. Job iv. 18. When God into the hands of their deliverer Puts invincible might. Milton. In the mean time other measures were put in operation. Sparks. 3. To attach or attribute; to assign; as, to put a wrong construction on an act or expression. 4. To lay down; to give up; to surrender. [Obs.] No man hath more love than this, that a man put his life for his friends. Wyclif (John xv. 13). 5. To set before one for judgment, acceptance, or rejection; to bring to the attention; to offer; to state; to express; figuratively, to assume; to suppose; -- formerly sometimes followed by that introducing a proposition; as, to put a question; to put a case. Let us now put that ye have leave. Chaucer. Put the perception and you put the mind. Berkeley. These verses, originally Greek, were put in Latin. Milton. All this is ingeniously and ably put. Hare. 6. To incite; to entice; to urge; to constrain; to oblige. These wretches put us upon all mischief. Swift. Put me not use the carnal weapon in my own defense. Sir W. Scott. Thank him who puts me, loath, to this revenge. Milton. 7. To throw or cast with a pushing motion "overhand," the hand being raised from the shoulder; a practice in athletics; as, to put the shot or weight. 8. (Mining)  To convey coal in the mine, as from the working to the tramway. Raymond. Put case, formerly, an elliptical expression for, put or suppose the case to be. Put case that the soul after departure from the body may live. Bp. Hall. -- To put about (Naut.), to turn, or change the course of, as a ship. -- To put away. (a) To renounce; to discard; to expel. (b) To divorce. -- To put back. (a) To push or thrust backwards; hence, to hinder; to delay. (b) To refuse; to deny. Coming from thee, I could not put him back. Shak. (c) To set, as the hands of a clock, to an earlier hour. (d) To restore to the original place; to replace. -- To put by. (a) To turn, set, or thrust, aside. "Smiling put the question by." Tennyson. (b) To lay aside; to keep; to sore up; as, to put by money. -- To put down. (a) To lay down; to deposit; to set down. (b) To lower; to diminish; as, to put down prices. (c) To deprive of position or power; to put a stop to; to suppress; to abolish; to confute; as, to put down rebellion of traitors. Mark, how a plain tale shall put you down. Shak. Sugar hath put down the use of honey. Bacon. (d) To subscribe; as, to put down one's name. -- To put forth. (a) To thrust out; to extend, as the hand; to cause to come or push out; as, a tree puts forth leaves. (b) To make manifest; to develop; also, to bring into action; to exert; as, to put forth strength. (c) To propose, as a question, a riddle, and the like. (d) To publish, as a book. -- To put forward. (a) To advance to a position of prominence responsibility; to promote. (b) To cause to make progress; to aid. (c) To set, as the hands of a clock, to a later hour. -- To put in. (a) To introduce among others; to insert; sometimes, to introduce with difficulty; as, to put in a word while others are discoursing. (b) (Naut.) To conduct into a harbor, as a ship. (c) (Law) To place in due form before a court; to place among the records of a court. Burrill. (d) (Med.) To restore, as a dislocated part, to its place. -- To put off. (a) To lay aside; to discard; as, to put off a robe; to put off mortality. "Put off thy shoes from off thy feet." Ex. iii. 5. (b) To turn aside; to elude; to disappoint; to frustrate; to baffle. I hoped for a demonstration, but Themistius hoped to put me off with an harangue. Boyle. We might put him off with this answer. Bentley. (c) To delay; to defer; to postpone; as, to put off repentance. (d) To get rid of; to dispose of; especially, to pass fraudulently; as, to put off a counterfeit note, or an ingenious theory. (e) To push from land; as, to put off a boat. -- To put on or upon. (a) To invest one's self with, as clothes; to assume. "Mercury . . . put on the shape of a man." L'Estrange. (b) To impute (something) to; to charge upon; as, to put blame on or upon another. (c) To advance; to promote. [Obs.] "This came handsomely to put on the peace." Bacon. (d) To impose; to inflict. "That which thou puttest on me, will I bear." 2 Kings xviii. 14. (e) To apply; as, to put on workmen; to put on steam. (f) To deceive; to trick. "The stork found he was put upon." L'Estrange. (g) To place upon, as a means or condition; as, he put him upon bread and water. "This caution will put them upon considering." Locke. (h) (Law) To rest upon; to submit to; as, a defendant puts himself on or upon the country. Burrill. -- To put out. (a) To eject; as, to put out and intruder. (b) To put forth; to shoot, as a bud, or sprout. (c) To extinguish; as, to put out a candle, light, or fire. (d) To place at interest; to loan; as, to put out funds. (e) To provoke, as by insult; to displease; to vex; as, he was put out by my reply. [Colloq.] (f) To protrude; to stretch forth; as, to put out the hand. (g) To publish; to make public; as, to put out a pamphlet. (h) To confuse; to disconcert; to interrupt; as, to put one out in reading or speaking. (i) (Law) To open; as, to put out lights, that is, to open or cut windows. Burrill. (j) (Med.) To place out of joint; to dislocate; as, to put out the ankle. (k) To cause to cease playing, or to prevent from playing longer in a certain inning, as in base ball. -- To put over. (a) To place (some one) in authority over; as, to put a general over a division of an army. (b) To refer. For the certain knowledge of that knowledge of that truthput you o'er to heaven and to my mother. Shak. (c) To defer; to postpone; as, the court put over the cause to the next term. (d) To transfer (a person or thing) across; as, to put one over the river. -- To put the hand to or unto. (a) To take hold of, as of an instrument of labor; as, to put the hand to the plow; hence, to engage in (any task or affair); as, to put one's hand to the work. (b) To take or seize, as in theft. "He hath not put his hand unto his neighbor's goods." Ex. xxii. 11. -- To put through, to cause to go through all conditions or stages of a progress; hence, to push to completion; to accomplish; as, he put through a measure of legislation; he put through a railroad enterprise. [U.S.] -- To put to. (a) To add; to unite; as, to put one sum to another. (b) To refer to; to expose; as, to put the safety of the state to hazard. "That dares not put it to the touch." Montrose. (c) To attach (something) to; to harness beasts to. Dickens. -- To put to a stand, to stop; to arrest by obstacles or difficulties. -- To put to bed. (a) To undress and place in bed, as a child. (b) To deliver in, or to make ready for, childbirth. -- To put to death, to kill. -- To put together, to attach; to aggregate; to unite in one. -- To put this and that (or two and two) together, to draw an inference; to form a correct conclusion. -- To put to it, to distress; to press hard; to perplex; to give difficulty to. "O gentle lady, do not put me to 't." Shak. -- To put to rights, to arrange in proper order; to settle or compose rightly. -- To put to the sword, to kill with the sword; to slay. -- To put to trial, or on trial, to bring to a test; to try. -- To put trust in, to confide in; to repose confidence in. -- To put up. (a) To pass unavenged; to overlook; not to punish or resent; to put up with; as, to put up indignities. [Obs.] "Such national injuries are not to be put up." Addison. (b) To send forth or upward; as, to put up goods for sale. (d) To start from a cover, as game. "She has been frightened; she has been put up." C. Kingsley. (e) To hoard. "Himself never put up any of the rent." Spelman. (f) To lay side or preserve; to pack away; to store; to pickle; as, to put up pork, beef, or fish. (g) To place out of sight, or away; to put in its proper place; as, put up that letter. Shak. (h) To incite; to instigate; -- followed by to; as, he put the lad up to mischief. (i) To raise; to erect; to build; as, to put up a tent, or a house. (j) To lodge; to entertain; as, to put up travelers. -- To put up a job, to arrange a plot. [Slang] Syn. -- To place; set; lay; cause; produce; propose; state. -- Put, Lay, Place, Set. These words agree in the idea of fixing the position of some object, and are often used interchangeably. To put is the least definite, denoting merely to move to a place. To place has more particular reference to the precise location, as to put with care in a certain or proper place. To set or to lay may be used when there is special reference to the position of the object.  1. To go or move; as, when the air first puts up. [Obs.] Bacon. 2. To steer; to direct one's course; to go. His fury thus appeased, he puts to land. Dryden. 3. To play a card or a hand in the game called put. To put about (Naut.), to change direction; to tack. -- To put back (Naut.), to turn back; to return. "The French . . . had put back to Toulon." Southey. -- To put forth. (a) To shoot, bud, or germinate. "Take earth from under walls where nettles put forth." Bacon. (b) To leave a port or haven, as a ship. Shak. -- To put in (Naut.), to enter a harbor; to sail into port. -- To put in for. (a) To make a request or claim; as, to put in for a share of profits. (b) To go into covert; -- said of a bird escaping from a hawk. (c) To offer one's self; to stand as a candidate for. Locke. -- To put off, to go away; to depart; esp., to leave land, as a ship; to move from the shore. -- To put on, to hasten motion; to drive vehemently. -- To put over (Naut.), to sail over or across. -- To put to sea (Naut.), to set sail; to begin a voyage; to advance into the ocean. -- To put up. (a) To take lodgings; to lodge. (b) To offer one's self as a candidate. L'Estrange. -- To put up to, to advance to. [Obs.] "With this he put up to my lord." Swift. -- To put up with. (a) To overlook, or suffer without recompense, punishment, or resentment; as, to put up with an injury or affront. (b) To take without opposition or expressed dissatisfaction; to endure; as, to put up with bad fare.  1. The act of putting; an action; a movement; a thrust; a push; as, the put of a ball. "A forced put." L'Estrange. 2. A certain game at cards. Young. 3. A privilege which one party buys of another to "put" (deliver) to him a certain amount of stock, grain, etc., at a certain price and date. [Brokers' Cant] A put and a call may be combined in one instrument, the holder of which may either buy or sell as he chooses at the fixed price. Johnson's Cyc.  A prostitute. [Obs.]
meat: 1. Food, in general; anything eaten for nourishment, either by man or beast. Hence, the edible part of anything; as, the meat of a lobster, a nut, or an egg. Chaucer. And God said, Behold, I have given you every herb bearing seed, . . . to you it shall be for meat. Gen. i. 29. Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you. Gen. ix. 3. 2. The flesh of animals used as food; esp., animal muscle; as, a breakfast of bread and fruit without meat. 3. Specifically, dinner; the chief meal. [Obs.] Chaucer. Meat biscuit. See under Biscuit. -- Meat earth (Mining), vegetable mold. Raymond. -- Meat fly. (Zoöl.) See Flesh fly, under Flesh. -- Meat offering (Script.), an offering of food, esp. of a cake made of flour with salt and oil. -- To go to meat, to go to a meal. [Obs.] -- To sit at meat, to sit at the table in taking food.  To supply with food. [Obs.] Tusser. His shield well lined, his horses meated well. Chapman.
special: 1. Of or pertaining to a species; constituting a species or sort. A special is called by the schools a "species". I. Watts. 2. Particular; peculiar; different from others; extraordinary; uncommon. Our Savior is represented everywhere in Scripture as the special patron of the poor and the afficted. Atterbury. To this special evil an improvement of style would apply a special redress. De Quincey. 3. Appropriate; designed for a particular purpose, occasion, or person; as, a special act of Parliament or of Congress; a special sermon. 4. Limited in range; confined to a definite field of action, investigation, or discussion; as, a special dictionary of commercial terms; a special branch of study. 5. Chief in excellence. [Obs.] The king hath drawn The special head of all the land together. Shak. Special administration (Law), an administration limited to certain specified effects or acts, or one granted during a particular time or the existence of a special cause, as during a controversy respecting the probate of a will, or the right of administration, etc. -- Special agency, an agency confined to some particular matter. -- Special bail, Bail above, or Bail to the action (Law), sureties who undertake that, if the defendant is convicted, he shall satisfy the plaintiff, or surrender himself into custody. Tomlins. Wharton (Law Dict.). -- Special constable. See under Constable. Bouvier. -- Special damage (Law), a damage resulting from the act complained of, as a natural, but not the necessary, consequence of it. -- Special demurrer (Law), a demurrer for some defect of form in the opposite party pleading, in which the cause of demurrer is particularly stated. -- Special deposit, a deposit made of a specific thing to be kept distinct from others. -- Special homology. (Biol.) See under Homology. -- Special injuction (Law), an injuction granted on special grounds, arising of the circumstances of the case. Daniell. -- Special issue (Law), an issue produced upon a special plea. Stephen. -- Special jury (Law), a jury consisting of persons of some particular calling, station, or qualification, which is called upon motion of either party when the cause is supposed to require it; a struck jury. -- Special orders (Mil.), orders which do not concern, and are not published to, the whole command, such as those relating to the movement of a particular corps, a detail, a temporary camp, etc. -- Special partner, a limited partner; a partner with a limited or restricted responsibility; -- unknown at common law. -- Special partnership, a limited or particular partnership; -- a term sometimes applied to a partnership in a particular business, operation, or adventure. -- Special plea in bar (Law), a plea setting forth particular and new matter, distinguished from the general issue. Bouvier. -- Special pleader (Law), originally, a counsel who devoted himself to drawing special counts and pleas; in a wider sense, a lawyer who draws pleadings. -- Special pleading (Law), the allegation of special or new matter, as distingiushed from a direct denial of matter previously alleged on the side. Bouvier. The popular denomination of the whole science of pleading. Stephen. The phrase is sometimes popularly applied to the specious, but unsound, argumentation of one whose aim is victory, and not truth. Burrill. -- Special property (Law), a qualified or limited ownership possession, as in wild animals, things found or bailed. -- Special session, an extraordinary session; a session at an unusual time or for an unusual purpose; as, a special session of Congress or of a legislature. -- Special statute, or Special law, an act of the legislature which has reference to a particular person, place, or interest; -- in distinction from a general law. -- Special verdict (Law), a special finding of the facts of the case, leaving to the court the application of the law to them. Wharton (Law Dict.). Syn. -- Peculiar; appropriate; specific; dictinctive; particular; exceptional; singular. See Peculiar.  1. A particular. [Obs.] Hammond. 2. One appointed for a special service or occasion. In special, specially; in particular. Chaucer.
metal: 1. (Chem.)  An elementary substance, as sodium, calcium, or copper, whose oxide or hydroxide has basic rather than acid properties, as contrasted with the nonmetals, or metalloids. No sharp line can be drawn between the metals and nonmetals, and certain elements partake of both acid and basic qualities, as chromium, manganese, bismuth, etc. Note: Popularly, the name is applied to certain hard, fusible metals, as gold, silver, copper, iron, tin, lead, zinc, nickel, etc., and also to the mixed metals, or metallic alloys, as brass, bronze, steel, bell metal, etc. 2. Ore from which a metal is derived; -- so called by miners. Raymond. 3. A mine from which ores are taken. [Obs.] Slaves . . . and persons condemned to metals. Jer. Taylor. 4. The substance of which anything is made; material; hence, constitutional disposition; character; temper. Not till God make men of some other metal than earth. Shak. 5. Courage; spirit; mettle. See Mettle. Shak. Note: The allusion is to the temper of the metal of a sword blade. Skeat. 6. The broken stone used in macadamizing roads and ballasting railroads. 7. The effective power or caliber of guns carried by a vessel of war. 8. Glass in a state of fusion. Knight. 9. pl.  The rails of a railroad. [Eng.] Base metal (Chem.), any one of the metals, as iron, lead, etc., which are readily tarnished or oxidized, in contrast with the noble metals. In general, a metal of small value, as compared with gold or silver. -- Fusible metal (Metal.), a very fusible alloy, usually consisting of bismuth with lead, tin, or cadmium. -- Heavy metals (Chem.), the metallic elements not included in the groups of the alkalies, alkaline earths, or the earths; specifically, the heavy metals, as gold, mercury, platinum, lead, silver, etc. -- Light metals (Chem.), the metallic elements of the alkali and alkaline earth groups, as sodium, lithium, calcium, magnesium, etc.; also, sometimes, the metals of the earths, as aluminium. -- Muntz metal, an alloy for sheathing and other purposes, consisting of about sixty per cent of copper, and forty of zinc. Sometimes a little lead is added. It is named from the inventor. -- Prince's metal (Old Chem.), an alloy resembling brass, consisting of three parts of copper to one of zinc; -- also called Prince Rupert's metal.  To cover with metal; as, to metal a ship's bottom; to metal a road.
one: 1. Being a single unit, or entire being or thing, and no more; not multifold; single; individual. The dream of Pharaoh is one. Gen. xli. 25. O that we now had here But one ten thousand of those men in England. Shak. 2. Denoting a person or thing conceived or spoken of indefinitely; a certain. "I am the sister of one Claudio" [Shak.], that is, of a certain man named Claudio. 3. Pointing out a contrast, or denoting a particular thing or person different from some other specified; -- used as a correlative adjective, with or without the. From the one side of heaven unto the other. Deut. iv. 32. 4. Closely bound together; undivided; united; constituting a whole. The church is therefore one, though the members may be many. Bp. Pearson 5. Single in kind; the same; a common. One plague was on you all, and on your lords. 1 Sam. vi. 4. 6. Single; inmarried. [Obs.] Men may counsel a woman to be one. Chaucer. Note: One is often used in forming compound words, the meaning of which is obvious; as, one-armed, one-celled, one-eyed, one-handed, one-hearted, one-horned, one-idead, one-leaved, one-masted, one- ribbed, one-story, one-syllable, one-stringed, one-winged, etc. All one, of the same or equal nature, or consequence; as, he says that it is all one what course you take. Shak. -- One day. (a) On a certain day, not definitely specified, referring to time past. One day when Phoebe fair, With all her band, was following the chase. Spenser. (b) Referring to future time: At some uncertain day or period; some day. Well, I will marry one day. Shak.  1. A single unit; as, one is the base of all numbers. 2. A symbol representing a unit, as 1, or i. 3. A single person or thing. "The shining ones." Bunyan. "Hence, with your little ones." Shak. He will hate the one, and love the other. Matt. vi. 24. That we may sit, one on thy right hand, and the other on thy left hand, in thy glory. Mark x. 37. After one, after one fashion; alike. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- At one, in agreement or concord. See At one, in the Vocab. -- Ever in one, continually; perpetually; always. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- In one, in union; in a single whole. -- One and one, One by one, singly; one at a time; one after another."Raising one by one the suppliant crew." Dryden.  Any person, indefinitely; a person or body; as, what one would have well done, one should do one's self. It was well worth one's while. Hawthorne. Against this sort of condemnation one must steel one's self as one best can. G. Eliot. Note: One is often used with some, any, no, each, every, such, a, many a, another, the other, etc. It is sometimes joined with another, to denote a reciprocal relation. When any one heareth the word. Matt. xiii. 19. She knew every one who was any one in the land of Bohemia. Compton Reade. The Peloponnesians and the Athenians fought against one another. Jowett (Thucyd. ). The gentry received one another. Thackeray.  To cause to become one; to gather into a single whole; to unite; to assimilite. [Obs.] The rich folk that embraced and oned all their heart to treasure of the world. Chaucer.
told: imp. & p. p. of Tell.
hot: of Hote. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. Having much sensible heat; exciting the feeling of warmth in a great degree; very warm; -- opposed to cold, and exceeding warm in degree; as, a hot stove; hot water or air. "A hotvenison pasty." Shak. 2. Characterized by heat, ardor, or animation; easily excited; firely; vehement; passionate; violent; eager. Achilles is impatient, hot, and revengeful. Dryden. There was mouthing in hot haste. Byron. 3. Lustful; lewd; lecherous. Shak. 4. Acrid; biting; pungent; as, hot as mustard. Hot bed (Iron Manuf.), an iron platform in a rolling mill, on which hot bars, rails, etc., are laid to cool. -- Hot wall (Gardening), a wall provided with flues for the conducting of heat, to hasten the growth of fruit trees or the ripening of fruit. -- Hot well (Condensing Engines), a receptacle for the hot water drawn from the condenser by the air pump. This water is returned to the boiler, being drawn from the hot well by the feed pump. -- In hot water (Fig.), in trouble; in difficulties. [Colloq.] Syn. -- Burning; fiery; fervid; glowing; eager; animated; brisk; vehement; precipitate; violent; furious; ardent; fervent; impetuous; irascible; passionate; hasty; excitable.
clear: 1. Free from opaqueness; transparent; bright; light; luminous; unclouded. The stream is so transparent, pure, and clear. Denham. Fair as the moon, clear as the sun. Canticles vi. 10. 2. Free from ambiquity or indistinctness; lucid; perspicuous; plain; evident; manifest; indubitable. One truth is clear; whatever is, is right. Pop 3. Able to perceive clearly; keen; acute; penetrating; discriminating; as, a clear intellect; a clear head. Mother of science! now I feel thy power Within me clear, not only to discern Things in their causes, but to trace the ways Of highest agents. Milton. 4. Not clouded with passion; serene; cheerful. With a countenance as clear As friendship wears at feasts. Shak. 5. Easily or distinctly heard; audible; canorous. Hark! the numbers soft and clear Gently steal upon the ear. Pope. 6. Without mixture; entirely pure; as, clear sand. 7. Without defect or blemish, such as freckles or knots; as, a clear complexion; clear lumber. 8. Free from guilt or stain; unblemished. Statesman, yet friend to truth! in soul sincere, In action faithful, and in honor clear. Pope. 9. Without diminution; in full; net; as, clear profit. I often wished that I had clear, For life, six hundred pounds a-year. Swift . 10. Free from impediment or obstruction; unobstructed; as, a clear view; to keep clear of debt. My companion . . . left the way clear for him. Addison. 11. Free from embarrassment; detention, etc. The cruel corporal whispered in my ear, Five pounds, if rightly tipped, would set me clear. Gay. Clear breach. See under Breach, n., 4. -- Clear days (Law.), days reckoned from one day to another, excluding both the first and last day; as, from Sunday to Sunday there are six clear days. -- Clear stuff, boards, planks, etc., free from knots. Syn. -- Manifest; pure; unmixed; pellucid; transparent; luminous; obvious; visible; plain; evident; apparent; distinct; perspicuous. See Manifest.  Full extent; distance between extreme limits; especially; the distance between the nearest surfaces of two bodies, or the space between walls; as, a room ten feet square in the clear.  1. In a clear manner; plainly. Now clear I understand What oft . . . thoughts have searched in vain. Milton. 2. Without limitation; wholly; quite; entirely; as, to cut a piece clear off.  1. To render bright, transparent, or undimmed; to free from clouds. He sweeps the skies and clears the cloudy north. Dryden. 2. To free from impurities; to clarify; to cleanse. 3. To free from obscurity or ambiguity; to relive of perplexity; to make perspicuous. Many knotty points there are Which all discuss, but few can clear. Prior. 4. To render more quick or acute, as the understanding; to make perspicacious. Our common prints would clear up their understandings. Addison 5. To free from impediment or incumbrance, from defilement, or from anything injurious, useless, or offensive; as, to clear land of trees or brushwood, or from stones; to clear the sight or the voice; to clear one's self from debt; -- often used with of, off, away, or out. Clear your mind of cant. Dr. Johnson. A statue lies hid in a block of marble; and the art of the statuary only clears away the superfluous matter. Addison. 6. To free from the imputation of guilt; to justify, vindicate, or acquit; -- often used with from before the thing imputed. I . . . am sure he will clear me from partiality. Dryden. How! wouldst thou clear rebellion Addison. 7. To leap or pass by, or over, without touching or fallure; as, to clear a hedge; to clear a reef. 8. To gain without deduction; to net. The profit which she cleared on the cargo. Macaulay. To clear a ship at the customhouse, to exhibit the documents required by law, give bonds, or perform other acts requisite, and procure a permission to sail, and such papers as the law requires. -- To clear a ship for action, or To clear for action (Naut.), to remove incumbrances from the decks, and prepare for an engagement. -- To clear the land (Naut.), to gain such a distance from shore as to have sea room, and be out of danger from the land. -- To clear hawse (Naut.), to disentangle the cables when twisted. -- To clear up, to explain; to dispel, as doubts, cares or fears.  1. To become free from clouds or fog; to become fair; -- often fallowed by up, off, or away. So foul a sky clears without a strom. Shak. Advise him to stay till the weather clears up. Swift. 2. To disengage one's self frpm incumbrances, distress, or entanglements; to become free. [He that clears at once will relapse; for finding himself out of straits, he will revert to the customs; but he that cleareth by degrees induceth a habit of frugality. Bacon. 3. (Banking)  To make exchanges of checks and bills, and settle balances, as is done in a clearing house. 4. To obtain a clearance; as, the steamer cleared for Liverpool to- day. To clear out, to go or run away; to depart. [Colloq.]
result: 1. To leap back; to rebound. [Obs.] The huge round stone, resulting with a bound. Pope. 2. To come out, or have an issue; to terminate; to have consequences; -- followed by in; as, this measure will result in good or in evil. 3. To proceed, spring, or rise, as a consequence, from facts, arguments, premises, combination of circumstances, consultation, thought, or endeavor. Pleasure and peace do naturally result from a holy and good life. Tillotson. Resulting trust (Law), a trust raised by implication for the benefit of a party granting an estate. The phrase is also applied to a trust raised by implication for the benefit of a party who advances the purchase money of an estate, etc. Bouvier. -- Resulting use (Law), a use which, being limited by the deed, expires or can not vest, and thence returns to him who raised it. Bouvier. Syn. -- To proceed; spring; rise; arise; ensue; terminate.  1. A flying back; resilience. [Obs.] Sound is produced between the string and the air by the return or the result of the string. Bacon. 2. That which results; the conclusion or end to which any course or condition of things leads, or which is obtained by any process or operation; consequence or effect; as, the result of a course of action; the result of a mathematical operation. If our proposals once again were heard, We should compel them to a quick result. Milton. 3. The decision or determination of a council or deliberative assembly; a resolve; a decree. Then of their session ended they bid cry With trumpet's regal sound the great result. Milton. Syn. -- Effect; consequence; conclusion; inference; issue; event. See Effect.
silver: 1. (Chem.)  A soft white metallic element, sonorous, ductile, very malleable, and capable of a high degree of polish. It is found native, and also combined with sulphur, arsenic, antimony, chlorine, etc., in the minerals argentite, proustite, pyrargyrite, ceragyrite, etc. Silver is one of the "noble" metals, so-called, not being easily oxidized, and is used for coin, jewelry, plate, and a great variety of articles. Symbol Ag (Argentum). Atomic weight 107.7. Specific gravity 10.5. Note: Silver was known under the name of luna to the ancients and also to the alchemists. Some of its compounds, as the halogen salts, are remarkable for the effect of light upon them, and are used in photography. 2. Coin made of silver; silver money. 3. Anything having the luster or appearance of silver. 4. The color of silver. Note: Silver is used in the formation of many compounds of obvious meaning; as, silver-armed, silver-bright, silver-buskined, silver- coated, silver-footed, silver-haired, silver-headed, silver-mantled, silver-plated, silver-slippered, silver-sounding, silver-studded, silver-tongued, silver-white. See Silver, a. Black silver (Min.), stephanite; -- called also brittle silver ore, or brittle silver glance. -- Fulminating silver. (Chem.) (a) A black crystalline substance, Ag2O.(NH3)2, obtained by dissolving silver oxide in aqua ammonia. When dry it explodes violently on the slightest percussion. (b) Silver fulminate, a white crystalline substance, Ag2C2N2O2, obtained by adding alcohol to a solution of silver nitrate. When dry it is violently explosive. -- German silver. (Chem.) See under German. -- Gray silver. (Min.) See Freieslebenite. -- Horn silver. (Min.) See Cerargyrite. -- King's silver. (O. Eng. Law) See Postfine. -- Red silver, or Ruby silver. (Min.) See Proustite, and Pyrargyrite. -- Silver beater, one who beats silver into silver leaf or silver foil. -- Silver glance, or Vitreous silver. (Min.) See Argentine.  1. Of or pertaining to silver; made of silver; as, silver leaf; a silver cup. 2. Resembling silver. Specifically: (a) Bright; resplendent; white. "Silver hair." Shak. Others, on silver lakes and rivers, bathed Their downy breast. Milton. (b) Precious; costly. (c) Giving a clear, ringing sound soft and clear. "Silver voices." Spenser. (d) Sweet; gentle; peaceful. "Silver slumber." Spenser. American silver fir (Bot.), the balsam fir. See under Balsam. -- Silver age (Roman Lit.), the latter part (a. d. 14-180) of the classical period of Latinity, -- the time of writers of inferior purity of language, as compared with those of the previous golden age, so-called. -- Silver-bell tree (Bot.), an American shrub or small tree (Halesia tetraptera) with white bell-shaped flowers in clusters or racemes; the snowdrop tree. -- Silver bush (Bot.), a shrubby leguminous plant (Anthyllis Barba- Jovis) of Southern Europe, having silvery foliage. -- Silver chub (Zoöl.), the fallfish. -- Silver eel. (Zoöl.) (a) The cutlass fish. (b) A pale variety of the common eel. -- Silver fir (Bot.), a coniferous tree (Abies pectinata) found in mountainous districts in the middle and south of Europe, where it often grows to the height of 100 or 150 feet. It yields Burgundy pitch and Strasburg turpentine. -- Silver foil, foil made of silver. -- Silver fox (Zoöl.), a variety of the common fox (Vulpes vulpes, variety argenteus) found in the northern parts of Asia, Europe, and America. Its fur is nearly black, with silvery tips, and is highly valued. Called also black fox, and silver-gray fox. -- Silver gar. (Zoöl.) See Billfish (a) -- Silver grain (Bot.), the lines or narrow plates of cellular tissue which pass from the pith to the bark of an exogenous stem; the medullary rays. In the wood of the oak they are much larger than in that of the beech, maple, pine, cherry, etc. -- Silver grebe (Zoöl.), the red-throated diver. See Illust. under Diver. -- Silver hake (Zoöl.), the American whiting. -- Silver leaf, leaves or sheets made of silver beaten very thin. -- Silver lunge (Zoöl.), the namaycush. -- Silver moonfish.(Zoöl.) See Moonfish (b). -- Silver moth (Zoöl.), a lepisma. -- Silver owl (Zoöl.), the barn owl. -- Silver perch (Zoöl.), the mademoiselle, 2. -- Silver pheasant (Zoöl.), any one of several species of beautiful crested and long-tailed Asiatic pheasants, of the genus Euplocamus. They have the tail and more or less of the upper parts silvery white. The most common species (E. nychtemerus) is native of China. -- Silver plate, domestic utensils made of silver. -- Silver plover (Zoöl.), the knot. -- Silver salmon (Zoöl.), a salmon (Oncorhynchus kisutch) native of both coasts of the North Pacific. It ascends all the American rivers as far south as the Sacramento. Called also kisutch, whitefish, and white salmon. -- Silver shell (Zoöl.), a marine bivalve of the genus Anomia. See Anomia. -- Silver steel, an alloy of steel with a very small proportion of silver. -- Silver stick, a title given to the title field officer of the Life Guards when on duty at the palace. [Eng.] Thackeray. -- Silver tree (Bot.), a South African tree (Leucadendron argenteum) with long, silvery, silky leaves. -- Silver trout, (Zoöl.) See Trout. -- Silver wedding. See under Wedding. -- Silver whiting (Zoöl.), a marine sciænoid food fish (Menticirrus littoralis) native of the Southern United States; -- called also surf whiting. -- Silver witch (Zoöl.), A lepisma.  1. To cover with silver; to give a silvery appearance to by applying a metal of a silvery color; as, to silver a pin; to silver a glass mirror plate with an amalgam of tin and mercury. 2. To polish like silver; to impart a brightness to, like that of silver. And smiling calmness silvered o'er the deep. Pope. 3. To make hoary, or white, like silver. His head was silvered o'er with age. Gay.  To acquire a silvery color. [R.] The eastern sky began to silver and shine. L. Wallace.
close: 1. To stop, or fill up, as an opening; to shut; as, to close the eyes; to close a door. 2. To bring together the parts of; to consolidate; as, to close the ranks of an army; -- often used with up. 3. To bring to an end or period; to conclude; to complete; to finish; to end; to consummate; as, to close a bargain; to close a course of instruction. One frugal supper did our studies close. Dryden. 4. To come or gather around; to inclose; to encompass; to confine. The depth closed me round about. Jonah ii. 5. But now thou dost thyself immure and close In some one corner of a feeble heart. Herbert. A closed sea, a sea within the jurisdiction of some particular nation, which controls its navigation.  1. To come together; to unite or coalesce, as the parts of a wound, or parts separated. What deep wounds ever closed without a scar Byron. 2. To end, terminate, or come to a period; as, the debate closed at six o'clock. 3. To grapple; to engange in hand-to-hand fight. They boldly closed in a hand-to-hand contest. Prescott. To close on or upon, to come to a mutual agreement; to agree on or join in. "Would induce France and Holland to close upon some measures between them to our disadvantage." Sir W. Temple. -- To close with. (a) To accede to; to consent or agree to; as, to close with the terms proposed. (b) To make an agreement with. -- To close with the land (Naut.), to approach the land.  1. The manner of shutting; the union of parts; junction. [Obs.] The doors of plank were; their close exquisite. Chapman. 2. Conclusion; cessation; ending; end. His long and troubled life was drawing to a close. Macaulay. 3. A grapple in wrestling. Bacon. 4. (Mus.) (a) The conclusion of a strain of music; cadence. (b) A double bar marking the end. At every close she made, the attending throng Replied, and bore the burden of the song. Dryden. Syn. -- Conclusion; termination; cessation; end; ending; extremity; extreme.  1. An inclosed place; especially, a small field or piece of land surrounded by a wall, hedge, or fence of any kind; -- specifically, the precinct of a cathedral or abbey. Closes surrounded by the venerable abodes of deans and canons. Macaulay. 2. A narrow passage leading from a street to a court, and the houses within. [Eng.] Halliwell 3. (Law)  The interest which one may have in a piece of ground, even though it is not inclosed. Bouvier.  1. Shut fast; closed; tight; as, a close box. From a close bower this dainty music flowed. Dryden. 2. Narrow; confined; as, a close alley; close quarters. "A close prison." Dickens. 3. Oppressive; without motion or ventilation; causing a feeling of lassitude; -- said of the air, weather, etc. If the rooms be low-roofed, or full of windows and doors, the one maketh the air close, . . . and the other maketh it exceeding unequal. Bacon. 4. Strictly confined; carefully quarded; as, a close prisoner. 5. Out of the way observation; secluded; secret; hidden. "He yet kept himself close because of Saul." 1 Chron. xii. 1 "Her close intent." Spenser. 6. Disposed to keep secrets; secretive; reticent. "For servecy, no lady closer." Shak. 7. Having the parts near each other; dense; solid; compact; as applied to bodies; viscous; tenacious; not volatile, as applied to liquids. The golden globe being put into a press, . . . the water made itself way through the pores of that very close metal. Locke. 8. Concise; to the point; as, close reasoning. "Where the original is close no version can reach it in the same compass." Dryden. 9. Adjoining; near; either in space; time, or thought; -- often followed by to. Plant the spring crocuses close to a wall. Mortimer. The thought of the Man of sorrows seemed a very close thing -- not a faint hearsay. G. Eliot. 10. Short; as, to cut grass or hair close. 11. Intimate; familiar; confidential. League with you I seek And mutual amity, so strait, so close, That I with you must dwell, or you with me. Milton. 12. Nearly equal; almost evenly balanced; as, a close vote. "A close contest." Prescott. 13. Difficult to obtain; as, money is close. Bartlett. 14. Parsimonious; stingy. "A crusty old fellow, as close as a vise." Hawthorne. 15. Adhering strictly to a standard or original; exact; strict; as, a close translation. Locke. 16. Accurate; careful; precise; also, attentive; undeviating; strict; not wandering; as, a close observer. 17. (Phon.)  Uttered with a relatively contracted opening of the mouth, as certain sounds of e and o in French, Italian, and German; -- opposed to open. Close borough. See under Borough. -- Close breeding. See under Breeding. -- Close communion, communion in the Lord's supper, restricted to those who have received baptism by immersion. -- Close corporation, a body or corporation which fills its own vacancies. -- Close fertilization. (Bot.) See Fertilization. -- Close harmony (Mus.), compact harmony, in which the tones composing each chord are not widely distributed over several octaves. -- Close time, a fixed period during which killing game or catching certain fish is prohibited by law. -- Close vowel (Pron.), a vowel which is pronounced with a diminished aperture of the lips, or with contraction of the cavity of the mouth. -- Close to the wind (Naut.), directed as nearly to the point from which the wind blows as it is possible to sail; closehauled; -- said of a vessel.  1. In a close manner. 2. Secretly; darkly. [Obs.] A wondrous vision which did close imply The course of all her fortune and posterity. Spenser.
bank: A bench; a high seat, or seat of distinction or judgment; a tribunal or court. In banc, In banco (the ablative of bancus), In bank, in full court, or with full judicial authority; as, sittings in banc (distinguished from sittings at nisi prius).  1. A mound, pile, or ridge of earth, raised above the surrounding level; hence, anything shaped like a mound or ridge of earth; as, a bank of clouds; a bank of snow. They cast up a bank against the city. 2 Sam. xx. 15. 2. A steep acclivity, as the slope of a hill, or the side of a ravine. 3. The margin of a watercourse; the rising ground bordering a lake, river, or sea, or forming the edge of a cutting, or other hollow. Tiber trembled underneath her banks. Shak. 4. An elevation, or rising ground, under the sea; a shoal, shelf, or shallow; as, the banks of Newfoundland. 5. (Mining) (a) The face of the coal at which miners are working. (b) A deposit of ore or coal, worked by excavations above water level. (c) The ground at the top of a shaft; as, ores are brought to bank. Bank beaver (Zoöl.), the otter. [Local, U.S.] -- Bank swallow, a small American and European swallow (Clivicola riparia) that nests in a hole which it excavates in a bank.  1. To raise a mound or dike about; to inclose, defend, or fortify with a bank; to embank. "Banked well with earth." Holland. 2. To heap or pile up; as, to bank sand. 3. To pass by the banks of. [Obs.] Shak. To bank a fire, To bank up a fire, to cover the coals or embers with ashes or cinders, thus keeping the fire low but alive.  1. A bench, as for rowers in a galley; also, a tier of oars. Placed on their banks, the lusty Trojan sweep Neptune's smooth face, and cleave the yielding deep. Waller. 2. (Law) (a) The bench or seat upon which the judges sit. (b) The regular term of a court of law, or the full court sitting to hear arguments upon questions of law, as distinguished from a sitting at Nisi Prius, or a court held for jury trials. See Banc. Burrill. 3. (Printing)  A sort of table used by printers. 4. (Music)  A bench, or row of keys belonging to a keyboard, as in an organ. Knight.  1. An establishment for the custody, loan, exchange, or issue, of money, and for facilitating the transmission of funds by drafts or bills of exchange; an institution incorporated for performing one or more of such functions, or the stockholders (or their representatives, the directors), acting in their corporate capacity. 2. The building or office used for banking purposes. 3. A fund from deposits or contributions, to be used in transacting business; a joint stock or capital. [Obs.] Let it be no bank or common stock, but every man be master of his own money. Bacon. 4. (Gaming)  The sum of money or the checks which the dealer or banker has as a fund, from which to draw his stakes and pay his losses. 5. In certain games, as dominos, a fund of pieces from which the players are allowed to draw. Bank credit, a credit by which a person who has give -- Bank of deposit, a bank which receives money for safe keeping. -- Bank of issue, a bank which issues its own notes payable to bearer.  To deposit in a bank.  1. To keep a bank; to carry on the business of a banker. 2. To deposit money in a bank; to have an account with a banker.
quiet: 1. In a state of rest or calm; without stir, motion, or agitation; still; as, a quiet sea; quiet air. They . . . were quiet all the night, saying, In the morning, when it is day, we shall kill him. Judg. xvi. 2. 2. Free from noise or disturbance; hushed; still. 3. Not excited or anxious; calm; peaceful; placid; settled; as, a quiet life; a quiet conscience. " So quiet and so sweet a style." Shak. That son, who on the quiet state of man Such trouble brought. Milton. 4. Not giving offense; not exciting disorder or trouble; not turbulent; gentle; mild; meek; contented. The ornament of a meek and quiet spirit. 1 Pet. iii. 4. I will sit as quiet as a lamb. Shak. 5. Not showy; not such as to attract attention; undemonstrative; as, a quiet dress; quiet colors; a quiet movement. Syn. -- Still; tranquil; calm; unruffled; smooth; unmolested; undisturbed; placid; peaceful; mild; peaceable; meek; contented.  1. The quality or state of being quiet, or in repose; as an hour or a time of quiet. 2. Freedom from disturbance, noise, or alarm; stillness; tranquillity; peace; security. And join with thee, calm Peace and Quiet. Milton. At quiet, still; peaceful. -- In quiet, quietly. " I will depart in quiet." Shak. -- Out of quiet, disturbed; restless. [Obs.] "She is much out of quiet." Shak.  1. To stop motion in; to still; to reduce to a state of rest, or of silence. 2. To calm; to appease; to pacify; to lull; to allay; to tranquillize; as, to quiet the passions; to quiet clamors or disorders; to quiet pain or grief. Quiet yourselves, I pray, and be at peace. Shak.  To become still, silent, or calm; -- often with down; as, be soon quieted down.
meant: of Mean.
drink: 1. To swallow anything liquid, for quenching thirst or other purpose; to imbibe; to receive or partake of, as if in satisfaction of thirst; as, to drink from a spring. Gird thyself, and serve me, till have eaten and drunken; and afterward thou shalt eat and drink. Luke xvii. 8. He shall drink of the wrath the Almighty. Job xxi. 20. Drink of the cup that can not cloy. Keble. 2. To quaff exhilarating or intoxicating liquors, in merriment or feasting; to carouse; to revel; hence, to lake alcoholic liquors to excess; to be intemperate in the Pope. And they drank, and were merry with him. Gem. xliii. 34. Bolingbroke always spoke freely when he had drunk freely. Thackeray. To drink to, to salute in drinking; to wish well to, in the act of taking the cup; to pledge in drinking. I drink to the general joy of the whole table, And to our dear friend Banquo. Shak.  1. To swallow (a liquid); to receive, as a fluid, into the stomach; to imbibe; as, to drink milk or water. There lies she with the blessed gods in bliss, There drinks the nectar with ambrosia mixed. Spenser. The bowl of punch which was brewed and drunk in Mrs. Betty's room. Thackeray. 2. To take in (a liquid), in any manner; to suck up; to absorb; to imbibe. And let the purple violets drink the stream. Dryden. 3. To take in; to receive within one, through the senses; to inhale; to hear; to see. To drink the cooler air, Tennyson. My ears have not yet drunk a hundred words Of that tongue's utterance. Shak. Let me . . . drink delicious poison from thy eye. Pope. 4. To smoke, as tobacco. [Obs.] And some men now live ninety years and past, Who never drank to tobacco first nor last. Taylor (1630. ) To drink down, to act on by drinking; to reduce or subdue; as, to drink down unkindness. Shak. -- To drink in, to take into one's self by drinking, or as by drinking; to receive and appropriate as in satisfaction of thirst. "Song was the form of literature which he [Burns] had drunk in from his cradle." J. C. Shairp. -- To drink off or up, to drink the whole at a draught; as, to drink off a cup of cordial. -- To drink the health of, or To drink to the health of, to drink while expressing good wishes for the health or welfare of.  1. Liquid to be swallowed; any fluid to be taken into the stomach for quenching thirst or for other purposes, as water, coffee, or decoctions. Give me some drink, Titinius. Shak. 2. Specifically, intoxicating liquor; as, when drink is on, wit is out. Drink money, or Drink penny, an allowance, or perquisite, given to buy drink; a gratuity. -- Drink offering (Script.), an offering of wine, etc., in the Jewish religious service. -- In drink, drunk. "The poor monster's in drink." Shak. -- Strong drink, intoxicating liquor; esp., liquor containing a large proportion of alcohol. " Wine is a mocker, strong drink is raging." Prov. xx. 1.
felt: imp. & p. p. or a. from Feel.  1. A cloth or stuff made of matted fibers of wool, or wool and fur, fulled or wrought into a compact substance by rolling and pressure, with lees or size, without spinning or weaving. It were a delicate stratagem to shoe A troop of horse with felt. Shak . 2. A hat made of felt. Thynne. 3. A skin or hide; a fell; a pelt. [Obs.] To know whether sheep are sound or not, see that the felt be loose. Mortimer.  1. To make into felt, or a feltike substance; to cause to adhere and mat together. Sir M. Hale. 2. To cover with, or as with, felt; as, to felt the cylinder of a steam emgine.
broke: 1. To transact business for another. [R.] Brome. 2. To act as procurer in love matters; to pimp. [Obs.] We do want a certain necessary woman to broke between them, Cupid said. Fanshawe. And brokes with all that can in such a suit Corrupt the tender honor of a maid. Shak.  imp. & p. p. of Break.
pound: 1. To strike repeatedly with some heavy instrument; to beat. With cruel blows she pounds her blubbered cheeks. Dryden. 2. To comminute and pulverize by beating; to bruise or break into fine particles with a pestle or other heavy instrument; as, to pound spice or salt.  1. To strike heavy blows; to beat. 2. (Mach.)  To make a jarring noise, as in running; as, the engine pounds.  1. An inclosure, maintained by public authority, in which cattle or other animals are confined when taken in trespassing, or when going at large in violation of law; a pinfold. Shak. 2. A level stretch in a canal between locks. 3. (Fishing)  A kind of net, having a large inclosure with a narrow entrance into which fish are directed by wings spreading outward. Pound covert, a pound that is close or covered over, as a shed. -- Pound overt, a pound that is open overhead.  To confine in, or as in, a pound; to impound. Milton.  1. A certain specified weight; especially, a legal standard consisting of an established number of ounces. Note: The pound in general use in the United States and in England is the pound avoirdupois, which is divided into sixteen ounces, and contains 7,000 grains. The pound troy is divided into twelve ounces, and contains 5,760 grains. 144 pounds avoirdupois are equal to 175 pounds troy weight. See Avoirdupois, and Troy. 2. A British denomination of money of account, equivalent to twenty shillings sterling, and equal in value to about $4.86. There is no coin known by this name, but the gold sovereign is of the same value. Note: The pound sterling was in Saxon times, about A. D. 671, a pound troy of silver, and a shilling was its twentieth part; consequently the latter was three times as large as it is at present. Peacham.
syllable: 1. An elementary sound, or a combination of elementary sounds, uttered together, or with a single effort or impulse of the voice, and constituting a word or a part of a word. In other terms, it is a vowel or a diphtong, either by itself or flanked by one or more consonants, the whole produced by a single impulse or utterance. One of the liquids, l, m, n, may fill the place of a vowel in a syllable. Adjoining syllables in a word or phrase need not to be marked off by a pause, but only by such an abatement and renewal, or reënforcement, of the stress as to give the feeling of separate impulses. See Guide to Pronunciation, §275. 2. In writing and printing, a part of a word, separated from the rest, and capable of being pronounced by a single impulse of the voice. It may or may not correspond to a syllable in the spoken language. Withouten vice [i. e. mistake] of syllable or letter. Chaucer. 3. A small part of a sentence or discourse; anything concise or short; a particle. Before any syllable of the law of God was written. Hooker. Who dare speak One syllable against him Shak.  To pronounce the syllables of; to utter; to articulate. Milton.
cost: 1. A rib; a side; a region or coast. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. Betwixt the costs of a ship. B. Jonson. 2. (Her.)  See Cottise.  1. To require to be given, expended, or laid out therefor, as in barter, purchase, acquisition, etc.; to cause the cost, expenditure, relinquishment, or loss of; as, the ticket cost a dollar; the effort cost his life. A d'amond gone, cost me two thousand ducats. Shak. Though it cost me ten nights' watchings. Shak. 2. To require to be borne or suffered; to cause. To do him wanton rites, whichcost them woe. Milton. To cost dear, to require or occasion a large outlay of money, or much labor, self-denial, suffering, etc.  1. The amount paid, charged, or engaged to be paid, for anything bought or taken in barter; charge; expense; hence, whatever, as labor, self-denial, suffering, etc., is requisite to secure benefitt. One day shall crown the alliance on 't so please you, Here at my house, and at my proper cost. Shak. At less cost of life than is often expended in a skirmish, [Charles V.] saved Europe from invasion. Prescott. 2. Loss of any kind; detriment; pain; suffering. I know thy trains, Though dearly to my cost, thy gins and toils. Milton. 3. pl. (Law)  Expenses incurred in litigation. Note: Costs in actions or suits are either between attorney and client, being what are payable in every case to the attorney or counsel by his client whether he ultimately succeed or not, or between party and party, being those which the law gives, or the court in its discretion decrees, to the prevailing, against the losing, party. Bill of costs. See under Bill. -- Cost free, without outlay or expense. "Her duties being to talk French, and her privileges to live cost free and to gather scraps of knowledge." Thackeray.
could: Was, should be, or would be, able, capable, or susceptible. Used as an auxiliary, in the past tense or in the conditional present.
red: . imp. & p. p. of Read. Spenser.  To put on order; to make tidy; also, to free from entanglement or embarrassement; -- generally with up; as, to red up a house. [Prov. Eng. & Scot.]  Of the color of blood, or of a tint resembling that color; of the hue of that part of the rainbow, or of the solar spectrum, which is furthest from the violet part. "Fresh flowers, white and reede." Chaucer. Your color, I warrant you, is as red as any rose. Shak. Note: Red is a general term, including many different shades or hues, as scarlet, crimson, vermilion, orange red, and the like. Note: Red is often used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, red-breasted, red-cheeked, red-faced, red-haired, red- headed, red-skinned, red-tailed, red-topped, red-whiskered, red- coasted. Red admiral (Zoöl.), a beautiful butterfly (Vanessa Atalanta) common in both Europe and America. The front wings are crossed by a broad orange red band. The larva feeds on nettles. Called also Atlanta butterfly, and nettle butterfly. -- Red ant. (Zoöl.) (a) A very small ant (Myrmica molesta) which often infests houses. (b) A larger reddish ant (Formica sanquinea), native of Europe and America. It is one of the slave-making species. -- Red antimony (Min.), kermesite. See Kermes mineral (b), under Kermes. -- Red ash (Bot.), an American tree (Fraxinus pubescens), smaller than the white ash, and less valuable for timber. Cray. -- Red bass. (Zoöl.) See Redfish (d). -- Red bay (Bot.), a tree (Persea Caroliniensis) having the heartwood red, found in swamps in the Southern United States. -- Red beard (Zoöl.), a bright red sponge (Microciona prolifera), common on oyster shells and stones. [Local, U.S.] -- Red birch (Bot.), a species of birch (Betula nigra) having reddish brown bark, and compact, light-colored wood. Gray. -- Red blindness. (Med.) See Daltonism. -- Red book, a book containing the names of all the persons in the service of the state. [Eng.] -- Red book of the Exchequer, an ancient record in which are registered the names of all that held lands per baroniam in the time of Henry II. Brande & C. -- Red brass, an alloy containing eight parts of copper and three of zinc. -- Red bug. (Zoöl.) (a) A very small mite which in Florida attacks man, and produces great irritation by its bites. (b) A red hemipterous insect of the genus Pyrrhocoris, especially the European species (P. apterus), which is bright scarlet and lives in clusters on tree trunks. (c) See Cotton stainder, under Cotton. -- Red cedar. (Bot.) An evergreen North American tree (Juniperus Virginiana) having a fragrant red-colored heartwood. (b) A tree of India and Australia (Cedrela Toona) having fragrant reddish wood; -- called also toon tree in India. -- Red chalk. See under Chalk. -- Red copper (Min.), red oxide of copper; cuprite. -- Red coral (Zoöl.), the precious coral (Corallium rubrum). See Illusts. of Coral and Gorgonlacea. -- Red cross. The cross of St. George, the national emblem of the English. (b) The Geneva cross. See Geneva convention, and Geneva cross, under Geneva. -- Red currant. (Bot.) See Currant. -- Red deer. (Zoöl.) (a) The common stag (Cervus elaphus), native of the forests of the temperate parts of Europe and Asia. It is very similar to the American elk, or wapiti. (b) The Virginia deer. See Deer. -- Red duck (Zoöl.), a European reddish brown duck (Fuligula nyroca); -- called also ferruginous duck. -- Red ebony. (Bot.) See Grenadillo. -- Red empress (Zoöl.), a butterfly. See Tortoise shell. -- Red fir (Bot.), a coniferous tree (Pseudotsuga Douglasii) found from British Columbia to Texas, and highly valued for its durable timber. The name is sometimes given to other coniferous trees, as the Norway spruce and the American Abies magnifica and A. nobilis. -- Red fire. (Pyrotech.) See Blue fire, under Fire. -- Red flag. See under Flag. -- Red fox (Zoöl.), the common American fox (Vulpes fulvus), which is usually reddish in color. -- Red grouse (Zoöl.), the Scotch grouse, or ptarmigan. See under Ptarmigan. -- Red gum, or Red gum-tree (Bot.), a name given to eight Australian species of Eucalyptus (Eucalyptus amygdalina, resinifera, etc.) which yield a reddish gum resin. See Eucalyptus. -- Red hand (Her.), a left hand appaumé, fingers erect, borne on an escutcheon, being the mark of a baronet of the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland; -- called also Badge of Ulster. -- Red herring, the common herring dried and smoked. -- Red horse. (Zoöl.) (a) Any large American red fresh-water sucker, especially Moxostoma macrolepidotum and allied species. (b) See the Note under Drumfish. -- Red lead. (Chem) See under Lead, and Minium. -- Red-lead ore. (Min.) Same as Crocoite. -- Red liquor (Dyeing), a solution consisting essentially of aluminium acetate, used as a mordant in the fixation of dyestuffs on vegetable fiber; -- so called because used originally for red dyestuffs. Called also red mordant. -- Red maggot (Zoöl.), the larva of the wheat midge. -- Red manganese. (Min.) Same as Rhodochrosite. -- Red man, one of the American Indians; -- so called from his color. -- Red maple (Bot.), a species of maple (Acer rubrum). See Maple. -- Red mite. (Zoöl.) See Red spider, below. -- Red mulberry (Bot.), an American mulberry of a dark purple color (Morus rubra). -- Red mullet (Zoöl.), the surmullet. See Mullet. -- Red ocher (Min.), a soft earthy variety of hematite, of a reddish color. -- Red perch (Zoöl.), the rosefish. -- Red phosphorus. (Chem.) See under Phosphorus. -- Red pine (Bot.), an American species of pine (Pinus resinosa); -- so named from its reddish bark. -- Red precipitate. See under Precipitate. -- Red Republican (European Politics), originally, one who maintained extreme republican doctrines in France, -- because a red liberty cap was the badge of the party; an extreme radical in social reform. [Cant] -- Red ribbon, the ribbon of the Order of the Bath in England. -- Red sanders. (Bot.) See Sanders. -- Red sandstone. (Geol.) See under Sandstone. -- Red scale (Zoöl.), a scale insect (Aspidiotus aurantii) very injurious to the orange tree in California and Australia. -- Red silver (Min.), an ore of silver, of a ruby-red or reddish black color. It includes proustite, or light red silver, and pyrargyrite, or dark red silver. -- Red snapper (Zoöl.), a large fish (Lutlanus aya or Blackfordii) abundant in the Gulf of Mexico and about the Florida reefs. -- Red snow, snow colored by a mocroscopic unicellular alga (Protococcus nivalis) which produces large patches of scarlet on the snows of arctic or mountainous regions. -- Red softening (Med.) a form of cerebral softening in which the affected parts are red, -- a condition due either to infarction or inflammation. -- Red spider (Zoöl.), a very small web-spinning mite (Tetranychus telarius) which infests, and often destroys, plants of various kinds, especially those cultivated in houses and conservatories. It feeds mostly on the under side of the leaves, and causes them to turn yellow and die. The adult insects are usually pale red. Called also red mite. -- Red squirrel (Zoöl.), the chickaree. -- Red tape, the tape used in public offices for tying up documents, etc.; hence, official formality and delay. -- Red underwing (Zoöl.), any species of noctuid moths belonging to Catacola and allied genera. The numerous species are mostly large and handsomely colored. The under wings are commonly banded with bright red or orange. -- Red water, a disease in cattle, so called from an appearance like blood in the urine.  1. The color of blood, or of that part of the spectrum farthest from violet, or a tint resembling these. "Celestial rosy red, love's proper hue." Milton. 2. A red pigment. 3. (European Politics)  An abbreviation for Red Republican. See under Red, a. [Cant] 4. pl. (Med.)  The menses. Dunglison. English red, a pigment prepared by the Dutch, similar to Indian red. -- Hypericum red, a red resinous dyestuff extracted from Hypericum. -- Indian red. See under Indian, and Almagra.
bone: 1. (Anat.)  The hard, calcified tissue of the skeleton of vertebrate animals, consisting very largely of calcic carbonate, calcic phosphate, and gelatine; as, blood and bone. Note: Even in the hardest parts of bone there are many minute cavities containing living matter and connected by minute canals, some of which connect with larger canals through which blood vessels ramify. 2. One of the pieces or parts of an animal skeleton; as, a rib or a thigh bone; a bone of the arm or leg; also, any fragment of bony substance. (pl.) The frame or skeleton of the body. 3. Anything made of bone, as a bobbin for weaving bone lace. 4. pl.  Two or four pieces of bone held between the fingers and struck together to make a kind of music. 5. pl.  Dice. 6. Whalebone; hence, a piece of whalebone or of steel for a corset. 7. Fig.: The framework of anything. A bone of contention, a subject of contention or dispute. -- A bone to pick, something to investigate, or to busy one's self about; a dispute to be settled (with some one). -- Bone ash, the residue from calcined bones; -- used for making cupels, and for cleaning jewelry. -- Bone black (Chem.), the black, carbonaceous substance into which bones are converted by calcination in close vessels; -- called also animal charcoal. It is used as a decolorizing material in filtering sirups, extracts, etc., and as a black pigment. See Ivory black, under Black. -- Bone cave, a cave in which are found bones of extinct or recent animals, mingled sometimes with the works and bones of man. Am. Cyc. -- Bone dust, ground or pulverized bones, used as a fertilizer. -- Bone earth (Chem.), the earthy residuum after the calcination of bone, consisting chiefly of phosphate of calcium. -- Bone lace, a lace made of linen thread, so called because woven with bobbins of bone. -- Bone oil, an oil obtained by, heating bones (as in the manufacture of bone black), and remarkable for containing the nitrogenous bases, pyridine and quinoline, and their derivatives; -- also called Dippel's oil. -- Bone setter. Same as Bonesetter. See in the Vocabulary. -- Bone shark (Zoöl.), the basking shark. -- Bone spavin. See under Spavin. -- Bone turquoise, fossil bone or tooth of a delicate blue color, sometimes used as an imitation of true turquoise. -- Bone whale (Zoöl.), a right whale. -- To be upon the bones of, to attack. [Obs.] -- To make no bones, to make no scruple; not to hesitate. [Low] -- To pick a bone with, to quarrel with, as dogs quarrel over a bone; to settle a disagreement. [Colloq.]  1. To withdraw bones from the flesh of, as in cookery. "To bone a turkey." Soyer. 2. To put whalebone into; as, to bone stays. Ash. 3. To fertilize with bone. 4. To steal; to take possession of. [Slang]  To sight along an object or set of objects, to see if it or they be level or in line, as in carpentry, masonry, and surveying. Knight. Joiners, etc., bone their work with two straight edges. W. M. Buchanan.
most: 1. Consisting of the greatest number or quantity; greater in number or quantity than all the rest; nearly all. "Most men will proclaim every one his own goodness." Prov. xx. 6. The cities wherein most of his mighty works were done. Matt. xi. 20. 2. Greatest in degree; as, he has the most need of it. "In the moste pride." Chaucer. 3. Highest in rank; greatest. [Obs.] Chaucer. Note: Most is used as a noun, the words part, portion, quantity, etc., being omitted, and has the following meanings: 1. The greatest value, number, or part; preponderating portion; highest or chief part. 2. The utmost; greatest possible amount, degree, or result; especially in the phrases to make the most of, at the most, at most. A quarter of a year or some months at the most. Bacon. A covetous man makes the most of what he has. L'Estrange. For the most part, in reference to the larger part of a thing, or to the majority of the persons, instances, or things referred to; as, human beings, for the most part, are superstitious; the view, for the most part, was pleasing. -- Most an end, generally. See An end, under End, n. [Obs.] "She sleeps most an end." Massinger.  In the greatest or highest degree. Those nearest to this king, and most his favorites, were courtiers and prelates. Milton. Note: Placed before an adjective or adverb, most is used to form the superlative degree, being equivalent to the termination -est; as, most vile, most wicked; most illustrious; most rapidly. Formerly, and until after the Elizabethan period of our literature, the use of the double superlative was common. See More, adv. The most unkindest cut of all. Shak. The most straitest sect of our religion. Acts xxvi. 5.
experience: 1. Trial, as a test or experiment. [Obs.] She caused him to make experience Upon wild beasts. Spenser. 2. The effect upon the judgment or feelings produced by any event, whether witnessed or participated in; personal and direct impressions as contrasted with description or fancies; personal acquaintance; actual enjoyment or suffering. "Guided by other's experiences." Shak. I have but one lamp by which my feet are guided, and that is the lamp of experience. P. Henry To most men experience is like the stern lights of a ship, which illumine only the track it has passed. Coleridge. When the consuls . . . came in . . . they knew soon by experience how slenderly guarded against danger the majesty of rulers is where force is wanting. Holland. Those that undertook the religion of our Savior upon his preaching, had no experience of it. Sharp. 3. An act of knowledge, one or more, by which single facts or general truths are ascertained; experimental or inductive knowledge; hence, implying skill, facility, or practical wisdom gained by personal knowledge, feeling or action; as, a king without experience of war. Whence hath the mind all the materials of reason and knowledge To this I answer in one word, from experience. Locke. Experience may be acquired in two ways; either, first by noticing facts without any attempt to influence the frequency of their occurrence or to vary the circumstances under which they occur; this is observation; or, secondly, by putting in action causes or agents over which we have control, and purposely varying their combinations, and noticing what effects take place; this is experiment. Sir J. Herschel.  1. To make practical acquaintance with; to try personally; to prove by use or trial; to have trial of; to have the lot or fortune of; to have befall one; to be affected by; to feel; as, to experience pain or pleasure; to experience poverty; to experience a change of views. The partial failure and disappointment which he had experienced in India. Thirwall. 2. To exercise; to train by practice. The youthful sailors thus with early care Their arms experience, and for sea prepare. Harte. To experience religion (Theol.), to become a convert to the diatribes of Christianity; to yield to the power of religions truth.
also: 1. In like manner; likewise. [Obs.] 2. In addition; besides; as well; further; too. Lay up for yourselves treasures in heaven . . . for where your treasure is, there will your heart be also. Matt. vi. 20. 3. Even as; as; so. [Obs.] Chaucer. Syn. -- Also, Likewise, Too. These words are used by way of transition, in leaving one thought and passing to another. Also is the widest term. It denotes that what follows is all so, or entirely like that which preceded, or may be affirmed with the same truth; as, "If you were there, I was there also;" "If our situation has some discomforts, it has also many sources of enjoyment." Too is simply less formal and pointed than also; it marks the transition with a lighter touch; as, "I was there too;" "a courtier yet a patriot too." Pope. Likewise denotes literally "in like manner," and hence has been thought by some to be more specific than also. "It implies," says Whately, "some connection or agreement between the words it unites. We may say, ` He is a poet, and likewise a musician; ' but we should not say, ` He is a prince, and likewise a musician,' because there is no natural connection between these qualities." This distinction, however, is often disregarded.
born: 1. Brought forth, as an animal; brought into life; introduced by birth. No one could be born into slavery in Mexico. Prescott. 2. Having from birth a certain character; by or from birth; by nature; innate; as, a born liar. "A born matchmaker." W. D. Howells. Born again (Theol.), regenerated; renewed; having received spiritual life. "Except a man be born again, he can not see the kingdom of God." John iii. 3. -- Born days, days since one was born; lifetime. [Colloq.]
eye: A brood; as, an eye of pheasants.  1. The organ of sight or vision. In man, and the vertebrates generally, it is properly the movable ball or globe in the orbit, but the term often includes the adjacent parts. In most invertebrates the years are immovable ocelli, or compound eyes made up of numerous ocelli. See Ocellus. Description of illustration: a b Conjunctiva; c Cornea; d Sclerotic; e Choroid; f Cillary Muscle; g Cillary Process; h Iris; i Suspensory Ligament; k Prosterior Aqueous Chamber between h and i; l Anterior Aqueous Chamber; m Crystalline Lens; n Vitreous Humor; o Retina; p Yellow spot; q Center of blind spot; r Artery of Retina in center of the Optic Nerve. Note: The essential parts of the eye are inclosed in a tough outer coat, the sclerotic, to which the muscles moving it are attached, and which in front changes into the transparent cornea. A little way back of cornea, the crystalline lens is suspended, dividing the eye into two unequal cavities, a smaller one in front filled with a watery fluid, the aqueous humor, and larger one behind filled with a clear jelly, the vitreous humor. The sclerotic is lined with a highly pigmented membrane, the choroid, and this is turn is lined in the back half of the eyeball with the nearly transparent retina, in which the fibers of the optic nerve ramify. The choroid in front is continuous with the iris, which has a contractile opening in the center, the pupil, admitting light to the lens which brings the rays to a focus and forms an image upon the retina, where the light, falling upon delicate structures called rods and cones, causes them to stimulate the fibres of the optic nerve to transmit visual impressions to the brain. 2. The faculty of seeing; power or range of vision; hence, judgment or taste in the use of the eye, and in judging of objects; as, to have the eye of sailor; an eye for the beautiful or picturesque. 3. The action of the organ of sight; sight, look; view; ocular knowledge; judgment; opinion. In my eye, she is the sweetest lady that I looked on. Shak. 4. The space commanded by the organ of sight; scope of vision; hence, face; front; the presence of an object which is directly opposed or confronted; immediate presence. We shell express our duty in his eye. Shak. Her shell your hear disproved to her eyes. Shak. 5. Observation; oversight; watch; inspection; notice; attention; regard. "Keep eyes upon her." Shak. Booksellers . . . have an eye to their own advantage. Addison. 6. That which resembles the organ of sight, in form, position, or appearance; as: (a) (Zoöl.) The spots on a feather, as of peacock. (b) The scar to which the adductor muscle is attached in oysters and other bivalve shells; also, the adductor muscle itself, esp. when used as food, as in the scallop. (c) The bud or sprout of a plant or tuber; as the eye of a potato. (d) The center of a target; the bull's-eye. (e) A small loop to receive a hook; as hooks and eyes on a dress. (f) The hole through the head of a needle. (g) A loop forming part of anything, or a hole through anything, to receive a rope, hook, pin, shaft, etc.; as an eye at the end of a tie bar in a bridge truss; as an eye through a crank; an eye at the end of rope. (h) The hole through the upper millstone. 7. That which resembles the eye in relative importance or beauty. "The very eye of that proverb." Shak. Athens, the eye of Greece, mother of arts. Milton. 8. Tinge; shade of color. [Obs.] Red with an eye of blue makes a purple. Boyle. By the eye, in abundance. [Obs.] Marlowe. -- Elliott eye (Naut.), a loop in a hemp cable made around a thimble and served. -- Eye agate, a kind of circle agate, the central part of which are of deeper tints than the rest of the mass. Brande & C. -- Eye animalcule (Zoöl), a flagellate infusorian belonging to Euglena and related genera; -- so called because it has a colored spot like an eye at one end. -- Eye doctor, an oculist. -- Eye of a volute (Arch.), the circle in the center of volute. -- Eye of day, Eye of the morning, Eye of heaven, the sun. "So gently shuts the eye day." Mrs. Barbauld. -- Eye of a ship, the foremost part in the bows of a ship, where, formerly, eyes were painted; also, the hawser holes. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- Half an eye, very imperfect sight; a careless glance; as, to see a thing with half an eye; often figuratively. "Those who have but half an eye. " B. Jonson. -- To catch one's eye, to attract one's notice. -- To find favor in the eyes (of), to be graciously received and treated. -- To have an eye to, to pay particular attention to; to watch. "Have an eye to Cinna." Shak. -- To keep an eye on, to watch. -- To set the eyes on, to see; to have a sight of. -- In the eye of the wind (Naut.), in a direction opposed to the wind; as, a ship sails in the eye of the wind.  To fix the eye on; to look on; to view; to observe; particularly, to observe or watch narrowly, or with fixed attention; to hold in view. Eye me, blest Providence, and square my trial To my proportioned strength. Milton.  To appear; to look. [Obs.] My becomings kill me, when they do not Eye well to you. Shak.
captain: 1. A head, or chief officer; as: (a) The military officer who commands a company, troop, or battery, or who has the rank entitling him to do so though he may be employed on other service. (b) An officer in the United States navy, next above a commander and below a commodore, and ranking with a colonel in the ermy. (c) By courtesy, an officer actually commanding a vessel, although not having the rank of captain. (d) The master or commanding officer of a merchant vessel. (e) One in charge of a portion of a ship's company; as, a captain of a top, captain of a gun, etc. (f) The foreman of a body of workmen. (g) A person having authority over others acting in concert; as, the captain of a boat's crew; the captain of a football team. A trainband captain eke was he. Cowper. The Rhodian captain, relying on . . . the lightness of his vessel, passed, in open day, through all the guards. Arbuthnot. 2. A military leader; a warrior. Foremost captain of his time. Tennyson. Captain general. (a) The commander in chief of an army or armies, or of the militia. (b) The Spanish governor of Cuba and its dependent islands. -- Captain lieutenant, a lieutenant with the rank and duties of captain but with a lieutenant's pay, -- as in the first company of an English regiment.  To act as captain of; to lead. [R.] Men who captained or accompanied the exodus from existing forms. Lowell.  Chief; superior. [R.] captain jewes in the carcanet. Shak.
tone: 1. Sound, or the character of a sound, or a sound considered as of this or that character; as, a low, high, loud, grave, acute, sweet, or harsh tone. [Harmony divine] smooths her charming tones. Milton. Tones that with seraph hymns might blend. Keble. 2. (Rhet.)  Accent, or inflection or modulation of the voice, as adapted to express emotion or passion. Eager his tone, and ardent were his eyes. Dryden. 3. A whining style of speaking; a kind of mournful or artificial strain of voice; an affected speaking with a measured rhythm ahd a regular rise and fall of the voice; as, children often read with a tone. 4. (Mus.) (a) A sound considered as to pitch; as, the seven tones of the octave; she has good high tones. (b) The larger kind of interval between contiguous sounds in the diatonic scale, the smaller being called a semitone as, a whole tone too flat; raise it a tone. (c) The peculiar quality of sound in any voice or instrument; as, a rich tone, a reedy tone. (d) A mode or tune or plain chant; as, the Gregorian tones. Note: The use of the word tone, both for a sound and for the interval between two sounds or tones, is confusing, but is common -- almost universal. Note: Nearly every musical sound is composite, consisting of several simultaneous tones having different rates of vibration according to fixed laws, which depend upon the nature of the vibrating body and the mode of excitation. The components (of a composite sound) are called partial tones; that one having the lowest rate of vibration is the fundamental tone, and the other partial tones are called harmonics, or overtones. The vibration ratios of the partial tones composing any sound are expressed by all, or by a part, of the numbers in the series 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, etc.; and the quality of any sound (the tone color) is due in part to the presence or absence of overtones as represented in this series, and in part to the greater or less intensity of those present as compared with the fundamental tone and with one another. Resultant tones, combination tones, summation tones, difference tones, Tartini's tones (terms only in part synonymous) are produced by the simultaneous sounding of two or more primary (simple or composite) tones. 5. (Med.)  That state of a body, or of any of its organs or parts, in which the animal functions are healthy and performed with due vigor. Note: In this sense, the word is metaphorically applied to character or faculties, intellectual and moral; as, his mind has lost its tone. 6. (Physiol.)  Tonicity; as, arterial tone. 7. State of mind; temper; mood. The strange situation I am in and the melancholy state of public affairs, . . . drag the mind down . . . from a philosophical tone or temper, to the drudgery of private and public business. Bolingbroke. Their tone was dissatisfied, almost menacing. W. C. Bryant. 8. Tenor; character; spirit; drift; as, the tone of his remarks was commendatory. 9. General or prevailing character or style, as of morals, manners, or sentiment, in reference to a scale of high and low; as, a low tone of morals; a tone of elevated sentiment; a courtly tone of manners. 10. The general effect of a picture produced by the combination of light and shade, together with color in the case of a painting; -- commonly used in a favorable sense; as, this picture has tone. Tone color. (Mus.) see the Note under def. 4, above. -- Tone syllable, an accented syllable. M. Stuart.  1. To utter with an affected tone. 2. To give tone, or a particular tone, to; to tune. See Tune, v. t. 3. (Photog.)  To bring, as a print, to a certain required shade of color, as by chemical treatment. To tone down. (a) To cause to give lower tone or sound; to give a lower tone to. (b) (Paint.) To modify, as color, by making it less brilliant or less crude; to modify, as a composition of color, by making it more harmonius. Its thousand hues toned down harmoniusly. C. Kingsley. (c) Fig.: To moderate or relax; to diminish or weaken the striking characteristics of; to soften. The best method for the purpose in hand was to employ some one of a character and position suited to get possession of their confidence, and then use it to tone down their religious strictures. Palfrey. -- To tone up, to cause to give a higher tone or sound; to give a higher tone to; to make more intense; to heighten; to strengthen.
by: 1. In the neighborhood of; near or next to; not far from; close to; along with; as, come and sit by me. By foundation or by shady rivulet He sought them both. Milton. 2. On; along; in traversing. Compare 5. Long labors both by sea and land he bore. Dryden. By land, by water, they renew the charge. Pope. 3. Near to, while passing; hence, from one to the other side of; past; as, to go by a church. 4. Used in specifying adjacent dimensions; as, a cabin twenty feet by forty. 5. Against. [Obs.] Tyndale [1. Cor. iv. 4]. 6. With, as means, way, process, etc.; through means of; with aid of; through; through the act or agency of; as, a city is destroyed by fire; profit is made by commerce; to take by force. Note: To the meaning of by, as denoting means or agency, belong, more or less closely, most of the following uses of the word: (a) It points out the author and producer; as, "Waverley", a novel by Sir W.Scott; a statue by Canova; a sonata by Beethoven. (b) In an oath or adjuration, it indicates the being or thing appealed to as sanction; as, I affirm to you by all that is sacred; he swears by his faith as a Christian; no, by Heaven. (c) According to; by direction, authority, or example of; after; -- in such phrases as, it appears by his account; ten o'clock by my watch; to live by rule; a model to build by. (d) At the rate of; according to the ratio or proportion of; in the measure or quantity of; as, to sell cloth by the yard, milk by the quart, eggs by the dozen, meat by the pound; to board by the year. (e) In comparison, it denotes the measure of excess or deficiency; when anything is increased or diminished, it indicates the measure of increase or diminution; as, larger by a half; older by five years; to lessen by a third. (f) It expresses continuance or duration; during the course of; within the period of; as, by day, by night. (g) As soon as; not later than; near or at; -- used in expressions of time; as, by this time the sun had risen; he will be here by two o'clock. Note: In boxing the compass, by indicates a pint nearer to, or towards, the next cardinal point; as, north by east, i.e., a point towards the east from the north; northeast by east, i.e., on point nearer the east than northeast is. Note: With is used instead of by before the instrument with which anything is done; as, to beat one with a stick; the board was fastened by the carpenter with nails. But there are many words which may be regarded as means or processes, or, figuratively, as instruments; and whether with or by shall be used with them is a matter of arbitrary, and often, of unsettled usage; as, to a reduce a town by famine; to consume stubble with fire; he gained his purpose by flattery; he entertained them with a story; he distressed us with or by a recital of his sufferings. see With. By all means, most assuredly; without fail; certainly. -- By and by. (a) Close together (of place). [Obs.] "Two yonge knightes liggyng [lying] by and by." Chaucer. (b) Immediately; at once. [Obs.] "When . . . persecution ariseth because of the word, by and by he is offended." Matt. xiii. 21. (c) Presently; pretty soon; before long. Note: In this phrase, by seems to be used in the sense of nearness in time, and to be repeated for the sake of emphasis, and thus to be equivalent to "soon, and soon," that is instantly; hence, -- less emphatically, -- pretty soon, presently. -- By one's self, with only one's self near; alone; solitary.- By the bye. See under Bye. -- By the head (Naut.), having the bows lower than the stern; -- said of a vessel when her head is lower in the water than her stern. If her stern is lower, she is by the stern. -- By the lee, the situation of a vessel, going free, when she has fallen off so much as to bring the wind round her stern, and to take her sails aback on the other side. -- By the run, to let go by the run, to let go altogether, instead of slacking off. -- By the way, by the bye; -- used to introduce an incidental or secondary remark or subject. -Day by day, One by one, Piece by piece, etc., each day, each one, each piece, etc., by itself singly or separately; each severally. -- To come by, to get possession of; to obtain. -- To do by, to treat, to behave toward. -- To set by, to value, to esteem. -- To stand by, to aid, to support. Note: The common phrase good-by is equivalent to farewell, and would be better written good-bye, as it is a corruption of God be with you (b'w'ye).  1. Near; in the neighborhood; present; as, there was no person by at the time. 2. Passing near; going past; past; beyond; as, the procession has gone by; a bird flew by. 3. Aside; as, to lay by; to put by.  Out of the common path; aside; -- used in composition, giving the meaning of something aside, secondary, or incidental, or collateral matter, a thing private or avoiding notice; as, by-line, by-place, by-play, by-street. It was formerly more freely used in composition than it is now; as, by-business, by-concernment, by- design, by-interest, etc.
space: 1. Extension, considered independently of anything which it may contain; that which makes extended objects conceivable and possible. Pure space is capable neither of resistance nor motion. Locke. 2. Place, having more or They gave him chase, and hunted him as hare; Long had he no space to dwell [in]. R. of Brunne. While I have time and space. Chaucer. 3. A quantity or portion of extension; distance from one thing to another; an interval between any two or more objects; as, the space between two stars or two hills; the sound was heard for the space of a mile. Put a space betwixt drove and drove. Gen. xxxii. 16. 4. Quantity of time; an interval between two points of time; duration; time. "Grace God gave him here, this land to keep long space." R. of brunne. Nine times the space that measures day and night. Milton. God may defer his judgments for a time, and give a people a longer space of repentance. Tillotson. 5. A short time; a while. [R.] "To stay your deadly strife a space." Spenser. 6. Walk; track; path; course. [Obs.] This ilke [same] monk let old things pace, And held after the new world the space. Chaucer. 7. (print.) (a) A small piece of metal cast lower than a face type, so as not to receive the ink in printing, -- used to separate words or letters. (b) The distance or interval between words or letters in the lines, or between lines, as in books. Note: Spaces are of different thicknesses to enable the compositor to arrange the words at equal distances from each other in the same line. 8. (Mus.)  One of the intervals, or open places, between the lines of the staff. Absolute space, Euclidian space, etc. See under Absolute, Euclidian, etc. -- Space line (Print.), a thin piece of metal used by printers to open the lines of type to a regular distance from each other, and for other purposes; a lead. Hansard. -- Space rule (Print.), a fine, thin, short metal rule of the same height as the type, used in printing short lines in tabular matter.  To walk; to rove; to roam. [Obs.] And loved in forests wild to space. Spenser.  To arrange or adjust the spaces in or between; as, to space words, lines, or letters.
century: 1. A hundred; as, a century of sonnets; an aggregate of a hundred things. [Archaic.] And on it said a century of prayers. Shak. 2. A period of a hundred years; as, this event took place over two centuries ago. Note: Century, in the reckoning of time, although often used in a general way of any series of hundred consecutive years (as, a century of temperance work), usually signifies a division of the Christian era, consisting of a period of one hundred years ending with the hundredth year from which it is named; as, the first century (a. d. 1-100 inclusive); the seventh century (a.d. 601-700); the eighteenth century (a.d. 1701-1800). With words or phrases connecting it with some other system of chronology it is used of similar division of those eras; as, the first century of Rome (A.U.C. 1-100). 3. (Rom. Antiq.) (a) A division of the Roman people formed according to their property, for the purpose of voting for civil officers. (b) One of sixty companies into which a legion of the army was divided. It was Commanded by a centurion. Century plant (Bot.), the Agave Americana, formerly supposed to flower but once in a century; - - hence the name. See Agave. -- The Magdeburg Centuries, an ecclesiastical history of the first thirteen centuries, arranged in thirteen volumes, compiled in the 16th century by Protestant scholars at Magdeburg.
tell: 1. To mention one by one, or piece by piece; to recount; to enumerate; to reckon; to number; to count; as, to tell money. "An heap of coin he told." Spenser. He telleth the number of the stars. Ps. cxlvii. 4. Tell the joints of the body. Jer. Taylor. 2. To utter or recite in detail; to give an account of; to narrate. Of which I shall tell all the array. Chaucer. And not a man appears to tell their fate. Pope. 3. To make known; to publish; to disclose; to divulge. Why didst thou not tell me that she was thy wife Gen. xii. 18. 4. To give instruction to; to make report to; to acquaint; to teach; to inform. A secret pilgrimage, That you to-day promised to tell me of Shak. 5. To order; to request; to command. He told her not to be frightened. Dickens. 6. To discern so as to report; to ascertain by observing; to find out; to discover; as, I can not tell where one color ends and the other begins. 7. To make account of; to regard; to reckon; to value; to estimate. [Obs.] I ne told no dainity of her love. Chaucer. Note: Tell, though equivalent in some respect to speak and say, has not always the same application. We say, to tell truth or falsehood, to tell a number, to tell the reasons, to tell something or nothing; but we never say, to tell a speech, discourse, or oration, or to tell an argument or a lesson. It is much used in commands; as, tell me the whole story; tell me all you know. To tell off, to count; to divide. Sir W. Scott. Syn. -- To communicate; impart; reveal; disclose; inform; acquaint; report; repeat; rehearse; recite.  1. To give an account; to make report. That I may publish with the voice of thankgiving, and tell of all thy wondrous works. Ps. xxvi. 7. 2. To take effect; to produce a marked effect; as, every shot tells; every expression tells. To tell of. (a) To speak of; to mention; to narrate or describe. (b) To inform against; to disclose some fault of. -- To tell on, to inform against. [Archaic & Colloq.] Lest they should tell on us, saying, So did David. 1 Sam. xxvii. 11.  That which is told; tale; account. [R.] I am at the end of my tell. Walpole.  A hill or mound. W. M. Thomson.
select: Taken from a number by preferance; picked out as more valuable or exellent than others; of special value or exellence; nicely chosen; selected; choice. A few select spirits had separated from the crowd, and formed a fit audience round a far greater teacher. Macaulay.  To choose and take from a number; to take by preference from among others; to pick out; to cull; as, to select the best authors for perusal. "One peculiar nation to select." Milton. The pious chief . . . A hundred youths from all his train selects. Dryden.
join: 1. To bring together, literally or figuratively; to place in contact; to connect; to couple; to unite; to combine; to associate; to add; to append. Woe unto them that join house to house. Is. v. 8. Held up his left hand, which did flame and burn Like twenty torches joined. Shak. Thy tuneful voice with numbers join. Dryden. 2. To associate one's self to; to be or become connected with; to league one's self with; to unite with; as, to join a party; to join the church. We jointly now to join no other head. Dryden. 3. To unite in marriage. He that joineth his virgin in matrimony. Wyclif. What, therefore, God hath joined together, let not man put asunder. Matt. xix. 6. 4. To enjoin upon; to command. [Obs. & R.] They join them penance, as they call it. Tyndale. 5. To accept, or engage in, as a contest; as, to join encounter, battle, issue. Milton. To join battle, To join issue. See under Battle, Issue. Syn. -- To add; annex; unite; connect; combine; consociate; couple; link; append. See Add.  To be contiguous, close, or in contact; to come together; to unite; to mingle; to form a union; as, the hones of the skull join; two rivers join. Whose house joined hard to the synagogue. Acts xviii. 7. Should we again break thy commandments, and join in affinity with the people of these abominations Ezra ix. 14. Nature and fortune joined to make thee great. Shak.  The line joining two points; the point common to two intersecting lines. Henrici.
yard: 1. A rod; a stick; a staff. [Obs.] P. Plowman. If men smote it with a yerde. Chaucer. 2. A branch; a twig. [Obs.] The bitter frosts with the sleet and rain Destroyed hath the green in every yerd. Chaucer. 3. A long piece of timber, as a rafter, etc. [Obs.] 4. A measure of length, equaling three feet, or thirty-six inches, being the standard of English and American measure. 5. The penis. 6. (Naut.)  A long piece of timber, nearly cylindrical, tapering toward the ends, and designed to support and extend a square sail. A yard is usually hung by the center to the mast. See Illust. of Ship. Golden Yard, or Yard and Ell (Astron.), a popular name the three stars in the belt of Orion. -- Under yard [i. e., under the rod], under contract. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. An inclosure; usually, a small inclosed place in front of, or around, a house or barn; as, a courtyard; a cowyard; a barnyard. A yard . . . inclosed all about with sticks In which she had a cock, hight chanticleer. Chaucer. 2. An inclosure within which any work or business is carried on; as, a dockyard; a shipyard. Liberty of the yard, a liberty, granted to persons imprisoned for debt, of walking in the yard, or within any other limits prescribed by law, on their giving bond not to go beyond those limits. -- Prison yard, an inclosure about a prison, or attached to it. -- Yard grass (Bot.), a low-growing grass (Eleusine Indica) having digitate spikes. It is common in dooryards, and like places, especially in the Southern United States. Called also crab grass. -- Yard of land. See Yardland.  To confine (cattle) to the yard; to shut up, or keep, in a yard; as, to yard cows.
science: 1. Knowledge; lnowledge of principles and causes; ascertained truth of facts. If we conceive God's or science, before the creation, to be extended to all and every part of the world, seeing everything as it is, . . . his science or sight from all eternity lays no necessity on anything to come to pass. Hammond. Shakespeare's deep and accurate science in mental philosophy. Coleridge. 2. Accumulated and established knowledge, which has been systematized and formulated with reference to the discovery of general truths or the operation of general laws; knowledge classified and made available in work, life, or the search for truth; comprehensive, profound, or philosophical knowledge. All this new science that men lere [teach]. Chaucer. Science is . . . a complement of cognitions, having, in point of form, the character of logical perfection, and in point of matter, the character of real truth. Sir W. Hamilton. 3. Especially, such knowledge when it relates to the physical world and its phenomena, the nature, constitution, and forces of matter, the qualities and function of living tissues, etc.; -- called also natural science, and physical science. Voltaire hardly left a single corner of the field entirely unexplored in science, poetry, history, philosophy. J. Morley. 4. Any branch or departament of systematized knowledge considered as a distinct field of investigation or object of study; as, the science of astronomy, of chemistry, or of mind. Note: The ancients reckoned seven sciences, namely, grammar, rhetoric, logic, arithmetic, music, geometry, and astronomy; -- the first three being included in the Trivium, the remaining four in the Quadrivium. Good sense, which only is the gift of Heaven, And though no science, fairly worth the seven. Pope. 5. Art, skill, or expertness, regarded as the result of knowledge of laws and principles. His science, coolness, and great strength. G. A. Lawrence. Note: Science is applied or pure. Applied science is a knowledge of facts, events, or phenomena, as explained, accounted for, or produced, by means of powers, causes, or laws. Pure science is the knowledge of these powers, causes, or laws, considered apart, or as pure from all applications. Both these terms have a similar and special signification when applied to the science of quantity; as, the applied and pure mathematics. Exact science is knowledge so systematized that prediction and verification, by measurement, experiment, observation, etc., are possible. The mathematical and physical sciences are called the exact sciences. Comparative sciences, Inductive sciences. See under Comparative, and Inductive. Syn. -- Literature; art; knowledge. -- Science, Literature, Art. Science is literally knowledge, but more usually denotes a systematic and orderly arrangement of knowledge. In a more distinctive sense, science embraces those branches of knowledge of which the subject-matter is either ultimate principles, or facts as explained by principles or laws thus arranged in natural order. The term literature sometimes denotes all compositions not embraced under science, but usually confined to the belles-lettres. [See Literature.] Art is that which depends on practice and skill in performance. "In science, scimus ut sciamus; in art, scimus ut producamus. And, therefore, science and art may be said to be investigations of truth; but one, science, inquires for the sake of knowledge; the other, art, for the sake of production; and hence science is more concerned with the higher truths, art with the lower; and science never is engaged, as art is, in productive application. And the most perfect state of science, therefore, will be the most high and accurate inquiry; the perfection of art will be the most apt and efficient system of rules; art always throwing itself into the form of rules." Karslake.  To cause to become versed in science; to make skilled; to instruct. [R.] Francis.
gray: 1. White mixed with black, as the color of pepper and salt, or of ashes, or of hair whitened by age; sometimes, a dark mixed color; as, the soft gray eye of a dove. These gray and dun colors may be also produced by mixing whites and blacks. Sir I. Newton. 2. Gray-haired; gray-headed; of a gray color; hoary. 3. Old; mature; as, gray experience. Ames. Gray antimony (Min.), stibnite. -- Gray buck (Zoöl.), the chickara. -- Gray cobalt (Min.), smaltite. -- Gray copper (Min.), tetrahedrite. -- Gray duck (Zoöl.), the gadwall; also applied to the female mallard. -- Gray falcon (Zoöl.) the peregrine falcon. -- Gray Friar. See Franciscan, and Friar. -- Gray hen (Zoöl.), the female of the blackcock or black grouse. See Heath grouse. -- Gray mill or millet (Bot.), a name of several plants of the genus Lithospermum; gromwell. -- Gray mullet (Zoöl.) any one of the numerous species of the genus Mugil, or family Mugilidæ, found both in the Old World and America; as the European species (M. capito, and M. auratus), the American striped mullet (M. albula), and the white or silver mullet (M. Braziliensis). See Mullet. -- Gray owl (Zoöl.), the European tawny or brown owl (Syrnium aluco). The great gray owl (Ulula cinerea) inhabits arctic America. -- Gray parrot (Zoöl.), a parrot (Psittacus erithacus), very commonly domesticated, and noted for its aptness in learning to talk. -- Gray pike. (Zoöl.) See Sauger. -- Gray snapper (Zoöl.), a Florida fish; the sea lawyer. See Snapper. -- Gray snipe (Zoöl.), the dowitcher in winter plumage. -- Gray whale (Zoöl.), a rather large and swift California whale (Rhachianectes glaucus), formerly taken in large numbers in the bays; -- called also grayback, devilfish, and hardhead.  1. A gray color; any mixture of white and black; also, a neutral or whitish tint. 2. An animal or thing of gray color, as a horse, a badger, or a kind of salmon. Woe worth the chase, woe worth the day. That coats thy life, my gallant gray. Sir W. Scott.
break: 1. To strain apart; to sever by fracture; to divide with violence; as, to break a rope or chain; to break a seal; to break an axle; to break rocks or coal; to break a lock. Shak. 2. To lay open as by breaking; to divide; as, to break a package of goods. 3. To lay open, as a purpose; to disclose, divulge, or communicate. Katharine, break thy mind to me. Shak. 4. To infringe or violate, as an obligation, law, or promise. Out, out, hyena! these are thy wonted arts . . . To break all faith, all vows, deceive, betray. Milton 5. To interrupt; to destroy the continuity of; to dissolve or terminate; as, to break silence; to break one's sleep; to break one's journey. Go, release them, Ariel; My charms I'll break, their senses I'll restore. Shak. 6. To destroy the completeness of; to remove a part from; as, to break a set. 7. To destroy the arrangement of; to throw into disorder; to pierce; as, the cavalry were not able to break the British squares. 8. To shatter to pieces; to reduce to fragments. The victim broke in pieces the musical instruments with which he had solaced the hours of captivity. Prescott. 9. To exchange for other money or currency of smaller denomination; as, to break a five dollar bill. 10. To destroy the strength, firmness, or consistency of; as, to break flax. 11. To weaken or impair, as health, spirit, or mind. An old man, broken with the storms of state. Shak. 12. To diminish the force of; to lessen the shock of, as a fall or blow. I'll rather leap down first, and break your fall. Dryden. 13. To impart, as news or information; to broach; -- with to, and often with a modified word implying some reserve; as, to break the news gently to the widow; to break a purpose cautiously to a friend. 14. To tame; to reduce to subjection; to make tractable; to discipline; as, to break a horse to the harness or saddle. "To break a colt." Spenser. Why, then thou canst not break her to the lute Shak. 15. To destroy the financial credit of; to make bankrupt; to ruin. With arts like these rich Matho, when he speaks, Attracts all fees, and little lawyers breaks. Dryden. 16. To destroy the official character and standing of; to cashier; to dismiss. I see a great officer broken. Swift. Note: With prepositions or adverbs: --To break down. (a) To crush; to overwhelm; as, to break down one's strength; to break down opposition. (b) To remove, or open a way through, by breaking; as, to break down a door or wall. -- To break in. (a) To force in; as, to break in a door. (b) To train; to discipline; as, a horse well broken in. -- To break of, to rid of; to cause to abandon; as, to break one of a habit. -- To break off. (a) To separate by breaking; as, to break off a twig. (b) To stop suddenly; to abandon. "Break off thy sins by righteousness." Dan. iv. 27. -- To break open, to open by breaking. "Open the door, or I will break it open." Shak. -- To break out, to take or force out by breaking; as, to break out a pane of glass. -- To break out a cargo, to unstow a cargo, so as to unload it easily. -- To break through. (a) To make an opening through, as, as by violence or the force of gravity; to pass violently through; as, to break through the enemy's lines; to break through the ice. (b) To disregard; as, to break through the ceremony. -- To break up. (a) To separate into parts; to plow (new or fallow ground). "Break up this capon." Shak. "Break up your fallow ground." Jer. iv. 3. (b) To dissolve; to put an end to. "Break up the court." Shak. -- To break (one) all up, to unsettle or disconcert completely; to upset. [Colloq.] Note: With an immediate object: -To break the back. (a) To dislocate the backbone; hence, to disable totally. (b) To get through the worst part of; as, to break the back of a difficult undertaking. -- To break bulk, to destroy the entirety of a load by removing a portion of it; to begin to unload; also, to transfer in detail, as from boats to cars. -- To break cover, to burst forth from a protecting concealment, as game when hunted. -- To break a deer or stag, to cut it up and apportion the parts among those entitled to a share. -- To break fast, to partake of food after abstinence. See Breakfast. -- To break ground. (a) To open the earth as for planting; to commence excavation, as for building, siege operations, and the like; as, to break ground for a foundation, a canal, or a railroad. (b) Fig.: To begin to execute any plan. (c) (Naut.) To release the anchor from the bottom. -- To break the heart, to crush or overwhelm (one) with grief. -- To break a house (Law), to remove or set aside with violence and a felonious intent any part of a house or of the fastenings provided to secure it. -- To break the ice, to get through first difficulties; to overcome obstacles and make a beginning; to introduce a subject. -- To break jail, to escape from confinement in jail, usually by forcible means. -- To break a jest, to utter a jest. "Patroclus . . . the livelong day break scurril jests." Shak. -- To break joints, to lay or arrange bricks, shingles, etc., so that the joints in one course shall not coincide with those in the preceding course. -- To break a lance, to engage in a tilt or contest. -- To break the neck, to dislocate the joints of the neck. -- To break no squares, to create no trouble. [Obs.] -- To break a path, road, etc., to open a way through obstacles by force or labor. -- To break upon a wheel, to execute or torture, as a criminal by stretching him upon a wheel, and breaking his limbs with an iron bar; -- a mode of punishment formerly employed in some countries. -- To break wind, to give vent to wind from the anus. Syn. -- To dispart; rend; tear; shatter; batter; violate; infringe; demolish; destroy; burst; dislocate.  1. To come apart or divide into two or more pieces, usually with suddenness and violence; to part; to burst asunder. 2. To open spontaneously, or by pressure from within, as a bubble, a tumor, a seed vessel, a bag. Else the bottle break, and the wine runneth out. Math. ix. 17. 3. To burst forth; to make its way; to come to view; to appear; to dawn. The day begins to break, and night is fied. Shak. And from the turf a fountain broke, and gurgled at our feet. Wordswoorth. 4. To burst forth violently, as a storm. The clouds are still above; and, while I speak, A second deluge o'er our head may break. Shak. 5. To open up. to be scattered; t be dissipated; as, the clouds are breaking. At length the darkness begins to break. Macawlay. 6. To become weakened in constitution or faculties; to lose health or strength. See how the dean begins to break; Poor gentleman . Swift. 7. To be crushed, or overwhelmed with sorrow or grief; as, my heart is breaking. 8. To fall in business; to become bankrupt. He that puts all upon adventures doth oftentimes break, and come to poverty. Bacn. 9. To make an abrupt or sudden change; to change the gait; as, to break into a run or gallop. 10. To fail in musical quality; as, a singer's voice breaks when it is strained beyond its compass and a tone or note is not completed, but degenerates into an unmusical sound instead. Also, to change in tone, as a boy's voice at puberty. 11. To fall out; to terminate friendship. To break upon the score of danger or expense is to be mean and narrow-spirited. Collier. Note: With prepositions or adverbs: -To break away, to disengage one's self abruptly; to come or go away against resistance. Fear me not, man; I will not break away. Shak. To break down. (a) To come down by breaking; as, the coach broke down. (b) To fail in any undertaking. He had broken down almost at the outset. Thackeray. -- To break forth, to issue; to come out suddenly, as sound, light, etc. "Then shall thy light break forth as the morning." Isa. lviii. 8; Note: often with into in expressing or giving vent to one's feelings. "Break forth into singing, ye mountains." Isa. xliv. 23. To break from, to go away from abruptly. This radiant from the circling crowd he broke. Dryden. -- To break into, to enter by breaking; as, a house. -- To break in upon, to enter or approach violently or unexpectedly. "This, this is he; softly awhile; let us not break in upon him." Milton. -- To break loose. (a) To extricate one's self forcibly. "Who would not, finding way, break loose from hell" Milton. (b) To cast off restraint, as of morals or propriety. -- To break off. (a) To become separated by rupture, or with suddenness and violence. (b) To desist or cease suddenly. "Nay, forward, old man; do not break off so." Shak. -- To break off from, to desist from; to abandon, as a habit. -- To break out. (a) To burst forth; to escape from restraint; to appear suddenly, as a fire or an epidemic. "For in the wilderness shall waters break out, and stream in the desert." Isa. xxxv. 6 (b) To show itself in cutaneous eruptions; -- said of a disease. (c) To have a rash or eruption on the akin; -- said of a patient. -- To break over, to overflow; to go beyond limits. -- To break up. (a) To become separated into parts or fragments; as, the ice break up in the rivers; the wreck will break up in the next storm. (b) To disperse. "The company breaks up." I. Watts. -- To break upon, to discover itself suddenly to; to dawn upon. -- To break with. (a) To fall out; to sever one's relations with; to part friendship. "It can not be the Volsces dare break with us." Shak. "If she did not intend to marry Clive, she should have broken with him altogether." Thackeray. (b) To come to an explanation; to enter into conference; to speak. [Obs.] "I will break with her and with her father." Shak.  1. An opening made by fracture or disruption. 2. An interruption of continuity; change of direction; as, a break in a wall; a break in the deck of a ship. Specifically: (a) (Arch.) A projection or recess from the face of a displacement in the circuit, interrupting the electrical current. 3. An interruption; a pause; as, a break in friendship; a break in the conversation. 4. An interruption in continuity in writing or printing, as where there is an omission, an unfilled line, etc. All modern trash is Set forth with numerous breaks and dashes. Swift. 5. The first appearing, as of light in the morning; the dawn; as, the break of day; the break of dawn. 6. A large four-wheeled carriage, having a straight body and calash top, with the driver's seat in front and the footman's behind. 7. A device for checking motion, or for measuring friction. See Brake, n. 9 & 10. 8. (Teleg.)  See Commutator.
necessary: 1. Such as must be; impossible to be otherwise; not to be avoided; inevitable. Death, a necessary end, Will come when it will come. Shak. 2. Impossible to be otherwise, or to be dispensed with, without preventing the attainment of a desired result; indispensable; requiste; essential. "'T is necessary he should die." Shak. A certain kind of temper is necessary to the pleasure and quiet of our minds. Tillotson. 3. Acting from necessity or compulsion; involuntary; -- opposed to free; as, whether man is a necessary or a free agent is a question much discussed.  1. A thing that is necessary or indispensable to some purpose; something that one can not do without; a requisite; an essential; -- used chiefly in the plural; as, the necessaries of life. 2. A privy; a water-closet. 3. pl. (Law)  Such things, in respect to infants, lunatics, and married women, as are requisite for support suitable to station.
gold: An old English name of some yellow flower, -- the marigold (Calendula), according to Dr. Prior, but in Chaucer perhaps the turnsole.  1. (Chem.)  A metallic element, constituting the most precious metal used as a common commercial medium of exchange. It has a characteristic yellow color, is one of the heaviest substances known (specific gravity 19.32), is soft, and very malleable and ductile. It is quite unalterable by heat, moisture, and most corrosive agents, and therefore well suited for its use in coin and jewelry. Symbol Au (Aurum). Atomic weight 196.7. Note: Native gold contains usually eight to ten per cent of silver, but often much more. As the amount of silver increases, the color becomes whiter and the specific gravity lower. Gold is very widely disseminated, as in the sands of many rivers, but in very small quantity. It usually occurs in quartz veins (gold quartz), in slate and metamorphic rocks, or in sand and alluvial soil, resulting from the disintegration of such rocks. It also occurs associated with other metallic substances, as in auriferous pyrites, and is combined with tellurium in the minerals petzite, calaverite, sylvanite, etc. Pure gold is too soft for ordinary use, and is hardened by alloying with silver and copper, the latter giving a characteristic reddish tinge. [See Carat.] Gold also finds use in gold foil, in the pigment purple of Cassius, and in the chloride, which is used as a toning agent in photography. 2. Money; riches; wealth. For me, the gold of France did not seduce. Shak. 3. A yellow color, like that of the metal; as, a flower tipped with gold. 4. Figuratively, something precious or pure; as, hearts of gold. Shak. Age of gold. See Golden age, under Golden. -- Dutch gold, Fool's gold, Gold dust, etc. See under Dutch, Dust, etc. -- Gold amalgam, a mineral, found in Columbia and California, composed of gold and mercury. -- Gold beater, one whose occupation is to beat gold into gold leaf. -- Gold beater's skin, the prepared outside membrane of the large intestine of the ox, used for separating the leaves of metal during the process of gold-beating. -- Gold beetle (Zoöl.), any small gold-colored beetle of the family Chrysomelidæ; -- called also golden beetle. -- Gold blocking, printing with gold leaf, as upon a book cover, by means of an engraved block. Knight. -- Gold cloth. See Cloth of gold, under Cloth. -- Gold Coast, a part of the coast of Guinea, in West Africa. -- Gold cradle. (Mining) See Cradle, n., 7. -- Gold diggings, the places, or region, where gold is found by digging in sand and gravel from which it is separated by washing. -- Gold end, a fragment of broken gold or jewelry. -- Gold-end man. (a) A buyer of old gold or jewelry. (b) A goldsmith's apprentice. (c) An itinerant jeweler. "I know him not: he looks like a gold-end man." B. Jonson. -- Gold fever, a popular mania for gold hunting. -- Gold field, a region in which are deposits of gold. -- Gold finder. (a) One who finds gold. (b) One who empties privies. [Obs. & Low] Swift. -- Gold flower, a composite plant with dry and persistent yellow radiating involucral scales, the Helichrysum Stoechas of Southern Europe. There are many South African species of the same genus. -- Gold foil, thin sheets of gold, as used by dentists and others. See Gold leaf. -- Gold knobs or knoppes (Bot.), buttercups. -- Gold lace, a kind of lace, made of gold thread. -- Gold latten, a thin plate of gold or gilded metal. -- Gold leaf, gold beaten into a film of extreme thinness, and used for gilding, etc. It is much thinner than gold foil. -- Gold lode (Mining), a gold vein. -- Gold mine, a place where gold is obtained by mining operations, as distinguished from diggings, where it is extracted by washing. Cf. Gold diggings (above). -- Gold nugget, a lump of gold as found in gold mining or digging; - - called also a pepito. -- Gold paint. See Gold shell. -- Gold or Golden, pheasant. (Zoöl.) See under Pheasant. -- Gold plate, a general name for vessels, dishes, cups, spoons, etc., made of gold. -- Gold of pleasure. Etym: [Name perhaps translated from Sp. oro-de- alegria.] (Bot.) A plant of the genus Camelina, bearing yellow flowers. C. sativa is sometimes cultivated for the oil of its seeds. -- Gold shell. (a) A composition of powdered gold or gold leaf, ground up with gum water and spread on shells, for artists' use; -- called also gold paint. (b) (Zoöl.) A bivalve shell (Anomia glabra) of the Atlantic coast; -- called also jingle shell and silver shell. See Anomia. -- Gold size, a composition used in applying gold leaf. -- Gold solder, a kind of solder, often containing twelve parts of gold, two of silver, and four of copper. -- Gold stick, the colonel of a regiment of English lifeguards, who attends his sovereign on state occasions; -- so called from the gilt rod presented to him by the sovereign when he receives his commission as colonel of the regiment. [Eng.] -- Gold thread. (a) A thread formed by twisting flatted gold over a thread of silk, with a wheel and iron bobbins; spun gold. Ure. (b) (Bot.) A small evergreen plant (Coptis trifolia), so called from its fibrous yellow roots. It is common in marshy places in the United States. -- Gold tissue, a tissue fabric interwoven with gold thread. -- Gold tooling, the fixing of gold leaf by a hot tool upon book covers, or the ornamental impression so made. -- Gold washings, places where gold found in gravel is separated from lighter material by washing. -- Gold worm, a glowworm. [Obs.] -- Jeweler's gold, an alloy containing three parts of gold to one of copper. -- Mosaic gold. See under Mosaic.
though: Granting, admitting, or supposing that; notwithstanding that; if. Though he slay me, yet will I trust in him. Job xiii. 15. Not that I so affirm, though so it seem. Milton. Note: It is compounded with all in although. See Although. As though, as if. In the vine were three branches; and it was as though it budded. Gen. xl. 10.  However; nevertheless; notwithstanding; -- used in familiar language, and in the middle or at the end of a sentence. I would not be as sick though for his place. Shak. A good cause would do well, though. Dryden.
how: 1. In what manner or way; by what means or process. How can a man be born when he is old John iii. 4. 2. To what degree or extent, number or amount; in what proportion; by what measure or quality. O, how love I thy law! it is my meditation all the day. Ps. cxix. 97. By how much they would diminish the present extent of the sea, so much they would impair the fertility, and fountains, and rivers of the earth. Bentley. 3. For what reason; from what cause. How now, my love! why is your cheek so pale Shak. 4. In what state, condition, or plight. How, and with what reproach, shall I return Dryden. 5. By what name, designation, or title. How art thou called Shak. 6. At what price; how dear. [Obs.] How a score of ewes now Shak. Note: How is used in each sense, interrogatively, interjectionally, and relatively; it is also often employed to emphasize an interrogation or exclamation. "How are the mighty fallen!" 2 Sam. i. 27. Sometimes, also, it is used as a noun; -- as, the how, the when, the wherefore. Shelley. Let me beg you -- don't say "How" for "What" Holmes.
chance: 1. A supposed material or psychical agent or mode of activity other than a force, law, or purpose; fortune; fate; -- in this sense often personifed. It is strictly and philosophically true in nature and reason that there is no such thing as chance or accident; it being evident that these words do not signify anything really existing, anything that is truly an agent or the cause of any event; but they signify merely men's ignorance of the real and immediate cause. Samuel Clark. Any society into which chance might throw him. Macaulay. That power Which erring men call Chance. Milton. 2. The operation or activity of such agent. By chance a priest came down that way. Luke x. 31. 3. The supposed effect of such an agent; something that befalls, as the result of unknown or unconsidered forces; the issue of uncertain conditions; an event not calculated upon; an unexpected occurrence; a happening; accident; fortuity; casualty. It was a chance that happened to us. 1 Sam. vi. 9. The Knave of Diamonds tries his wily arts, And wins (O shameful chance!) the Queen of Hearts. Pope. I spake of most disastrous chance. Shak. 4. A possibity; a likelihood; an opportunity; -- with reference to a doubtful result; as, a chance result; as, a chance to escape; a chance for life; the chances are all against him. So weary with disasters, tugged with fortune. That I would get my life on any chance, To mend it, or be rid on't Shak. 5. (Math.)  Probability. Note: The mathematical expression, of a chance is the ratio of frequency with which an event happens in the long run. If an event may happen in a ways and may fail in b ways, and each of these a + b ways is equally likely, the chance, or probability, that the event will happen is measured by the fraction a/(a + b), and the chance, or probability, that it will fail is measured by b/(a + b). Chance comer, one who, comes unexpectedly. -- The last chance, the sole remaining ground of hope. -- The main chance, the chief opportunity; that upon which reliance is had, esp. self-interest. -- Theory of chances, Doctrine of chances (Math.), that branch of mathematics which treats of the probability of the occurrence of particular events, as the fall of dice in given positions. -- To mind one's chances, to take advantage of every circumstance; to seize every opportunity.  To happen, come, or arrive, without design or expectation. "Things that chance daily." Robynson (More's Utopia). If a bird's nest chance to be before thee. Deut. xxii. 6. I chanced on this letter. Shak. Note: Often used impersonally; as, how chances it How chance, thou art returned so soon Shak.  1. To take the chances of; to venture upon; -- usually with it as object. Come what will, I will chance it. W. D. Howells. 2. To befall; to happen to. [Obs.] W. Lambarde.  Happening by chance; casual.  By chance; perchance. Gray.
year: 1. The time of the apparent revolution of the sun trough the ecliptic; the period occupied by the earth in making its revolution around the sun, called the astronomical year; also, a period more or less nearly agreeing with this, adopted by various nations as a measure of time, and called the civil year; as, the common lunar year of 354 days, still in use among the Mohammedans; the year of 360 days, etc. In common usage, the year consists of 365 days, and every fourth year (called bissextile, or leap year) of 366 days, a day being added to February on that year, on account of the excess above 365 days (see Bissextile). Of twenty year of age he was, I guess. Chaucer. Note: The civil, or legal, year, in England, formerly commenced on the 25th of March. This practice continued throughout the British dominions till the year 1752. 2. The time in which any planet completes a revolution about the sun; as, the year of Jupiter or of Saturn. 3. pl.  Age, or old age; as, a man in years. Shak. Anomalistic year, the time of the earth's revolution from perihelion to perihelion again, which is 365 days, 6 hours, 13 minutes, and 48 seconds. -- A year's mind (Eccl.), a commemoration of a deceased person, as by a Mass, a year after his death. Cf. A month's mind, under Month. -- Bissextile year. See Bissextile. -- Canicular year. See under Canicular. -- Civil year, the year adopted by any nation for the computation of time. -- Common lunar year, the period of 12 lunar months, or 354 days. -- Common year, each year of 365 days, as distinguished from leap year. -- Embolismic year, or Intercalary lunar year, the period of 13 lunar months, or 384 days. -- Fiscal year (Com.), the year by which accounts are reckoned, or the year between one annual time of settlement, or balancing of accounts, and another. -- Great year. See Platonic year, under Platonic. -- Gregorian year, Julian year. See under Gregorian, and Julian. -- Leap year. See Leap year, in the Vocabulary. -- Lunar astronomical year, the period of 12 lunar synodical months, or 354 days, 8 hours, 48 minutes, 36 seconds. -- Lunisolar year. See under Lunisolar. -- Periodical year. See Anomalistic year, above. -- Platonic year, Sabbatical year. See under Platonic, and Sabbatical. -- Sidereal year, the time in which the sun, departing from any fixed star, returns to the same. This is 365 days, 6 hours, 9 minutes, and 9.3 seconds. -- Tropical year. See under Tropical. -- Year and a day (O. Eng. Law), a time to be allowed for an act or an event, in order that an entire year might be secured beyond all question. Abbott. -- Year of grace, any year of the Christian era; Anno Domini; A. D. or a. d.
organ: 1. An instrument or medium by which some important action is performed, or an important end accomplished; as, legislatures, courts, armies, taxgatherers, etc., are organs of government. 2. (Biol.)  A natural part or structure in an animal or a plant, capable of performing some special action (termed its function), which is essential to the life or well-being of the whole; as, the heart, lungs, etc., are organs of animals; the root, stem, foliage, etc., are organs of plants. Note: In animals the organs are generally made up of several tissues, one of which usually predominates, and determines the principal function of the organ. Groups of organs constitute a system. See System. 3. A component part performing an essential office in the working of any complex machine; as, the cylinder, valves, crank, etc., are organs of the steam engine. 4. A medium of communication between one person or body and another; as, the secretary of state is the organ of communication between the government and a foreign power; a newspaper is the organ of its editor, or of a party, sect, etc. 5. Etym: [Cf. AS. organ, fr. L. organum.] (Mus.)  A wind instrument containing numerous pipes of various dimensions and kinds, which are filled with wind from a bellows, and played upon by means of keys similar to those of a piano, and sometimes by foot keys or pedals; -- formerly used in the plural, each pipe being considired an organ. The deep, majestic, solemn organs blow. Pope. Note: Chaucer used the form orgon as a plural. The merry orgon . . . that in the church goon [go]. Barrel organ, Choir organ, Great organ, etc. See under Barrel, Choir, etc. -- Cabinet organ (Mus.), an organ of small size, as for a chapel or for domestic use; a reed organ. -- Organ bird (Zoöl.), a Tasmanian crow shrike (Gymnorhina organicum). It utters discordant notes like those of a hand organ out of tune. -- Organ fish (Zoöl.), the drumfish. -- Organ gun. (Mil.) Same as Orgue (b). -- Organ harmonium (Mus.), an harmonium of large capacity and power. -- Organ of Gorti (Anat.), a complicated structure in the cochlea of the ear, including the auditory hair cells, the rods or fibers of Corti, the membrane of Corti, etc. See Note under Ear. -- Organ pipe. See Pipe, n., 1. -- Organ-pipe coral. (Zoöl.) See Tubipora. -- Organ point (Mus.), a passage in which the tonic or dominant is sustained continuously by one part, while the other parts move.  To supply with an organ or organs; to fit with organs; to organize. [Obs.] Thou art elemented and organed for other apprehensions. Bp. Mannyngham.
under: 1. Below or lower, in place or position, with the idea of being covered; lower than; beneath; -- opposed to over; as, he stood under a tree; the carriage is under cover; a cellar extends under the whole house. Fruit put in bottles, and the bottles let down into wells under water, will keep long. Bacon. Be gathered now, ye waters under heaven, Into one place. Milton. 2. Hence, in many figurative uses which may be classified as follows;  In a lower, subject, or subordinate condition; in subjection; - - used chiefly in a few idiomatic phrases; as, to bring under, to reduce to subjection; to subdue; to keep under, to keep in subjection; to control; to go under, to be unsuccessful; to fail. I keep under my body, and bring it into subjection. 1 Cor. ix. 27. The minstrel fell, but the foeman's chain Could not bring his proud soul under. Moore. Note: Under is often used in composition with a verb to indicate lowness or inferiority in position or degree, in the act named by the verb; as, to underline; to undermine; to underprop.  Lower in position, intensity, rank, or degree; subject; subordinate; -- generally in composition with a noun, and written with or without the hyphen; as, an undercurrent; undertone; underdose; under-garment; underofficer; undersheriff. Under covert (Zoöl.), one of the feathers situated beneath the bases of the quills in the wings and tail of a bird. See Illust. under Bird.
pose: Standing still, with all the feet on the ground; -- said of the attitude of a lion, horse, or other beast.  A cold in the head; catarrh. [Obs.] Chaucer.  The attitude or position of a person; the position of the body or of any member of the body; especially, a position formally assumed for the sake of effect; an artificial position; as, the pose of an actor; the pose of an artist's model or of a statue.  To place in an attitude or fixed position, for the sake of effect; to arrange the posture and drapery of (a person) in a studied manner; as, to pose a model for a picture; to pose a sitter for a portrait.  To assume and maintain a studied attitude, with studied arrangement of drapery; to strike an attitude; to attitudinize; figuratively, to assume or affect a certain character; as, she poses as a prude. He . . . posed before her as a hero. Thackeray.  1. To interrogate; to question. [Obs.] "She . . . posed him and sifted him." Bacon. 2. To question with a view to puzzling; to embarrass by questioning or scrutiny; to bring to a stand. A question wherewith a learned Pharisee thought to pose and puzzle him. Barrow.
spoke: imp. of Speak.  1. The radius or ray of a wheel; one of the small bars which are inserted in the hub, or nave, and which serve to support the rim or felly. 2. (Naut.)  A projecting handle of a steering wheel. 3. A rung, or round, of a ladder. 4. A contrivance for fastening the wheel of a vehicle, to prevent it from turning in going down a hill. To put a spoke in one's wheel, to thwart or obstruct one in the execution of some design.  To furnish with spokes, as a wheel.
my: Of or belonging to me; -- used always attributively; as, my body; my book; -- mine is used in the predicate; as, the book is mine. See Mine.
before: 1. In front of; preceding in space; ahead of; as, to stand before the fire; before the house. His angel, who shall go Before them in a cloud and pillar of fire. Milton. 2. Preceding in time; earlier than; previously to; anterior to the time when; -- sometimes with the additional idea of purpose; in order that. Before Abraham was, I am. John viii. 58. Before this treatise can become of use, two points are necessary. Swift. Note: Formerly before, in this sense, was followed by that. "Before that Philip called thee . . . I saw thee." John i. 48. 3. An advance of; farther onward, in place or time. The golden age . . . is before us. Carlyle. 4. Prior or preceding in dignity, order, rank, right, or worth; rather than. He that cometh after me is preferred before me. John i. 15. The eldest son is before the younger in succession. Johnson. 5. In presence or sight of; face to face with; facing. Abraham bowed down himself before the people. Gen. xxiii. 12. Wherewith shall I come before the Lord Micah vi. 6. 6. Under the cognizance or jurisdiction of. If a suit be begun before an archdeacon. Ayliffe. 7. Open for; free of access to; in the power of. The world was all before them where to choose. Milton. Before the mast (Naut.), as a common sailor, -- because the sailors live in the forecastle, forward of the foremast. -- Before the wind (Naut.), in the direction of the wind and by its impulse; having the wind aft.  1. On the fore part; in front, or in the direction of the front; -- opposed to in the rear. The battle was before and behind. 2 Chron. xiii. 14. 2. In advance. "I come before to tell you." Shak. 3. In time past; previously; already. You tell me, mother, what I knew before. Dryden. 4. Earlier; sooner than; until then. When the butt is out, we will drink water; not a drop before. Shak. Note: Before is often used in self-explaining compounds; as, before- cited, before-mentioned; beforesaid.
discuss: 1. To break to pieces; to shatter. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne. 2. To break up; to disperse; to scatter; to dissipate; to drive away; -- said especially of tumors. Many arts were used to discuss the beginnings of new affection. Sir H. Wotton. A pomade . . . of virtue to discuss pimples. Rambler. 3. To shake; to put away; to finish. [Obs.] All regard of shame she had discussed. Spenser. 4. To examine in detail or by disputation; to reason upon by presenting favorable and adverse considerations; to debate; to sift; to investigate; to ventilate. "We sat and . . . discussed the farm . . . and the price of grain." Tennyson. "To discuss questions of taste." Macaulay. 5. To deal with, in eating or drinking. [Colloq.] We sat quietly down and discussed a cold fowl that we had brought with us. Sir S. Baker. 6. (Law)  To examine or search thoroughly; to exhaust a remedy against, as against a principal debtor before proceeding against the surety. Burrill. Syn. -- To Discuss, Examine, Debate. We speak of examining a subject when we ponder it with care, in order to discover its real state, or the truth respecting it. We speak of discussing a topic when we examine it thoroughly in its distinct parts. The word is very commonly applied to matters of opinion. We may discuss a subject without giving in an adhesion to any conclusion. We speak of debating a point when we examine it in mutual argumentation between opposing parties. In debate we contend for or against some conclusion or view.
am: The first person singular of the verb be, in the indicative mode, present tense. See Be. God said unto Moses, I am that am. Exod. iii. 14.
kill: A kiln. [Obs.] Fuller.  A channel or arm of the sea; a river; a stream; as, the channel between Staten Island and Bergen Neck is the Kill van Kull, or the Kills; -- used also in composition; as, Schuylkill, Catskill, etc.  1. To deprive of life, animal or vegetable, in any manner or by any means; to render inanimate; to put to death; to slay. Ah, kill me with thy weapon, not with words ! Shak. 2. To destroy; to ruin; as, to kill one's chances; to kill the sale of a book. "To kill thine honor." Shak. Her lively color kill'd with deadly cares. Shak. 3. To cause to cease; to quell; to calm; to still; as, in seamen's language, a shower of rain kills the wind. Be comforted, good madam; the great rage, You see, is killed in him. Shak. 4. To destroy the effect of; to counteract; to neutralize; as, alkali kills acid. To kill time, to busy one's self with something which occupies the attention, or makes the time pass without tediousness. Syn. -- To murder; assassinate; slay; butcher; destroy. -- To Kill, Murder, Assassinate. To kill does not necessarily mean any more than to deprive of life. A man may kill another by accident or in self-defense, without the imputation of guilt. To murder is to kill with malicious forethought and intention. To assassinate is tomurder suddenly and by stealth. The sheriff may kill without murdering; the duelist murders, but does not assassinate his antagonist; the assassin kills and murders.
thousand: 1. The number of ten hundred; a collection or sum consisting of ten times one hundred units or objects. 2. Hence, indefinitely, a great number. A thousand shall fall at thy side, and ten thousand at thy right hand. Ps. xci. 7. Note: The word thousand often takes a plural form. See the Note under Hundred. 3. A symbol representing one thousand units; as, 1,000, M or CI.  1. Consisting of ten hundred; being ten times one hundred. 2. Hence, consisting of a great number indefinitely. "Perplexed with a thousand cares." Shak.
land: Urine. See Lant. [Obs.]  1. The solid part of the surface of the earth; -- opposed to water as constituting a part of such surface, especially to oceans and seas; as, to sight land after a long voyage. They turn their heads to sea, their sterns to land. Dryden. 2. Any portion, large or small, of the surface of the earth, considered by itself, or as belonging to an individual or a people, as a country, estate, farm, or tract. Go view the land, even Jericho. Josh. ii. 1. Ill fares the land, to hastening ills a prey, Where wealth accumulates and men decay. Goldsmith. Note: In the expressions "to be, or dwell, upon land," "to go, or fare, on land," as used by Chaucer, land denotes the country as distinguished from the town. A poor parson dwelling upon land [i.e., in the country]. Chaucer. 3. Ground, in respect to its nature or quality; soil; as, wet land; good or bad land. 4. The inhabitants of a nation or people. These answers, in the silent night received, The kind himself divulged, the land believed. Dryden. 5. The mainland, in distinction from islands. 6. The ground or floor. [Obs.] Herself upon the land she did prostrate. Spenser. 7. (Agric.)  The ground left unplowed between furrows; any one of several portions into which a field is divided for convenience in plowing. 8. (Law)  Any ground, soil, or earth whatsoever, as meadows, pastures, woods, etc., and everything annexed to it, whether by nature, as trees, water, etc., or by the hand of man, as buildings, fences, etc.; real estate. Kent. Bouvier. Burrill. 9. (Naut.)  The lap of the strakes in a clinker-built boat; the lap of plates in an iron vessel; -- called also landing. Knight. 10. In any surface prepared with indentations, perforations, or grooves, that part of the surface which is not so treated, as the level part of a millstone between the furrows, or the surface of the bore of a rifled gun between the grooves. Land agent, a person employed to sell or let land, to collect rents, and to attend to other money matters connected with land. -- Land boat, a vehicle on wheels propelled by sails. -- Land blink, a peculiar atmospheric brightness seen from sea over distant snow-covered land in arctic regions. See Ice blink. -- Land breeze. See under Breeze. -- Land chain. See Gunter's chain. -- Land crab (Zoöl.), any one of various species of crabs which live much on the land, and resort to the water chiefly for the purpose of breeding. They are abundant in the West Indies and South America. Some of them grow to a large size. -- Land fish a fish on land; a person quite out of place.Shak. -- Land force, a military force serving on land, as distinguished from a naval force. -- Land, ho! (Naut.), a sailor's cry in announcing sight of land. -- Land ice, a field of ice adhering to the coast, in distinction from a floe. -- Land leech (Zoöl.), any one of several species of blood-sucking leeches, which, in moist, tropical regions, live on land, and are often troublesome to man and beast. -- Land measure, the system of measurement used in determining the area of land; also, a table of areas used in such measurement. -- Land, or House, of bondage, in Bible history, Egypt; by extension, a place or condition of special oppression. -- Land o' cakes, Scotland. -- Land of Nod, sleep. -- Land of promise, in Bible history, Canaan: by extension, a better country or condition of which one has expectation. -- Land of steady habits, a nickname sometimes given to the State of Connecticut. -- Land office, a government office in which the entries upon, and sales of, public land are registered, and other business respecting the public lands is transacted. [U.S.] -- Land pike. (Zoöl.) (a) The gray pike, or sauger. (b) The Menobranchus. -- Land service, military service as distinguished from naval service. -- Land rail. (Zoöl) (a) The crake or corncrake of Europe. See Crake. (b) An Australian rail (Hypotænidia Phillipensis); -- called also pectoral rail. -- Land scrip, a certificate that the purchase money for a certain portion of the public land has been paid to the officer entitled to receive it. [U.S.] -- Land shark, a swindler of sailors on shore. [Sailors' Cant] -- Land side (a) That side of anything in or on the sea, as of an island or ship, which is turned toward the land. (b) The side of a plow which is opposite to the moldboard and which presses against the unplowed land. -- Land snail (Zoöl.), any snail which lives on land, as distinguished from the aquatic snails are Pulmonifera, and belong to the Geophila; but the operculated land snails of warm countries are Dioecia, and belong to the Tænioglossa. See Geophila, and Helix. -- Land spout, a descent of cloud and water in a conical form during the occurrence of a tornado and heavy rainfall on land. -- Land steward, a person who acts for another in the management of land, collection of rents, etc. -- Land tortoise, Land turtle (Zoöl.), any tortoise that habitually lives on dry land, as the box tortoise. See Tortoise. -- Land warrant, a certificate from the Land Office, authorizing a person to assume ownership of a public land. [U.S.] -- Land wind. Same as Land breeze (above). -- To make land (Naut.), to sight land. To set the land, to see by the compass how the land bears from the ship. -- To shut in the land, to hide the land, as when fog, or an intervening island, obstructs the view.  1. To set or put on shore from a ship or other water craft; to disembark; to debark. I 'll undertake top land them on our coast. Shak. 2. To catch and bring to shore; to capture; as, to land a fish. 3. To set down after conveying; to cause to fall, alight, or reach; to bring to the end of a course; as, he landed the quoit near the stake; to be thrown from a horse and landed in the mud; to land one in difficulties or mistakes.  To go on shore from a ship or boat; to disembark; to come to the end of a course.
third: 1. Next after the second; coming after two others; -- the ordinal of three; as, the thirdhour in the day. "The third night." Chaucer. 2. Constituting or being one of three equal parts into which anything is divided; as, the third part of a day. Third estate. (a) In England, the commons, or the commonalty, who are represented in Parliament by the House of Commons. (b) In France, the tiers état. See Tiers état. Third order (R. C. Ch.), an order attached to a monastic order, and comprising men and women devoted to a rule of pious living, called the third rule, by a simple vow if they remain seculars, and by more solemn vows if they become regulars. See Tertiary, n., 1. -- Third person (Gram.), the person spoken of. See Person, n., 7. -- Third sound. (Mus.) See Third, n., 3.  1. The quotient of a unit divided by three; one of three equal parts into which anything is divided. 2. The sixtieth part of a second of time. 3. (Mus.)  The third tone of the scale; the mediant. 4. pl. (Law)  The third part of the estate of a deseased husband, which, by some local laws, the widow is entitled to enjoy during her life. Major third (Mus.), an interval of two tones. -- Minor third (Mus.), an interval of a tone and a half.
brown: Of a dark color, of various shades between black and red or yellow. Cheeks brown as the oak leaves. Longfellow. Brown Bess, the old regulation flintlock smoothbore musket, with bronzed barrel, formerly used in the British army. -- Brown bread (a) Dark colored bread; esp. a kind made of unbolted wheat flour, sometimes called in the United States Graham bread. "He would mouth with a beggar though she smelt brown bread and garlic." Shak. (b) Dark colored bread made of rye meal and Indian meal, or of wheat and rye or Indian; rye and Indian bread. [U.S.] -- Brown coal, wood coal. See Lignite. -- Brown hematite or Brown iron ore (Min.), the hydrous iron oxide, limonite, which has a brown streak. See Limonite. -- Brown holland. See under Holland. -- Brown paper, dark colored paper, esp. coarse wrapping paper, made of unbleached materials. -- Brown spar (Min.), a ferruginous variety of dolomite, in part identical with ankerite. -- Brown stone. See Brownstone. -- Brown stout, a strong kind of proter or malt liquor. -- Brown study, a state of mental abstraction or serious reverie. W. Irving.  A dark color inclining to red or yellow, resulting from the mixture of red and black, or of red, black, and yellow; a tawny, dusky hue.  1. To make brown or dusky. A trembling twilight o'er welkin moves,Browns the dim void and darkens deep the groves. Barlow. 2. To make brown by scorching slightly; as, to brown meat or flour. 3. To give a bright brown color to, as to gun barrels, by forming a thin coat of oxide on their surface. Ure.  To become brown.
free: 1. Exempt from subjection to the will of others; not under restraint, control, or compulsion; able to follow one's own impulses, desires, or inclinations; determining one's own course of action; not dependent; at liberty. That which has the power, or not the power, to operate, is that alone which is or is not free. Locke. 2. Not under an arbitrary or despotic government; subject only to fixed laws regularly and fairly administered, and defended by them from encroachments upon natural or acquired rights; enjoying political liberty. 3. Liberated, by arriving at a certain age, from the control of parents, guardian, or master. 4. Not confined or imprisoned; released from arrest; liberated; at liberty to go. Set an unhappy prisoner free. Prior. 5. Not subjected to the laws of physical necessity; capable of voluntary activity; endowed with moral liberty; -- said of the will. Not free, what proof could they have given sincere Of true allegiance, constant faith, or love. Milton. 6. Clear of offense or crime; guiltless; innocent. My hands are guilty, but my heart is free. Dryden. 7. Unconstrained by timidity or distrust; unreserved; ingenuous; frank; familiar; communicative. He was free only with a few. Milward. 8. Unrestrained; immoderate; lavish; licentious; -- used in a bad sense. The critics have been very free in their censures. Felton. A man may live a free life as to wine or women. Shelley. 9. Not close or parsimonious; liberal; open-handed; lavish; as, free with his money. 10. Exempt; clear; released; liberated; not encumbered or troubled with; as, free from pain; free from a burden; -- followed by from, or, rarely, by of. Princes declaring themselves free from the obligations of their treaties. Bp. Burnet. 11. Characteristic of one acting without restraint; charming; easy. 12. Ready; eager; acting without spurring or whipping; spirited; as, a free horse. 13. Invested with a particular freedom or franchise; enjoying certain immunities or privileges; admitted to special rights; -- followed by of. He therefore makes all birds, of every sect, Free of his farm. Dryden. 14. Thrown open, or made accessible, to all; to be enjoyed without limitations; unrestricted; not obstructed, engrossed, or appropriated; open; -- said of a thing to be possessed or enjoyed; as, a free school. Why, sir, I pray, are not the streets as free For me as for you Shak. 15. Not gained by importunity or purchase; gratuitous; spontaneous; as, free admission; a free gift. 16. Not arbitrary or despotic; assuring liberty; defending individual rights against encroachment by any person or class; instituted by a free people; -- said of a government, institutions, etc. 17. (O. Eng. Law)  Certain or honorable; the opposite of base; as, free service; free socage. Burrill. 18. (Law)  Privileged or individual; the opposite of common; as, a free fishery; a free warren. Burrill. 19. Not united or combined with anything else; separated; dissevered; unattached; at liberty to escape; as, free carbonic acid gas; free cells. Free agency, the capacity or power of choosing or acting freely, or without necessity or constraint upon the will. -- Free bench (Eng. Law), a widow's right in the copyhold lands of her husband, corresponding to dower in freeholds. -- Free board (Naut.), a vessel's side between water line and gunwale. -- Free bond (Chem.), an unsaturated or unemployed unit, or bond, of affinity or valence, of an atom or radical. -- Free-borough men (O.Eng. Law). See Friborg. -- Free chapel (Eccles.), a chapel not subject to the jurisdiction of the ordinary, having been founded by the king or by a subject specially authorized. [Eng.] Bouvier. -- Free charge (Elec.), a charge of electricity in the free or statical condition; free electricity. -- Free church. (a) A church whose sittings are for all and without charge. (b) An ecclesiastical body that left the Church of Scotland, in 1843, to be free from control by the government in spiritual matters. -- Free city, or Free town, a city or town independent in its government and franchises, as formerly those of the Hanseatic league. -- Free cost, freedom from charges or expenses. South. -- Free and easy, unconventional; unrestrained; regardless of formalities. [Colloq.] "Sal and her free and easy ways." W. Black. -- Free goods, goods admitted into a country free of duty. -- Free labor, the labor of freemen, as distinguished from that of slaves. -- Free port. (Com.) (a) A port where goods may be received and shipped free of custom duty. (b) A port where goods of all kinds are received from ships of all nations at equal rates of duty. -- Free public house, in England, a tavern not belonging to a brewer, so that the landlord is free to brew his own beer or purchase where he chooses. Simmonds. -- Free school. (a) A school to which pupils are admitted without discrimination and on an equal footing. (b) A school supported by general taxation, by endowmants, etc., where pupils pay nothing for tuition; a public school. -- Free services (O.Eng. Law), such feudal services as were not unbecoming the character of a soldier or a freemen to perform; as, to serve under his lord in war, to pay a sum of money, etc. Burrill. -- Free ships, ships of neutral nations, which in time of war are free from capture even though carrying enemy's goods. -- Free socage (O.Eng. Law), a feudal tenure held by certain services which, though honorable, were not military. Abbott. -- Free States, those of the United States before the Civil War, in which slavery had ceased to exist, or had never existed. -- Free stuff (Carp.), timber free from knots; clear stuff. -- Free thought, that which is thought independently of the authority of others. -- Free trade, commerce unrestricted by duties or tariff regulations. -- Free trader, one who believes in free trade. -- To make free with, to take liberties with; to help one's self to. [Colloq.] -- To sail free (Naut.), to sail with the yards not braced in as sharp as when sailing closehauled, or close to the wind.  1. Freely; willingly. [Obs.] I as free forgive you As I would be forgiven. Shak. 2. Without charge; as, children admitted free.  1. To make free; to set at liberty; to rid of that which confines, limits, embarrasses, oppresses, etc.; to release; to disengage; to clear; -- followed by from, and sometimes by off; as, to free a captive or a slave; to be freed of these inconveniences. Clarendon. Our land is from the rage of tigers freed. Dryden. Arise, . . . free thy people from their yoke. Milton. 2. To remove, as something that confines or bars; to relieve from the constraint of. This master key Frees every lock, and leads us to his person. Dryden. 3. To frank. [Obs.] Johnson.
success: 1. Act of succeeding; succession. [Obs.] Then all the sons of these five brethren reigned By due success. Spenser. 2. That which comes after; hence, consequence, issue, or result, of an endeavor or undertaking, whether good or bad; the outcome of effort. Men . . . that are like to do that, that is committed to them, and to report back again faithfully the success. Bacon. Perplexed and troubled at his bad success The tempter stood. Milton. 3. The favorable or prosperous termination of anything attempted; the attainment of a proposed object; prosperous issue. Dream of success and happy victory! Shak. Or teach with more success her son The vices of the time to shun. Waller. Military successes, above all others, elevate the minds of a people. Atterbury. 4. That which meets with, or one who accomplishes, favorable results, as a play or a player. [Colloq.]
case: 1. A box, sheath, or covering; as, a case for holding goods; a case for spectacles; the case of a watch; the case (capsule) of a cartridge; a case (cover) for a book. 2. A box and its contents; the quantity contained in a box; as, a case of goods; a case of instruments. 3. (Print.)  A shallow tray divided into compartments or "boxes" for holding type. Note: Cases for type are usually arranged in sets of two, called respectively the upper and the lower case. The upper case contains capitals, small capitals, accented; the lower case contains the small letters, figures, marks of punctuation, quadrats, and spaces. 4. An inclosing frame; a casing; as, a door case; a window case. 5. (Mining)  A small fissure which admits water to the workings. Knight.  1. To cover or protect with, or as with, a case; to inclose. The man who, cased in steel, had passed whole days and nights in the saddle. Prescott. 2. To strip the skin from; as, to case a box. [Obs.]  1. Chance; accident; hap; opportunity. [Obs.] By aventure, or sort, or cas. Chaucer. 2. That which befalls, comes, or happens; an event; an instance; a circumstance, or all the circumstamces; condition; state of things; affair; as, a strange case; a case of injustice; the case of the Indian tribes. In any case thou shalt deliver him the pledge. Deut. xxiv. 13. If the case of the man be so with his wife. Matt. xix. 10. And when a lady's in the case. You know all other things give place. Gay. You think this madness but a common case. Pope. I am in case to justle a constable, Shak. 3. (Med. & Surg.)  A patient under treatment; an instance of sickness or injury; as, ten cases of fever; also, the history of a disease or injury. A proper remedy in hypochondriacal cases. Arbuthnot. 4. (Law)  The matters of fact or conditions involved in a suit, as distinguished from the questions of law; a suit or action at law; a cause. Let us consider the reason of the case, for nothing is law that is not reason. Sir John Powell. Not one case in the reports of our courts. Steele. 5. (Gram.)  One of the forms, or the inflections or changes of form, of a noun, pronoun, or adjective, which indicate its relation to other words, and in the aggregate constitute its declension; the relation which a noun or pronoun sustains to some other word. Case is properly a falling off from the nominative or first state of word; the name for which, however, is now, by extension of its signification, applied also to the nominative. J. W. Gibbs. Note: Cases other than the nominative are oblique cases. Case endings are terminations by which certain cases are distinguished. In old English, as in Latin, nouns had several cases distinguished by case endings, but in modern English only that of the possessive case is retained. Action on the case (Law), according to the old classification (now obsolete), was an action for redress of wrongs or injuries to person or property not specially provided against by law, in which the whole cause of complaint was set out in the writ; -- called also trespass on the case, or simply case. -- All a case, a matter of indifference. [Obs.] "It is all a case to me." L'Estrange. -- Case at bar. See under Bar, n. -- Case divinity, casuistry. -- Case lawyer, one versed in the reports of cases rather than in the science of the law. -- Case stated or agreed on (Law), a statement in writing of facts agreed on and submitted to the court for a decision of the legal points arising on them. -- A hard case, an abandoned or incorrigible person. [Colloq.] -- In any case, whatever may be the state of affairs; anyhow. -- In case, or In case that, if; supposing that; in the event or contingency; if it should happen that. "In case we are surprised, keep by me." W. Irving. -- In good case, in good condition, health, or state of body. -- To put a case, to suppose a hypothetical or illustrative case. Syn. -- Situation, condition, state; circumstances; plight; predicament; occurrence; contingency; accident; event; conjuncture; cause; action; suit.  To propose hypothetical cases. [Obs.] "Casing upon the matter." L'Estrange.
ran: imp. of Run.  Open robbery. [Obs.] Lambarde.  Yarns coiled on a spun-yarn winch.
listen: 1. To give close attention with the purpose of hearing; to give ear; to hearken; to attend. When we have occasion to listen, and give a more particular attention to same sound, the tympanum is drawn to a more than ordinary tension. Holder. 2. To give heed; to yield to advice; to follow admonition; to obey. Listen to me, and by me be ruled. Tennyson. To listen after, to take an interest in. [Obs.] Soldiers note forts, armories, and magazines; scholars listen after libraries, disputations, and professors. Fuller. Syn. -- To attend; hearken. See Attend.  To attend to. [Obs.] Shak.
son: 1. A male child; the male issue, or offspring, of a parent, father or mother. Sarah conceived, and bare Abraham a son. Gen. xxi. 2. 2. A male descendant, however distant; hence, in the plural, descendants in general. I am the son of the wise, the son of ancient kings. Isa. xix. 11. I am the Lord, I change not; therefore ye sons of Jacob are not consumed. Mal. iii. 6. 3. Any young male person spoken of as a child; an adopted male child; a pupil, ward, or any other male dependent. The child grew, and she brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter, and he became her son. Ex. ii. 10. Be plain, good son, and homely in thy drift. Shak. 4. A native or inhabitant of some specified place; as, sons of Albion; sons of New England. 5. The produce of anything. Earth's tall sons, the cedar, oak, and pine. Blackmore. 6. (Commonly with the def. article)  Jesus Christ, the Savior; -- called the Son of God, and the Son of man. We . . . do testify that the Father sent the Son to be the Savior of the world. 1 John iv. 14. Who gave His Son sure all has given. Keble. Note: The expressions son of pride, sons of light, son of Belial, are Hebraisms, which denote persons possessing the qualitites of pride, of light, or of Belial, as children inherit the qualities of their ancestors. Sons of the prophets. See School of the prophets, under Prophet.
when: 1. At what time; -- used interrogatively. When shall these things be Matt. xxiv. 3. Note: See the Note under What, pron., 1. 2. At what time; at, during, or after the time that; at or just after, the moment that; -- used relatively. Kings may Take their advantage when and how they list. Daniel. Book lore ne'er served, when trial came, Nor gifts, when faith was dead. J. H. Newman. 3. While; whereas; although; -- used in the manner of a conjunction to introduce a dependent adverbial sentence or clause, having a causal, conditional, or adversative relation to the principal proposition; as, he chose to turn highwayman when he might have continued an honest man; he removed the tree when it was the best in the grounds. 4. Which time; then; -- used elliptically as a noun. I was adopted heir by his consent; Since when, his oath is broke. Shak. Note: When was formerly used as an exclamation of surprise or impatience, like what! Come hither; mend my ruff: Here, when! thou art such a tedious lady! J. Webster. When as, When that, at the time that; when. [Obs.] When as sacred light began to dawn. Milton. When that mine eye is famished for a look. Shak.
beat: 1. To strike repeatedly; to lay repeated blows upon; as, to beat one's breast; to beat iron so as to shape it; to beat grain, in order to force out the seeds; to beat eggs and sugar; to beat a drum. Thou shalt beat some of it [spices] very small. Ex. xxx. 36. They did beat the gold into thin plates. Ex. xxxix. 3. 2. To punish by blows; to thrash. 3. To scour or range over in hunting, accompanied with the noise made by striking bushes, etc., for the purpose of rousing game. To beat the woods, and rouse the bounding prey. Prior. 4. To dash against, or strike, as with water or wind. A frozen continent . . . beat with perpetual storms. Milton. 5. To tread, as a path. Pass awful gulfs, and beat my painful way. Blackmore. 6. To overcome in a battle, contest, strife, race, game, etc.; to vanquish or conquer; to surpass. He beat them in a bloody battle. Prescott. For loveliness, it would be hard to beat that. M. Arnold. 7. To cheat; to chouse; to swindle; to defraud; -- often with out. [Colloq.] 8. To exercise severely; to perplex; to trouble. Why should any one . . . beat his head about the Latin grammar who does not intend to be a critic Locke. 9. (Mil.)  To give the signal for, by beat of drum; to sound by beat of drum; as, to beat an alarm, a charge, a parley, a retreat; to beat the general, the reveille, the tattoo. See Alarm, Charge, Parley, etc. To beat down, to haggle with (any one) to secure a lower price; to force down. [Colloq.] -- To beat into, to teach or instill, by repetition. -- To beat off, to repel or drive back. -- To beat out, to extend by hammering. -- To beat out of a thing, to cause to relinquish it, or give it up. "Nor can anything beat their posterity out of it to this day." South. -- To beat the dust. (Man.) (a) To take in too little ground with the fore legs, as a horse. (b) To perform curvets too precipitately or too low. -- To beat the hoof, to walk; to go on foot. -- To beat the wing, to flutter; to move with fluttering agitation. -- To beat time, to measure or regulate time in music by the motion of the hand or foot. -- To beat up, to attack suddenly; to alarm or disturb; as, to beat up an enemy's quarters. Syn. -- To strike; pound; bang; buffet; maul; drub; thump; baste; thwack; thrash; pommel; cudgel; belabor; conquer; defeat; vanquish; overcome.  1. To strike repeatedly; to inflict repeated blaows; to knock vigorously or loudly. The men of the city . . . beat at the door. Judges. xix. 22. 2. To move with pulsation or throbbing. A thousand hearts beat happily. Byron. 3. To come or act with violence; to dash or fall with force; to strike anything, as, rain, wind, and waves do. Sees rolling tempests vainly beat below. Dryden. They [winds] beat at the crazy casement. Longfellow. The sun beat upon the head of Jonah, that he fainted, and wisbed in himself to die. Jonah iv. 8. Public envy seemeth to beat chiefly upon ministers. Bacon. 4. To be in agitation or doubt. [Poetic] To still my beating mind. Shak . 5. (Naut.)  To make progress against the wind, by sailing in a zigzag line or traverse. 6. To make a sound when struck; as, the drums beat. 7. (Mil.)  To make a succession of strokes on a drum; as, the drummers beat to call soldiers to their quarters. 8. (Acoustics & Mus.)  To sound with more or less rapid alternations of greater and less intensity, so as to produce a pulsating effect; -- said of instruments, tones, or vibrations, not perfectly in unison. A beating wind (Naut.), a wind which necessitates tacking in order to make progress. -- To beat about, to try to find; to search by various means or ways. Addison. -- To beat about the bush, to approach a subject circuitously. -- To beat up and down (Hunting), to run first one way and then another; -- said of a stag. -- To beat up for recruits, to go diligently about in order to get helpers or participators in an enterprise.  1. A stroke; a blow. He, with a careless beat, Struck out the mute creation at a heat. Dryden. 2. A recurring stroke; a throb; a pulsation; as, a beat of the heart; the beat of the pulse. 3. (Mus.) (a) The rise or fall of the hand or foot, marking the divisions of time; a division of the measure so marked. In the rhythm of music the beat is the unit. (b) A transient grace note, struck immediately before the one it is intended to ornament. 4. (Acoustics & Mus.)  A sudden swelling or reënforcement of a sound, recurring at regular intervals, and produced by the interference of sound waves of slightly different periods of vibrations; applied also, by analogy, to other kinds of wave motions; the pulsation or throbbing produced by the vibrating together of two tones not quite in unison. See Beat, v. i., 8. 5. A round or course which is frequently gone over; as, a watchman's beat. 6. A place of habitual or frequent resort. 7. A cheat or swindler of the lowest grade; -- often emphasized by dead; as, a dead beat. [Low] Beat of drum (Mil.), a succession of strokes varied, in different ways, for particular purposes, as to regulate a march, to call soldiers to their arms or quarters, to direct an attack, or retreat, etc. -- Beat of a watch, or clock, the stroke or sound made by the action of the escapement. A clock is in beat or out of beat, according as the strokes is at equal or unequal intervals.  Weary; tired; fatigued; exhausted. [Colloq.] Quite beat, and very much vexed and disappointed. Dickens.
shell: 1. A hard outside covering, as of a fruit or an animal. Specifically: (a) The covering, or outside part, of a nut; as, a hazelnut shell. (b) A pod. (c) The hard covering of an egg. Think him as a serpent's egg, . . . And kill him in the shell. Shak. (d) (Zoöl.)  The hard calcareous or chitinous external covering of mollusks, crustaceans, and some other invertebrates. In some mollusks, as the cuttlefishes, it is internal, or concealed by the mantle. Also, the hard covering of some vertebrates, as the armadillo, the tortoise, and the like. (e) (Zoöl.) Hence, by extension, any mollusks having such a covering. 2. (Mil.)  A hollow projectile, of various shapes, adapted for a mortar or a cannon, and containing an explosive substance, ignited with a fuse or by percussion, by means of which the projectile is burst and its fragments scattered. See Bomb. 3. The case which holds the powder, or charge of powder and shot, used with breechloading small arms. 4. Any slight hollow structure; a framework, or exterior structure, regarded as not complete or filled in; as, the shell of a house. 5. A coarse kind of coffin; also, a thin interior coffin inclosed in a more substantial one. Knight. 6. An instrument of music, as a lyre, -- the first lyre having been made, it is said, by drawing strings over a tortoise shell. When Jubal struck the chorded shell. Dryden. 7. An engraved copper roller used in print works. 8. pl.  The husks of cacao seeds, a decoction of which is often used as a substitute for chocolate, cocoa, etc. 9. (Naut.)  The outer frame or case of a block within which the sheaves revolve. 10. A light boat the frame of which is covered with thin wood or with paper; as, a racing shell. Message shell, a bombshell inside of which papers may be put, in order to convey messages. -- Shell bit, a tool shaped like a gouge, used with a brace in boring wood. See Bit, n., 3. -- Shell button. (a) A button made of shell. (b) A hollow button made of two pieces, as of metal, one for the front and the other for the back, -- often covered with cloth, silk, etc. -- Shell cameo, a cameo cut in shell instead of stone. -- Shell flower. (Bot.) Same as Turtlehead. -- Shell gland. (Zoöl.) (a) A glandular organ in which the rudimentary shell is formed in embryonic mollusks. (b) A glandular organ which secretes the eggshells of various worms, crustacea, mollusks, etc. -- Shell gun, a cannon suitable for throwing shells. -- Shell ibis (Zoöl.), the openbill of India. -- Shell jacket, an undress military jacket. -- Shell lime, lime made by burning the shells of shellfish. -- Shell marl (Min.), a kind of marl characterized by an abundance of shells, or fragments of shells. -- Shell meat, food consisting of shellfish, or testaceous mollusks. Fuller. -- Shell mound. See under Mound. -- Shell of a boiler, the exterior of a steam boiler, forming a case to contain the water and steam, often inclosing also flues and the furnace; the barrel of a cylindrical, or locomotive, boiler. -- Shell road, a road of which the surface or bed is made of shells, as oyster shells. -- Shell sand, minute fragments of shells constituting a considerable part of the seabeach in some places.  1. To strip or break off the shell of; to take out of the shell, pod, etc.; as, to shell nuts or pease; to shell oysters. 2. To separate the kernels of (an ear of Indian corn, wheat, oats, etc.) from the cob, ear, or husk. 3. To throw shells or bombs upon or into; to bombard; as, to shell a town. To shell out, to distribute freely; to bring out or pay, as money. [Colloq.]  1. To fall off, as a shell, crust, etc. 2. To cast the shell, or exterior covering; to fall out of the pod or husk; as, nuts shell in falling. 3. To be disengaged from the ear or husk; as, wheat or rye shells in reaping.
black: 1. Destitute of light, or incapable of reflecting it; of the color of soot or coal; of the darkest or a very dark color, the opposite of white; characterized by such a color; as, black cloth; black hair or eyes. O night, with hue so black! Shak. 2. In a less literal sense: Enveloped or shrouded in darkness; very dark or gloomy; as, a black night; the heavens black with clouds. I spy a black, suspicious, threatening cloud. Shak. 3. Fig.: Dismal, gloomy, or forbidding, like darkness; destitute of moral light or goodness; atrociously wicked; cruel; mournful; calamitous; horrible. "This day's black fate." "Black villainy." "Arise, black vengeance." "Black day." "Black despair." Shak. 4. Expressing menace, or discontent; threatening; sullen; foreboding; as, to regard one with black looks. Note: Black is often used in self-explaining compound words; as, black-eyed, black-faced, black-haired, black-visaged. Black act, the English statute 9 George I, which makes it a felony to appear armed in any park or warren, etc., or to hunt or steal deer, etc., with the face blackened or disguised. Subsequent acts inflicting heavy penalties for malicious injuries to cattle and machinery have been called black acts. -- Black angel (Zoöl.), a fish of the West Indies and Florida (Holacanthus tricolor), with the head and tail yellow, and the middle of the body black. -- Black antimony (Chem.), the black sulphide of antimony, Sb2S3, used in pyrotechnics, etc. -- Black bear (Zoöl.), the common American bear (Ursus Americanus). -- Black beast. See Bête noire. -- Black beetle (Zoöl.), the common large cockroach (Blatta orientalis). -- Black and blue, the dark color of a bruise in the flesh, which is accompanied with a mixture of blue. "To pinch the slatterns black and blue." Hudibras. -- Black bonnet (Zoöl.), the black-headed bunting (Embriza Schoeniclus) of Europe. -- Black canker, a disease in turnips and other crops, produced by a species of caterpillar. -- Black cat (Zoöl.), the fisher, a quadruped of North America allied to the sable, but larger. See Fisher. -- Black cattle, any bovine cattle reared for slaughter, in distinction from dairy cattle. [Eng.] -- Black cherry. See under Cherry. -- Black cockatoo (Zoöl.), the palm cockatoo. See Cockatoo. -- Black copper. Same as Melaconite. -- Black currant. (Bot.) See Currant. -- Black diamond. (Min.) See Carbonado. -- Black draught (Med.), a cathartic medicine, composed of senna and magnesia. -- Black drop (Med.), vinegar of opium; a narcotic preparation consisting essentially of a solution of opium in vinegar. -- Black earth, mold; earth of a dark color. Woodward. -- Black flag, the flag of a pirate, often bearing in white a skull and crossbones; a signal of defiance. -- Black flea (Zoöl.), a flea beetle (Haltica nemorum) injurious to turnips. -- Black flux, a mixture of carbonate of potash and charcoal, obtained by deflagrating tartar with half its weight of niter. Brande & C. -- Black fly. (Zoöl.) (a) In the United States, a small, venomous, two-winged fly of the genus Simulium of several species, exceedingly abundant and troublesome in the northern forests. The larvæ are aquatic. (b) A black plant louse, as the bean aphis (A. fabæ). -- Black Forest Etym: [a translation of G. Schwarzwald], a forest in Baden and Würtemburg, in Germany; a part of the ancient Hercynian forest. -- Black game, or Black grouse. (Zoöl.) See Blackcock, Grouse, and Heath grouse. -- Black grass (Bot.), a grasslike rush of the species Juncus Gerardi, growing on salt marshes, and making good hay. -- Black gum (Bot.), an American tree, the tupelo or pepperidge. See Tupelo. -- Black Hamburg (grape) (Bot.), a sweet and juicy variety of dark purple or "black" grape. -- Black horse (Zoöl.), a fish of the Mississippi valley (Cycleptus elongatus), of the sucker family; the Missouri sucker. -- Black lemur (Zoöl.), the Lemurniger of Madagascar; the acoumbo of the natives. -- Black list, a list of persons who are for some reason thought deserving of censure or punishment; -- esp. a list of persons stigmatized as insolvent or untrustworthy, made for the protection of tradesmen or employers. See Blacklist, v. t. -- Black manganese (Chem.), the black oxide of manganese, MnO2. -- Black Maria, the close wagon in which prisoners are carried to or from jail. -- Black martin (Zoöl.), the chimney swift. See Swift. -- Black moss (Bot.), the common so-called long moss of the southern United States. See Tillandsia. -- Black oak. See under Oak. -- Black ocher. See Wad. -- Black pigment, a very fine, light carbonaceous substance, or lampblack, prepared chiefly for the manufacture of printers' ink. It is obtained by burning common coal tar. -- Black plate, sheet iron before it is tinned. Knight. -- Black quarter, malignant anthrax with engorgement of a shoulder or quarter, etc., as of an ox. -- Black rat (Zoöl.), one of the species of rats (Mus rattus), commonly infesting houses. -- Black rent. See Blackmail, n., 3. -- Black rust, a disease of wheat, in which a black, moist matter is deposited in the fissures of the grain. -- Black sheep, one in a family or company who is unlike the rest, and makes trouble. -- Black silver. (Min.) See under Silver. -- Black and tan, black mixed or spotted with tan color or reddish brown; -- used in describing certain breeds of dogs. -- Black tea. See under Tea. -- Black tin (Mining), tin ore (cassiterite), when dressed, stamped and washed, ready for smelting. It is in the form of a black powder, like fine sand. Knight. -- Black walnut. See under Walnut. -- Black warrior (Zoöl.), an American hawk (Buteo Harlani). Syn. -- Dark; murky; pitchy; inky; somber; dusky; gloomy; swart; Cimmerian; ebon; atrocious.  Sullenly; threateningly; maliciously; so as to produce blackness.  1. That which is destitute of light or whiteness; the darkest color, or rather a destitution of all color; as, a cloth has a good black. Black is the badge of hell, The hue of dungeons, and the suit of night. Shak. 2. A black pigment or dye. 3. A negro; a person whose skin is of a black color, or shaded with black; esp. a member or descendant of certain African races. 4. A black garment or dress; as, she wears black; pl. (Obs.)  Mourning garments of a black color; funereal drapery. Friends weeping, and blacks, and obsequies, and the like show death terrible. Bacon. That was the full time they used to wear blacks for the death of their fathers. Sir T. North. 5. The part of a thing which is distinguished from the rest by being black. The black or sight of the eye. Sir K. Digby. 6. A stain; a spot; a smooch. Defiling her white lawn of chastity with ugly blacks of lust. Rowley. Black and white, writing or print; as, I must have that statement in black and white. -- Blue black, a pigment of a blue black color. -- Ivory black, a fine kind of animal charcoal prepared by calcining ivory or bones. When ground it is the chief ingredient of the ink used in copperplate printing. -- Berlin black. See under Berlin.  1. To make black; to blacken; to soil; to sully. They have their teeth blacked, both men and women, for they say a dog hath his teeth white, therefore they will black theirs. Hakluyt. Sins which black thy soul. J. Fletcher. 2. To make black and shining, as boots or a stove, by applying blacking and then polishing with a brush.
past: Of or pertaining to a former time or state; neither present nor future; gone by; elapsed; ended; spent; as, past troubles; past offences. "Past ages." Milton. Past master. See under Master.  A former time or state; a state of things gone by. "The past, at least, is secure." D. Webster. The present is only intelligible in the light of the past, often a very remote past indeed. Trench.  1. Beyond, in position, or degree; further than; beyond the reach or influence of. "Who being past feeling." Eph. iv. 19. "Galled past endurance." Macaulay. Until we be past thy borders. Num. xxi. 22. Love, when once past government, is consequently past shame. L'Estrange. 2. Beyond, in time; after; as, past the hour. Is it not past two o'clock Shak. 3. Above; exceeding; more than. [R.] Not past three quarters of a mile. Shak. Bows not past three quarters of a yard long. Spenser.  By; beyond; as, he ran past. The alarum of drums swept past. Longfellow.
cool: 1. Moderately cold; between warm and cold; lacking in warmth; producing or promoting coolness. Fanned with cool winds. Milton. 2. Not ardent, warm, fond, or passionate; not hasty; deliberate; exercising self-control; self-possessed; dispassionate; indifferent; as, a cool lover; a cool debater. For a patriot, too cool. Goldsmith. 3. Not retaining heat; light; as, a cool dress. 4. Manifesting coldness or dislike; chilling; apathetic; as, a cool manner. 5. Quietly impudent; negligent of propriety in matters of minor importance, either ignorantly or willfully; presuming and selfish; audacious; as, cool behavior. Its cool stare of familiarity was intolerable. Hawthorne. 6. Applied facetiously, in a vague sense, to a sum of money, commonly as if to give emphasis to the largeness of the amount. He had lost a cool hundred. Fielding. Leaving a cool thousand to Mr.Matthew Pocket. Dickens. Syn. -- Calm; dispassionate; self-possessed; composed; repulsive; frigid; alienated; impudent.  A moderate state of cold; coolness; -- said of the temperature of the air between hot and cold; as, the cool of the day; the cool of the morning or evening.  1. To make cool or cold; to reduce the temperature of; as, ice cools water. Send Lazarus, that he may dip the tip of his finger in water, and cool my tongue. Luke xvi. 24. 2. To moderate the heat or excitement of; to allay, as passion of any kind; to calm; to moderate. We have reason to cool our raging motions, our carnal stings, our unbitted lusts. Shak. To cool the heels, to dance attendance; to wait, as for admission to a patron's house. [Colloq.] Dryden.  1. To become less hot; to lose heat. I saw a smith stand with his hammer, thus, the whilst his iron did on the anvil cool. Shak. 2. To lose the heat of excitement or passion; to become more moderate. I will not give myself liberty to think, lest I should cool. Congreve.
bell: 1. A hollow metallic vessel, usually shaped somewhat like a cup with a flaring mouth, containing a clapper or tongue, and giving forth a ringing sound on being struck. Note: Bells have been made of various metals, but the best have always been, as now, of an alloy of copper and tin. The Liberty Bell, the famous bell of the Philadelphia State House, which rang when the Continental Congress declared the Independence of the United States, in 1776. It had been cast in 1753, and upon it were the words "Proclaim liberty throughout all the land, to all the inhabitants thereof." 2. A hollow perforated sphere of metal containing a loose ball which causes it to sound when moved. 3. Anything in the form of a bell, as the cup or corol of a flower. "In a cowslip's bell I lie." Shak. 4. (Arch.)  That part of the capital of a column included between the abacus and neck molding; also used for the naked core of nearly cylindrical shape, assumed to exist within the leafage of a capital. 5. pl. (Naut.)  The strikes of the bell which mark the time; or the time so designated. Note: On shipboard, time is marked by a bell, which is struck eight times at 4, 8, and 12 o'clock. Half an hour after it has struck "eight bells" it is struck once, and at every succeeding half hour the number of strokes is increased by one, till at the end of the four hours, which constitute a watch, it is struck eight times. To bear away the bell, to win the prize at a race where the prize was a bell; hence, to be superior in something. Fuller. -- To bear the bell, to be the first or leader; -- in allusion to the bellwether or a flock, or the leading animal of a team or drove, when wearing a bell. -- To curse by bell, book, and candle, a solemn form of excommunication used in the Roman Catholic church, the bell being tolled, the book of offices for the purpose being used, and three candles being extinguished with certain ceremonies. Nares. -- To lose the bell, to be worsted in a contest. "In single fight he lost the bell." Fairfax. -- To shake the bells, to move, give notice, or alarm. Shak. Note: Bell is much used adjectively or in combinations; as, bell clapper; bell foundry; bell hanger; bell-mouthed; bell tower, etc., which, for the most part, are self-explaining. Bell arch (Arch.), an arch of unusual form, following the curve of an ogee. -- Bell cage, or Bell carriage (Arch.), a timber frame constructed to carry one or more large bells. -- Bell cot (Arch.), a small or subsidiary construction, frequently corbeled out from the walls of a structure, and used to contain and support one or more bells. -- Bell deck (Arch.), the floor of a belfry made to serve as a roof to the rooms below. -- Bell founder, one whose occupation it is to found or cast bells. -- Bell foundry, or Bell foundery, a place where bells are founded or cast. -- Bell gable (Arch.), a small gable-shaped construction, pierced with one or more openings, and used to contain bells. -- Bell glass. See Bell jar. -- Bell hanger, a man who hangs or puts up bells. -- Bell pull, a cord, handle, or knob, connecting with a bell or bell wire, and which will ring the bell when pulled. Aytoun. -- Bell punch, a kind of conductor's punch which rings a bell when used. -- Bell ringer, one who rings a bell or bells, esp. one whose business it is to ring a church bell or chime, or a set of musical bells for public entertainment. -- Bell roof (Arch.), a roof shaped according to the general lines of a bell. -- Bell rope, a rope by which a church or other bell is rung. -- Bell tent, a circular conical-topped tent. -- Bell trap, a kind of bell shaped stench trap.  To put a bell upon; as, to bell the cat. 2. To make bell-mouthed; as, to bell a tube.  To develop bells or corollas; to take the form of a bell; to blossom; as, hops bell.  To utter by bellowing. [Obs.]  To call or bellow, as the deer in rutting time; to make a bellowing sound; to roar. As loud as belleth wind in hell. Chaucer. The wild buck bells from ferny brake. Sir W. Scott.
right: 1. Straight; direct; not crooked; as, a right line. "Right as any line." Chaucer 2. Upright; erect from a base; having an upright axis; not oblique; as, right ascension; a right pyramid or cone. 3. Conformed to the constitution of man and the will of God, or to justice and equity; not deviating from the true and just; according with truth and duty; just; true. That which is conformable to the Supreme Rule is absolutely right, and is called right simply without relation to a special end. Whately. 2. Fit; suitable; proper; correct; becoming; as, the right man in the right place; the right way from London to Oxford. 5. Characterized by reality or genuineness; real; actual; not spurious. "His right wife." Chaucer. In this battle, . . . the Britons never more plainly manifested themselves to be right barbarians. Milton. 6. According with truth; passing a true judgment; conforming to fact or intent; not mistaken or wrong; not erroneous; correct; as, this is the right faith. You are right, Justice, and you weigh this well. Shak. If there be no prospect beyond the grave, the inference is . . . right, "Let us eat and drink, for to-morrow we die." Locke. 7. Most favorable or convenient; fortunate. The lady has been disappointed on the right side. Spectator. 8. Of or pertaining to that side of the body in man on which the muscular action is usually stronger than on the other side; -- opposed to left when used in reference to a part of the body; as, the right side, hand, arm. Also applied to the corresponding side of the lower animals. Became the sovereign's favorite, his right hand. Longfellow. Note: In designating the banks of a river, right and left are used always with reference to the position of one who is facing in the direction of the current's flow. 9. Well placed, disposed, or adjusted; orderly; well regulated; correctly done. 10. Designed to be placed or worn outward; as, the right side of a piece of cloth. At right angles, so as to form a right angle or right angles, as when one line crosses another perpendicularly. -- Right and left, in both or all directions. [Colloq.] -- Right and left coupling (Pipe fitting), a coupling the opposite ends of which are tapped for a right-handed screw and a left-handed screw, respectivelly. -- Right angle. (a) The angle formed by one line meeting another perpendicularly, as the angles ABD, DBC. (b) (Spherics) A spherical angle included between the axes of two great circles whose planes are perpendicular to each other. -- Right ascension. See under Ascension. -- Right Center (Politics), those members belonging to the Center in a legislative assembly who have sympathies with the Right on political questions. See Center, n., 5. -- Right cone, Right cylinder, Right prism, Right pyramid (Geom.), a cone, cylinder, prism, or pyramid, the axis of which is perpendicular to the base. -- Right line. See under Line. -- Right sailing (Naut.), sailing on one of the four cardinal points, so as to alter a ship's latitude or its longitude, but not both. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- Right sphere (Astron. & Geol.), a sphere in such a position that the equator cuts the horizon at right angles; in spherical projections, that position of the sphere in which the primitive plane coincides with the plane of the equator. Note: Right is used elliptically for it is right, what you say is right, true. "Right," cries his lordship. Pope. Syn. -- Straight; direct; perpendicular; upright; lawful; rightful; true; correct; just; equitable; proper; suitable; becoming.  1. In a right manner. 2. In a right or straight line; directly; hence; straightway; immediately; next; as, he stood right before me; it went right to the mark; he came right out; he followed right after the guide. Unto Dian's temple goeth she right. Chaucer. Let thine eyes look right on. Prov. iv. 25. Right across its track there lay, Down in the water, a long reef of gold. Tennyson. 3. Exactly; just. [Obs. or Colloq.] Came he right now to sing a raven's note Shak. 4. According to the law or will of God; conforming to the standard of truth and justice; righteously; as, to live right; to judge right. 5. According to any rule of art; correctly. You with strict discipline instructed right. Roscommon. 6. According to fact or truth; actually; truly; really; correctly; exactly; as, to tell a story right. "Right at mine own cost." Chaucer. Right as it were a steed of Lumbardye. Chaucer. His wounds so smarted that he slept right naught. Fairfax. 7. In a great degree; very; wholly; unqualifiedly; extremely; highly; as, right humble; right noble; right valiant. "He was not right fat". Chaucer. For which I should be right sorry. Tyndale. [I] return those duties back as are right fit. Shak. Note: In this sense now chiefly prefixed to titles; as, right honorable; right reverend. Right honorable, a title given in England to peers and peeresses, to the eldest sons and all daughters of such peers as have rank above viscounts, and to all privy councilors; also, to certain civic officers, as the lord mayor of London, of York, and of Dublin. Note: Right is used in composition with other adverbs, as upright, downright, forthright, etc. Right along, without cessation; continuously; as, to work right along for several hours. [Colloq. U.S.] -- Right away, or Right off, at once; straightway; without delay. [Colloq. U.S.] "We will . . . shut ourselves up in the office and do the work right off." D. Webster.  1. That which is right or correct. Specifically: (a) The straight course; adherence to duty; obedience to lawful authority, divine or human; freedom from guilt, -- the opposite of moral wrong. (b) A true statement; freedom from error of falsehood; adherence to truth or fact. Seldom your opinions err; Your eyes are always in the right. Prior. (c) A just judgment or action; that which is true or proper; justice; uprightness; integrity. Long love to her has borne the faithful knight, And well deserved, had fortune done him right. Dryden. 2. That to which one has a just claim. Specifically: (a) That which one has a natural claim to exact. There are no rights whatever, without corresponding duties. Coleridge. (b) That which one has a legal or social claim to do or to exact; legal power; authority; as, a sheriff has a right to arrest a criminal. (c) That which justly belongs to one; that which one has a claim to possess or own; the interest or share which anyone has in a piece of property; title; claim; interest; ownership. Born free, he sought his right. Dryden. Hast thou not right to all created things Milton. Men have no right to what is not reasonable. Burke. (d) Privilege or immunity granted by authority. 3. The right side; the side opposite to the left. Led her to the Souldan's right. Spenser. 4. In some legislative bodies of Europe (as in France), those members collectively who are conservatives or monarchists. See Center, 5. 5. The outward or most finished surface, as of a piece of cloth, a carpet, etc. At all right, at all points; in all respects. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Bill of rights, a list of rights; a paper containing a declaration of rights, or the declaration itself. See under Bill. -- By right, By rights, or By good rights, rightly; properly; correctly. He should himself use it by right. Chaucer. I should have been a woman by right. Shak. -- Divine right, or Divine right of kings, a name given to the patriarchal theory of government, especially to the doctrine that no misconduct and no dispossession can forfeit the right of a monarch or his heirs to the throne, and to the obedience of the people. -- To rights. (a) In a direct line; straight. [R.] Woodward. (b) At once; directly. [Obs. or Colloq.] Swift. -- To set to rights, To put to rights, to put in good order; to adjust; to regulate, as what is out of order. -- Writ of right (Law), a writ which lay to recover lands in fee simple, unjustly withheld from the true owner. Blackstone.  1. To bring or restore to the proper or natural position; to set upright; to make right or straight (that which has been wrong or crooked); to correct. 2. To do justice to; to relieve from wrong; to restore rights to; to assert or regain the rights of; as, to right the oppressed; to right one's self; also, to vindicate. So just is God, to right the innocent. Shak. All experience hath shown that mankind are more disposed to suffer while evils are sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms to which they are accustomed. Jefferson. To right a vessel (Naut.), to restore her to an upright position after careening. -- To right the helm (Naut.), to place it in line with the keel.  1. To recover the proper or natural condition or position; to become upright. 2. (Naut.)  Hence, to regain an upright position, as a ship or boat, after careening.
earth: 1. The globe or planet which we inhabit; the world, in distinction from the sun, moon, or stars. Also, this world as the dwelling place of mortals, in distinction from the dwelling place of spirits. That law preserves the earth a sphere And guides the planets in their course. S. Rogers. In heaven, or earth, or under earth, in hell. Milton. 2. The solid materials which make up the globe, in distinction from the air or water; the dry land. God called the dry land earth. Gen. i. 10. He is pure air and fire, and the dull elements of earth and water never appear in him. Shak. 3. The softer inorganic matter composing part of the surface of the globe, in distinction from the firm rock; soil of all kinds, including gravel, clay, loam, and the like; sometimes, soil favorable to the growth of plants; the visible surface of the globe; the ground; as, loose earth; rich earth. Give him a little earth for charity. Shak. 4. A part of this globe; a region; a country; land. Would I had never trod this English earth. Shak. 5. Worldly things, as opposed to spiritual things; the pursuits, interests, and allurements of this life. Our weary souls by earth beguiled. Keble. 6. The people on the globe. The whole earth was of one language. Gen. xi. 1. 7. (Chem.) (a) Any earthy-looking metallic oxide, as alumina, glucina, zirconia, yttria, and thoria. (b) A similar oxide, having a slight alkaline reaction, as lime, magnesia, strontia, baryta. 8. A hole in the ground, where an animal hides himself; as, the earth of a fox. Macaulay. They [ferrets] course the poor conies out of their earths. Holland. Note: Earth is used either adjectively or in combination to form compound words; as, earth apple or earth-apple; earth metal or earth- metal; earth closet or earth-closet. Adamic earth, Bitter earth, Bog earth, Chian earth, etc. See under Adamic, Bitter, etc. -- Alkaline earths. See under Alkaline. -- Earth apple. (Bot.) (a) A potato. (b) A cucumber. -- Earth auger, a form of auger for boring into the ground; -- called also earth borer. -- Earth bath, a bath taken by immersing the naked body in earth for healing purposes. -- Earth battery (Physics), a voltaic battery the elements of which are buried in the earth to be acted on by its moisture. -- Earth chestnut, the pignut. -- Earth closet, a privy or commode provided with dry earth or a similar substance for covering and deodorizing the fæcal discharges. -- Earth dog (Zoöl.), a dog that will dig in the earth, or enter holes of foxes, etc. -- Earth hog, Earth pig (Zoöl.), the aard-vark. -- Earth hunger, an intense desire to own land, or, in the case of nations, to extend their domain. -- Earth light (Astron.), the light reflected by the earth, as upon the moon, and corresponding to moonlight; -- called also earth shine. Sir J. Herschel. -- Earth metal. See 1st Earth, 7. (Chem.) -- Earth oil, petroleum. -- Earth pillars or pyramids (Geol.), high pillars or pyramids of earth, sometimes capped with a single stone, found in Switzerland. Lyell. -- Earth pitch (Min.), mineral tar, a kind of asphaltum. -- Earth quadrant, a fourth of the earth's circumference. -- Earth table (Arch.), the lowest course of stones visible in a building; the ground table. -- On earth, an intensive expression, oftenest used in questions and exclamations; as, What on earth shall I do Nothing on earth will satisfy him. [Colloq.]  1. To hide, or cause to hide, in the earth; to chase into a burrow or den. "The fox is earthed." Dryden. 2. To cover with earth or mold; to inter; to bury; -- sometimes with up. The miser earths his treasure, and the thief, Watching the mole, half beggars him ere noon. Young. Why this in earthing up a carcass R. Blair.  To burrow. Tickell.  A plowing. [Obs.] Such land as ye break up for barley to sow, Two earths at the least, ere ye sow it, bestow. Tusser.
beauty: 1. An assemblage or graces or properties pleasing to the eye, the ear, the intellect, the æsthetic faculty, or the moral sense. Beauty consists of a certain composition of color and figure, causing delight in the beholder. Locke. The production of beauty by a multiplicity of symmetrical parts uniting in a consistent whole. Wordsworth. The old definition of beauty, in the Roman school, was, "multitude in unity;" and there is no doubt that such is the principle of beauty. Coleridge. 2. A particular grace, feature, ornament, or excellence; anything beautiful; as, the beauties of nature. 3. A beautiful person, esp. a beautiful woman. All the admired beauties of Verona. Shak. 4. Prevailing style or taste; rage; fashion. [Obs.] She stained her hair yellow, which was then the beauty. Jer. Taylor. Beauty spot, a patch or spot placed on the face with intent to heighten beauty by contrast.
piece: 1. A fragment or part of anything separated from the whole, in any manner, as by cutting, splitting, breaking, or tearing; a part; a portion; as, a piece of sugar; to break in pieces. Bring it out piece by piece. Ezek. xxiv. 6. 2. A definite portion or quantity, as of goods or work; as, a piece of broadcloth; a piece of wall paper. 3. Any one thing conceived of as apart from other things of the same kind; an individual article; a distinct single effort of a series; a definite performance; especially: (a) A literary or artistic composition; as, a piece of poetry, music, or statuary. (b) A musket, gun, or cannon; as, a battery of six pieces; a following piece. (c) A coin; as, a sixpenny piece; -- formerly applied specifically to an English gold coin worth 22 shillings. (d) A fact; an item; as, a piece of news; a piece of knowledge. 4. An individual; -- applied to a person as being of a certain nature or quality; often, but not always, used slightingly or in contempt. "If I had not been a piece of a logician before I came to him." Sir P. Sidney. Thy mother was a piece of virtue. Shak. His own spirit is as unsettled a piece as there is in all the world. Coleridge. a piece of cake, a task easily accomplished. a piece of work, a disparaging term for a person considered to have an excess of some undesirable quality; esp. difficult or eccentric person. Piece of ass vulgar term for a woman, considered as a partner in sexual intercourse 5. (Chess)  One of the superior men, distinguished from a pawn. 6. A castle; a fortified building. [Obs.] Spenser. Of a piece, of the same sort, as if taken from the same whole; like; -- sometimes followed by with. Dryden. -- Piece of eight, the Spanish piaster, formerly divided into eight reals. -- To give a piece of one's mind to, to speak plainly, bluntly, or severely to (another). Tackeray. -- Piece broker, one who buys shreds and remnants of cloth to sell again. -- Piece goods, goods usually sold by pieces or fixed portions, as shirtings, calicoes, sheetings, and the like.  1. To make, enlarge, or repair, by the addition of a piece or pieces; to patch; as, to piece a garment; -- often with out. Shak. 2. To unite; to join; to combine. Fuller. His adversaries . . . pieced themselves together in a joint opposition against him. Fuller.  To unite by a coalescence of parts; to fit together; to join. "It pieced better." Bacon.
lake: A pigment formed by combining some coloring matter, usually by precipitation, with a metallic oxide or earth, esp. with aluminium hydrate; as, madder lake; Florentine lake; yellow lake, etc.  A kind of fine white linen, formerly in use. [Obs.] Chaucer.  To play; to sport. [Prov. Eng.]  A large body of water contained in a depression of the earth's surface, and supplied from the drainage of a more or less extended area. Note: Lakes are for the most part of fresh water; the salt lakes, like the Great Salt Lake of Utah, have usually no outlet to the ocean. Lake dwellers (Ethnol.), people of a prehistoric race, or races, which inhabited different parts of Europe. Their dwellings were built on piles in lakes, a short distance from the shore. Their relics are common in the lakes of Switzerland. -- Lake dwellings (Archæol.), dwellings built over a lake, sometimes on piles, and sometimes on rude foundations kept in place by piles; specifically, such dwellings of prehistoric times. Lake dwellings are still used by many savage tribes. Called also lacustrine dwellings. See Crannog. -- Lake fly (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of dipterous flies of the genus Chironomus. In form they resemble mosquitoes, but they do not bite. The larvæ live in lakes. -- Lake herring (Zoöl.), the cisco (Coregonus Artedii). -- Lake poets, Lake school, a collective name originally applied in contempt, but now in honor, to Southey, Coleridge, and Wordsworth, who lived in the lake country of Cumberland, England, Lamb and a few others were classed with these by hostile critics. Called also lakers and lakists. -- Lake sturgeon (Zoöl.), a sturgeon (Acipenser rubicundus), of moderate size, found in the Great Lakes and the Mississippi River. It is used as food. -- Lake trout (Zoöl.), any one of several species of trout and salmon; in Europe, esp. Salmo fario; in the United States, esp. Salvelinus namaycush of the Great Lakes, and of various lakes in New York, Eastern Maine, and Canada. A large variety of brook trout (S. fontinalis), inhabiting many lakes in New England, is also called lake trout. See Namaycush. -- Lake whitefish. (Zoöl.) See Whitefish. -- Lake whiting (Zoöl.), an American whitefish (Coregonus Labradoricus), found in many lakes in the Northern United States and Canada. It is more slender than the common whitefish.
soldier: 1. One who is engaged in military service as an officer or a private; one who serves in an army; one of an organized body of combatants. I am a soldier and unapt to weep. Shak. 2. Especially, a private in military service, as distinguished from an officer. It were meet that any one, before he came to be a captain, should have been a soldier. Spenser. 3. A brave warrior; a man of military experience and skill, or a man of distinguished valor; -- used by way of emphasis or distinction. Shak. 4. (Zoöl.)  The red or cuckoo gurnard (Trigla pini.) [Prov. Eng.] 5. (Zoöl.)  One of the asexual polymorphic forms of white ants, or termites, in which the head and jaws are very large and strong. The soldiers serve to defend the nest. See Termite. Soldier beetle (Zoöl.), an American carabid beetle (Chauliognathus Americanus) whose larva feeds upon other insects, such as the plum curculio. -- Soldier bug (Zoöl.), any hemipterous insect of the genus Podisus and allied genera, as the spined soldier bug (Podius spinosus). These bugs suck the blood of other insects. -- Soldier crab (Zoöl.) (a) The hermit crab. (b) The fiddler crab. -- Soldier fish (Zoöl.), a bright-colored etheostomoid fish (Etheostoma coeruleum) found in the Mississippi River; -- called also blue darter, and rainbow darter. -- Soldier fly (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of small dipterous flies of the genus Stratyomys and allied genera. They are often bright green, with a metallic luster, and are ornamented on the sides of the back with markings of yellow, like epaulets or shoulder straps. -- Soldier moth (Zoöl.), a large geometrid moth (Euschema militaris), having the wings bright yellow with bluish black lines and spots. -- Soldier orchis (Bot.), a kind of orchis (Orchis militaris).  1. To serve as a soldier. 2. To make a pretense of doing something, or of performing any task. [Colloq.U.S.] Note: In this sense the vulgar pronounciation (so"jer) is jocosely preserved. It needs an opera glass to discover whether the leaders are pulling, or only soldiering. C. D. Warner.
hand: 1. That part of the fore limb below the forearm or wrist in man and monkeys, and the corresponding part in many other animals; manus; paw. See Manus. 2. That which resembles, or to some extent performs the office of, a human hand; as: (a) A limb of certain animals, as the foot of a hawk, or any one of the four extremities of a monkey. (b) An index or pointer on a dial; as, the hour or minute hand of a clock. 3. A measure equal to a hand's breadth, -- four inches; a palm. Chiefly used in measuring the height of horses. 4. Side; part; direction, either right or left. On this hand and that hand, were hangings. Ex. xxxviii. 15. The Protestants were then on the winning hand. Milton. 5. Power of performance; means of execution; ability; skill; dexterity. He had a great mind to try his hand at a Spectator. Addison. 6. Actual performance; deed; act; workmanship; agency; hence, manner of performance. To change the hand in carrying on the war. Clarendon. Gideon said unto God, If thou wilt save Israel by my hand. Judges vi. 36. 7. An agent; a servant, or laborer; a workman, trained or competent for special service or duty; a performer more or less skillful; as, a deck hand; a farm hand; an old hand at speaking. A dictionary containing a natural history requires too many hands, as well as too much time, ever to be hoped for. Locke. I was always reckoned a lively hand at a simile. Hazlitt. 8. Handwriting; style of penmanship; as, a good, bad or running hand. Hence, a signature. I say she never did invent this letter; This is a man's invention and his hand. Shak. Some writs require a judge's hand. Burril. 9. Personal possession; ownership; hence, control; direction; management; -- usually in the plural. "Receiving in hand one year's tribute." Knolles. Albinus . . . found means to keep in his hands the goverment of Britain. Milton. 10. Agency in transmission from one person to another; as, to buy at first hand, that is, from the producer, or when new; at second hand, that is, when no longer in the producer's hand, or when not new. 11. Rate; price. [Obs.] "Business is bought at a dear hand, where there is small dispatch." Bacon. 12. That which is, or may be, held in a hand at once; as: (a) (Card Playing) The quota of cards received from the dealer. (b) (Tobacco Manuf.) A bundle of tobacco leaves tied together. 13. (Firearms)  The small part of a gunstock near the lock, which is grasped by the hand in taking aim. Note: Hand is used figuratively for a large variety of acts or things, in the doing, or making, or use of which the hand is in some way employed or concerned; also, as a symbol to denote various qualities or conditions, as: (a) Activity; operation; work; -- in distinction from the head, which implies thought, and the heart, which implies affection. "His hand will be against every man." Gen. xvi. 12.(b) Power; might; supremacy; -- often in the Scriptures. "With a mighty hand . . . will I rule over you." Ezek. xx. 33.(c) Fraternal feeling; as, to give, or take, the hand; to give the right hand. (d) Contract; -- commonly of marriage; as, to ask the hand; to pledge the hand. Note: Hand is often used adjectively or in compounds (with or without the hyphen), signifying performed by the hand; as, hand blow or hand- blow, hand gripe or hand-gripe: used by, or designed for, the hand; as, hand ball or handball, hand bow, hand fetter, hand grenade or hand-grenade, handgun or hand gun, handloom or hand loom, handmill or hand organ or handorgan, handsaw or hand saw, hand-weapon: measured or regulated by the hand; as, handbreadth or hand's breadth, hand gallop or hand-gallop. Most of the words in the following paragraph are written either as two words or in combination. Hand bag, a satchel; a small bag for carrying books, papers, parcels, etc. -- Hand basket, a small or portable basket. -- Hand bell, a small bell rung by the hand; a table bell. Bacon. -- Hand bill, a small pruning hook. See 4th Bill. -- Hand car. See under Car. -- Hand director (Mus.), an instrument to aid in forming a good position of the hands and arms when playing on the piano; a hand guide. -- Hand drop. See Wrist drop. -- Hand gallop. See under Gallop. -- Hand gear (Mach.), apparatus by means of which a machine, or parts of a machine, usually operated by other power, may be operated by hand. -- Hand glass. (a) A glass or small glazed frame, for the protection of plants. (b) A small mirror with a handle. -- Hand guide. Same as Hand director (above). -- Hand language, the art of conversing by the hands, esp. as practiced by the deaf and dumb; dactylology. -- Hand lathe. See under Lathe. -- Hand money, money paid in hand to bind a contract; earnest money. -- Hand organ (Mus.), a barrel organ, operated by a crank turned by hand. -- Hand plant. (Bot.) Same as Hand tree (below). -- Hand rail, a rail, as in staircases, to hold by. Gwilt. -- Hand sail, a sail managed by the hand. Sir W. Temple. -- Hand screen, a small screen to be held in the hand. -- Hand screw, a small jack for raising heavy timbers or weights; (Carp.) a screw clamp. -- Hand staff (pl. Hand staves), a javelin. Ezek. xxxix. 9. -- Hand stamp, a small stamp for dating, addressing, or canceling papers, envelopes, etc. -- Hand tree (Bot.), a lofty tree found in Mexico (Cheirostemon platanoides), having red flowers whose stamens unite in the form of a hand. -- Hand vise, a small vise held in the hand in doing small work. Moxon. -- Hand work, or Handwork, work done with the hands, as distinguished from work done by a machine; handiwork. -- All hands, everybody; all parties. -- At all hands, On all hands, on all sides; from every direction; generally. -- At any hand, At no hand, in any (or no) way or direction; on any account; on no account. "And therefore at no hand consisting with the safety and interests of humility." Jer. Taylor. -- At first hand, At second hand. See def. 10 (above). -- At hand. (a) Near in time or place; either present and within reach, or not far distant. "Your husband is at hand; I hear his trumpet." Shak. (b) Under the hand or bridle. [Obs.] "Horses hot at hand." Shak. -- At the hand of, by the act of; as a gift from. "Shall we receive good at the hand of God and shall we not receive evil" Job ii. 10. -- Bridle hand. See under Bridle. -- By hand, with the hands, in distinction from instrumentality of tools, engines, or animals; as, to weed a garden by hand; to lift, draw, or carry by hand. -- Clean hands, freedom from guilt, esp. from the guilt of dishonesty in money matters, or of bribe taking. "He that hath clean hands shall be stronger and stronger." Job xvii. 9. -- From hand to hand, from one person to another. -- Hand in hand. (a) In union; conjointly; unitedly. Swift. (b) Just; fair; equitable. As fair and as good, a kind of hand in hand comparison. Shak. -- Hand over hand, Hand over fist, by passing the hands alternately one before or above another; as, to climb hand over hand; also, rapidly; as, to come up with a chase hand over hand. -- Hand over head, negligently; rashly; without seeing what one does. [Obs.] Bacon. -- Hand running, consecutively; as, he won ten times hand running. -- Hand off! keep off! forbear! no interference or meddling! -- Hand to hand, in close union; in close fight; as, a hand to hand contest. Dryden. -- Heavy hand, severity or oppression. -- In hand. (a) Paid down. "A considerable reward in hand, and . . . a far greater reward hereafter." Tillotson. (b) In preparation; taking place. Chaucer. "Revels . . . in hand." Shak. (c) Under consideration, or in the course of transaction; as, he has the business in hand. -- In one's hand or hands. (a) In one's possession or keeping. (b) At one's risk, or peril; as, I took my life in my hand. -- Laying on of hands, a form used in consecrating to office, in the rite of confirmation, and in blessing persons. -- Light hand, gentleness; moderation. -- Note of hand, a promissory note. -- Off hand, Out of hand, forthwith; without delay, hesitation, or difficulty; promptly. "She causeth them to be hanged up out of hand." Spenser. -- Off one's hands, out of one's possession or care. -- On hand, in present possession; as, he has a supply of goods on hand. -- On one's hands, in one's possession care, or management. -- Putting the hand under the thigh, an ancient Jewish ceremony used in swearing. -- Right hand, the place of honor, power, and strength. -- Slack hand, idleness; carelessness; inefficiency; sloth. -- Strict hand, severe discipline; rigorous government. -- To bear a hand (Naut), to give help quickly; to hasten. -- To bear in hand, to keep in expectation with false pretenses. [Obs.] Shak. -- To be hand and glove, or in glove with. See under Glove. -- To be on the mending hand, to be convalescent or improving. -- To bring up by hand, to feed (an infant) without suckling it. -- To change hand. See Change. -- To change hands, to change sides, or change owners. Hudibras. -- To clap the hands, to express joy or applause, as by striking the palms of the hands together. -- To come to hand, to be received; to be taken into possession; as, the letter came to hand yesterday. -- To get hand, to gain influence. [Obs.] Appetites have . . . got such a hand over them. Baxter. -- To got one's hand in, to make a beginning in a certain work; to become accustomed to a particular business. -- To have a hand in, to be concerned in; to have a part or concern in doing; to have an agency or be employed in. -- To have in hand. (a) To have in one's power or control. Chaucer. (b) To be engaged upon or occupied with. -- To have one's hands full, to have in hand al that one can do, or more than can be done conveniently; to be pressed with labor or engagements; to be surrounded with difficulties. -- To have, or get, the (higher) upper hand, to have, or get, the better of another person or thing. -- To his hand, To my hand, etc., in readiness; already prepared. "The work is made to his hands." Locke. -- To hold hand, to compete successfully or on even conditions. [Obs.] Shak. -- To lay hands on, to seize; to assault. -- To lend a hand, to give assistance. -- To lift, or put forth, the hand against, to attack; to oppose; to kill. -- To live from hand to mouth, to obtain food and other necessaries as want compels, without previous provision. -- To make one's hand, to gain advantage or profit. -- To put the hand unto, to steal. Ex. xxii. 8.-- To put the last, or finishing, hand to, to make the last corrections in; to complete; to perfect. -- To set the hand to, to engage in; to undertake. That the Lord thy God may bless thee in all that thou settest thine hand to. Deut. xxiii. 20. -- To stand one in hand, to concern or affect one. -- To strike hands, to make a contract, or to become surety for another's debt or good behavior. -- To take in hand. (a) To attempt or undertake. (b) To seize and deal with; as, he took him in hand. -- To wash the hands of, to disclaim or renounce interest in, or responsibility for, a person or action; as, to wash one's hands of a business. Matt. xxvii. 24. -- Under the hand of, authenticated by the handwriting or signature of; as, the deed is executed under the hand and seal of the owner.  1. To give, pass, or transmit with the hand; as, he handed them the letter. 2. To lead, guide, or assist with the hand; to conduct; as, to hand a lady into a carriage. 3. To manage; as, I hand my oar. [Obs.] Prior. 4. To seize; to lay hands on. [Obs.] Shak. 5. To pledge by the hand; to handfast. [R.] 6. (Naut.)  To furl; -- said of a sail. Totten. To hand down, to transmit in succession, as from father to son, or from predecessor to successor; as, fables are handed down from age to age; to forward to the proper officer (the decision of a higher court); as, the Clerk of the Court of Appeals handed down its decision. -- To hand over, to yield control of; to surrender; to deliver up.  To coöperate. [Obs.] Massinger.
test: 1. (Metal.)  A cupel or cupelling hearth in which precious metals are melted for trial and refinement. Our ingots, tests, and many mo. Chaucer. 2. Examination or trial by the cupel; hence, any critical examination or decisive trial; as, to put a man's assertions to a test. "Bring me to the test." Shak. 3. Means of trial; as, absence is a test of love. Each test every light her muse will bear. Dryden. 4. That with which anything is compared for proof of its genuineness; a touchstone; a standard. Life, force, and beauty must to all impart, At once the source, and end, and test of art. Pope. 5. Discriminative characteristic; standard of judgment; ground of admission or exclusion. Our test excludes your tribe from benefit. Dryden. 6. Judgment; distinction; discrimination. Who would excel, when few can make a test Betwixt indifferent writing and the best Dryden. 7. (Chem.)  A reaction employed to recognize or distinguish any particular substance or constituent of a compound, as the production of some characteristic precipitate; also, the reagent employed to produce such reaction; thus, the ordinary test for sulphuric acid is the production of a white insoluble precipitate of barium sulphate by means of some soluble barium salt. Test act (Eng. Law), an act of the English Parliament prescribing a form of oath and declaration against transubstantiation, which all officers, civil and military, were formerly obliged to take within six months after their admission to office. They were obliged also to receive the sacrament according to the usage of the Church of England. Blackstone. -- Test object (Optics), an object which tests the power or quality of a microscope or telescope, by requiring a certain degree of excellence in the instrument to determine its existence or its peculiar texture or markings. -- Test paper. (a) (Chem.) Paper prepared for use in testing for certain substances by being saturated with a reagent which changes color in some specific way when acted upon by those substances; thus, litmus paper is turned red by acids, and blue by alkalies, turmeric paper is turned brown by alkalies, etc. (b) (Law) An instrument admitted as a standard or comparison of handwriting in those jurisdictions in which comparison of hands is permitted as a mode of proving handwriting. -- Test tube. (Chem.) (a) A simple tube of thin glass, closed at one end, for heating solutions and for performing ordinary reactions. (b) A graduated tube. Syn. -- Criterion; standard; experience; proof; experiment; trial. -- Test, Trial. Trial is the wider term; test is a searching and decisive trial. It is derived from the Latin testa (earthen pot), which term was early applied to the fining pot, or crucible, in which metals are melted for trial and refinement. Hence the peculiar force of the word, as indicating a trial or criterion of the most decisive kind. I leave him to your gracious acceptance, whose trial shall better publish his commediation. Shak. Thy virtue, prince, has stood the test of fortune, Like purest gold, that tortured in the furnace, Comes out more bright, and brings forth all its weight. Addison.  1. (Metal.)  To refine, as gold or silver, in a test, or cupel; to subject to cupellation. 2. To put to the proof; to prove the truth, genuineness, or quality of by experiment, or by some principle or standard; to try; as, to test the soundness of a principle; to test the validity of an argument. Experience is the surest standard by which to test the real tendency of the existing constitution. Washington. 3. (Chem.)  To examine or try, as by the use of some reagent; as, to test a solution by litmus paper.  A witness. [Obs.] Prelates and great lords of England, who were for the more surety tests of that deed. Ld. Berners.  To make a testament, or will. [Obs.]  1. (Zoöl.)  The external hard or firm covering of many invertebrate animals. Note: The test of crustaceans and insects is composed largely of chitin; in mollusks it is composed chiefly of calcium carbonate, and is called the shell. 2. (Bot.)  The outer integument of a seed; the episperm, or spermoderm.
exact: 1. Precisely agreeing with a standard, a fact, or the truth; perfectly conforming; neither exceeding nor falling short in any respect; true; correct; precise; as, the clock keeps exact time; he paid the exact debt; an exact copy of a letter; exact accounts. I took a great pains to make out the exact truth. Jowett (Thucyd. ) 2. Habitually careful to agree with a standard, a rule, or a promise; accurate; methodical; punctual; as, a man exact in observing an appointment; in my doings I was exact. "I see thou art exact of taste." Milton. 3. Precisely or definitely conceived or stated; strict. An exact command, Larded with many several sorts of reason. Shak.  To demand or require authoritatively or peremptorily, as a right; to enforce the payment of, or a yielding of; to compel to yield or to furnish; hence, to wrest, as a fee or reward when none is due; -- followed by from or of before the one subjected to exaction; as, to exact tribute, fees, obedience, etc., from or of some one. He said into them, Exact no more than that which is appointed you. Luke. iii. 13. Years of servise past From grateful souls exact reward at last Dryden. My designs Exact me in another place. Massinger.  To practice exaction. [R.] The anemy shall not exact upon him. Ps. lxxxix. 22.
key: 1. An instrument by means of which the bolt of a lock is shot or drawn; usually, a removable metal instrument fitted to the mechanism of a particular lock and operated by turning in its place. 2. An instrument which is turned like a key in fastening or adjusting any mechanism; as, a watch key; a bed key, etc. 3. That part of an instrument or machine which serves as the means of operating it; as, a telegraph key; the keys of a pianoforte, or of a typewriter. 4. A position or condition which affords entrance, control, pr possession, etc.; as, the key of a line of defense; the key of a country; the key of a political situation. Hence, that which serves to unlock, open, discover, or solve something unknown or difficult; as, the key to a riddle; the key to a problem. Those who are accustomed to reason have got the true key of books. Locke. Who keeps the keys of all the creeds. Tennyson. 5. That part of a mechanism which serves to lock up, make fast, or adjust to position. 6. (Arch.) (a) A piece of wood used as a wedge. (b) The last board of a floor when laid down. 7. (Masonry) (a) A keystone. (b) That part of the plastering which is forced through between the laths and holds the rest in place. 8. (Mach.) (a) A wedge to unite two or more pieces, or adjust their relative position; a cotter; a forelock. See Illusts. of Cotter, and Gib. (b) A bar, pin or wedge, to secure a crank, pulley, coupling, etc., upon a shaft, and prevent relative turning; sometimes holding by friction alone, but more frequently by its resistance to shearing, being usually embedded partly in the shaft and partly in the crank, pulley, etc. 9. (Bot.)  An indehiscent, one-seeded fruit furnished with a wing, as the fruit of the ash and maple; a samara; -- called also key fruit. 10. (Mus.) (a) A family of tones whose regular members are called diatonic tones, and named key tone (or tonic) or one (or eight), mediant or three, dominant or five, subdominant or four, submediant or six, supertonic or two, and subtonic or seven. Chromatic tones are temporary members of a key, under such names as " sharp four," "flat seven," etc. Scales and tunes of every variety are made from the tones of a key. (b) The fundamental tone of a movement to which its modulations are referred, and with which it generally begins and ends; keynote. Both warbling of one song, both in one key. Shak. 11. Fig: The general pitch or tone of a sentence or utterance. You fall at once into a lower key. Cowper. Key bed. Same as Key seat. -- Key bolt, a bolt which has a mortise near the end, and is secured by a cotter or wedge instead of a nut. Key bugle. See Kent bugle. -- Key of a position or country. (Mil.) See Key, 4. -- Key seat (Mach.), a bed or groove to receive a key which prevents one part from turning on the other. -- Key way, a channel for a key, in the hole of a piece which is keyed to a shaft; an internal key seat; -- called also key seat. -- Key wrench (Mach.), an adjustable wrench in which the movable jaw is made fast by a key. -- Power of the keys (Eccl.), the authority claimed by the ministry in some Christian churches to administer the discipline of the church, and to grant or withhold its privileges; -- so called from the declaration of Christ, "I will give unto thee the keys of the kingdom of heaven." Matt. xvi. 19.  To fasten or secure firmly; to fasten or tighten with keys or wedges. Francis. To key up. (a) (Arch.) To raise (the whole ring of an arch) off its centering, by driving in the keystone forcibly. (b) (Mus.) To raise the pitch of. (c) Hence, fig., to produce nervous tension in.
chord: 1. The string of a musical instrument. Milton. 2. (Mus.)  A combination of tones simultaneously performed, producing more or less perfect harmony, as, the common chord. 3. (Geom.)  A right line uniting the extremities of the arc of a circle or curve. 4. (Anat.)  A cord. See Cord, n., 4. 5. (Engin.)  The upper or lower part of a truss, usually horizontal, resisting compression or tension. Waddell. Accidental, Common, and Vocal chords. See under Accidental, Common, and Vocal. -- Chord of an arch. See Illust. of Arch. -- Chord of curvature, a chord drawn from any point of a curve, in the circle of curvature for that point. -- Scale of chords. See Scale.  To provide with musical chords or strings; to string; to tune. When Jubal struck the chorded shell. Dryden. Even the solitary old pine tree chords his harp. Beecher.  To accord; to harmonize together; as, this note chords with that.
world: 1. The earth and the surrounding heavens; the creation; the system of created things; existent creation; the universe. The invisible things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen. Rom. 1. 20. With desire to know, What nearer might concern him, how this world Of heaven and earth conspicuous first began. Milton. 2. Any planet or heavenly body, especially when considered as inhabited, and as the scene of interests analogous with human interests; as, a plurality of worlds. "Lord of the worlds above." I. Watts. Amongst innumerable stars, that shone Star distant, but high-hand seemed other worlds. Milton. There may be other worlds, where the inhabitants have never violated their allegiance to their almighty Sovereign. W. B. Sprague. 3. The earth and its inhabitants, with their concerns; the sum of human affairs and interests. That forbidden tree, whose mortal taste Brought death into the world, and all our woe. Milton. 4. In a more restricted sense, that part of the earth and its concerns which is known to any one, or contemplated by any one; a division of the globe, or of its inhabitants; human affairs as seen from a certain position, or from a given point of view; also, state of existence; scene of life and action; as, the Old World; the New World; the religious world; the Catholic world; the upper world; the future world; the heathen world. One of the greatest in the Christian world Shall be my surety. Shak. Murmuring that now they must be put to make war beyond the world's end -- for so they counted Britain. Milton. 5. The customs, practices, and interests of men; general affairs of life; human society; public affairs and occupations; as, a knowledge of the world. Happy is she that from the world retires. Waller. If knowledge of the world makes man perfidious, May Juba ever live in ignorance. Addison. 6. Individual experience of, or concern with, life; course of life; sum of the affairs which affect the individual; as, to begin the world with no property; to lose all, and begin the world anew. 7. The inhabitants of the earth; the human race; people in general; the public; mankind. Since I do purpose to marry, I will think nothing to any purpose that the world can say against it. Shak. Tell me, wench, how will the world repute me For undertaking so unstaid a journey Shak. 8. The earth and its affairs as distinguished from heaven; concerns of this life as distinguished from those of the life to come; the present existence and its interests; hence, secular affairs; engrossment or absorption in the affairs of this life; worldly corruption; the ungodly or wicked part of mankind. I pray not for the world, but for them which thou hast given me; for they are thine. John xvii. 9. Love not the world, neither the things that are in the world. If any man love the world, the love of the Father is not in him. For all that is in the world, the lust of the flesh, and the lust of the eyes, and the pride of life, is not of the Father, but is of the world. 1 John ii. 15, 16. 9. As an emblem of immensity, a great multitude or quantity; a large number. "A world of men." Chapman. "A world of blossoms for the bee." Bryant. Nor doth this wood lack worlds of company. Shak. A world of woes dispatched in little space. Dryden. All . . . in the world, all that exists; all that is possible; as, all the precaution in the world would not save him. -- A world to see, a wonder to see; something admirable or surprising to see. [Obs.] O, you are novices; 't is a world to see How tame, when men and women are alone, A meacock wretch can make the curstest shrew. Shak. -- For all the world. (a) Precisely; exactly. (b) For any consideration. -- Seven wonders of the world. See in the Dictionary of Noted Names in Fiction. -- To go to the world, to be married. [Obs.] "Thus goes every one to the world but I . . . ; I may sit in a corner and cry heighho for a husband!" Shak. -- World's end, the end, or most distant part, of the world; the remotest regions. -- World without end, eternally; forever; everlastingly; as if in a state of existence having no end. Throughout all ages, world without end. Eph. iii. 21.
city: 1. A large town. 2. A corporate town; in the United States, a town or collective body of inhabitants, incorporated and governed by a mayor and aldermen or a city council consisting of a board of aldermen and a common council; in Great Britain, a town corporate, which is or has been the seat of a bishop, or the capital of his see. A city is a town incorporated; which is, or has been, the see of a bishop; and though the bishopric has been dissolved, as at Westminster, it yet remaineth a city. Blackstone When Gorges constituted York a city, he of course meant it to be the seat of a bishop, for the word city has no other meaning in English law. Palfrey 3. The collective body of citizens, or inhabitants of a city. "What is the city but the people" Shak. Syn. -- See Village.  Of or pertaining to a city. Shak. City council. See under Council. -- City court, The municipal court of a city. [U. S.] -- City ward, a watchman, or the collective watchmen, of a city. [Obs.] Fairfax.
forest: 1. An extensive wood; a large tract of land covered with trees; in the United States, a wood of native growth, or a tract of woodland which has never been cultivated. 2. (Eng. Law)  A large extent or precinct of country, generally waste and woody, belonging to the sovereign, set apart for the keeping of game for his use, not inclosed, but distinguished by certain limits, and protected by certain laws, courts, and officers of its own. Burrill.  Of or pertaining to a forest; sylvan. Forest fly. (Zoöl.) (a) One of numerous species of blood-sucking flies, of the family Tabanidæ, which attack both men and beasts. See Horse fly. (b) A fly of the genus Hippobosca, esp. H. equina. See Horse tick. -- Forest glade, a grassy space in a forest. Thomson. -- Forest laws, laws for the protection of game, preservation of timber, etc., in forests. -- Forest tree, a tree of the forest, especially a timber tree, as distinguished from a fruit tree.  To cover with trees or wood.
hard: 1. Not easily penetrated, cut, or separated into parts; not yielding to pressure; firm; solid; compact; -- applied to material bodies, and opposed to soft; as, hard wood; hard flesh; a hard apple. 2. Difficult, mentally or judicially; not easily apprehended, decided, or resolved; as a hard problem. The hard causes they brought unto Moses. Ex. xviii. 26. In which are some things hard to be understood. 2 Peter iii. 16. 3. Difficult to accomplish; full of obstacles; laborious; fatiguing; arduous; as, a hard task; a disease hard to cure. 4. Difficult to resist or control; powerful. The stag was too hard for the horse. L'Estrange. A power which will be always too hard for them. Addison. 5. Difficult to bear or endure; not easy to put up with or consent to; hence, severe; rigorous; oppressive; distressing; unjust; grasping; as, a hard lot; hard times; hard fare; a hard winter; hard conditions or terms. I never could drive a hard bargain. Burke. 6. Difficult to please or influence; stern; unyielding; obdurate; unsympathetic; unfeeling; cruel; as, a hard master; a hard heart; hard words; a hard character. 7. Not easy or agreeable to the taste; stiff; rigid; ungraceful; repelling; as, a hard style. Figures harder than even the marble itself. Dryden. 8. Rough; acid; sour, as liquors; as, hard cider. 9. (Pron.) Abrupt or explosive in utterance; not aspirated, sibilated, or pronounced with a gradual change of the organs from one position to another;- said of certain consonants, as c in came, and g in go, as distinguished from the same letters in center, general, etc. 10. Wanting softness or smoothness of utterance; harsh; as, a hard tone. 11. (Painting) (a) Rigid in the drawing or distribution of the figures; formal; lacking grace of composition. (b) Having disagreeable and abrupt contrasts in the coloring or light and shade. Hard cancer, Hard case, etc. See under Cancer, Case, etc. -- Hard clam, or Hard-shelled clam (Zoöl.), the guahog. -- Hard coal, anthracite, as distinguished from bituminous or soft coal. -- Hard and fast. (Naut.) See under Fast. -- Hard finish (Arch.), a smooth finishing coat of hard fine plaster applied to the surface of rough plastering. -- Hard lines, hardship; difficult conditions. -- Hard money, coin or specie, as distinguished from paper money. -- Hard oyster (Zoöl.), the northern native oyster. [Local, U. S.] - - Hard pan, the hard stratum of earth lying beneath the soil; hence, figuratively, the firm, substantial, fundamental part or quality of anything; as, the hard pan of character, of a matter in dispute, etc. See Pan. -- Hard rubber. See under Rubber. -- Hard solder. See under Solder. -- Hard water, water, which contains lime or some mineral substance rendering it unfit for washing. See Hardness, 3.- Hard wood, wood of a solid or hard texture; as walnut, oak, ash, box, and the like, in distinction from pine, poplar, hemlock, etc.- In hard condition, in excellent condition for racing; having firm muscles;-said of race horses. Syn. -- Solid; arduous; powerful; trying; unyielding; stubborn; stern; flinty; unfeeling; harsh; difficult; severe; obdurate; rigid. See Solid, and Arduous.  1. With pressure; with urgency; hence, diligently; earnestly. And prayed so hard for mercy from the prince. Dryden. My father Is hard at study; pray now, rest yourself. Shak. 2. With difficulty; as, the vehicle moves hard. 3. Uneasily; vexatiously; slowly. Shak. 4. So as to raise difficulties. " The guestion is hard set". Sir T. Browne. 5. With tension or strain of the powers; violently; with force; tempestuously; vehemently; vigorously; energetically; as, to press, to blow, to rain hard; hence, rapidly; as, to run hard. 6. Close or near. Whose house joined hard to the synagogue. Acts xviii.7. Hard by, near by; close at hand; not far off. "Hard by a cottage chimney smokes." Milton. -- Hard pushed, Hard run, greatly pressed; as, he was hard pushed or hard run for time, money, etc. [Colloq.] -- Hard up, closely pressed by want or necessity; without money or resources; as, hard up for amusements. [Slang] Note: Hard in nautical language is often joined to words of command to the helmsman, denoting that the order should be carried out with the utmost energy, or that the helm should be put, in the direction indicated, to the extreme limit, as, Hard aport! Hard astarboard! Hard alee! Hard aweather up! Hard is also often used in composition with a participle; as, hard-baked; hard-earned; hard-working; hard- won.  To harden; to make hard. [Obs.] Chaucer.  A ford or passage across a river or swamp.
still: 1. Motionless; at rest; quiet; as, to stand still; to lie or sit still. "Still as any stone." Chaucer. 2. Uttering no sound; silent; as, the audience is still; the animals are still. The sea that roared at thy command, At thy command was still. Addison. 3. Not disturbed by noise or agitation; quiet; calm; as, a still evening; a still atmosphere. "When all the woods are still." Milton. 4. Comparatively quiet or silent; soft; gentle; low. "A still small voice." 1 Kings xix. 12. 5. Constant; continual. [Obs.] By still practice learn to know thy meaning. Shak. 6. Not effervescing; not sparkling; as, still wines. Still life. (Fine Arts) (a) Inanimate objects. (b) (Painting) The class or style of painting which represents inanimate objects, as fruit, flowers, dead game, etc. Syn. -- Quiet; calm; noiseless; serene; motionless; inert; stagnant.  1. Freedom from noise; calm; silence; as, the still of midnight. [Poetic] 2. A steep hill or ascent. [Obs.] W. Browne.  1. To this time; until and during the time now present; now no less than before; yet. It hath been anciently reported, and is still received. Bacon. 2. In the future as now and before. Hourly joys be still upon you! Shak. 3. In continuation by successive or repeated acts; always; ever; constantly; uniformly. The desire of fame betrays an ambitious man into indecencies that lessen his reputation; he is still afraid lest any of his actions should be thrown away in private. Addison. Chemists would be rich if they could still do in great quantities what they have sometimes done in little. Boyle. 4. In an increasing or additional degree; even more; -- much used with comparatives. The guilt being great, the fear doth still exceed. Shak. 5. Notwithstanding what has been said or done; in spite of what has occured; nevertheless; -- sometimes used as a conjunction. See Synonym of But. As sunshine, broken in the rill, Though turned astray, is sunshine still. Moore. 6. After that; after what is stated. In the primitive church, such as by fear being compelled to sacrifice to strange gods, after repented, and kept still the office of preaching the gospel. Whitgift. Still and anon, at intervals and repeatedly; continually; ever and anon; now and then. And like the watchful minutes to the hour, Still and anon cheered up the heavy time. Shak.  1. To stop, as motion or agitation; to cause to become quiet, or comparatively quiet; to check the agitation of; as, to still the raging sea. He having a full sway over the water, had power to still and compose it, as well as to move and disturb it. Woodward. 2. To stop, as noise; to silence. With his name the mothers still their babies. Shak. 3. To appease; to calm; to quiet, as tumult, agitation, or excitement; as, to still the passions. Shak. Toil that would, at least, have stilled an unquiet impulse in me. Hawthorne. Syn. -- To quiet; calm; allay; lull; pacify; appease; subdue; suppress; silence; stop; check; restrain.  1. A vessel, boiler, or copper used in the distillation of liquids; specifically, one used for the distillation of alcoholic liquors; a retort. The name is sometimes applied to the whole apparatus used in in vaporization and condensation. 2. A house where liquors are distilled; a distillery. Still watcher, a device for indicating the progress of distillation by the density of the liquid given over. Knight.  1. To cause to fall by drops. 2. To expel spirit from by heat, or to evaporate and condense in a refrigeratory; to distill. Tusser.  To drop, or flow in drops; to distill. [Obs.] Spenser.
double: 1. Twofold; multiplied by two; increased by its equivalent; made twice as large or as much, etc. Let a double portion of thy spirit be upon me. 2 Kings ii. 9. Darkness and tempest make a double night. Dryden. 2. Being in pairs; presenting two of a kind, or two in a set together; coupled. [Let] The swan, on still St. Mary's lake, Float double, swan and shadow. Wordsworth. 3. Divided into two; acting two parts, one openly and the other secretly; equivocal; deceitful; insincere. With a double heart do they speak. Ps. xii. 2. 4. (Bot.)  Having the petals in a flower considerably increased beyond the natural number, usually as the result of cultivation and the expense of the stamens, or stamens and pistils. The white water lily and some other plants have their blossoms naturally double. Note: Double is often used as the first part of a compound word, generally denoting two ways, or twice the number, quantity, force, etc., twofold, or having two. Double base, or Double bass (Mus.), the largest and lowest-toned instrument in the violin form; the contrabasso or violone. -- Double convex. See under Convex. -- Double counterpoint (Mus.), that species of counterpoint or composition, in which two of the parts may be inverted, by setting one of them an octave higher or lower. -- Double court (Lawn Tennis), a court laid out for four players, two on each side. -- Double dagger (Print.), a reference mark (||) next to the dagger (|) in order; a diesis. -- Double drum (Mus.), a large drum that is beaten at both ends. -- Double eagle, a gold coin of the United States having the value of 20 dollars. -- Double entry. See under Bookkeeping. -- Double floor (Arch.), a floor in which binding joists support flooring joists above and ceiling joists below. See Illust. of Double-framed floor. -- Double flower. See Double, a., 4. -- Double-framed floor (Arch.), a double floor having girders into which the binding joists are framed. -- Double fugue (Mus.), a fugue on two subjects. -- Double letter. (a) (Print.) Two letters on one shank; a ligature. (b) A mail requiring double postage. -- Double note (Mus.), a note of double the length of the semibreve; a breve. See Breve. -- Double octave (Mus.), an interval composed of two octaves, or fifteen notes, in diatonic progression; a fifteenth. -- Double pica. See under Pica. -- Double play (Baseball), a play by which two players are put out at the same time. -- Double plea (Law), a plea alleging several matters in answer to the declaration, where either of such matters alone would be a sufficient bar to the action. Stephen. -- Double point (Geom.), a point of a curve at which two branches cross each other. Conjugate or isolated points of a curve are called double points, since they possess most of the properties of double points (see Conjugate). They are also called acnodes, and those points where the branches of the curve really cross are called crunodes. The extremity of a cusp is also a double point. -- Double quarrel. (Eccl. Law) See Duplex querela, under Duplex. -- Double refraction. (Opt.) See Refraction. -- Double salt. (Chem.) (a) A mixed salt of any polybasic acid which has been saturated by different bases or basic radicals, as the double carbonate of sodium and potassium, NaKCO3.6H2O. (b) A molecular combination of two distinct salts, as common alum, which consists of the sulphate of aluminium, and the sulphate of potassium or ammonium. -- Double shuffle, a low, noisy dance. -- Double standard (Polit. Econ.), a double standard of monetary values; i. e., a gold standard and a silver standard, both of which are made legal tender. -- Double star (Astron.), two stars so near to each other as to be seen separate only by means of a telescope. Such stars may be only optically near to each other, or may be physically connected so that they revolve round their common center of gravity, and in the latter case are called also binary stars. -- Double time (Mil.). Same as Double-quick. -- Double window, a window having two sets of glazed sashes with an air space between them.  Twice; doubly. I was double their age. Swift.  1. To increase by adding an equal number, quantity, length, value, or the like; multiply by two; to double a sum of money; to double a number, or length. Double six thousand, and then treble that. Shak. 2. To make of two thicknesses or folds by turning or bending together in the middle; to fold one part upon another part of; as, to double the leaf of a book, and the like; to clinch, as the fist; -- often followed by up; as, to double up a sheet of paper or cloth. Prior. Then the old man Was wroth, and doubled up his hands. Tennyson. 3. To be the double of; to exceed by twofold; to contain or be worth twice as much as. Thus reënforced, against the adverse fleet, Still doubling ours, brave Rupert leads the way. Dryden. 4. To pass around or by; to march or sail round, so as to reverse the direction of motion. Sailing along the coast, the doubled the promontory of Carthage. Knolles. 5. (Mil.)  To unite, as ranks or files, so as to form one from each two.  1. To be increased to twice the sum, number, quantity, length, or value; to increase or grow to twice as much. 'T is observed in particular nations, that within the space of three hundred years, notwithstanding all casualties, the number of men doubles. T. Burnet. 2. To return upon one's track; to turn and go back over the same ground, or in an opposite direction. Doubling and turning like a hunted hare. Dryden. Doubling and doubling with laborious walk. Wordsworth. 3. To play tricks; to use sleights; to play false. What penalty and danger you accrue, If you be found to double. J. Webster. 4. (Print.)  To set up a word or words a second time by mistake; to make a doublet. To double upon (Mil.), to inclose between two fires.  1. Twice as much; twice the number, sum, quantity, length, value, and the like. If the thief be found, let him pay double. Ex. xxii. 7. 2. Among compositors, a doublet (see Doublet, 2.); among pressmen, a sheet that is twice pulled, and blurred. 3. That which is doubled over or together; a doubling; a plait; a fold. Rolled up in sevenfold double Of plagues. Marston. 4. A turn or circuit in running to escape pursues; hence, a trick; a shift; an artifice. These men are too well acquainted with the chase to be flung off by any false steps or doubles. Addison. 5. Something precisely equal or counterpart to another; a counterpart. Hence, a wraith. My charming friend . . . has, I am almost sure, a double, who preaches his afternoon sermons for him. Atlantic Monthly. 6. A player or singer who prepares to take the part of another player in his absence; a substitute. 7. Double beer; strong beer. 8. (Eccl.)  A feast in which the antiphon is doubled, hat is, said twice, before and after the Psalms, instead of only half being said, as in simple feasts. Shipley. 9. (Lawn Tennis)  A game between two pairs of players; as, a first prize for doubles. 10. (Mus.)  An old term for a variation, as in Bach's Suites.
total: Whole; not divided; entire; full; complete; absolute; as, a total departure from the evidence; a total loss. " Total darkness." "To undergo myself the total crime." Milton. Total abstinence. See Abstinence, n., 1. -- Total depravity. (Theol.) See Original sin, under Original. Syn: Whole; entire; complete. See Whole.  The whole; the whole sum or amount; as, these sums added make the grand total of five millions.
wall: A kind of knot often used at the end of a rope; a wall knot; a wale. Wall knot, a knot made by unlaying the strands of a rope, and making a bight with the first strand, then passing the second over the end of the first, and the third over the end of the second and through the bight of the first; a wale knot. Wall knots may be single or double, crowned or double-crowned.  1. A work or structure of stone, brick, or other materials, raised to some height, and intended for defense or security, solid and permanent inclosing fence, as around a field, a park, a town, etc., also, one of the upright inclosing parts of a building or a room. The plaster of the wall of the King's palace. Dan. v. 5. 2. A defense; a rampart; a means of protection; in the plural, fortifications, in general; works for defense. The waters were a wall unto them on their right hand, and on their left. Ex. xiv. 22. In such a night, Troilus, methinks, mounted the Troyan walls. Shak. To rush undaunted to defend the walls. Dryden. 3. An inclosing part of a receptacle or vessel; as, the walls of a steam-engine cylinder. 4. (Mining) (a) The side of a level or drift. (b) The country rock bounding a vein laterally. Raymond. Note: Wall is often used adjectively, and also in the formation of compounds, usually of obvious signification; as in wall paper, or wall-paper; wall fruit, or wall-fruit; wallflower, etc. Blank wall, Blind wall, etc. See under Blank, Blind, etc. -- To drive to the wall, to bring to extremities; to push to extremes; to get the advantage of, or mastery over. -- To go to the wall, to be hard pressed or driven; to be the weaker party; to be pushed to extremes. -- To take the wall. to take the inner side of a walk, that is, the side next the wall; hence, to take the precedence. "I will take the wall of any man or maid of Montague's." Shak. -- Wall barley (Bot.), a kind of grass (Hordeum murinum) much resembling barley; squirrel grass. See under Squirrel. -- Wall box. (Mach.) See Wall frame, below. -- Wall creeper (Zoöl.), a small bright-colored bird (Tichodroma muraria) native of Asia and Southern Europe. It climbs about over old walls and cliffs in search of insects and spiders. Its body is ash- gray above, the wing coverts are carmine-red, the primary quills are mostly red at the base and black distally, some of them with white spots, and the tail is blackish. Called also spider catcher. -- Wall cress (Bot.), a name given to several low cruciferous herbs, especially to the mouse-ear cress. See under Mouse-ear. -- Wall frame (Mach.), a frame set in a wall to receive a pillow block or bearing for a shaft passing through the wall; -- called also wall box. -- Wall fruit, fruit borne by trees trained against a wall. -- Wall gecko (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Old World geckos which live in or about buildings and run over the vertical surfaces of walls, to which they cling by means of suckers on the feet. -- Wall lizard (Zoöl.), a common European lizard (Lacerta muralis) which frequents houses, and lives in the chinks and crevices of walls; -- called also wall newt. -- Wall louse, a wood louse. -- Wall moss (Bot.), any species of moss growing on walls. -- Wall newt (Zoöl.), the wall lizard. Shak. -- Wall paper, paper for covering the walls of rooms; paper hangings. -- Wall pellitory (Bot.), a European plant (Parictaria officinalis) growing on old walls, and formerly esteemed medicinal. -- Wall pennywort (Bot.), a plant (Cotyledon Umbilicus) having rounded fleshy leaves. It is found on walls in Western Europe. -- Wall pepper (Bot.), a low mosslike plant (Sedum acre) with small fleshy leaves having a pungent taste and bearing yellow flowers. It is common on walls and rocks in Europe, and is sometimes seen in America. -- Wall pie (Bot.), a kind of fern; wall rue. -- Wall piece, a gun planted on a wall. H. L. Scott. -- Wall plate (Arch.), a piece of timber placed horizontally upon a wall, and supporting posts, joists, and the like. See Illust. of Roof. -- Wall rock, granular limestone used in building walls. [U. S.] Bartlett. -- Wall rue (Bot.), a species of small fern (Asplenium Ruta-muraria) growing on walls, rocks, and the like. -- Wall spring, a spring of water issuing from stratified rocks. -- Wall tent, a tent with upright cloth sides corresponding to the walls of a house. -- Wall wasp (Zoöl.), a common European solitary wasp (Odynerus parietus) which makes its nest in the crevices of walls.  1. To inclose with a wall, or as with a wall. "Seven walled towns of strength." Shak. The king of Thebes, Amphion, That with his singing walled that city. Chaucer. 2. To defend by walls, or as if by walls; to fortify. The terror of his name that walls us in. Denham. 3. To close or fill with a wall, as a doorway.
will: 1. The power of choosing; the faculty or endowment of the soul by which it is capable of choosing; the faculty or power of the mind by which we decide to do or not to do; the power or faculty of preferring or selecting one of two or more objects. It is necessary to form a distinct notion of what is meant by the word "volition" in order to understand the import of the word will, for this last word expresses the power of mind of which "volition" is the act. Stewart. Will is an ambiguous word, being sometimes put for the faculty of willing; sometimes for the act of that faculty, besides [having] other meanings. But "volition" always signifies the act of willing, and nothing else. Reid. Appetite is the will's solicitor, and the will is appetite's controller; what we covet according to the one, by the other we often reject. Hooker. The will is plainly that by which the mind chooses anything. J. Edwards. 2. The choice which is made; a determination or preference which results from the act or exercise of the power of choice; a volition. The word "will," however, is not always used in this its proper acceptation, but is frequently substituted for "volition", as when I say that my hand mover in obedience to my will. Stewart. 3. The choice or determination of one who has authority; a decree; a command; discretionary pleasure. Thy will be done. Matt. vi. 10. Our prayers should be according to the will of God. Law. 4. Strong wish or inclination; desire; purpose. Note: "Inclination is another word with which will is frequently confounded. Thus, when the apothecary says, in Romeo and Juliet, -- My poverty, but not my will, consents; . . . Put this in any liquid thing you will, And drink it off. the word will is plainly used as, synonymous with inclination; not in the strict logical sense, as the immediate antecedent of action. It is with the same latitude that the word is used in common conversation, when we speak of doing a thing which duty prescribes, against one's own will; or when we speak of doing a thing willingly or unwillingly." Stewart. 5. That which is strongly wished or desired. What's your will, good friar Shak. The mariner hath his will. Coleridge. 6. Arbitrary disposal; power to control, dispose, or determine. Deliver me not over unto the will of mine enemies. Ps. xxvii. 12. 7 7 (Law)  The legal declaration of a person's mind as to the manner in which he would have his property or estate disposed of after his death; the written instrument, legally executed, by which a man makes disposition of his estate, to take effect after his death; testament; devise. See the Note under Testament, 1. Note: Wills are written or nuncupative, that is, oral. See Nuncupative will, under Nuncupative. At will (Law), at pleasure. To hold an estate at the will of another, is to enjoy the possession at his pleasure, and be liable to be ousted at any time by the lessor or proprietor. An estate at will is at the will of both parties. -- Good will. See under Good. -- Ill will, enmity; unfriendliness; malevolence. -- To have one's will, to obtain what is desired; to do what one pleases. -- Will worship, worship according to the dictates of the will or fancy; formal worship. [Obs.] -- Will worshiper, one who offers will worship. [Obs.] Jer. Taylor. -- With a will, with willingness and zeal; with all one's heart or strength; earnestly; heartily.  1. To wish; to desire; to incline to have. A wife as of herself no thing ne sholde [should] Wille in effect, but as her husband wolde [would]. Chaucer. Caleb said unto her, What will thou Judg. i. 14. They would none of my counsel. Prov. i. 30. 2. As an auxiliary, will is used to denote futurity dependent on the verb. Thus, in first person, "I will" denotes willingness, consent, promise; and when "will" is emphasized, it denotes determination or fixed purpose; as, I will go if you wish; I will go at all hazards. In the second and third persons, the idea of distinct volition, wish, or purpose is evanescent, and simple certainty is appropriately expressed; as, "You will go," or "He will go," describes a future event as a fact only. To emphasize will denotes (according to the tone or context) certain futurity or fixed determination. Note: Will, auxiliary, may be used elliptically for will go. "I'll to her lodgings." Marlowe. Note: As in shall (which see), the second and third persons may be virtually converted into the first, either by question or indirect statement, so as to receive the meaning which belongs to will in that person; thus, "Will you go" (answer, "I will go") asks assent, requests, etc.; while "Will he go" simply inquires concerning futurity; thus, also,"He says or thinks he will go," "You say or think you will go," both signify willingness or consent. Note: Would, as the preterit of will, is chiefly employed in conditional, subjunctive, or optative senses; as, he would go if he could; he could go if he would; he said that he would go; I would fain go, but can not; I would that I were young again; and other like phrases. In the last use, the first personal pronoun is often omitted; as, would that he were here; would to Heaven that it were so; and, omitting the to in such an adjuration. "Would God I had died for thee." Would is used for both present and future time, in conditional propositions, and would have for past time; as, he would go now if he were ready; if it should rain, he would not go; he would have gone, had he been able. Would not, as also will not, signifies refusal. "He was angry, and would not go in." Luke xv. 28. Would is never a past participle. Note: In Ireland, Scotland, and the United States, especially in the southern and western portions of the United States, shall and will, should and would, are often misused, as in the following examples: -- I am able to devote as much time and attention to other subjects as I will [shall] be under the necessity of doing next winter. Chalmers. A countryman, telling us what he had seen, remarked that if the conflagration went on, as it was doing, we would [should] have, as our next season's employment, the Old Town of Edinburgh to rebuild. H. Miller. I feel assured that I will [shall] not have the misfortune to find conflicting views held by one so enlightened as your excellency. J. Y. Mason.  To be willing; to be inclined or disposed; to be pleased; to wish; to desire. And behold, there came a leper and worshiped him, saying, Lord if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean. And Jesus . . . touched him, saying, I will; be thou clean. Matt. viii. 2, 3. Note: This word has been confused with will, v. i., to choose, which, unlike this, is of the weak conjugation. Will I, nill I, or Will ye, hill ye, or Will he, nill he, whether I, you, or he will it or not; hence, without choice; compulsorily; -- sometimes corrupted into willy nilly. "If I must take service willy nilly." J. H. Newman. "Land for all who would till it, and reading and writing will ye, nill ye." Lowell.  1. To form a distinct volition of; to determine by an act of choice; to ordain; to decree. "What she will to do or say." Milton. By all law and reason, that which the Parliament will not, is no more established in this kingdom. Milton. Two things he [God] willeth, that we should be good, and that we should be happy. Barrow. 2. To enjoin or command, as that which is determined by an act of volition; to direct; to order. [Obs. or R.] They willed me say so, madam. Shak. Send for music, And will the cooks to use their best of cunning To please the palate. Beau. & Fl. As you go, will the lord mayor . . . To attend our further pleasure presently. J. Webster. 3. To give or direct the disposal of by testament; to bequeath; to devise; as, to will one's estate to a child; also, to order or direct by testament; as, he willed that his nephew should have his watch.  To exercise an act of volition; to choose; to decide; to determine; to decree. At Winchester he lies, so himself willed. Robert of Brunne. He that shall turn his thoughts inward upon what passes in his own mind when he wills. Locke. I contend for liberty as it signifies a power in man to do as he wills or pleases. Collins.
cat: 1. (Zoöl.)  An animal of various species of the genera Felis and Lynx. The domestic cat is Felis domestica. The European wild cat (Felis catus) is much larger than the domestic cat. In the United States the name wild cat is commonly applied to the bay lynx (Lynx rufus) See Wild cat, and Tiger cat. Note: The domestic cat includes many varieties named from their place of origin or from some peculiarity; as, the Angora cat; the Maltese cat; the Manx cat. Note: The word cat is also used to designate other animals, from some fancied resemblance; as, civet cat, fisher cat, catbird, catfish shark, sea cat. 2. (Naut.) (a) A strong vessel with a narrow stern, projecting quarters, and deep waist. It is employed in the coal and timber trade. (b) A strong tackle used to draw an anchor up to the cathead of a ship. Totten. 3. A double tripod (for holding a plate, etc.), having six feet, of which three rest on the ground, in whatever position in is placed. 4. An old game; (a) The game of tipcat and the implement with which it is played. See Tipcat. (c) A game of ball, called, according to the number of batters, one old cat, two old cat, etc. 5. A cat o' nine tails. See below. Angora cat, blind cat, See under Angora, Blind. -- Black cat the fisher. See under Black. -- Cat and dog, like a cat and dog; quarrelsome; inharmonius. "I am sure we have lived a cat and dog life of it." Coleridge. -- Cat block (Naut.), a heavy iron-strapped block with a large hook, part of the tackle used in drawing an anchor up to the cathead. -- Cat hook (Naut.), a strong hook attached to a cat block. -- Cat nap, a very short sleep. [Colloq.] -- Cat o' nine tails, an instrument of punishment consisting of nine pieces of knotted line or cord fastened to a handle; -- formerly used to flog offenders on the bare back. -- Cat's cradle, game played, esp. by children, with a string looped on the fingers so, as to resemble small cradle. The string is transferred from the fingers of one to those of another, at each transfer with a change of form. See Cratch, Cratch cradle. -- To let the cat out of the bag, to tell a secret, carelessly or willfully. [Colloq.] -- Bush cat, the serval. See Serval.  To bring to the cathead; as, to cat an anchor. See Anchor. Totten.
gave: imp. of Give.
said: imp. & p. p. of Say.  before-mentioned; already spoken of or specified; aforesaid; -- used chiefly in legal style.
made: See Mad, n.  of Make.  Artificially produced; pieced together; formed by filling in; as, made ground; a made mast, in distinction from one consisting of a single spar. Made up. (a) Complete; perfect. "A made up villain." Shak. (b) Falsely devised; fabricated; as, a made up story. (c) Artificial; as, a made up figure or complexion.
process: 1. The act of proceeding; continued forward movement; procedure; progress; advance. "Long process of time." Milton. The thoughts of men are widened with the process of the suns. Tennyson. 2. A series of actions, motions, or occurrences; progressive act or transaction; continuous operation; normal or actual course or procedure; regular proceeding; as, the process of vegetation or decomposition; a chemical process; processes of nature. Tell her the process of Antonio's end. Shak. 3. A statement of events; a narrative. [Obs.] Chaucer. 4. (Anat. & Zoöl.)  Any marked prominence or projecting part, especially of a bone; anapophysis. 5. (Law)  The whole course of proceedings in a cause real or personal, civil or criminal, from the beginning to the end of the suit; strictly, the means used for bringing the defendant into court to answer to the action; -- a generic term for writs of the class called judicial. Deacon's process Etym: [from H. Deacon, who introduced it] (Chem.), a method of obtaining chlorine gas by passing hydrochloric acid gas over heated slag which has been previously saturated with a solution of some metallic salt, as sulphate of copper. -- Final process (Practice), a writ of execution in an action at law. Burrill. -- In process, in the condition of advance, accomplishment, transaction, or the like; begun, and not completed. -- Jury process (Law), the process by which a jury is summoned in a cause, and by which their attendance is enforced. Burrill. -- Leblanc's process (Chem.), the process of manufacturing soda by treating salt with sulphuric acid, reducing the sodium sulphate so formed to sodium sulphide by roasting with charcoal, and converting the sodium sulphide to sodium carbonate by roasting with lime. -- Mesne process. See under Mesne. -- Process milling, the process of high milling for grinding flour. See under Milling. -- Reversible process (Thermodynamics), any process consisting of a cycle of operations such that the different operations of the cycle can be performed in reverse order with a reversal of their effects.
meet: 1. To join, or come in contact with; esp., to come in contact with by approach from an opposite direction; to come upon or against, front to front, as distinguished from contact by following and overtaking. 2. To come in collision with; to confront in conflict; to encounter hostilely; as, they met the enemy and defeated them; the ship met opposing winds and currents. 3. To come into the presence of without contact; to come close to; to intercept; to come within the perception, influence, or recognition of; as, to meet a train at a junction; to meet carriages or persons in the street; to meet friends at a party; sweet sounds met the ear. His daughter came out to meet him. Judg. xi. 34. 4. To perceive; to come to a knowledge of; to have personal acquaintance with; to experience; to suffer; as, the eye met a horrid sight; he met his fate. Of vice or virtue, whether blest or curst, Which meets contempt, or which compassion first. Pope. 5. To come up to; to be even with; to equal; to match; to satisfy; to ansver; as, to meet one's expectations; the supply meets the demand. To meet half way, literally, to go half the distance between in order to meet (one); hence, figuratively, to yield or concede half of the difference in order to effect a compromise or reconciliation with.  1. To come together by mutual approach; esp., to come in contact, or into proximity, by approach from opposite directions; to join; to come face to face; to come in close relationship; as, we met in the street; two lines meet so as to form an angle. O, when meet now Such pairs in love and mutual honor joined ! Milton. 2. To come together with hostile purpose; to have an encounter or conflict. Weapons more violent, when next we meet, May serve to better us and worse our foes. Milton. 3. To assemble together; to congregate; as, Congress meets on the first Monday of December. They . . . appointed a day to meet together. 2. Macc. xiv. 21. 4. To come together by mutual concessions; hence, to agree; to harmonize; to unite. To meet with. (a) To light upon; to find; to come to; -- often with the sense of unexpectedness. We met with many things worthy of observation. Bacon. (b) To join; to unite in company. Shak. (c) To suffer unexpectedly; as, to meet with a fall; to meet with a loss. (d) To encounter; to be subjected to. Prepare to meet with more than brutal fury From the fierce prince. Rowe. (e) To obviate. [Obs.] Bacon.  An assembling together; esp., the assembling of huntsmen for the hunt; also, the persons who so assemble, and the place of meeting.  Suitable; fit; proper; appropriate; qualified; convenient. It was meet that we should make merry. Luke xv. 32. To be meet with, to be even with; to be equal to. [Obs.]  Meetly. [Obs.] Shak.
which: 1. Of what sort or kind; what; what a; who. [Obs.] And which they weren and of what degree. Chaucer. 2. A interrogative pronoun, used both substantively and adjectively, and in direct and indirect questions, to ask for, or refer to, an individual person or thing among several of a class; as, which man is it which woman was it which is the house he asked which route he should take; which is best, to live or to die See the Note under What, pron., 1. Which of you convinceth me of sin John viii. 46. 3. A relative pronoun, used esp. in referring to an antecedent noun or clause, but sometimes with reference to what is specified or implied in a sentence, or to a following noun or clause (generally involving a reference, however, to something which has preceded). It is used in all numbers and genders, and was formerly used of persons. And when thou fail'st -- as God forbid the hour! --Must Edward fall, which peril heaven forfend! Shak. God . . . rested on the seventh day from all his work which he had made. Gen. ii. 2. Our Father, which art in heaven. Matt. vi. 9. The temple of God is holy, which temple ye are. 1 Cor. iii. 17. 4. A compound relative or indefinite pronoun, standing for any one which, whichever, that which, those which, the . . . which, and the like; as, take which you will. Note: The which was formerly often used for which. The expressions which that, which as, were also sometimes used by way of emphasis. Do not they blaspheme that worthy name by the which ye are called James ii. 7. Note: Which, referring to a series of preceding sentences, or members of a sentence, may have all joined to it adjectively. "All which, as a method of a proclamation, is very convenient." Carlyle.
did: of Do.
chart: 1. A sheet of paper, pasteboard, or the like, on which information is exhibited, esp. when the information is arranged in tabular form; as, an historical chart. 2. A map; esp., a hydrographic or marine map; a map on which is projected a portion of water and the land which it surrounds, or by which it is surrounded, intended especially for the use of seamen; as, the United States Coast Survey charts; the English Admiralty charts. 3. A written deed; a charter. Globular chart, a chart constructed on a globular projection. See under Globular. -- Heliographic chart, a map of the sun with its spots. -- Mercator's chart, a chart constructed on the principle of Mercator's projection. See Projection. -- Plane chart, a representation of some part of the superficies of the globe, in which its spherical form is disregarded, the meridians being drawn parallel to each other, and the parallels of latitude at equal distances. -- Selenographic chart, a map representing the surface of the moon. -- Topographic chart, a minute delineation of a limited place or region.  To lay down in a chart; to map; to delineate; as, to chart a coast.
family: 1. The collective body of persons who live in one house, and under one head or manager; a household, including parents, children, and servants, and, as the case may be, lodgers or boarders. 2. The group comprising a husband and wife and their dependent children, constituting a fundamental unit in the organization of society. The welfare of the family underlies the welfare of society. H. Spencer. 3. Those who descend from one common progenitor; a tribe, clan, or race; kindred; house; as, the human family; the family of Abraham; the father of a family. Go ! and pretennd your family is young. Pope. 4. Course of descent; genealogy; line of ancestors; lineage. 5. Honorable descent; noble or respectable stock; as, a man of family. 6. A groupe of kindred or closely related individuals; as, a family of languages; a family of States; the chlorine family. 7. (Biol.)  A groupe of organisms, either animal or vegetable, related by certain points of resemblance in structure or development, more comprehensive than a genus, because it is usually based on fewer or less pronounced points of likeness. In zoölogy a family is less comprehesive than an order; in botany it is often considered the same thing as an order. Family circle. See under Circle. -- Family man. (a) A man who has a family; esp., one who has a wife and children living with him andd dependent upon him. (b) A man of domestic habits. "The Jews are generally, when married, most exemplary family men." Mayhew. -- Family of curves or surfaces (Geom.), a group of curves or surfaces derived from a single equation. -- In a family way, like one belonging to the family. "Why don't we ask him and his ladies to come over in a family way, and dine with some other plain country gentlefolks" Thackeray. -- In the family way, pregnant. [Colloq.]
fill: One of the thills or shafts of a carriage. Mortimer. Fill horse, a thill horse. Shak.  1. To make full; to supply with as much as can be held or contained; to put or pour into, till no more can be received; to occupy the whole capacity of. The rain also filleth the pools. Ps. lxxxiv. 6. Jesus saith unto them, Fill the waterpots with water. Anf they filled them up to the brim. John ii. 7. 2. To furnish an abudant supply to; to furnish with as mush as is desired or desirable; to occupy the whole of; to swarm in or overrun. And God blessed them, saying. Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill the waters in the seas. Gen. i. 22. The Syrians filled the country. 1 Kings xx. 27. 3. To fill or supply fully with food; to feed; to satisfy. Whence should we have so much bread in the wilderness, as to fillso great a multitude Matt. xv. 33. Things that are sweet and fat are more filling. Bacon. 4. To possess and perform the duties of; to officiate in, as an incumbent; to occupy; to hold; as, a king fills a throne; the president fills the office of chief magistrate; the speaker of the House fills the chair. 5. To supply with an incumbent; as, to fill an office or a vacancy. A. Hamilton. 6. (Naut.) (a) To press and dilate, as a sail; as, the wind filled the sails. (b) To trim (a yard) so that the wind shall blow on the after side of the sails. 7. (Civil Engineering)  To make an embankment in, or raise the level of (a low place), with earth or gravel. To fill in, to insert; as, he filled in the figures. -- To fill out, to extend or enlarge to the desired limit; to make complete; as, to fill out a bill. -- To fill up, to make quite full; to fill to the brim or entirely; to occupy completely; to complete. "The bliss that fills up all the mind." Pope. "And fill up that which is behind of the afflictions of Christ." Col. i. 24.  1. To become full; to have the whole capacity occupied; to have an abundant supply; to be satiated; as, corn fills well in a warm season; the sail fills with the wind. 2. To fill a cup or glass for drinking. Give me some wine; fill full. Shak. To back and fill. See under Back, v. i. -- To fill up, to grow or become quite full; as, the channel of the river fills up with sand.  A full supply, as much as supplies want; as much as gives complete satisfaction. "Ye shall eat your fill." Lev. xxv. 19. I'll bear thee hence, where I may weep my fill. Shak.
question: 1. The act of asking; interrogation; inquiry; as, to examine by question and answer. 2. Discussion; debate; hence, objection; dispute; doubt; as, the story is true beyond question; he obeyed without question. There arose a question between some of John's disciples and the Jews about purifying. John iii. 25. It is to be to question, whether it be lawful for Christian princes to make an invasive war simply for the propagation of the faith. Bacon. 3. Examination with reference to a decisive result; investigation; specifically, a judicial or official investigation; also, examination under torture. Blackstone. He that was in question for the robbery. Shak. The Scottish privy council had power to put state prisoners to the question. Macaulay. 4. That which is asked; inquiry; interrogatory; query. But this question asked Puts me in doubt. Lives there who loves his pain Milton. 5. Hence, a subject of investigation, examination, or debate; theme of inquiry; matter to be inquired into; as, a delicate or doubtful question. 6. Talk; conversation; speech; speech.[Obs.] Shak. In question, in debate; in the course of examination or discussion; as, the matter or point in question. -- Leading question. See under Leading. -- Out of question, unquestionably. "Out of question, 't is Maria's hand." Shak. -- Out of the question. See under Out. -- Past question, beyond question; certainly; undoubtedly; unquestionably. -- Previous question, a question put to a parliamentary assembly upon the motion of a member, in order to ascertain whether it is the will of the body to vote at once, without further debate, on the subject under consideration. Note: The form of the question is: "Shall the main question be now put" If the vote is in the affirmative, the matter before the body must be voted upon as it then stands, without further general debate or the submission of new amendments. In the House of Representatives of the United States, and generally in America, a negative decision operates to keep the business before the body as if the motion had not been made; but in the English Parliament, it operates to postpone consideration for the day, and until the subject may be again introduced. In American practice, the object of the motion is to hasten action, and it is made by a friend of the measure. In English practice, the object is to get rid of the subject for the time being, and the motion is made with a purpose of voting against it. Cushing. -- To beg the question. See under Beg. -- To the question, to the point in dispute; to the real matter under debate. Syn. -- Point; topic; subject.  1. To ask questions; to inquire. He that questioneth much shall lean much. Bacon. 2. To argue; to converse; to dispute. [Obs.] I pray you, think you question with the Jew. Shak.  1. To inquire of by asking questions; to examine by interrogatories; as, to question a witness. 2. To doubt of; to be uncertain of; to query. And most we question what we most desire. Prior. 3. To raise a question about; to call in question; to make objection to. "But have power and right to question thy bold entrance on this place." Milton. 4. To talk to; to converse with. With many holiday and lady terms he questioned me. Shak. Syn. -- To ask; interrogate; catechise; doubt; controvert; dispute. -- Question, Inquire, Interrogate. To inquire is merely to ask for information, and implies no authority in the one who asks. To interrogate is to put repeated questions in a formal or systematic fashion to elicit some particular fact or facts. To question has a wider sense than to interrogate, and often implies an attitude of distrust or opposition on the part of the questioner.
story: A set of rooms on the same floor or level; a floor, or the space between two floors. Also, a horizontal division of a building's exterior considered architecturally, which need not correspond exactly with the stories within. [Written also storey.] Note: A story comprehends the distance from one floor to another; as, a story of nine or ten feet elevation. The spaces between floors are numbered in order, from below upward; as, the lower, second, or third story; a house of one story, of two stories, of five stories. Story post (Arch.), a vertical post used to support a floor or superincumbent wall.  1. A narration or recital of that which has occurred; a description of past events; a history; a statement; a record. One malcontent who did indeed get a name in story. Barrow. Venice, with its unique city and its Impressive story. Ed. Rev. The four great monarchies make the subject of ancient story. Sir W. Temple. 2. The relation of an incident or minor event; a short narrative; a tale; especially, a fictitious narrative less elaborate than a novel; a short romance. Addison. 3. A euphemism or child's word for "a lie;" a fib; as, to tell a story. [Colloq.]  To tell in historical relation; to make the subject of a story; to narrate or describe in story. How worthy he is I will leave to appear hereafter, rather than story him in his own hearing. Shak. It is storied of the brazen colossus in Rhodes, that it was seventy cubits high. Bp. Wilkins.
sudden: 1. Happening without previous notice or with very brief notice; coming unexpectedly, or without the common preparation; immediate; instant; speedy. "O sudden wo!" Chaucer. "For fear of sudden death." Shak. Sudden fear troubleth thee. Job xxii. 10. 2. Hastly prepared or employed; quick; rapid. Never was such a sudden scholar made. Shak. The apples of Asphaltis, appearing goodly to the sudden eye. Milton. 3. Hasty; violent; rash; precipitate. [Obs.] Shak. Syn. -- Unexpected; unusual; abrupt; unlooked-for. -- Sud"den*ly, adv. -- Sud"den*ness, n.  Suddenly; unexpectedly. [R.] Herbs of every leaf that sudden flowered. Milton.  An unexpected occurrence; a surprise. All of a sudden, On a sudden, Of a sudden, sooner than was expected; without the usual preparation; suddenly. How art thou lost! how on a sudden lost! Milton. He withdrew his opposition all of a sudden. Thackeray.
unit: 1. A single thing or person. 2. (Arith.)  The least whole number; one. Units are the integral parts of any large number. I. Watts. 3. A gold coin of the reign of James I., of the value of twenty shillings. Camden. 4. Any determinate amount or quantity (as of length, time, heat, value) adopted as a standard of measurement for other amounts or quantities of the same kind. 5. (Math.)  A single thing, as a magnitude or number, regarded as an undivided whole. Abstract unit, the unit of numeration; one taken in the abstract; the number represented by 1. The term is used in distinction from concrete, or determinate, unit, that is, a unit in which the kind of thing is expressed; a unit of measure or value; as 1 foot, 1 dollar, 1 pound, and the like. -- Complex unit (Theory of Numbers), an imaginary number of the form a + b-1, when a2 + b2 = 1. -- Duodecimal unit, a unit in the scale of numbers increasing or decreasing by twelves. -- Fractional unit, the unit of a fraction; the reciprocal of the denominator; thus, unit of the fraction -- Integral unit, the unit of integral numbers, or 1. -- Physical unit, a value or magnitude conventionally adopted as a unit or standard in physical measurements. The various physical units are usually based on given units of length, mass, and time, and on the density or other properties of some substance, for example, water. See Dyne, Erg, Farad, Ohm, Poundal, etc. -- Unit deme (Biol.), a unit of the inferior order or orders of individuality. -- Unit jar (Elec.), a small, insulated Leyden jar, placed between the electrical machine and a larger jar or battery, so as to announce, by its repeated discharges, the amount of electricity passed into the larger jar. -- Unit of heat (Physics), a determinate quantity of heat adopted as a unit of measure; a thermal unit (see under Thermal). Water is the substance generally employed, the unit being one gram or one pound, and the temperature interval one degree of the Centigrade or Fahrenheit scale. When referred to the gram, it is called the gram degree. The British unit of heat, or thermal unit, used by engineers in England and in the United States, is the quantity of heat necessary to raise one pound of pure water at and near its temperature of greatest density (39.1º Fahr.) through one degree of the Fahrenheit scale. Rankine. -- Unit of illumination, the light of a sperm candle burning 120 grains per hour. Standard gas, burning at the rate of five cubic feet per hour, must have an illuminating power equal to that of fourteen such candles. -- Unit of measure (as of length, surface, volume, dry measure, liquid measure, money, weight, time, and the like), in general, a determinate quantity or magnitude of the kind designated, taken as a standard of comparison for others of the same kind, in assigning to them numerical values, as 1 foot, 1 yard, 1 mile, 1 square foot, 1 square yard, 1 cubic foot, 1 peck, 1 bushel, 1 gallon, 1 cent, 1 ounce, 1 pound, 1 hour, and the like; more specifically, the fundamental unit adopted in any system of weights, measures, or money, by which its several denominations are regulated, and which is itself defined by comparison with some known magnitude, either natural or empirical, as, in the United States, the dollar for money, the pound avoirdupois for weight, the yard for length, the gallon of 8.3389 pounds avoirdupois of water at 39.8º Fahr. (about 231 cubic inches) for liquid measure, etc.; in Great Britain, the pound sterling, the pound troy, the yard, or -- Unit of power. (Mach.) See Horse power. -- Unit of resistance. (Elec.) See Resistance, n., 4, and Ohm. -- Unit of work (Physics), the amount of work done by a unit force acting through a unit distance, or the amount required to lift a unit weight through a unit distance against gravitation. See Erg, Foot Pound, Kilogrammeter. -- Unit stress (Mech. Physics), stress per unit of area; intensity of stress. It is expressed in ounces, pounds, tons, etc., per square inch, square foot, or square yard, etc., or in atmospheres, or inches of mercury or water, or the like.
buy: 1. To acquire the ownership of (property) by giving an accepted price or consideration therefor, or by agreeing to do so; to acquire by the payment of a price or value; to purchase; -- opposed to sell. Buy what thou hast no need of, and ere long thou wilt sell thy necessaries. B. Franklin. 2. To acquire or procure by something given or done in exchange, literally or figuratively; to get, at a cost or sacrifice; to buy pleasure with pain. Buy the truth and sell it not; also wisdom, and instruction, and understanding. Prov. xxiii. 23. To buy again. See Againbuy. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To buy off. (a) To influence to compliance; to cause to bend or yield by some consideration; as, to buy off conscience. (b) To detach by a consideration given; as, to buy off one from a party. -- To buy out (a) To buy off, or detach from. Shak. (b) To purchase the share or shares of in a stock, fund, or partnership, by which the seller is separated from the company, and the purchaser takes his place; as, A buys out B. (c) To purchase the entire stock in trade and the good will of a business. -- To buy in, to purchase stock in any fund or partnership. -- To buy on credit, to purchase, on a promise, in fact or in law, to make payment at a future day. -- To buy the refusal (of anything), to give a consideration for the right of purchasing, at a fixed price, at a future time.  To negotiate or treat about a purchase. I will buy with you, sell with you. Shak.
shoulder: 1. (Anat.)  The joint, or the region of the joint, by which the fore limb is connected with the body or with the shoulder girdle; the projection formed by the bones and muscles about that joint. 2. The flesh and muscles connected with the shoulder joint; the upper part of the back; that part of the human frame on which it is most easy to carry a heavy burden; -- often used in the plural. Then by main force pulled up, and on his shoulders bore The gates of Azza. Milton. Adown her shoulders fell her length of hair. Dryden. 3. Fig.: That which supports or sustains; support. In thy shoulder do I build my seat. Shak. 4. That which resembles a human shoulder, as any protuberance or projection from the body of a thing. The north western shoulder of the mountain. Sir W. Scott. 5. The upper joint of the fore leg and adjacent parts of an animal, dressed for market; as, a shoulder of mutton. 6. (Fort.)  The angle of a bastion included between the face and flank. See Illust. of Bastion. 7. An abrupt projection which forms an abutment on an object, or limits motion, etc., as the projection around a tenon at the end of a piece of timber, the part of the top of a type which projects beyond the base of the raised character, etc. Shoulder belt, a belt that passes across the shoulder. -- Shoulder blade (Anat.), the flat bone of the shoulder, to which the humerus is articulated; the scapula. -- Shoulder block (Naut.), a block with a projection, or shoulder, near the upper end, so that it can rest against a spar without jamming the rope. -- Shoulder clapper, one who claps another on the shoulder, or who uses great familiarity. [Obs.] Shak. -- Shoulder girdle. (Anat.) See Pectoral girdle, under Pectoral. -- Shoulder knot, an ornamental knot of ribbon or lace worn on the shoulder; a kind of epaulet or braided ornament worn as part of a military uniform. -- Shoulder-of-mutton sail (Naut.), a triangular sail carried on a boat's mast; -- so called from its shape. -- Shoulder slip, dislocation of the shoulder, or of the humerous. Swift. -- Shoulder strap, a strap worn on or over the shoulder. Specifically (Mil. & Naval), a narrow strap worn on the shoulder of a commissioned officer, indicating, by a suitable device, the rank he holds in the service. See Illust. in App.  1. To push or thrust with the shoulder; to push with violence; to jostle. As they the earth would shoulder from her seat. Spenser. Around her numberless the rabble flowed, Shouldering each other, crowding for a view. Rowe. 2. To take upon the shoulder or shoulders; as, to shoulder a basket; hence, to assume the burden or responsibility of; as, to shoulder blame; to shoulder a debt. As if Hercules Or burly Atlas shouldered up their state. Marston. Right shoulder arms (Mil.), a position in the Manual of Arms which the piece is placed on the right shoulder, with the lock plate up, and the muzzle elevated and inclined to the left, and held as in the illustration.
roll: 1. To cause to revolve by turning over and over; to move by turning on an axis; to impel forward by causing to turn over and over on a supporting surface; as, to roll a wheel, a ball, or a barrel. 2. To wrap round on itself; to form into a spherical or cylindrical body by causing to turn over and over; as, to roll a sheet of paper; to roll parchment; to roll clay or putty into a ball. 3. To bind or involve by winding, as in a bandage; to inwrap; -- often with up; as, to roll up a parcel. 4. To drive or impel forward with an easy motion, as of rolling; as, a river rolls its waters to the ocean. The flood of Catholic reaction was rolled over Europe. J. A. Symonds. 5. To utter copiously, esp. with sounding words; to utter with a deep sound; -- often with forth, or out; as, to roll forth some one's praises; to roll out sentences. Who roll'd the psalm to wintry skies. Tennyson. 6. To press or level with a roller; to spread or form with a roll, roller, or rollers; as, to roll a field; to roll paste; to roll steel rails, etc. 7. To move, or cause to be moved, upon, or by means of, rollers or small wheels. 8. To beat with rapid, continuous strokes, as a drum; to sound a roll upon. 9. (Geom.)  To apply (one line or surface) to another without slipping; to bring all the parts of (one line or surface) into successive contact with another, in suck manner that at every instant the parts that have been in contact are equal. 10. To turn over in one's mind; to revolve. Full oft in heart he rolleth up and down The beauty of these florins new and bright. Chaucer. To roll one's self, to wallow. -- To roll the eye, to direct its axis hither and thither in quick succession. -- To roll one's r's, to utter the letter r with a trill. [Colloq.]  1. To move, as a curved object may, along a surface by rotation without sliding; to revolve upon an axis; to turn over and over; as, a ball or wheel rolls on the earth; a body rolls on an inclined plane. And her foot, look you, is fixed upon a spherical stone, which rolls, and rolls, and rolls. Shak. 2. To move on wheels; as, the carriage rolls along the street. "The rolling chair." Dryden. 3. To be wound or formed into a cylinder or ball; as, the cloth rolls unevenly; the snow rolls well. 4. To fall or tumble; -- with over; as, a stream rolls over a precipice. 5. To perform a periodical revolution; to move onward as with a revolution; as, the rolling year; ages roll away. 6. To turn; to move circularly. And his red eyeballs roll with living fire. Dryden. 7. To move, as waves or billows, with alternate swell and depression. What different sorrows did within thee roll. Prior. 8. To incline first to one side, then to the other; to rock; as, there is a great difference in ships about rolling; in a general semse, to be tossed about. Twice ten tempestuous nights I rolled. Pope. 9. To turn over, or from side to side, while lying down; to wallow; as, a horse rolls. 10. To spread under a roller or rolling-pin; as, the paste rolls well. 11. To beat a drum with strokes so rapid that they can scarcely be distinguished by the ear. 12. To make a loud or heavy rumbling noise; as, the thunder rolls. To roll about, to gad abroad. [Obs.] Man shall not suffer his wife go roll about. Chaucer.  1. The act of rolling, or state of being rolled; as, the roll of a ball; the roll of waves. 2. That which rolls; a roller. Specifically: (a) A heavy cylinder used to break clods. Mortimer. (b) One of a set of revolving cylinders, or rollers, between which metal is pressed, formed, or smoothed, as in a rolling mill; as, to pass rails through the rolls. 3. That which is rolled up; as, a roll of fat, of wool, paper, cloth, etc. Specifically: (a) A document written on a piece of parchment, paper, or other materials which may be rolled up; a scroll. Busy angels spread The lasting roll, recording what we say. Prior. (b) Hence, an official or public document; a register; a record; also, a catalogue; a list. The rolls of Parliament, the entry of the petitions, answers, and transactions in Parliament, are extant. Sir M. Hale. The roll and list of that army doth remain. Sir J. Davies. (c) A quantity of cloth wound into a cylindrical form; as, a roll of carpeting; a roll of ribbon. (d) A cylindrical twist of tobacco. 4. A kind of shortened raised biscuit or bread, often rolled or doubled upon itself. 5. (Naut.)  The oscillating movement of a vessel from side to side, in sea way, as distinguished from the alternate rise and fall of bow and stern called pitching. 6. A heavy, reverberatory sound; as, the roll of cannon, or of thunder. 7. The uniform beating of a drum with strokes so rapid as scarcely to be distinguished by the ear. 8. Part; office; duty; rôle. [Obs.] L'Estrange. Long roll (Mil.), a prolonged roll of the drums, as the signal of an attack by the enemy, and for the troops to arrange themselves in line. -- Master of the rolls. See under Master. -- Roll call, the act, or the time, of calling over a list names, as among soldiers. -- Rolls of court, of parliament (or of any public body), the parchments or rolls on which the acts and proceedings of that body are engrossed by the proper officer, and which constitute the records of such public body. -- To call the roll, to call off or recite a list or roll of names of persons belonging to an organization, in order to ascertain who are present or to obtain responses from those present. Syn. -- List; schedule; catalogue; register; inventory. See List.
event: 1. That which comes, arrives, or happens; that which falls out; any incident, good or bad. "The events of his early years." Macaulay. To watch quietly the course of events. Jowett (Thucyd. ) There is one event to the righteous, and to the wicked. Eccl. ix. 2. 2. An affair in hand; business; enterprise. [Obs.] "Leave we him to his events." Shak. 3. The consequence of anything; the issue; conclusion; result; that in which an action, operation, or series of operations, terminates. Dark doubts between the promise and event. Young. Syn. -- Incident; occurrence; adventure; issue; result; termination; consequence; conclusion. -- Event, Occurrence, Incident, Circumstance. An event denotes that which arises from a preceding state of things. Hence we speak or watching the event; of tracing the progress of events. An occurrence has no reference to any antecedents, but simply marks that which meets us in our progress through life, as if by chance, or in the course of divine providence. The things which thus meet us, if important, are usually connected with antecedents; and hence event is the leading term. In the "Declaration of Independence" it is said, "When, in the cource of human events, it becomes necessary." etc. Here, occurrences would be out of place. An incident is that which falls into a state of things to which is does not primarily belong; as, the incidents of a journey. The term is usually applied to things of secondary importance. A circumstance is one of the things surrounding us in our path of life. These may differ greatly in importance; but they are always outsiders, which operate upon us from without, exerting greater or less influence according to their intrinsic importance. A person giving an account of a campaign might dwell on the leading events which it produced; might mention some of its striking occurrences; might allude to some remarkable incidents which attended it; and might give the details of the favorable or adverse circumstances which marked its progress.  To break forth. [Obs.] B. Jonson.
circle: 1. A plane figure, bounded by a single curve line called its circumference, every part of which is equally distant from a point within it, called the center. 2. The line that bounds sush a figure; a circumference; a ring. 3. (Astron.)  An instrument of observation, the graduated limb of which consists of an entire circle. Note: When it is fixed to a wall in an observatory, it is called a mural circle; when mounted with a telescope on an axis and in Y's, in the plane of the meridian, a meridian or transit circle; when involving the principle of reflection, like the sextant, a reflecting circle; and when that of repeating an angle several times continuously along the graduated limb, a repeating circle. 4. A round body; a sphere; an orb. It is he that sitteth upon the circle of the earth. Is. xi. 22. 5. Compass; circuit; inclosure. In the circle of this forest. Shak. 6. A company assembled, or conceived to assemble, about a central point of interest, or bound by a common tie; a class or division of society; a coterie; a set. As his name gradually became known, the circle of his acquaintance widened. Macaulay. 7. A circular group of persons; a ring. 8. A series ending where it begins, and repeating itself. Thus in a circle runs the peasant's pain. Dryden. 9. (Logic)  A form of argument in which two or more unproved statements are used to prove each other; inconclusive reasoning. That heavy bodies descend by gravity; and, again, that gravity is a quality whereby a heavy body descends, is an impertinent circle and teaches nothing. Glanvill. 10. Indirect form of words; circumlocution. [R.] Has he given the lie, In circle, or oblique, or semicircle. J. Fletcher. 11. A territorial division or district. Note: The Circles of the Holy Roman Empire, ten in number, were those principalities or provinces which had seats in the German Diet. Azimuth circle. See under Azimuth. -- Circle of altitude (Astron.), a circle parallel to the horizon, having its pole in the zenith; an almucantar. -- Circle of curvature. See Osculating circle of a curve (Below). -- Circle of declination. See under Declination. -- Circle of latitude. (a) (Astron.) A great circle perpendicular to the plane of the ecliptic, passing through its poles. (b) (Spherical Projection) A small circle of the sphere whose plane is perpendicular to the axis. -- Circles of longitude, lesser circles parallel to the ecliptic, diminishing as they recede from it. -- Circle of perpetual apparition, at any given place, the boundary of that space around the elevated pole, within which the stars never set. Its distance from the pole is equal to the latitude of the place. -- Circle of perpetual occultation, at any given place, the boundary of the space around the depressed pole, within which the stars never rise. -- Circle of the sphere, a circle upon the surface of the sphere, called a great circle when its plane passes through the center of the sphere; in all other cases, a small circle. -- Diurnal circle. See under Diurnal. -- Dress circle, a gallery in a theater, generally the one containing the prominent and more expensive seats. -- Druidical circles (Eng. Antiq.), a popular name for certain ancient inclosures formed by rude stones circularly arranged, as at Stonehenge, near Salisbury. -- Family circle, a gallery in a theater, usually one containing inexpensive seats. -- Horary circles (Dialing), the lines on dials which show the hours. -- Osculating circle of a curve (Geom.), the circle which touches the curve at some point in the curve, and close to the point more nearly coincides with the curve than any other circle. This circle is used as a measure of the curvature of the curve at the point, and hence is called circle of curvature. -- Pitch circle. See under Pitch. -- Vertical circle, an azimuth circle. -- Voltaic circle or circuit. See under Circuit. -- To square the circle. See under Square. Syn. -- Ring; circlet; compass; circuit; inclosure.  1. To move around; to revolve around. Other planets circle other suns. Pope. 2. To encompass, as by a circle; to surround; to inclose; to encircle. Prior. Pope. Their heads are circled with a short turban. Dampier. So he lies, circled with evil. Coleridge. To circle in, to confine; to hem in; to keep together; as, to circle bodies in. Sir K. Digby.  To move circularly; to form a circle; to circulate. Thy name shall circle round the gaping through. Byron.
woman: 1. An adult female person; a grown-up female person, as distinguished from a man or a child; sometimes, any female person. Women are soft, mild pitiful, and flexible. Shak. And the rib, which the Lord God had taken from man, made he a woman. Gen. ii. 22. I have observed among all nations that the women ornament themselves more than the men; that, wherever found, they are the same kind, civil, obliging, humane, tender beings, inclined to be gay and cheerful, timorous and modest. J. Ledyard. 2. The female part of the human race; womankind. Man is destined to be a prey to woman. Thackeray. 3. A female attendant or servant. " By her woman I sent your message." Shak. Woman hater, one who hates women; one who has an aversion to the female sex; a misogynist. Swift.  1. To act the part of a woman in; -- with indefinite it. Daniel. 2. To make effeminate or womanish. [R.] Shak. 3. To furnish with, or unite to, a woman. [R.] "To have him see me woman'd." Shak.
parent: 1. One who begets, or brings forth, offspring; a father or a mother. Children, obey your parents in the Lord. Eph. vi. 1. 2. That which produces; cause; source; author; begetter; as, idleness is the parent of vice. Regular industry is the parent of sobriety. Channing. Parent cell. (Biol.) See Mother cell, under Mother, also Cytula. -- Parent nucleus (Biol.), a nucleus which, in cell division, divides, and gives rise to two or more daughter nuclei. See Karyokinesis, and Cell division, under Division.
baby: An infant or young child of either sex; a babe. 2. A small image of an infant; a doll. Babies in the eyes, the minute reflection which one sees of one's self in the eyes of another. She clung about his neck, gave him ten kisses, Toyed with his locks, looked babies in his eyes. Heywood.  Pertaining to, or resembling, an infant; young or little; as, baby swans. "Baby figure" Shak.  To treat like a young child; to keep dependent; to humor; to fondle. Young.
start: 1. To leap; to jump. [Obs.] 2. To move suddenly, as with a spring or leap, from surprise, pain, or other sudden feeling or emotion, or by a voluntary act. And maketh him out of his sleep to start. Chaucer. I start as from some dreadful dream. Dryden. Keep your soul to the work when ready to start aside. I. Watts. But if he start, It is the flesh of a corrupted heart. Shak. 3. To set out; to commence a course, as a race or journey; to begin; as, to start business. At once they start, advancing in a line. Dryden. At intervals some bird from out the brakes Starts into voice a moment, then is still. Byron. 4. To become somewhat displaced or loosened; as, a rivet or a seam may start under strain or pressure. To start after, to set out after; to follow; to pursue. -- To start against, to act as a rival candidate against. -- To start for, to be a candidate for, as an office. -- To start up, to rise suddenly, as from a seat or couch; to come suddenly into notice or importance.  1. To cause to move suddenly; to disturb suddenly; to startle; to alarm; to rouse; to cause to flee or fly; as, the hounds started a fox. Upon malicious bravery dost thou come To start my quiet Shak. Brutus will start a spirit as soon as Cæsar. Shak. 2. To bring onto being or into view; to originate; to invent. Sensual men agree in the pursuit of every pleasure they can start. Sir W. Temple. 3. To cause to move or act; to set going, running, or flowing; as, to start a railway train; to start a mill; to start a stream of water; to start a rumor; to start a business. I was engaged in conversation upon a subject which the people love to start in discourse. Addison. 4. To move suddenly from its place or position; to displace or loosen; to dislocate; as, to start a bone; the storm started the bolts in the vessel. One, by a fall in wrestling, started the end of the clavicle from the sternum. Wiseman. 5. Etym: [Perh. from D. storten, which has this meaning also.] (Naut.)  To pour out; to empty; to tap and begin drawing from; as, to start a water cask.  1. The act of starting; a sudden spring, leap, or motion, caused by surprise, fear, pain, or the like; any sudden motion, or beginning of motion. The fright awakened Arcite with a start. Dryden. 2. A convulsive motion, twitch, or spasm; a spasmodic effort. For she did speak in starts distractedly. Shak. Nature does nothing by starts and leaps, or in a hurry. L'Estrange. 3. A sudden, unexpected movement; a sudden and capricious impulse; a sally; as, starts of fancy. To check the starts and sallies of the soul. Addison. 4. The beginning, as of a journey or a course of action; first motion from a place; act of setting out; the outset; -- opposed to finish. The start of first performance is all. Bacon. I see you stand like greyhounds in the slips, Straining upon the start. Shak. At a start, at once; in an instant. [Obs.] At a start he was betwixt them two. Chaucer. To get, or have, the start, to before another; to gain or have the advantage in a similar undertaking; -- usually with of. "Get the start of the majestic world." Shak. "She might have forsaken him if he had not got the start of her." Dryden.  1. A tail, or anything projecting like a tail. 2. The handle, or tail, of a plow; also, any long handle. [Prov. Eng.] 3. The curved or inclined front and bottom of a water-wheel bucket. 4. (Mining)  The arm, or level, of a gin, drawn around by a horse.
happen: 1. To come by chance; to come without previous expectation; to fall out. There shall no evil happen to the just. Prov. xii. 21. 2. To take place; to occur. All these things which had happened. Luke xxiv. 14. To happen on, to meet with; to fall or light upon. "I have happened on some other accounts." Graunt. -- To happen in, to make a casual call. [Colloq.]
section: 1. The act of cutting, or separation by cutting; as, the section of bodies. 2. A part separated from something; a division; a portion; a slice. Specifically: -- (a) A distinct part or portion of a book or writing; a subdivision of a chapter; the division of a law or other writing; a paragraph; an article; hence, the character §, often used to denote such a division. It is hardly possible to give a distinct view of his several arguments in distinct sections. Locke. (b) A distinct part of a country or people, community, class, or the like; a part of a territory separated by geographical lines, or of a people considered as distinct. The extreme section of one class consists of bigoted dotards, the extreme section of the other consists of shallow and reckless empirics. Macaulay. (c) One of the portions, of one square mile each, into which the public lands of the United States are divided; one thirty-sixth part of a township. These sections are subdivided into quarter sections for sale under the homestead and preëmption laws. 3. (Geom.)  The figure made up of all the points common to a superficies and a solid which meet, or to two superficies which meet, or to two lines which meet. In the first case the section is a superficies, in the second a line, and in the third a point. 4. (Nat. Hist.)  A division of a genus; a group of species separated by some distinction from others of the same genus; -- often indicated by the sign §. 5. (Mus.)  A part of a musical period, composed of one or more phrases. See Phrase. 6. The description or representation of anything as it would appear if cut through by any intersecting plane; depiction of what is beyond a plane passing through, or supposed to pass through, an object, as a building, a machine, a succession of strata; profile. Note: In mechanical drawing, as in these Illustrations of a cannon, a longitudinal section (a) usually represents the object as cut through its center lengthwise and vertically; a cross or transverse section (b), as cut crosswise and vertically; and a horizontal section (c), as cut through its center horizontally. Oblique sections are made at various angles. In architecture, a vertical section is a drawing showing the interior, the thickness of the walls, ets., as if made on a vertical plane passed through a building. Angular sections (Math.), a branch of analysis which treats of the relations of sines, tangents, etc., of arcs to the sines, tangents, etc., of their multiples or of their parts. [R.] -- Conic sections. (Geom.) See under Conic. -- Section liner (Drawing), an instrument to aid in drawing a series of equidistant parallel lines, -- used in representing sections. -- Thin sections, a section or slice, as of mineral, animal, or vegetable substance, thin enough to be transparent, and used for study under the microscope. Syn. -- Part; portion; division. -- Section, Part. The English more commonly apply the word section to a part or portion of a body of men; as, a section of the clergy, a small section of the Whigs, etc. In the United States this use is less common, but another use, unknown or but little known in England, is very frequent, as in the phrases "the eastern section of our country," etc., the same sense being also given to the adjective sectional as, sectional feelings, interests, etc.
tree: 1. (Bot.)  Any perennial woody plant of considerable size (usually over twenty feet high) and growing with a single trunk. Note: The kind of tree referred to, in any particular case, is often indicated by a modifying word; as forest tree, fruit tree, palm tree, apple tree, pear tree, etc. 2. Something constructed in the form of, or considered as resembling, a tree, consisting of a stem, or stock, and branches; as, a genealogical tree. 3. A piece of timber, or something commonly made of timber; -- used in composition, as in axletree, boottree, chesstree, crosstree, whiffletree, and the like. 4. A cross or gallows; as Tyburn tree. [Jesus] whom they slew and hanged on a tree. Acts x. 39. 5. Wood; timber. [Obs.] Chaucer. In a great house ben not only vessels of gold and of silver but also of tree and of earth. Wyclif (2 Tim. ii. 20). 6. (Chem.)  A mass of crystals, aggregated in arborescent forms, obtained by precipitation of a metal from solution. See Lead tree, under Lead. Tree bear (Zoöl.), the raccoon. [Local, U.S.] -- Tree beetle (Zoöl.) any one of numerous species of beetles which feed on the leaves of trees and shrubs, as the May beetles, the rose beetle, the rose chafer, and the goldsmith beetle. -- Tree bug (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of hemipterous insects which live upon, and suck the sap of, trees and shrubs. They belong to Arma, Pentatoma, Rhaphigaster, and allied genera. -- Tree cat (Zool.), the common paradoxure (Paradoxurus musang). -- Tree clover (Bot.), a tall kind of melilot (Melilotus alba). See Melilot. -- Tree crab (Zoöl.), the purse crab. See under Purse. -- Tree creeper (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of arboreal creepers belonging to Certhia, Climacteris, and allied genera. See Creeper, 3. -- Tree cricket (Zoöl.), a nearly white arboreal American cricket (Ecanthus nivoeus) which is noted for its loud stridulation; -- called also white cricket. -- Tree crow (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Old World crows belonging to Crypsirhina and allied genera, intermediate between the true crows and the jays. The tail is long, and the bill is curved and without a tooth. -- Tree dove (Zoöl.) any one of several species of East Indian and Asiatic doves belonging to Macropygia and allied genera. They have long and broad tails, are chiefly arboreal in their habits, and feed mainly on fruit. -- Tree duck (Zoöl.), any one of several species of ducks belonging to Dendrocygna and allied genera. These ducks have a long and slender neck and a long hind toe. They are arboreal in their habits, and are found in the tropical parts of America, Africa, Asia, and Australia. -- Tree fern (Bot.), an arborescent fern having a straight trunk, sometimes twenty or twenty-five feet high, or even higher, and bearing a cluster of fronds at the top. Most of the existing species are tropical. -- Tree fish (Zoöl.), a California market fish (Sebastichthys serriceps). -- Tree frog. (Zoöl.) (a) Same as Tree toad. (b) Any one of numerous species of Old World frogs belonging to Chiromantis, Rhacophorus, and allied genera of the family Ranidæ. Their toes are furnished with suckers for adhesion. The flying frog (see under Flying) is an example. -- Tree goose (Zoöl.), the bernicle goose. -- Tree hopper (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of small leaping hemipterous insects which live chiefly on the branches and twigs of trees, and injure them by sucking the sap. Many of them are very odd in shape, the prothorax being often prolonged upward or forward in the form of a spine or crest. -- Tree jobber (Zoöl.), a woodpecker. [Obs.] -- Tree kangaroo. (Zoöl.) See Kangaroo. -- Tree lark (Zoöl.), the tree pipit. [Prov. Eng.] -- Tree lizard (Zoöl.), any one of a group of Old World arboreal lizards (Dendrosauria) comprising the chameleons. -- Tree lobster. (Zoöl.) Same as Tree crab, above. -- Tree louse (Zoöl.), any aphid; a plant louse. -- Tree moss. (Bot.) (a) Any moss or lichen growing on trees. (b) Any species of moss in the form of a miniature tree. -- Tree mouse (Zoöl.), any one of several species of African mice of the subfamily Dendromyinæ. They have long claws and habitually live in trees. -- Tree nymph, a wood nymph. See Dryad. -- Tree of a saddle, a saddle frame. -- Tree of heaven (Bot.), an ornamental tree (Ailantus glandulosus) having long, handsome pinnate leaves, and greenish flowers of a disagreeable odor. -- Tree of life (Bot.), a tree of the genus Thuja; arbor vitæ. -- Tree onion (Bot.), a species of garlic (Allium proliferum) which produces bulbs in place of flowers, or among its flowers. -- Tree oyster (Zoöl.), a small American oyster (Ostrea folium) which adheres to the roots of the mangrove tree; -- called also raccoon oyster. -- Tree pie (Zoöl.), any species of Asiatic birds of the genus Dendrocitta. The tree pies are allied to the magpie. -- Tree pigeon (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of longwinged arboreal pigeons native of Asia, Africa, and Australia, and belonging to Megaloprepia, Carpophaga, and allied genera. -- Tree pipit. (Zoöl.) See under Pipit. -- Tree porcupine (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Central and South American arboreal porcupines belonging to the genera Chætomys and Sphingurus. They have an elongated and somewhat prehensile tail, only four toes on the hind feet, and a body covered with short spines mixed with bristles. One South American species (S. villosus) is called also couiy; another (S. prehensilis) is called also coendou. -- Tree rat (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large ratlike West Indian rodents belonging to the genera Capromys and Plagiodon. They are allied to the porcupines. -- Tree serpent (Zoöl.), a tree snake. -- Tree shrike (Zoöl.), a bush shrike. -- Tree snake (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of snakes of the genus Dendrophis. They live chiefly among the branches of trees, and are not venomous. -- Tree sorrel (Bot.), a kind of sorrel (Rumex Lunaria) which attains the stature of a small tree, and bears greenish flowers. It is found in the Canary Islands and Teneriffe. -- Tree sparrow (Zoöl.) any one of several species of small arboreal sparrows, especially the American tree sparrow (Spizella monticola), and the common European species (Passer montanus). -- Tree swallow (Zoöl.), any one of several species of swallows of the genus Hylochelidon which lay their eggs in holes in dead trees. They inhabit Australia and adjacent regions. Called also martin in Australia. -- Tree swift (Zoöl.), any one of several species of swifts of the genus Dendrochelidon which inhabit the East Indies and Southern Asia. -- Tree tiger (Zoöl.), a leopard. -- Tree toad (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of amphibians belonging to Hyla and allied genera of the family Hylidæ. They are related to the common frogs and toads, but have the tips of the toes expanded into suckers by means of which they cling to the bark and leaves of trees. Only one species (Hyla arborea) is found in Europe, but numerous species occur in America and Australia. The common tree toad of the Northern United States (H. versicolor) is noted for the facility with which it changes its colors. Called also tree frog. See also Piping frog, under Piping, and Cricket frog, under Cricket. -- Tree warbler (Zoöl.), any one of several species of arboreal warblers belonging to Phylloscopus and allied genera. -- Tree wool (Bot.), a fine fiber obtained from the leaves of pine trees.  1. To drive to a tree; to cause to ascend a tree; as, a dog trees a squirrel. J. Burroughs. 2. To place upon a tree; to fit with a tree; to stretch upon a tree; as, to tree a boot. See Tree, n., 3.
winter: 1. The season of the year in which the sun shines most obliquely upon any region; the coldest season of the year. "Of thirty winter he was old." Chaucer. And after summer evermore succeeds Barren winter, with his wrathful nipping cold. Shak. Winter lingering chills the lap of May. Goldsmith. Note: North of the equator, winter is popularly taken to include the months of December, January, and February (see Season). Astronomically, it may be considered to begin with the winter solstice, about December 21st, and to end with the vernal equinox, about March 21st. 2. The period of decay, old age, death, or the like. Life's autumn past, I stand on winter's verge. Wordsworth. Winter apple, an apple that keeps well in winter, or that does not ripen until winter. -- Winter barley, a kind of barley that is sown in autumn. -- Winter berry (Bot.), the name of several American shrubs (Ilex verticillata, I. lævigata, etc.) of the Holly family, having bright red berries conspicuous in winter. -- Winter bloom. (Bot.) (a) A plant of the genus Azalea. (b) A plant of the genus Hamamelis (H. Viginica); witch-hazel; -- so called from its flowers appearing late in autumn, while the leaves are falling. -- Winter bud (Zoöl.), a statoblast. -- Winter cherry (Bot.), a plant (Physalis Alkekengi) of the Nightshade family, which has, a red berry inclosed in the inflated and persistent calyx. See Alkekengi. -- Winter cough (Med.), a form of chronic bronchitis marked by a cough recurring each winter. -- Winter cress (Bot.), a yellow-flowered cruciferous plant (Barbarea vulgaris). -- Winter crop, a crop which will bear the winter, or which may be converted into fodder during the winter. -- Winter duck. (Zoöl.) (a) The pintail. (b) The old squaw. -- Winter egg (Zoöl.), an egg produced in the autumn by many invertebrates, and destined to survive the winter. Such eggs usually differ from the summer eggs in having a thicker shell, and often in being enveloped in a protective case. They sometimes develop in a manner different from that of the summer eggs. -- Winter fallow, ground that is fallowed in winter. -- Winter fat. (Bot.) Same as White sage, under White. -- Winter fever (Med.), pneumonia. [Colloq.] -- Winter flounder. (Zoöl.) See the Note under Flounder. -- Winter gull (Zoöl.), the common European gull; -- called also winter mew. [Prov. Eng.] -- Winter itch. (Med.) See Prarie itch, under Prairie. -- Winter lodge, or Winter lodgment. (Bot.) Same as Hibernaculum. -- Winter mew. (Zoöl.) Same as Winter gull, above. [Prov. Eng.] -- Winter moth (Zoöl.), any one of several species of geometrid moths which come forth in winter, as the European species (Cheimatobia brumata). These moths have rudimentary mouth organs, and eat no food in the imago state. The female of some of the species is wingless. -- Winter oil, oil prepared so as not to solidify in moderately cold weather. -- Winter pear, a kind of pear that keeps well in winter, or that does not ripen until winter. -- Winter quarters, the quarters of troops during the winter; a winter residence or station. -- Winter rye, a kind of rye that is sown in autumn. -- Winter shad (Zoöl.), the gizzard shad. -- Winter sheldrake (Zoöl.), the goosander. [Local, U.S.] -- Winter sleep (Zoöl.), hibernation. -- Winter snipe (Zoöl.), the dunlin. -- Winter solstice. (Astron.) See Solstice, 2. -- Winter teal (Zoöl.), the green-winged teal. -- Winter wagtail (Zoöl.), the gray wagtail (Motacilla melanope). [Prov. Eng.] -- Winter wheat, wheat sown in autumn, which lives during the winter, and ripens in the following summer. -- Winter wren (Zoöl.), a small American wren (Troglodytes hiemalis) closely resembling the common wren.  To pass the winter; to hibernate; as, to winter in Florida. Because the haven was not commodious to winter in, the more part advised to depart thence. Acts xxvii. 12.  To keep, feed or manage, during the winter; as, to winter young cattle on straw.
thick: 1. Measuring in the third dimension other than length and breadth, or in general dimension other than length; -- said of a solid body; as, a timber seven inches thick. Were it as thick as is a branched oak. Chaucer. My little finger shall be thicker than my father's loins. 1 Kings xii. 10. 2. Having more depth or extent from one surface to its opposite than usual; not thin or slender; as, a thick plank; thick cloth; thick paper; thick neck. 3. Dense; not thin; inspissated; as, thick vapors. Also used figuratively; as, thick darkness. Make the gruel thick and slab. Shak. 4. Not transparent or clear; hence, turbid, muddy, or misty; as, the water of a river is apt to be thick after a rain. "In a thick, misty day." Sir W. Scott. 5. Abundant, close, or crowded in space; closely set; following in quick succession; frequently recurring. The people were gathered thick together. Luke xi. 29. Black was the forest; thick with beech it stood. Dryden. 6. Not having due distinction of syllables, or good articulation; indistinct; as, a thick utterance. 7. Deep; profound; as, thick sleep. [R.] Shak. 8. Dull; not quick; as, thick of fearing. Shak. His dimensions to any thick sight were invincible. Shak. 9. Intimate; very friendly; familiar. [Colloq.] We have been thick ever since. T. Hughes. Note: Thick is often used in the formation of compounds, most of which are self-explaining; as, thick-barred, thick-bodied, thick- coming, thick-cut, thick-flying, thick-growing, thick-leaved, thick- lipped, thick-necked, thick-planted, thick-ribbed, thick-shelled, thick-woven, and the like. Thick register. (Phon.) See the Note under Register, n., 7. -- Thick stuff (Naut.), all plank that is more than four inches thick and less than twelve. J. Knowles. Syn. -- Dense; close; compact; solid; gross; coarse.  1. The thickest part, or the time when anything is thickest. In the thick of the dust and smoke. Knolles. 2. A thicket; as, gloomy thicks. [Obs.] Drayton. Through the thick they heard one rudely rush. Spenser. He through a little window cast his sight Through thick of bars, that gave a scanty light. Dryden. Thick-and-thin block (Naut.), a fiddle block. See under Fiddle. -- Through thick and thin, through all obstacles and difficulties, both great and small. Through thick and thin she followed him. Hudibras. He became the panegyrist, through thick and thin, of a military frenzy. Coleridge.  1. Frequently; fast; quick. 2. Closely; as, a plat of ground thick sown. 3. To a great depth, or to a greater depth than usual; as, land covered thick with manure. Thick and threefold, in quick succession, or in great numbers. [Obs.] L'Estrange.  To thicken. [R.] The nightmare Life-in-death was she, Who thicks man's blood with cold. Coleridge.
cotton: 1. A soft, downy substance, resembling fine wool, consisting of the unicellular twisted hairs which grow on the seeds of the cotton plant. Long-staple cotton has a fiber sometimes almost two inches long; short-staple, from two thirds of an inch to an inch and a half. 2. The cotton plant. See Cotten plant, below. 3. Cloth made of cotton. Note: Cotton is used as an adjective before many nouns in a sense which commonly needs no explanation; as, cottton bagging; cotton clotch; cotton goods; cotton industry; cotton mill; cotton spinning; cotton tick. Cotton cambric. See Cambric, n., 2. -- Cotton flannel, the manufactures' name for a heavy cotton fabric, twilled, and with a long plush nap. In England it is called swan's- down cotton, or Canton flannel. -- Cotton gin, a machine to separate the seeds from cotton, invented by Eli Whitney. -- Cotton grass (Bot.), a genus of plants (Eriphorum) of the Sedge family, having delicate capillary bristles surrounding the fruit (seedlike achenia), which elongate at maturity and resemble tufts of cotton. -- Cotton mouse (Zool.), a field mouse (Hesperomys gossypinus), injurious to cotton crops. -- Cotton plant (Bot.), a plant of the genus Gossypium, of several species, all growing in warm climates, and bearing the cotton of commerce. The common species, originally Asiatic, is G. herbaceum. -- Cotton press, a building and machinery in which cotton bales are compressed into smaller bulk for shipment; a press for baling cotton. -- Cotton rose (Bot.), a genus of composite herbs (Filago), covered with a white substance resembling cotton. -- Cotton scale (Zoöl.), a species of bark louse (Pulvinaria innumerabilis), which does great damage to the cotton plant. -- Cotton shrub. Same as Cotton plant. -- Cotton stainer (Zoöl.), a species of hemipterous insect (Dysdercus suturellus), which seriously damages growing cotton by staining it; -- called also redbug. -- Cotton thistle (Bot.), the Scotch thistle. See under Thistle. -- Cotton velvet, velvet in which the warp and woof are both of cotton, and the pile is of silk; also, velvet made wholly of cotton. -- Cotton waste, the refuse of cotton mills. -- Cotton wool, cotton in its raw or woolly state. -- Cotton worm (Zool.), a lepidopterous insect (Aletia argillacea), which in the larval state does great damage to the cotton plant by eating the leaves. It also feeds on corn, etc., and hence is often called corn worm, and Southern army worm.  1. To rise with a regular nap, as cloth does. [Obs.] It cottons well; it can not choose but bear A pretty nap. Family of Love. 2. To go on prosperously; to succeed. [Obs.] New, Hephestion, does not this matter cotton as I would Lyly. 3. To unite; to agree; to make friends; -- usually followed by with. [Colloq.] A quarrel will end in one of you being turned off, in which case it will not be easy to cotton with another. Swift. Didst see, Frank, how the old goldsmith cottoned in with his beggarly companion Sir W. Scott. 4. To take a liking to; to stick to one as cotton; -- used with to. [Slang]
against: 1. Abreast; opposite to; facing; towards; as, against the mouth of a river; -- in this sense often preceded by over. Jacob saw the angels of God come against him. Tyndale. 2. From an opposite direction so as to strike or come in contact with; in contact with; upon; as, hail beats against the roof. 3. In opposition to, whether the opposition is of sentiment or of action; on the other side; counter to; in contrariety to; hence, adverse to; as, against reason; against law; to run a race against time. The gate would have been shut against her. Fielding. An argument against the use of steam. Tyndale. 4. By of before the time that; in preparation for; so as to be ready for the time when. [Archaic or Dial.] Urijah the priest made it, against King Ahaz came from Damascus. 2 Kings xvi. 11. Against the sun, in a direction contrary to that in which the sun appears to move.
map: 1. A representation of the surface of the earth, or of some portion of it, showing the relative position of the parts represented; -- usually on a flat surface. Also, such a representation of the celestial sphere, or of some part of it. Note: There are five principal kinds of projection used in making maps: the orthographic, the stereographic, the globuar, the conical, and the cylindrical, or Mercator's projection. See Projection. 2. Anything which represents graphically a succession of events, states, or acts; as, an historical map. Thus is his cheek the map of days outworn. Shak. Map lichen (Bot.), a lichen (Lecidea geographica.) growing on stones in curious maplike figures. Dr. Prior.  To represent by a map; -- often with out; as, to survey and map, or map out, a county. Hence, figuratively: To represent or indicate systematically and clearly; to sketch; to plan; as, to map, or map out, a journey; to map out business. I am near to the place where they should meet, if Pisanio have mapped it truly. Shak.
fig: 1. (Bot.)  A small fruit tree (Ficus Carica) with large leaves, known from the remotest antiquity. It was probably native from Syria westward to the Canary Islands. 2. The fruit of a fig tree, which is of round or oblong shape, and of various colors. Note: The fruit of a fig tree is really the hollow end of a stem, and bears numerous achenia inside the cavity. Many species have little, hard, inedible figs, and in only a few does the fruit become soft and pulpy. The fruit of the cultivated varieties is much prized in its fresh state, and also when dried or preserved. See Caprification. 3. A small piece of tobacco. [U.S.] 4. The value of a fig, practically nothing; a fico; -- used in scorn or contempt. "A fig for Peter." Shak. Cochineal fig. See Conchineal fig. -- Fig dust, a preparation of fine oatmeal for feeding caged birds. -- Fig faun, one of a class of rural deities or monsters supposed to live on figs. "Therefore shall dragons dwell there with the fig fauns." Jer. i. 39. (Douay version). -- Fig gnat (Zoöl.), a small fly said to be injurious to figs. -- Fig leaf, the leaf tree; hence, in allusion to the first clothing of Adam and Eve (Genesis iii.7), a covering for a thing that ought to be concealed; esp., an inadequate covering; a symbol for affected modesty. -- Fig marigold (Bot.), the name of several plants of the genus Mesembryanthemum, some of which are prized for the brilliancy and beauty of their flowers. -- Fig tree (Bot.), any tree of the genus Ficus, but especially F. Carica which produces the fig of commerce.  1. To insult with a fico, or contemptuous motion. See Fico. [Obs.] When Pistol lies, do this, and fig me like The bragging Spaniard. Shak. 2. To put into the head of, as something useless o [Obs.] L'Estrange.  Figure; dress; array. [Colloq.] Were they all in full fig, the females with feathers on their heads, the males with chapeaux bras Prof. Wilson.
post: Hired to do what is wrong; suborned. [Obs.] Sir E. Sandys.  1. A piece of timber, metal, or other solid substance, fixed, or to be fixed, firmly in an upright position, especially when intended as a stay or support to something else; a pillar; as, a hitching post; a fence post; the posts of a house. They shall take of the blood, and strike it on the two side posts and on the upper doorpost of the houses. Ex. xii. 7. Then by main force pulled up, and on his shoulders bore, The gates of Azza, post and massy bar. Milton. Unto his order he was a noble post. Chaucer. Note: Post, in the sense of an upright timber or strut, is used in composition, in such words as king-post, queen-post, crown-post, gatepost, etc. 2. The doorpost of a victualer's shop or inn, on which were chalked the scores of customers; hence, a score; a debt. [Obs.] When God sends coin I will discharge your post. S. Rowlands. From pillar to post. See under Pillar. -- Knight of the post. See under Knight. -- Post hanger (Mach.), a bearing for a revolving shaft, adapted to be fastened to a post. -- Post hole, a hole in the ground to set the foot of a post in. -- Post mill, a form of windmill so constructed that the whole fabric rests on a vertical axis firmly fastened to the ground, and capable of being turned as the direction of the wind varies. -- Post and stall (Coal Mining), a mode of working in which pillars of coal are left to support the roof of the mine.  1. The place at which anything is stopped, placed, or fixed; a station. Specifically: (a) A station, or one of a series of stations, established for the refreshment and accommodation of travelers on some recognized route; as, a stage or railway post. (b) A military station; the place at which a soldier or a body of troops is stationed; also, the troops at such a station. (c) The piece of ground to which a sentinel's walk is limited. 2. A messenger who goes from station; an express; especially, one who is employed by the government to carry letters and parcels regularly from one place to another; a letter carrier; a postman. In certain places there be always fresh posts, to carry that further which is brought unto them by the other. Abp. Abbot. I fear my Julia would not deign my lines, Receiving them from such a worthless post. Shak. 3. An established conveyance for letters from one place or station to another; especially, the governmental system in any country for carrying and distributing letters and parcels; the post office; the mail; hence, the carriage by which the mail is transported. I send you the fair copy of the poem on dullness, which I should not care to hazard by the common post. Pope. 4. Haste or speed, like that of a messenger or mail carrier. [Obs.] "In post he came." Shak. 5. One who has charge of a station, especially of a postal station. [Obs.] He held office of postmaster, or, as it was then called, post, for several years. Palfrey. 6. A station, office, or position of service, trust, or emolument; as, the post of duty; the post of danger. The post of honor is a private station. Addison. 7. A size of printing and writing paper. See the Table under Paper. Post and pair, an old game at cards, in which each player a hand of three cards. B. Jonson. -- Post bag, a mail bag. -- Post bill, a bill of letters mailed by a postmaster. -- Post chaise, or Post coach, a carriage usually with four wheels, for the conveyance of travelers who travel post. Post day, a day on which the mall arrives or departs. -- Post hackney, a hired post horse. Sir H. Wotton. -- Post horn, a horn, or trumpet, carried and blown by a carrier of the public mail, or by a coachman. -- Post horse, a horse stationed, intended, or used for the post. -- Post hour, hour for posting letters. Dickens. -- Post office. (a) An office under governmental superintendence, where letters, papers, and other mailable matter, are received and distributed; a place appointed for attending to all business connected with the mail. (b) The governmental system for forwarding mail matter. -- Postoffice order. See Money order, under Money. -- Post road, or Post route, a road or way over which the mail is carried. -- Post town. (a) A town in which post horses are kept. (b) A town in which a post office is established by law. -- To ride post, to ride, as a carrier of dispatches, from place to place; hence, to ride rapidly, with as little delay as possible. -- To travel post, to travel, as a post does, by relays of horses, or by keeping one carriage to which fresh horses are attached at each stopping place.  1. To attach to a post, a wall, or other usual place of affixing public notices; to placard; as, to post a notice; to post playbills. Note: Formerly, a large post was erected before the sheriff's office, or in some public place, upon which legal notices were displayed. This way of advertisement has not entirely gone of use. 2. To hold up to public blame or reproach; to advertise opprobriously; to denounce by public proclamation; as, to post one for cowardice. On pain of being posted to your sorrow Fail not, at four, to meet me. Granville. 3. To enter (a name) on a list, as for service, promotion, or the like. 4. To assign to a station; to set; to place; as, to post a sentinel. "It might be to obtain a ship for a lieutenant, . . . or to get him posted." De Quincey. 5. (Bookkeeping)  To carry, as an account, from the journal to the ledger; as, to post an account; to transfer, as accounts, to the ledger. You have not posted your books these ten years. Arbuthnot. 6. To place in the care of the post; to mail; as, to post a letter. 7. To inform; to give the news to; to make (one) acquainted with the details of a subject; -- often with up. Thoroughly posted up in the politics and literature of the day. Lond. Sat. Rev. To post off, to put off; to delay. [Obs.] "Why did I, venturously, post off so great a business" Baxter. -- To post over, to hurry over. [Obs.] Fuller.  1. To travel with post horses; figuratively, to travel in haste. "Post seedily to my lord your husband." Shak. And post o'er land and ocean without rest. Milton. 2. (Man.)  To rise and sink in the saddle, in accordance with the motion of the horse, esp. in trotting. [Eng.]  With post horses; hence, in haste; as, to travel post.
only: 1. One alone; single; as, the only man present; his only occupation. 2. Alone in its class; by itself; not associated with others of the same class or kind; as, an only child. 3. Hence, figuratively: Alone, by reason of superiority; preëminent; chief. "Motley's the only wear." Shak.  1. In one manner or degree; for one purpose alone; simply; merely; barely. And to be loved himself, needs only to be known. Dryden. 2. So and no otherwise; no other than; exclusively; solely; wholly. "She being only wicked." Beau. & Fl. Every imagination . . . of his heart was only evil. Gen. vi. 5. 3. Singly; without more; as, only-begotten. 4. Above all others; particularly. [Obs.] His most only elected mistress. Marston.  Save or except (that); -- an adversative used elliptically with or without that, and properly introducing a single fact or consideration. He might have seemed some secretary or clerk . . . only that his low, flat, unadorned cap . . . indicated that he belonged to the city. Sir W. Scott.
study: 1. A setting of the mind or thoughts upon a subject; hence, application of mind to books, arts, or science, or to any subject, for the purpose of acquiring knowledge. Hammond . . . spent thirteen hours of the day in study. Bp. Fell. Study gives strength to the mind; conversation, grace. Sir W. Temple. 2. Mental occupation; absorbed or thoughtful attention; meditation; contemplation. Just men they seemed, and all their study bent To worship God aright, and know his works. Milton. 3. Any particular branch of learning that is studied; any object of attentive consideration. The Holy Scriptures, especially the New Testament, are her daily study. Law. The proper study of mankind is man. Pope. 4. A building or apartment devoted to study or to literary work. "His cheery little study." Hawthorne. 5. (Fine Arts)  A representation or rendering of any object or scene intended, not for exhibition as an original work of art, but for the information, instruction, or assistance of the maker; as, a study of heads or of hands for a figure picture. 6. (Mus.)  A piece for special practice. See Etude.  1. To fix the mind closely upon a subject; to dwell upon anything in thought; to muse; to ponder. Chaucer. I found a moral first, and then studied for a fable. Swift. 2. To apply the mind to books or learning. Shak. 3. To endeavor diligently; to be zealous. 1 Thes. iv. 11.  1. To apply the mind to; to read and examine for the purpose of learning and understanding; as, to study law or theology; to study languages. 2. To consider attentively; to examine closely; as, to study the work of nature. Study thyself; what rank or what degree The wise Creator has ordained for thee. Dryden. 3. To form or arrange by previous thought; to con over, as in committing to memory; as, to study a speech. 4. To make an object of study; to aim at sedulously; to devote one's thoughts to; as, to study the welfare of others; to study variety in composition. For their heart studieth destruction. Prov. xxiv. 2.
evening: 1. The latter part and close of the day, and the beginning of darkness or night; properly, the decline of the day, or of the sum. In the ascending scale Of heaven, the stars that usher evening rose. Milton. Note: Sometimes, especially in the Southern parts of the United States, the afternoon is called evening. Bartlett. 2. The latter portion, as of life; the declining period, as of strength or glory. Note: Sometimes used adjectively; as, evening gun. "Evening Prayer." Shak. Evening flower (Bot.), a genus of iridaceous plants (Hesperantha) from the Cape of Good Hope, with sword-shaped leaves, and sweet-scented flowers which expand in the evening. -- Evening grosbeak (Zoöl.), an American singing bird (Coccothraustes vespertina) having a very large bill. Its color is olivaceous, with the crown, wings, and tail black, and the under tail coverts yellow. So called because it sings in the evening. -- Evening primrose. See under Primrose. -- The evening star, the bright star of early evening in the western sky, soon passing below the horizon; specifically, the planet Venus; -- called also Vesper and Hesperus. During portions of the year, Mars, Jupiter, and Saturn are also evening stars. See Morning Star.
planet: 1. (Astron.)  A celestial body which revolves about the sun in an orbit of a moderate degree of eccentricity. It is distinguished from a comet by the absence of a coma, and by having a less eccentric orbit. See Solar system. Note: The term planet was first used to distinguish those stars which have an apparent motion through the constellations from the fixed stars, which retain their relative places unchanged. The inferior planets are Mercury and Venus, which are nearer to the sun than is the earth; the superior planets are Mars, the asteroids, Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus, and Neptune, which are farther from the sun than is the earth. Primary planets are those which revolve about the sun; secondary planets, or moons, are those which revolve around the primary planets as satellites, and at the same time revolve with them about the sun. 2. A star, as influencing the fate of a men. There's some ill planet reigns. Shak. Planet gear. (Mach.) See Epicyclic train, under Epicyclic. -- Planet wheel, a gear wheel which revolves around the wheel with which it meshes, in an epicyclic train.
yet: Any one of several species of large marine gastropods belonging to the genus Yetus, or Cymba; a boat shell.  1. In addition; further; besides; over and above; still. "A little longer; yet a little longer." Dryden. This furnishes us with yet one more reason why our savior, lays such a particular stress acts of mercy. Atterbury. The rapine is made yet blacker by the pretense of piety and justice. L'Estrange. 2. At the same time; by continuance from a former state; still. Facts they had heard while they were yet heathens. Addison. 3. Up to the present time; thus far; hitherto; until now; -- and with the negative, not yet, not up to the present time; not as soon as now; as, Is it time to go Not yet. See As yet, under As, conj. Ne never yet no villainy ne said. Chaucer. 4. Before some future time; before the end; eventually; in time. "He 'll be hanged yet." Shak. 5. Even; -- used emphatically. Men may not too rashly believe the confessions of witches, nor yet the evidence against them. Bacon.  Nevertheless; notwithstanding; however. Yet I say unto you, That even Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these. Matt. vi. 29. Syn. -- See However.
consider: 1. To fix the mind on, with a view to a careful examination; to thank on with care; to ponder; to study; to meditate on. I will consider thy testimonies. Ps. cxix. 95. Thenceforth to speculations high or deep I turned my thoughts, and with capacious mind Considered all things visible. Milton. 2. To look at attentively; to observe; to examine. She considereth a field, and buyeth it. Prov. xxxi. 16. 3. To have regard to; to take into view or account; to pay due attention to; to respect. Consider, sir, the chance of war: the day Was yours by accident. Shak. England could grow into a posture of being more united at home, and more considered abroad. Sir W. Temple. 4. To estamate; to think; to regard; to view. Considered as plays, his works are absurd. Macaulay. Note: The proper sense of consider is often blended with an idea of the result of considering; as, "Blessed is he that considereth the poor." Ps. xli. 1. ; i.e., considers with sympathy and pity. "Which [services] if I have not enough considered." Shak. ; i.e., requited as the sufficient considering of them would suggest. "Consider him liberally." J. Hooker. Syn. -- To ponder; weigh; revolve; study; reflect or meditate on; contemplate; examine. See Ponder.  1. To think seriously; to make examination; to reflect; to deliberate. We will consider of your suit. Shak. 'T were to consider too curiously, to consider so. Shak. She wished she had taken a moment to consider, before rushing down stairs. W. Black 2. To hesitate. [Poetic & R.] Dryden.
that: 1. As a demonstrative pronoun (pl. Those), that usually points out, or refers to, a person or thing previously mentioned, or supposed to be understood. That, as a demonstrative, may precede the noun to which it refers; as, that which he has said is true; those in the basket are good apples. The early fame of Gratian was equal to that of the most celebrated princes. Gibbon. Note: That may refer to an entire sentence or paragraph, and not merely to a word. It usually follows, but sometimes precedes, the sentence referred to. That be far from thee, to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked. Gen. xviii. 25. And when Moses heard that, he was content. Lev. x. 20. I will know your business, Harry, that I will. Shak. Note: That is often used in opposition to this, or by way of distinction, and in such cases this, like the Latin hic and French ceci, generally refers to that which is nearer, and that, like Latin ille and French cela, to that which is more remote. When they refer to foreign words or phrases, this generally refers to the latter, and that to the former. Two principles in human nature reign; Self-love, to urge, and Reason, to restrain; Nor this a good, nor that a bad we call. Pope. If the Lord will, we shall live, and do this or that. James iv. 16. 2. As an adjective, that has the same demonstrative force as the pronoun, but is followed by a noun. It shall be more tolerable for Sodom and Gomorrah in the day of judgment, than for that city. Matt. x. 15. The woman was made whole from that hour. Matt. ix. 22. Note: That was formerly sometimes used with the force of the article the, especially in the phrases that one, that other, which were subsequently corrupted into th'tone, th'tother (now written t'other). Upon a day out riden knightes two . . . That one of them came home, that other not. Chaucer. 3. As a relative pronoun, that is equivalent to who or which, serving to point out, and make definite, a person or thing spoken of, or alluded to, before, and may be either singular or plural. He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame. Prov. ix. 7. A judgment that is equal and impartial must incline to the greater probabilities. Bp. Wilkins. Note: If the relative clause simply conveys an additional idea, and is not properly explanatory or restrictive, who or which (rarely that) is employed; as, the king that (or who) rules well is generally popular; Victoria, who (not that) rules well, enjoys the confidence of her subjects. Ambiguity may in some cases be avoided in the use of that (which is restrictive) instead of who or which, likely to be understood in a coördinating sense. Bain. That was formerly used for that which, as what is now; but such use is now archaic. We speak that we do know, and testify that we have seen. John iii. 11. That I have done it is thyself to wite [blame]. Chaucer. That, as a relative pronoun, cannot be governed by a preposition preceding it, but may be governed by one at the end of the sentence which it commences. The ship that somebody was sailing in. Sir W. Scott. In Old English, that was often used with the demonstratives he, his, him, etc., and the two together had the force of a relative pronoun; thus, that he = who; that his = whose; that him = whom. I saw to-day a corpse yborn to church That now on Monday last I saw him wirche [work]. Chaucer. Formerly, that was used, where we now commonly use which, as a relative pronoun with the demonstrative pronoun that as its antecedent. That that dieth, let it die; and that that is to cut off, let it be cut off. Zech. xi. 9. 4. As a conjunction, that retains much of its force as a demonstrative pronoun. It is used, specifically: -- (a) To introduce a clause employed as the object of the preceding verb, or as the subject or predicate nominative of a verb. She tells them 't is a causeless fantasy, And childish error, that they are afraid. Shak. I have shewed before, that a mere possibility to the contrary, can by no means hinder a thing from being highly credible. Bp. Wilkins. (b) To introduce, a reason or cause; -- equivalent to for that, in that, for the reason that, because. He does hear me; And that he does, I weep. Shak. (c) To introduce a purpose; -- usually followed by may, or might, and frequently preceded by so, in order, to the end, etc. These things I say, that ye might be saved. John v. 34. To the end that he may prolong his days. Deut. xvii. 20. (d) To introduce a consequence, result, or effect; -- usually preceded by so or such, sometimes by that. The birds their notes renew, and bleating herds Attest their joy, that hill and valley rings. Milton. He gazed so long That both his eyes were dazzled. Tennyson. (e) To introduce a clause denoting time; -- equivalent to in which time, at which time, when. So wept Duessa until eventide, That shining lamps in Jove's high course were lit. Spenser. Is not this the day That Hermia should give answer of her choice Shak. (f) In an elliptical sentence to introduce a dependent sentence expressing a wish, or a cause of surprise, indignation, or the like. Ha, cousin Silence, that thou hadst seen that that this knight and I have seen! Shak. O God, that right should thus overcome might! Shak. Note: That was formerly added to other conjunctions or to adverbs to make them emphatic. To try if that our own be ours or no. Shak. That is sometimes used to connect a clause with a preceding conjunction on which it depends. When he had carried Rome and that we looked For no less spoil than glory. Shak. 5. As adverb: To such a degree; so; as, he was that frightened he could say nothing. [Archaic or in illiteral use.] All that, everything of that kind; all that sort. With singing, laughing, ogling, and all that. Pope. The rank is but the guinea's stamp, The man's the gowd [gold] for a'that. Burns. -- For that. See under For, prep. -- In that. See under In, prep.
music: 1. The science and the art of tones, or musical sounds, i.e., sounds of higher or lower pitch, begotten of uniform and synchronous vibrations, as of a string at various degrees of tension; the science of harmonical tones which treats of the principles of harmony, or the properties, dependences, and relations of tones to each other; the art of combining tones in a manner to please the ear. Note: Not all sounds are tones. Sounds may be unmusical and yet please the ear. Music deals with tones, and with no other sounds. See Tone. 2. (a) Melody; a rhythmical and otherwise agreeable succession of tones. (b) Harmony; an accordant combination of simultaneous tones. 3. The written and printed notation of a musical composition; the score. 4. Love of music; capacity of enjoying music. The man that hath ni music in himself Nor is not moved with concord of sweet sounds, Is fit for treasons, stratagems, and spoils. Shak. 5. (Zoöl.)  A more or less musical sound made by many of the lower animals. See Stridulation. Magic music, a game in which a person is guided in finding a hidden article, or in doing a specific art required, by music which is made more loud or rapid as he approaches success, and slower as he recedes. Tennyson. -- Music box. See Musical box, under Musical. -- Music hall, a place for public musical entertainments. -- Music loft, a gallery for musicians, as in a dancing room or a church. -- Music of the spheres, the harmony supposed to be produced by the accordant movement of the celestial spheres. -- Music paper, paper ruled with the musical staff, for the use of composers and copyists. -- Music pen, a pen for ruling at one time the five lines of the musical staff. -- Music shell (Zoöl.), a handsomely colored marine gastropod shell (Voluta musica) found in the East Indies; -- so called because the color markings often resemble printed music. Sometimes applied to other shells similarly marked. -- To face the music, to meet any disagreeable necessity without flinching. [Colloq. or Slang]
distant: 1. Separated; having an intervening space; at a distance; away. One board had two tenons, equally distant. Ex. xxxvi. 22. Diana's temple is not distant far. Shak. 2. Far separated; far off; not near; remote; -- in place, time, consanguinity, or connection; as, distant times; distant relatives. The success of these distant enterprises. Prescott. 3. Reserved or repelling in manners; cold; not cordial; somewhat haughty; as, a distant manner. He passed me with a distant bow. Goldsmith. 4. Indistinct; faint; obscure, as from distance. Some distant knowledge. Shak. A distant glimpse. W. Irving. 5. Not conformable; discrepant; repugnant; as, a practice so widely distant from Christianity. Syn. -- Separate; far; remote; aloof; apart; asunder; slight; faint; indirect; indistinct.
every: 1. All the parts which compose a whole collection or aggregate number, considered in their individuality, all taken separately one by one, out of an indefinite bumber. Every man at his best state is altogether vanity. Ps. xxxix. 5. Every door and window was adorned with wreaths of flowers. Macaulay. 2. Every one. Cf. Each. [Obs.] "Every of your wishes." Shak. Daily occasions given to every of us. Hooker. Every each, every one. [Obs.] "Every each of them hath some vices." Burton.. -- Every now and then, at short intervals; occasionally; repeatedly; frequently. [Colloq.] Note: Every may, by way of emphasis, precede the article the with a superlative adjective; as, every, the least variation. Locke. Syn. -- Every, Each, Any. Any denotes one, or some, taken indifferently from the individuals which compose a class. Every differs from each in giving less promonence to the selection of the individual. Each relates to two or more individuals of a class. It refers definitely to every one of them, denoting that they are considered separately, one by one, all being included; as, each soldier was receiving a dollar per day. Every relates to more than two and brings into greater prominence the notion that not one of all considered is excepted; as, every soldier was on service, except the cavalry, that is, all the soldiers, etc. In each division there were four pentecosties, in every pentecosty four enomoties, and of each enomoty there fought in the front rank four [soldiers]. Jowett (Thucyd. ). If society is to be kept together and the children of Adam to be saved from setting up each for himself with every one else his foe. J. H. Newman.
area: 1. Any plane surface, as of the floor of a room or church, or of the ground within an inclosure; an open space in a building. The Alban lake . . . looks like the area of some vast amphitheater. Addison. 2. The inclosed space on which a building stands. 3. The sunken space or court, giving ingress and affording light to the basement of a building. 4. An extent of surface; a tract of the earth's surface; a region; as, vast uncultivated areas. 5. (Geom.)  The superficial contents of any figure; the surface included within any given lines; superficial extent; as, the area of a square or a triangle. 6. (Biol.)  A spot or small marked space; as, the germinative area. 7. Extent; scope; range; as, a wide area of thought. The largest area of human history and man's common nature. F. Harrison. Dry area. See under Dry.
grand: 1. Of large size or extent; great; extensive; hence, relatively great; greatest; chief; principal; as, a grand mountain; a grand army; a grand mistake. "Our grand foe, Satan." Milton. Making so bold . . . to unseal Their grand commission. Shak. 2. Great in size, and fine or imposing in appearance or impression; illustrious, dignifled, or noble (said of persons); majestic, splendid, magnificent, or sublime (said of things); as, a grand monarch; a grand lord; a grand general; a grand view; a grand conception. They are the highest models of expression, the unapproached masters of the grand style. M. Arnold. 3. Having higher rank or more dignity, size, or importance than other persons or things of the same name; as, a grand lodge; a grand vizier; a grand piano, etc. 4. Standing in the second or some more remote degree of parentage or descent; -- generalIy used in composition; as, grandfather, grandson, grandchild, etc. What cause Mov'd our grand parents, in that happy state, Favor'd of Heaven so highly, to fall off From their Creator. Milton. Grand action, a pianoforte action, used in grand pianos, in which special devices are employed to obtain perfect action of the hammer in striking and leaving the string. -- Grand Army of the Republic, an organized voluntary association of men who served in the Union army or navy during the civil war in the United States. The order has chapters, called Posts, throughout the country. -- Grand cross. (a) The highest rank of knighthood in the Order of the Bath. (b) A knight grand cross. -- Grand cordon, the cordon or broad ribbon, identified with the highest grade in certain honorary orders; hence, a person who holds that grade. -- Grand days (Eng. Law), certain days in the terms which are observed as holidays in the inns of court and chancery (Candlemas, Ascension, St. John Baptist's, and All Saints' Days); called also Dies non juridici. -- Grand duchess. (a) The wife or widow of a grand duke. (b) A lady having the sovereignty of a duchy in her own right. (c) In Russia, a daughter of the Czar. -- Grand duke. (a) A sovereign duke, inferior in rank to a king; as, the Grand Duke of Tuscany. (b) In Russia, a son of the Czar. (c) (Zoöl.) The European great horned owl or eagle owl (Bubo maximas). -- Grand-guard, or Grandegarde, a piece of plate armor used in tournaments as an extra protection for the left shoulder and breast. -- Grand juror, a member of a grand jury. -- Grand jury (Law), a jury of not less than twelve men, and not more than twenty-three, whose duty it is, in private session, to examine into accusations against persons charged with crime, and if they see just cause, then to find bills of indictment against them, to be presented to the court; -- called also grand inquest. -- Grand juryman, a grand juror. -- Grand larceny. (Law) See under Larceny. -- Grand lodge, the chief lodge, or governing body, among Freemasons and other secret orders. -- Grand master. (a) The head of one of the military orders of knighthood, as the Templars, Hospitallers, etc. (b) The head of the order of Freemasons or of Good Templars, etc. -- Grand paunch, a glutton or gourmand. [Obs.] Holland. -- Grand pensionary. See under Pensionary. -- Grand piano (Mus.), a large piano, usually harp-shaped, in which the wires or strings are generally triplicated, increasing the power, and all the mechanism is introduced in the most effective manner, regardless of the size of the instrument. -- Grand relief (Sculp.), alto relievo. -- Grand Seignior. See under Seignior. -- Grand stand, the principal stand, or erection for spectators, at a, race course, etc. -- Grand vicar (Eccl.), a principal vicar; an ecclesiastical delegate in France. -- Grand vizier. See under Vizier. Syn. -- Magnificent; sublime; majestic; dignified; elevated; stately; august; pompous; lofty; eralted; noble. -- Grand, Magnificent, Sublime. Grand, in reference to objects of taste, is applied to that which expands the mind by a sense of vastness and majesty; magnificent is applied to anything which is imposing from its splendor; sublime describes that which is awful and elevating. A cataract is grand; a rich and varied landscape is magnificent; an overhanging precipice is sublime. "Grandeur admits of degrees and modifications; but magnificence is that which has already reached the highest degree of superiority naturally belonging to the object in question." Crabb.
about: 1. Around; all round; on every side of. "Look about you." Shak. "Bind them about thy neck." Prov. iii. 3. 2. In the immediate neighborhood of; in contiguity or proximity to; near, as to place; by or on (one's person). "Have you much money about you" Bulwer. 3. Over or upon different parts of; through or over in various directions; here and there in; to and fro in; throughout. Lampoons . . . were handed about the coffeehouses. Macaulay. Roving still about the world. Milton. 4. Near; not far from; -- determining approximately time, size, quantity. "To-morrow, about this time." Exod. ix. 18. "About my stature." Shak. He went out about the third hour. Matt. xx. 3. Note: This use passes into the adverbial sense. 5. In concern with; engaged in; intent on. I must be about my Father's business. Luke ii. 49. 6. Before a verbal noun or an infinitive:  On the point or verge of; going; in act of. Paul was now aboutto open his mouth. Acts xviii. 14. 7. Concerning; with regard to; on account of; touching. "To treat about thy ransom." Milton. She must have her way about Sarah. Trollope.  1. On all sides; around. 'Tis time to look about. Shak. 2. In circuit; circularly; by a circuitous way; around the outside; as, a mile about, and a third of a mile across. 3. Here and there; around; in one place and another. Wandering about from house to house. 1 Tim. v. 13. 4. Nearly; approximately; with close correspondence, in quality, manner, degree, etc.; as, about as cold; about as high; -- also of quantity, number, time. "There fell . . . about three thousand men." Exod. xxii. 28. 5. To a reserved position; half round; in the opposite direction; on the opposite tack; as, to face about; to turn one's self about. To bring about, to cause to take place; to accomplish. -- To come about, to occur; to take place. See under Come. -- To go about, To set about, to undertake; to arrange; to prepare. "Shall we set about some revels Shak. -- Round about, in every direction around.
great: 1. Large in space; of much size; big; immense; enormous; expanded; -- opposed to small and little; as, a great house, ship, farm, plain, distance, length. 2. Large in number; numerous; as, a great company, multitude, series, etc. 3. Long continued; lengthened in duration; prolonged in time; as, a great while; a great interval. 4. Superior; admirable; commanding; -- applied to thoughts, actions, and feelings. 5. Endowed with extraordinary powers; uncommonly gifted; able to accomplish vast results; strong; powerful; mighty; noble; as, a great hero, scholar, genius, philosopher, etc. 6. Holding a chief position; elevated: lofty: eminent; distingushed; formost; principal; as, great men; the great seal; the great marshal, etc. He doth object I am too great of birth. Shak. 7. Entitled to earnest consideration; weighty; important; as, a great argument, truth, or principle. 8. Pregnant; big (with young). The ewes great with young. Ps. lxxviii. 71. 9. More than ordinary in degree; very considerable in degree; as, to use great caution; to be in great pain. We have all Great cause to give great thanks. Shak. 10. (Genealogy) Older, younger, or more remote, by single generation; -- often used before grand to indicate one degree more remote in the direct line of de scent; as, great-grandfather (a grandfather's or a grand- mother's father), great-grandson, etc. Great bear (Astron.), the constellation Ursa Major. -- Great cattle (Law), all manner of cattle except sheep and yearlings. Wharton. -- Great charter (Eng. Hist.), Magna Charta. -- Great circle of a sphere, a circle the plane of which passes through the center of the sphere. -- Great circle sailing, the process or art of conducting a ship on a great circle of the globe or on the shortest arc between two places. -- Great go, the final examination for a degree at the University of Oxford, England; -- called also greats. T. Hughes. -- Great guns. (Naut.) See under Gun. -- The Great Lakes the large fresh-water lakes (Lakes Superior, Michigan, Huron, Erie, and Ontario) which lie on the northern borders of the United States. -- Great master. Same as Grand master, under Grand. -- Great organ (Mus.), the largest and loudest of the three parts of a grand organ (the others being the choir organ and the swell, and sometimes the pedal organ or foot keys), It is played upon by a separate keyboard, which has the middle position. -- The great powers (of Europe), in modern diplomacy, Great Britain, France, Germany, Austria, Russia, and Italy. -- Great primer. See under Type. -- Great scale (Mus.), the complete scale; -- employed to designate the entire series of musical sounds from lowest to highest. -- Great sea, the Mediterranean sea. In Chaucer both the Black and the Mediterranean seas are so called. -- Great seal. (a) The principal seal of a kingdom or state. (b) In Great Britain, the lord chancellor (who is custodian of this seal); also, his office. -- Great tithes. See under Tithes. -- The great, the eminent, distinguished, or powerful. -- The Great Spirit, among the North American Indians, their chief or principal deity. -- To be great (with one), to be intimate or familiar (with him). Bacon.  The whole.; the gross; as, a contract to build a ship by the great.
nor: A negative connective or particle, introducing the second member or clause of a negative proposition, following neither, or not, in the first member or clause (as or in affirmative propositions follows either). Nor is also used sometimes in the first member for neither, and sometimes the neither is omitted and implied by the use of nor. Provide neither gold nor silver, nor brass, in your purses, nor scrip for your journey. Matt. x. 9, 10. Where neither moth nor rust doth corrupt. Matt. vi. 20. I love him not, nor fear him. Shak. Where neither party is nor true, nor kind. Shak. Simois nor Xanthus shall be wanting there. Dryden.
trip: 1. To move with light, quick steps; to walk or move lightly; to skip; to move the feet nimbly; -- sometimes followed by it. See It, 5. This horse anon began to trip and dance. Chaucer. Come, and trip it, as you go, On the light fantastic toe. Milton. She bounded by, and tripped so light They had not time to take a steady sight. Dryden. 2. To make a brief journey or pleasure excursion; as, to trip to Europe. 3. To take a quick step, as when in danger of losing one's balance; hence, to make a false; to catch the foot; to lose footing; to stumble. 4. Fig.: To be guilty of a misstep; to commit an offense against morality, propriety, or rule; to err; to mistake; to fail. "Till his tongue trip." Locke. A blind will thereupon comes to be led by a blind understanding; there is no remedy, but it must trip and stumble. South. Virgil is so exact in every word that none can be changed but for a worse; he pretends sometimes to trip, but it is to make you think him in danger when most secure. Dryden. What dost thou verily trip upon a word R. Browning.  1. To cause to stumble, or take a false step; to cause to lose the footing, by striking the feet from under; to cause to fall; to throw off the balance; to supplant; -- often followed by up; as, to trip up a man in wrestling. The words of Hobbes's defense trip up the heels of his cause. Abp. Bramhall. 2. Fig.: To overthrow by depriving of support; to put an obstacle in the way of; to obstruct; to cause to fail. To trip the course of law, and blunt the sword. Shak. 3. To detect in a misstep; to catch; to convict. [R.] These her women can trip me if I err. Shak. 4. (Naut.) (a) To raise (an anchor) from the bottom, by its cable or buoy rope, so that it hangs free. (b) To pull (a yard) into a perpendicular position for lowering it. 5. (Mach.)  To release, let fall, or see free, as a weight or compressed spring, as by removing a latch or detent.  1. A quick, light step; a lively movement of the feet; a skip. His heart bounded as he sometimes could hear the trip of a light female step glide to or from the door. Sir W. Scott. 2. A brief or rapid journey; an excursion or jaunt. I took a trip to London on the death of the queen. Pope. 3. A false step; a stumble; a misstep; a loss of footing or balance. Fig.: An error; a failure; a mistake. Imperfect words, with childish trips. Milton. Each seeming trip, and each digressive start. Harte. 4. A small piece; a morsel; a bit. [Obs.] "A trip of cheese." Chaucer. 5. A stroke, or catch, by which a wrestler causes his antagonist to lose footing. And watches with a trip his foe to foil. Dryden. It is the sudden trip in wrestling that fetches a man to the ground. South. 6. (Naut.)  A single board, or tack, in plying, or beating, to windward. 7. A herd or flock, as of sheep, goats, etc. [Prov. Eng. & Scott.] 8. A troop of men; a host. [Obs.] Robert of Brunne. 9. (Zoöl.)  A flock of widgeons.
apple: 1. The fleshy pome or fruit of a rosaceous tree (Pyrus malus) cultivated in numberless varieties in the temperate zones. Note: The European crab apple is supposed to be the original kind, from which all others have sprung. 2. (bot.)  Any tree genus Pyrus which has the stalk sunken into the base of the fruit; an apple tree. 3. Any fruit or other vegetable production resembling, or supposed to resemble, the apple; as, apple of love, or love apple (a tomato), balsam apple, egg apple, oak apple. 4. Anything round like an apple; as, an apple of gold. Note: Apple is used either adjectively or in combination; as, apple paper or apple-paper, apple-shaped, apple blossom, apple dumpling, apple pudding. Apple blight, an aphid which injures apple trees. See Blight, n. -- Apple borer (Zoöl.), a coleopterous insect (Saperda candida or bivittata), the larva of which bores into the trunk of the apple tree and pear tree. -- Apple brandy, brandy made from apples. -- Apple butter, a sauce made of apples stewed down in cider. Bartlett. -- Apple corer, an instrument for removing the cores from apples. -- Apple fly (Zoöl.), any dipterous insect, the larva of which burrows in apples. Apple flies belong to the genera Drosophila and Trypeta. -- Apple midge (Zoöl.) a small dipterous insect (Sciara mali), the larva of which bores in apples. -- Apple of the eye, the pupil. -- Apple of discord, a subject of contention and envy, so called from the mythological golden apple, inscribed "For the fairest," which was thrown into an assembly of the gods by Eris, the goddess of discord. It was contended for by Juno, Minerva, and Venus, and was adjudged to the latter. -- Apple of love, or Love apple, the tomato (Lycopersicum esculentum). -- Apple of Peru, a large coarse herb (Nicandra physaloides) bearing pale blue flowers, and a bladderlike fruit inclosing a dry berry. -- Apples of Sodom, a fruit described by ancient writers as externally of air appearance but dissolving into smoke and ashes plucked; Dead Sea apples. The name is often given to the fruit of Solanum Sodomæum, a prickly shrub with fruit not unlike a small yellow tomato. -- Apple sauce, stewed apples. [U. S.] -- Apple snail or Apple shell (Zoöl.), a fresh-water, operculated, spiral shell of the genus Ampullaria. -- Apple tart, a tart containing apples. -- Apple tree, a tree naturally bears apples. See Apple, 2. -- Apple wine, cider. -- Apple worm (Zoöl.), the larva of a small moth (Carpocapsa pomonella) which burrows in the interior of apples. See Codling moth. -- Dead Sea Apple. (a) pl. Apples of Sodom. Also Fig. "To seek the Dead Sea apples of politics." S. B. Griffin. (b) A kind of gallnut coming from Arabia. See Gallnut.  To grow like an apple; to bear apples. Holland.
cold: 1. Deprived of heat, or having a low temperature; not warm or hot; gelid; frigid. "The snowy top of cold Olympis." Milton. 2. Lacking the sensation of warmth; suffering from the absence of heat; chilly; shivering; as, to be cold. 3. Not pungent or acrid. "Cold plants." Bacon 4. Wanting in ardor, intensity, warmth, zeal, or passion; spiritless; unconcerned; reserved. A cold and unconcerned spectator. T. Burnet. No cold relation is a zealous citizen. Burke. 5. Unwelcome; disagreeable; unsatisfactory. "Cold news for me." "Cold comfort." Shak. 6. Wanting in power to excite; dull; uninteresting. What a deal of cold business doth a man misspend the better part of life in! B. Jonson. The jest grows cold . . . when in comes on in a second scene. Addison. 7. Affecting the sense of smell (as of hunting dogs) but feebly; having lost its odor; as, a cold scent. 8. Not sensitive; not acute. Smell this business with a sense as cold As is a dead man's nose. Shak. 9. Distant; -- said, in the game of hunting for some object, of a seeker remote from the thing concealed. 10. (Paint.)  Having a bluish effect. Cf. Warm, 8. Cold abscess. See under Abscess. -- Cold blast See under Blast, n., 2. Cold blood. See under Blood, n., 8. -- Cold chill, an ague fit. Wright. -- Cold chisel, a chisel of peculiar strength and hardness, for cutting cold metal. Weale. -- Cold cream. See under Cream. -- Cold slaw. See Cole slaw. -- In cold blood, without excitement or passion; deliberately. He was slain in cold blood after thefight was over. Sir W. Scott. To give one the cold shoulder, to treat one with neglect. Syn. -- Gelid; bleak; frigid; chill; indifferent; unconcerned; passionless; reserved; unfeeling; stoical.  1. The relative absence of heat or warmth. 2. The sensation produced by the escape of heat; chilliness or chillness. When she saw her lord prepared to part, A deadly cold ran shivering to her heart. Dryden. 3. (Med.)  A morbid state of the animal system produced by exposure to cold or dampness; a catarrh. Cold sore (Med.), a vesicular eruption appearing about the mouth as the result of a cold, or in the course of any disease attended with fever. -- To leave one out in the cold, to overlook or neglect him. [Colloq.] Cold, v. i.  To become cold. [Obs.] Chaucer.
quick: 1. Alive; living; animate; -- opposed to dead or inanimate. Not fully quyke, ne fully dead they were. Chaucer. The Lord Jesus Christ, who shall judge the quick and the dead at his appearing and his kingdom. 2 Tim. iv. 1. Man is no star, but a quick coal Of mortal fire. Herbert. Note: In this sense the word is nearly obsolete, except in some compounds, or in particular phrases. 2. Characterized by life or liveliness; animated; sprightly; agile; brisk; ready. " A quick wit." Shak. 3. Speedy; hasty; swift; not slow; as, be quick Oft he her his charge of quick return Repeated. Milton. 4. Impatient; passionate; hasty; eager; eager; sharp; unceremonious; as, a quick temper. The bishop was somewhat quick with them, and signified that he was much offended. Latimer. 5. Fresh; bracing; sharp; keen. The air is quick there, And it pierces and sharpens the stomach. Shak. 6. Sensitive; perceptive in a high degree; ready; as, a quick ear. "To have an open ear, a quick eye." Shak. They say that women are so quick. Tennyson. 7. Pregnant; with child. Shak. Quick grass. (Bot.) See Quitch grass. -- Quick match. See under Match. -- Quick vein (Mining), a vein of ore which is productive, not barren. -- Quick vinegar, vinegar made by allowing a weak solution of alcohol to trickle slowly over shavings or other porous material. -- Quick water, quicksilver water. -- Quick with child, pregnant with a living child. Syn. -- Speedy; expeditious; swift; rapid; hasty; prompt; ready; active; brisk; nimble; fleet; alert; agile; lively; sprightly.  In a quick manner; quickly; promptly; rapidly; with haste; speedily; without delay; as, run quick; get back quick. If we consider how very quick the actions of the mind are performed. Locke.  1. That which is quick, or alive; a living animal or plant; especially, the hawthorn, or other plants used in making a living hedge. The works . . . are curiously hedged with quick. Evelyn. 2. The life; the mortal point; a vital part; a part susceptible of serious injury or keen feeling; the sensitive living flesh; the part of a finger or toe to which the nail is attached; the tender emotions; as, to cut a finger nail to the quick; to thrust a sword to the quick, to taunt one to the quick; -- used figuratively. This test nippeth, . . . this toucheth the quick. Latimer. How feebly and unlike themselves they reason when they come to the quick of the difference ! Fuller. 3. (Bot.)  Quitch grass. Tennyson.  To revive; to quicken; to be or become alive. [Obs.] Chaucer.
race: A game, match, etc., open only to losers in early stages of contests.  A root. "A race or two of ginger." Shak. Race ginger, ginger in the root, or not pulverized.  1. The descendants of a common ancestor; a family, tribe, people, or nation, believed or presumed to belong to the same stock; a lineage; a breed. The whole race of mankind. Shak. Whence the long race of Alban fathers come. Dryden. Note: Naturalists and ehnographers divide mankind into several distinct varieties, or races. Cuvier refers them all to three, Pritchard enumerates seven, Agassiz eight, Pickering describes eleven. One of the common classifications is that of Blumenbach, who makes five races: the Caucasian, or white race, to which belong the greater part of the European nations and those of Western Asia; the Mongolian, or yellow race, occupying Tartary, China, Japan, etc.; the Ethiopian, or negro race, occupying most of Africa (except the north), Australia, Papua, and other Pacific Islands; the American, or red race, comprising the Indians of North and South America; and the Malayan, or brown race, which occupies the islands of the Indian Archipelago, etc. Many recent writers classify the Malay and American races as branches of the Mongolian. See Illustration in Appendix. 2. Company; herd; breed. For do but note a wild and wanton herd, Or race of youthful and unhandled colts, Fetching mad bounds. Shak . 3. (Bot.)  A variety of such fixed character that it may be propagated by seed. 4. Peculiar flavor, taste, or strength, as of wine; that quality, or assemblage of qualities, which indicates origin or kind, as in wine; hence, characteristic flavor; smack. "A race of heaven." Shak. Is it [the wine] of the right race Massinqer. 5. Hence, characteristic quality or disposition. [Obs.] And now I give my sensual race the rein. Shak. Some . . . great race of fancy or judgment. Sir W. Temple. Syn. -- Lineage; line; family; house; breed; offspring; progeny; issue.  1. A progress; a course; a movement or progression. 2. Esp., swift progress; rapid course; a running. The flight of many birds is swifter than the race of any beasts. Bacon. 3. Hence: The act or process of running in competition; a contest of speed in any way, as in running, riding, driving, skating, rowing, sailing; in the plural, usually, a meeting for contests in the running of horses; as, he attended the races. The race is not to the swift. Eccl. ix. 11. I wield the gauntlet, and I run the race. Pope. 4. Competitive action of any kind, especially when prolonged; hence, career; course of life. My race of glory run, and race of shame. Milton. 5. A strong or rapid current of water, or the channel or passage for such a current; a powerful current or heavy sea, sometimes produced by the meeting of two tides; as, the Portland Race; the Race of Alderney. 6. The current of water that turns a water wheel, or the channel in which it flows; a mill race. Note: The part of the channel above the wheel is sometimes called the headrace, the part below, the tailrace. 7. (Mach.)  A channel or guide along which a shuttle is driven back and forth, as in a loom, sewing machine, etc. Race cloth, a cloth worn by horses in racing, having pockets to hold the weights prescribed. -- Race course. (a) The path, generally circular or elliptical, over which a race is run. (b) Same as Race way, below. -- Race cup, a cup given as a prize to the victor in a race. -- Race glass, a kind of field glass. -- Race horse. (a) A horse that runs in competition; specifically, a horse bred or kept for running races. (b) A breed of horses remarkable for swiftness in running. (c) (Zoöl.) The steamer duck. (d) (Zoöl.) A mantis. -- Race knife, a cutting tool with a blade that is hooked at the point, for marking outlines, on boards or metals, as by a pattern, -- used in shipbuilding. -- Race saddle, a light saddle used in racing. -- Race track. Same as Race course (a), above. -- Race way, the canal for the current that drives a water wheel.  1. To run swiftly; to contend in a race; as, the animals raced over the ground; the ships raced from port to port. 2. (Steam Mach.)  To run too fast at times, as a marine engine or screw, when the screw is lifted out of water by the action of a heavy sea.  1. To cause to contend in race; to drive at high speed; as, to race horses. 2. To run a race with.
bottom: 1. The lowest part of anything; the foot; as, the bottom of a tree or well; the bottom of a hill, a lane, or a page. Or dive into the bottom of the deep. Shak. 2. The part of anything which is beneath the contents and supports them, as the part of a chair on which a person sits, the circular base or lower head of a cask or tub, or the plank floor of a ship's hold; the under surface. Barrels with the bottom knocked out. Macaulay. No two chairs were alike; such high backs and low backs and leather bottoms and worsted bottoms. W. Irving. 3. That upon which anything rests or is founded, in a literal or a figurative sense; foundation; groundwork. 4. The bed of a body of water, as of a river, lake, sea. 5. The fundament; the buttocks. 6. An abyss. [Obs.] Dryden. 7. Low land formed by alluvial deposits along a river; low-lying ground; a dale; a valley. "The bottoms and the high grounds." Stoddard. 8. (Naut.)  The part of a ship which is ordinarily under water; hence, the vessel itself; a ship. My ventures are not in one bottom trusted. Shak. Not to sell the teas, but to return them to London in the same bottoms in which they were shipped. Bancroft. Full bottom, a hull of such shape as permits carrying a large amount of merchandise. 9. Power of endurance; as, a horse of a good bottom. 10. Dregs or grounds; lees; sediment. Johnson. At bottom, At the bottom, at the foundation or basis; in reality. "He was at the bottom a good man." J. F. Cooper. -- To be at the bottom of, to be the cause or originator of; to be the source of. [Usually in an opprobrious sense.] J. H. Newman. He was at the bottom of many excellent counsels. Addison. -- To go to the bottom, to sink; esp. to be wrecked. -- To touch bottom, to reach the lowest point; to find something on which to rest.  Of or pertaining to the bottom; fundamental; lowest; under; as, bottom rock; the bottom board of a wagon box; bottom prices. Bottom glade, a low glade or open place; a valley; a dale. Milton. -Bottom grass, grass growing on bottom lands. -- Bottom land. See 1st Bottom, n., 7.  1. To found or build upon; to fix upon as a support; -- followed by on or upon. Action is supposed to be bottomed upon principle. Atterbury. Those false and deceiving grounds upon which many bottom their eternal state]. South. 2. To furnish with a bottom; as, to bottom a chair. 3. To reach or get to the bottom of. Smiles.  1. To rest, as upon an ultimate support; to be based or grounded; -- usually with on or upon. Find on what foundation any proposition bottoms. Locke. 2. To reach or impinge against the bottom, so as to impede free action, as when the point of a cog strikes the bottom of a space between two other cogs, or a piston the end of a cylinder.  A ball or skein of thread; a cocoon. [Obs.] Silkworms finish their bottoms in . . . fifteen days. Mortimer.  To wind round something, as in making a ball of thread. [Obs.] As you unwind her love from him, Lest it should ravel and be good to none, You must provide to bottom it on me. Shak.
morning: Pertaining to the first part or early part of the day; being in the early part of the day; as, morning dew; morning light; morning service. She looks as clear As morning roses newly washed with dew. Shak. Morning gown, a gown worn in the morning before one is dressed for the day. -- Morning gun, a gun fired at the first stroke of reveille at military posts. -- Morning sickness (Med.), nausea and vomiting, usually occurring in the morning; -- a common sign of pregnancy. -- Morning star. (a) Any one of the planets (Venus, Jupiter, Mars, or Saturn) when it precedes the sun in rising, esp. Venus. Cf. Evening star, Evening. (b) Satan. See Lucifer. Since he miscalled the morning star, Nor man nor fiend hath fallen so far. Byron. (c) A weapon consisting of a heavy ball set with spikes, either attached to a staff or suspended from one by a chain. -- Morning watch (Naut.), the watch between four A. M. and eight A. M..
ask: 1. To request; to seek to obtain by words; to petition; to solicit; - - often with of, in the sense of from, before the person addressed. Ask counsel, we pray thee, of God. Judg. xviii. 5. If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done unto you. John xv. 7. 2. To require, demand, claim, or expect, whether by way of remuneration or return, or as a matter of necessity; as, what price do you ask Ask me never so much dowry. Gen. xxxiv. 12. To whom men have committed much, of him they will ask the more. Luke xii. 48. An exigence of state asks a much longer time to conduct a design to maturity. Addison. 3. To interrogate or inquire of or concerning; to put a question to or about; to question. He is of age; ask him: he shall speak for himself. John ix. 21. He asked the way to Chester. Shak. 4. To invite; as, to ask one to an entertainment. 5. To publish in church for marriage; -- said of both the banns and the persons. Fuller. Syn. -- To beg; request; seek; petition; solicit; entreat; beseech; implore; crave; require; demand; claim; exhibit; inquire; interrogate. See Beg.  1. To request or petition; -- usually folllowed by for; as, to ask for bread. Ask, and it shall be given you. Matt. vii. 7. 2. To make inquiry, or seek by request; -- sometimes followed by after. Wherefore . . . dost ask after my name Gen. xxxii. 29.  A water newt. [Scot. & North of Eng.]
sail: 1. An extent of canvas or other fabric by means of which the wind is made serviceable as a power for propelling vessels through the water. Behoves him now both sail and oar. Milton. 2. Anything resembling a sail, or regarded as a sail. 3. A wing; a van. [Poetic] Like an eagle soaring To weather his broad sails. Spenser . 4. the extended surface of the arm of a windmill. 5. A sailing vessel; a vessel of any kind; a craft. Note: In this sense, the plural has usually the same forms as the singular; as, twenty sail were in sight. 6. A passage by a sailing vessel; a journey or excursion upon the water. Note: Sails are of two general kinds, fore-and-aft sails, and square sails. Square sails are always bent to yards, with their foot lying across the line of the vessel. Fore-and-aft sails are set upon stays or gaffs with their foot in line with the keel. A fore-and-aft sail is triangular, or quadrilateral with the after leech longer than the fore leech. Square sails are quardrilateral, but not necessarily square. See Phrases under Fore, a., and Square, a.; also, Bark, Brig, Schooner, Ship, Stay. Sail burton (Naut.), a purchase for hoisting sails aloft for bending. -- Sail fluke (Zoöl.), the whiff. -- Sail hook, a small hook used in making sails, to hold the seams square. -- Sail loft, a loft or room where sails are cut out and made. -- Sail room (Naut.), a room in a vessel where sails are stowed when not in use. -- Sail yard (Naut.), the yard or spar on which a sail is extended. -- Shoulder-of-mutton sail (Naut.), a triangular sail of peculiar form. It is chiefly used to set on a boat's mast. -- To crowd sail. (Naut.) See under Crowd. -- To loose sails (Naut.), to unfurl or spread sails. -- To make sail (Naut.), to extend an additional quantity of sail. -- To set a sail (Naut.), to extend or spread a sail to the wind. -- To set sail (Naut.), to unfurl or spread the sails; hence, to begin a voyage. -- To shorten sail (Naut.), to reduce the extent of sail, or take in a part. -- To strike sail (Naut.), to lower the sails suddenly, as in saluting, or in sudden gusts of wind; hence, to acknowledge inferiority; to abate pretension. -- Under sail, having the sails spread.  1. To be impelled or driven forward by the action of wind upon sails, as a ship on water; to be impelled on a body of water by the action of steam or other power. 2. To move through or on the water; to swim, as a fish or a water fowl. 3. To be conveyed in a vessel on water; to pass by water; as, they sailed from London to Canton. 4. To set sail; to begin a voyage. 5. To move smoothly through the air; to glide through the air without apparent exertion, as a bird. As is a winged messenger of heaven, . . . When he bestrides the lazy pacing clouds, And sails upon the bosom of the air. Shak.  1. To pass or move upon, as in a ship, by means of sails; hence, to move or journey upon(the water) by means of steam or other force. A thousand ships were manned to sail the sea. Dryden. 2. To fly through; to glide or move smoothly through. Sublime she sails The aërial space, and mounts the winged gales. Pope. 3. To direct or manage the motion of, as a vessel; as, to sail one's own ship. Totten.
liquid: 1. Flowing freely like water; fluid; not solid. Yes, though he go upon the plane and liquid water which will receive no step. Tyndale. 2. (Physics)  Being in such a state that the component parts move among themselves, but do not tend to separate from each other as the particles of gases and vapors do; neither solid nor aëriform; as, liquid mercury, in distinction from mercury solidified or in a state of vapor. 3. Flowing or sounding smoothly or without abrupt transitions or harsh tones. "Liquid melody." Crashaw. 4. Pronounced without any jar or harshness; smooth; as, l and r are liquid letters. 5. Fluid and transparent; as, the liquid air. 6. Clear; definite in terms or amount.[Obs.] "Though the debt should be entirely liquid." Ayliffe. Liquid glass. See Soluble glass, under Glass.  1. A substance whose parts change their relative position on the slightest pressure, and therefore retain no definite form; any substance in the state of liquidity; a fluid that is not aëriform. Note: Liquid and fluid are terms often used synonymously, but fluid has the broader signification. All liquids are fluids, but many fluids, as air and the gases, are not liquids. 2. (Phon.)  A letter which has a smooth, flowing sound, or which flows smoothly after a mute; as, l and r, in bla, bra. M and n also are called liquids. Liquid measure, a measure, or system of measuring, for liquids, by the gallon, quart, pint, gill, etc.
men: pl. of Man.  A man; one; -- used with a verb in the singular, and corresponding to the present indefinite one or they. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. Men moot give silver to the poure triars. Chaucer. A privy thief, men clepeth death. Chaucer.
party: 1. A part or portion. [Obs.] "The most party of the time." Chaucer. 2. A number of persons united in opinion or action, as distinguished from, or opposed to, the rest of a community or association; esp., one of the parts into which a people is divided on questions of public policy. Win the noble Brutus to our party. Shak. The peace both parties want is like to last. Dryden. 3. A part of a larger body of company; a detachment; especially (Mil.), a small body of troops dispatched on special service. 4. A number of persons invited to a social entertainment; a select company; as, a dinner party; also, the entertainment itself; as, to give a party. 5. One concerned or interested in an affair; one who takes part with others; a participator; as, he was a party to the plot; a party to the contract. 6. The plaintiff or the defendant in a lawsuit, whether an individual, a firm, or corporation; a litigant. The cause of both parties shall come before the judges. Ex. xxii. 9. 7. Hence, any certain person who is regarded as being opposed or antagonistic to another. It the jury found that the party slain was of English race, it had been adjudged felony. Sir J. Davies. 8. Cause; side; interest. Have you nothing said Upon this Party 'gainst the Duke of Albany Shak. 9. A person; as, he is a queer party. [Now accounted a vulgarism.] Note: "For several generations, our ancestors largely employed party for person; but this use of the word, when it appeared to be reviving, happened to strike, more particularly, the fancy of the vulgar; and the consequence has been, that the polite have chosen to leave it in their undisputed possession." Fitzed. Hall. Party jury (Law), a jury composed of different parties, as one which is half natives and half foreigners. -- Party man, a partisan. Swift. -- Party spirit, a factious and unreasonable temper, not uncommonly shown by party men. Whately. -- Party verdict, a joint verdict. Shak. -- Party wall. (a) (Arch.) A wall built upon the dividing line between two adjoining properties, usually having half its thickness on each property. (b) (Law) A wall that separates adjoining houses, as in a block or row.  1. (Her.)  Parted or divided, as in the direction or form of one of the ordinaries; as, an escutcheon party per pale. 2. Partial; favoring one party. I will be true judge, and not party. Chaucer. Charter party. See under Charter.  Partly. [Obs.] Chaucer.
size: Six.  1. A thin, weak glue used in various trades, as in painting, bookbinding, paper making, etc. 2. Any viscous substance, as gilder's varnish.  To cover with size; to prepare with size.  1. A settled quantity or allowance. See Assize. [Obs.] "To scant my sizes." Shak. 2. (Univ. of Cambridge, Eng.)  An allowance of food and drink from the buttery, aside from the regular dinner at commons; -- corresponding to battel at Oxford. 3. Extent of superficies or volume; bulk; bigness; magnitude; as, the size of a tree or of a mast; the size of a ship or of a rock. 4. Figurative bulk; condition as to rank, ability, character, etc.; as, the office demands a man of larger size. Men of a less size and quality. L'Estrange. The middling or lower size of people. Swift. 5. A conventional relative measure of dimension, as for shoes, gloves, and other articles made up for sale. 6. An instrument consisting of a number of perforated gauges fastened together at one end by a rivet, -- used for ascertaining the size of pearls. Knight. Size roll, a small piese of parchment added to a roll. -- Size stick, a measuring stick used by shoemakers for ascertaining the size of the foot. Syn. -- Dimension; bigness; largeness; greatness; magnitude.  1. To fix the standard of. "To size weights and measures." [R.] Bacon. 2. To adjust or arrange according to size or bulk. Specifically: (a) (Mil.) To take the height of men, in order to place them in the ranks according to their stature. (b) (Mining) To sift, as pieces of ore or metal, in order to separate the finer from the coarser parts. 3. To swell; to increase the bulk of. Beau. & Fl. 4. (Mech.)  To bring or adjust anything exactly to a required dimension, as by cutting. To size up, to estimate or ascertain the character and ability of. See 4th Size, 4. [Slang, U.S.] We had to size up our fellow legislators. The Century.  1. To take greater size; to increase in size. Our desires give them fashion, and so, As they wax lesser, fall, as they size, grow. Donne. 2. (Univ. of Cambridge, Eng.)  To order food or drink from the buttery; hence, to enter a score, as upon the buttery book.
slow: imp. of Slee, to slay. Slew. Chaucer.  1. Moving a short space in a relatively long time; not swift; not quick in motion; not rapid; moderate; deliberate; as, a slow stream; a slow motion. 2. Not happening in a short time; gradual; late. These changes in the heavens, though slow, produced Like change on sea and land, sidereal blast. Milton. 3. Not ready; not prompt or quick; dilatory; sluggish; as, slow of speech, and slow of tongue. Fixed on defense, the Trojans are not slow To guard their shore from an expected foe. Dryden. 4. Not hasty; not precipitate; acting with deliberation; tardy; inactive. He that is slow to wrath is of great understanding. Prov. xiv. 29. 5. Behind in time; indicating a time earlier than the true time; as, the clock or watch is slow. 6. Not advancing or improving rapidly; as, the slow growth of arts and sciences. 7. Heavy in wit; not alert, prompt, or spirited; wearisome; dull. [Colloq.] Dickens. Thackeray. Note: Slow is often used in the formation of compounds for the most part self-explaining; as, slow-gaited, slow-paced, slow-sighted, slow-winged, and the like. Slow coach, a slow person. See def.7, above. [Colloq.] -- Slow lemur, or Slow loris (Zoöl.), an East Indian nocturnal lemurine animal (Nycticebus tardigradus) about the size of a small cat; -- so called from its slow and deliberate movements. It has very large round eyes and is without a tail. Called also bashful Billy. -- Slow match. See under Match. Syn. -- Dilatory; late; lingering; tardy; sluggish; dull; inactive. -- Slow, Tardy, Dilatory. Slow is the wider term, denoting either a want of rapid motion or inertness of intellect. Dilatory signifies a proneness to defer, a habit of delaying the performance of what we know must be done. Tardy denotes the habit of being behind hand; as, tardy in making up one's acounts.  Slowly. Let him have time to mark how slow time goes In time of sorrow. Shak.  To render slow; to slacken the speed of; to retard; to delay; as, to slow a steamer. Shak.  To go slower; -- often with up; as, the train slowed up before crossing the bridge.  A moth. [Obs.] Rom. of R.
south: 1. That one of the four cardinal points directly opposite to the north; the region or direction to the right or direction to the right of a person who faces the east. 2. A country, region, or place situated farther to the south than another; the southern section of a country. "The queen of the south." Matt. xii. 42. 3. Specifically: That part of the United States which is south of Mason and Dixon's line. See under Line. 4. The wind from the south. [Obs.] Shak.  Lying toward the south; situated at the south, or in a southern direction from the point of observation or reckoning; proceeding toward the south, or coming from the south; blowing from the south; southern; as, the south pole. "At the south entry." Shak. South-Sea tea (Bot.) See Yaupon.  , adv. 1. Toward the south; southward. 2. From the south; as, the wind blows south. Bacon.  1. To turn or move toward the south; to veer toward the south. 2. (Astron.)  To come to the meridian; to cross the north and south line; -- said chiefly of the moon; as, the moon souths at nine.  the old squaw; -- so called in imitation of its cry. Called also southerly, and southerland. See under Old.
travel: 1. To labor; to travail. [Obsoles.] Hooker. 2. To go or march on foot; to walk; as, to travel over the city, or through the streets. 3. To pass by riding, or in any manner, to a distant place, or to many places; to journey; as, a man travels for his health; he is traveling in California. 4. To pass; to go; to move. Time travels in divers paces with divers persons. Shak.  1. To journey over; to traverse; as, to travel the continent. "I travel this profound." Milton. 2. To force to journey. [R.] They shall not be traveled forth of their own franchises. Spenser.  1. The act of traveling, or journeying from place to place; a journey. With long travel I am stiff and weary. Shak. His travels ended at his country seat. Dryden. 2. pl.  An account, by a traveler, of occurrences and observations during a journey; as, a book of travels; -- often used as the title of a book; as, Travels in Italy. 3. (Mach.)  The length of stroke of a reciprocating piece; as, the travel of a slide valve. 4. Labor; parturition; travail. [Obs.]
sleep: imp. of Sleep. Slept. Chaucer.  1. To take rest by a suspension of the voluntary exercise of the powers of the body and mind, and an apathy of the organs of sense; to slumber. Chaucer. Watching at the head of these that sleep. Milton. 2. Figuratively: (a) To be careless, inattentive, or uncouncerned; not to be vigilant; to live thoughtlessly. We sleep over our happiness. Atterbury. (b) To be dead; to lie in the grave. Them also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him. 1 Thess. iv. 14. (c) To be, or appear to be, in repose; to be quiet; to be unemployed, unused, or unagitated; to rest; to lie dormant; as, a question sleeps for the present; the law sleeps. How sweet the moonlight sleep upon this bank! Shak.  1. To be slumbering in; -- followed by a cognate object; as, to sleep a dreamless sleep. Tennyson. 2. To give sleep to; to furnish with accomodations for sleeping; to lodge. [R.] Blackw. Mag. To sleep away, to spend in sleep; as, to sleep away precious time. -- To sleep off, to become free from by sleep; as, to sleep off drunkeness or fatigue.  A natural and healthy, but temporary and periodical, suspension of the functions of the organs of sense, as well as of those of the voluntary and rational soul; that state of the animal in which there is a lessened acuteness of sensory perception, a confusion of ideas, and a loss of mental control, followed by a more or less unconscious state. "A man that waketh of his sleep." Chaucer. O sleep, thou ape of death. Shak. Note: Sleep is attended by a relaxation of the muscles, and the absence of voluntary activity for any rational objects or purpose. The pulse is slower, the respiratory movements fewer in number but more profound, and there is less blood in the cerebral vessels. It is susceptible of greater or less intensity or completeness in its control of the powers. Sleep of plants (Bot.), a state of plants, usually at night, when their leaflets approach each other, and the flowers close and droop, or are covered by the folded leaves. Syn. -- Slumber; repose; rest; nap; doze; drowse.
eight: An island in a river; an ait. [Obs.] "Osiers on their eights." Evelyn.  Seven and one; as, eight years.  1. The number greater by a unit than seven; eight units or objects. 2. A symbol representing eight units, as 8 or viii.
offer: 1. To present, as an act of worship; to immolate; to sacrifice; to present in prayer or devotion; -- often with up. Thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for atonement. Ex. xxix. 36. A holy priesthood to offer up spiritual sacrifices. 1 Pet. ii. 5. 2. To bring to or before; to hold out to; to present for acceptance or rejection; as, to offer a present, or a bribe; to offer one's self in marriage. I offer thee three things. 2 Sam. xxiv. 12. 3. To present in words; to proffer; to make a proposal of; to suggest; as, to offer an opinion. With the infinitive as an objective: To make an offer; to declare one's willingness; as, he offered to help me. 4. To attempt; to undertake. All that offer to defend him. Shak. 5. To bid, as a price, reward, or wages; as, to offer a guinea for a ring; to offer a salary or reward. 6. To put in opposition to; to manifest in an offensive way; to threaten; as, to offer violence, attack, etc. Syn. -- To propose; propound; move; proffer; tender; sacrifice; immolate.  1. To present itself; to be at hand. The occasion offers, and the youth complies. Dryden. 2. To make an attempt; to make an essay or a trial; -- used with at. "Without offering at any other remedy." Swift. He would be offering at the shepherd's voice. L'Estrange. I will not offer at that I can not master. Bacon.  1. The act of offering, bringing forward, proposing, or bidding; a proffer; a first advance. "This offer comes from mercy." Shak. 2. That which is offered or brought forward; a proposal to be accepted or rejected; a sum offered; a bid. When offers are disdained, and love denied. Pope. 3. Attempt; endeavor; essay; as, he made an offer to catch the ball. "Some offer and attempt." South.
leg: 1. A limb or member of an animal used for supporting the body, and in running, climbing, and swimming; esp., that part of the limb between the knee and foot. 2. That which resembles a leg in form or use; especially, any long and slender support on which any object rests; as, the leg of a table; the leg of pair of compasses or dividers. 3. The part of any article of clothing which covers the leg; as, the leg of a stocking or of a pair of trousers. 4. A bow, esp. in the phrase to make a leg; probably from drawing the leg backward in bowing. [Obs.] He that will give a cap and make a leg in thanks for a favor he never received. Fuller. 5. A disreputable sporting character; a blackleg. [Slang, Eng.] 6. (Naut.)  The course and distance made by a vessel on one tack or between tacks. 7. (Steam Boiler)  An extension of the boiler downward, in the form of a narrow space between vertical plates, sometimes nearly surrounding the furnace and ash pit, and serving to support the boiler; -- called also water leg. 8. (Grain Elevator)  The case containing the lower part of the belt which carries the buckets. 9. (Cricket)  A fielder whose position is on the outside, a little in rear of the batter. A good leg (Naut.), a course sailed on a tack which is near the desired course. -- Leg bail, escape from custody by flight. [Slang] -- Legs of an hyperbola (or other curve) (Geom.), the branches of the curve which extend outward indefinitely. -- Legs of a triangle, the sides of a triangle; -- a name seldom used unless one of the sides is first distinguished by some appropriate term; as, the hypothenuse and two legs of a right-angled triangle. On one's legs, standing to speak. -- One's last legs. See under Last. -- To have legs (Naut.), to have speed. -- To stand on one's own legs, to support one's self; to be independent.  To use as a leg, with it as object: (a) To bow. [Obs.] (b) To run [Low]
as: 1. Denoting equality or likeness in kind, degree, or manner; like; similar to; in the same manner with or in which; in accordance with; in proportion to; to the extent or degree in which or to which; equally; no less than; as, ye shall be as gods, knowing good and evil; you will reap as you sow; do as you are bidden. His spiritual attendants adjured him, as he loved his soul, to emancipate his brethren. Macaulay. Note: As is often preceded by one of the antecedent or correlative words such, same, so, or as, in expressing an equality or comparison; as, give us such things as you please, and so long as you please, or as long as you please; he is not so brave as Cato; she is as amiable as she is handsome; come as quickly as possible. "Bees appear fortunately to prefer the same colors as we do." Lubbock. As, in a preceding part of a sentence, has such or so to answer correlatively to it; as with the people, so with the priest. 2. In the idea, character, or condition of, -- limiting the view to certain attributes or relations; as, virtue considered as virtue; this actor will appear as Hamlet. The beggar is greater as a man, than is the man merely as a king. Dewey. 3. While; during or at the same time that; when; as, he trembled as he spoke. As I return I will fetch off these justices. Shak. 4. Because; since; it being the case that. As the population of Scotland had been generally trained to arms . . . they were not indifferently prepared. Sir W. Scott. [See Synonym under Because.] 5. Expressing concession. (Often approaching though in meaning). We wish, however, to avail ourselves of the interest, transient as it may be, which this work has excited. Macaulay. 6. That, introducing or expressing a result or consequence, after the correlatives so and such. [Obs.] I can place thee in such abject state, as help shall never find thee. Rowe. So as, so that. [Obs.] The relations are so uncertain as they require a great deal of examination. Bacon. 7. As if; as though. [Obs. or Poetic] He lies, as he his bliss did know. Waller. 8. For instance; by way of example; thus; -- used to introduce illustrative phrases, sentences, or citations. 9. Than. [Obs. & R.] The king was not more forward to bestow favors on them as they free to deal affronts to others their superiors. Fuller. 10. Expressing a wish. [Obs.] "As have," i. e., may he have. Chaucer. As . . . as. See So . . . as, under So. -- As far as, to the extent or degree. "As far as can be ascertained." Macaulay. -- As far forth as, as far as. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- As for, or As to, in regard to; with respect to. -- As good as, not less than; not falling short of. -- As good as one's word, faithful to a promise. -- As if, or As though, of the same kind, or in the same condition or manner, that it would be if. -- As it were (as if it were), a qualifying phrase used to apologize for or to relieve some expression which might be regarded as inappropriate or incongruous; in a manner. -- As now, just now. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- As swythe, as quickly as possible. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- As well, also; too; besides. Addison. -- As well as, equally with, no less than. "I have understanding as well as you." Job xii. 3. -- As yet, until now; up to or at the present time; still; now.  An ace. [Obs.] Chaucer. Ambes-as, double aces.  1. A Roman weight, answering to the libra or pound, equal to nearly eleven ounces Troy weight. It was divided into twelve ounces. 2. A Roman copper coin, originally of a pound weight (12 oz.); but reduced, after the first Punic war, to two ounces; in the second Punic war, to one ounce; and afterwards to half an ounce.
dark: 1. Destitute, or partially destitute, of light; not receiving, reflecting, or radiating light; wholly or partially black, or of some deep shade of color; not light-colored; as, a dark room; a dark day; dark cloth; dark paint; a dark complexion. O dark, dark, dark, amid the blaze of noon, Irrecoverable dark, total eclipse Without all hope of day! milton. In the dark and silent grave. Sir W. Raleigh. 2. Not clear to the understanding; not easily The dark problems of existence. Shairp. What may seem dark at the first, will afterward be found more plain. Hooker. What's your dark meaning, mouse, of this light word Shak. 3. Destitute of knowledge and culture; in moral or intellectual darkness; unrefined; ignorant. The age wherin he lived was dark, but he Cobld not want light who taught the world oto see. Denhan. The tenth century used to be reckoned by mediæval historians as the darkest part of this intellectual night. Hallam. 4. Evincing blaxk or foul traits of character; vile; wicked; atrocious; as, a dark villain; a dark deed. Left him at large to his own dark designs. Milton. 5. Foreboding evil; gloomy; jealous; suspicious. More dark and dark our woes. Shak. A deep melancholy took possesion of him, and gave a dark tinge to all his views of human nature. Macaulay. There is, in every true woman-s heart, a spark of heavenly fire, which beams and blazes in the dark hour of adversity. W. Irving. 6. Deprived of sight; blind. [Obs.] He was, I think, at this time quite dark, and so had been for some years. Evelyn. Note: Dark is sometimes used to qualify another adjective; as, dark blue, dark green, and sometimes it forms the first part of a compound; as, dark-haired, dark-eyed, dark-colored, dark-seated, dark-working. A dark horse, in racing or politics, a horse or a candidate whose chances of success are not known, and whose capabilities have not been made the subject of general comment or of wagers. [Colloq.] -- Dark house, Dark room, a house or room in which madmen were confined. [Obs.] Shak. -- Dark lantern. See Lantern. -- The Dark Ages, a period of stagnation and obscurity in literature and art, lasting, according to Hallam, nearly 1000 years, from about 500 to about 1500 A. D.. See Middle Ages, under Middle. -- The Dark and Bloody Ground, a phrase applied to the State of Kentucky, and said to be the significance of its name, in allusion to the frequent wars that were waged there between Indians. -- The dark day, a day (May 19, 1780) when a remarkable and unexplained darkness extended over all New England. -- To keep dark, to reveal nothing. [Low]  1. Absence of light; darkness; obscurity; a place where there is little or no light. Here stood he in the dark, his sharp sword out. Shak. 2. The condition of ignorance; gloom; secrecy. Look, what you do, you do it still i' th' dark. Shak. Till we perceive by our own understandings, we are as mucdark, and as void of knowledge, as before. Locke. 3. (Fine Arts)  A dark shade or dark passage in a painting, engraving, or the like; as, the light and darks are well contrasted. The lights may serve for a repose to the darks, and the darks to the lights. Dryden.  To darken to obscure. [Obs.] Milton.
paragraph: 1. Originally, a marginal mark or note, set in the margin to call attention to something in the text, e. g., a change of subject; now, the character Note: This character is merely a modification of a capital P (the initial of the word paragraph), the letter being reversed, and the black part made white and the white part black for the sake of distinctiveness. 2. A distinct part of a discourse or writing; any section or subdivision of a writing or chapter which relates to a particular point, whether consisting of one or many sentences. The division is sometimes noted by the mark 3. A brief composition complete in one typographical section or paragraph; an item, remark, or quotation comprised in a few lines forming one paragraph; as, a column of news paragraphs; an editorial paragraph.  1. To divide into paragraphs; to mark with the character . 2. To express in the compass of a paragraph; as, to paragraph an article. 3. To mention in a paragraph or paragraphs
play: 1. To engage in sport or lively recreation; to exercise for the sake of amusement; to frolic; to spot. As Cannace was playing in her walk. Chaucer. The lamb thy riot dooms to bleed to-day, Had he thy reason, would he skip and play! Pope. And some, the darlings of their Lord, Play smiling with the flame and sword. Keble. 2. To act with levity or thoughtlessness; to trifle; to be careless. "Nay," quod this monk, "I have no lust to pleye." Chaucer. Men are apt to play with their healths. Sir W. Temple. 3. To contend, or take part, in a game; as, to play ball; hence, to gamble; as, he played for heavy stakes. 4. To perform on an instrument of music; as, to play on a flute. One that . . . can play well on an instrument. Ezek. xxxiii. 32. Play, my friend, and charm the charmer. Granville. 5. To act; to behave; to practice deception. His mother played false with a smith. Shak. 6. To move in any manner; especially, to move regularly with alternate or reciprocating motion; to operate; to act; as, the fountain plays. The heart beats, the blood circulates, the lungs play. Cheyne. 7. To move gayly; to wanton; to disport. Even as the waving sedges play with wind. Shak. The setting sun Plays on their shining arms and burnished helmets. Addison. All fame is foreign but of true desert, Plays round the head, but comes not to the heart. Pope. 8. To act on the stage; to personate a character. A lord will hear your play to-night. Shak. Courts are theaters where some men play. Donne. To play into a person's hands, to act, or to manage matters, to his advantage or benefit. -- To play off, to affect; to feign; to practice artifice. -- To play upon. (a) To make sport of; to deceive. Art thou alive Or is it fantasy that plays upon our eyesight. Shak. (b) To use in a droll manner; to give a droll expression or application to; as, to play upon words.  1. To put in action or motion; as, to play cannon upon a fortification; to play a trump. First Peace and Silence all disputes control, Then Order plays the soul. Herbert. 2. To perform music upon; as, to play the flute or the organ. 3. To perform, as a piece of music, on an instrument; as, to play a waltz on the violin. 4. To bring into sportive or wanton action; to exhibit in action; to execute; as, to play tricks. Nature here Wantoned as in her prime, and played at will Her virgin fancies. Milton. 5. To act or perform (a play); to represent in music action; as, to play a comedy; also, to act in the character of; to represent by acting; to simulate; to behave like; as, to play King Lear; to play the woman. Thou canst play the rational if thou wilt. Sir W. Scott. 6. To engage in, or go together with, as a contest for amusement or for a wager or prize; as, to play a game at baseball. 7. To keep in play, as a hooked fish, in order to land it. To play off, to display; to show; to put in exercise; as, to play off tricks. -- To play one's cards, to manage one's means or opportunities; to contrive. -- Played out, tired out; exhausted; at the end of one's resources. [Colloq.]  1. Amusement; sport; frolic; gambols. 2. Any exercise, or series of actions, intended for amusement or diversion; a game. John naturally loved rough play. Arbuthnot. 3. The act or practice of contending for victory, amusement, or a prize, as at dice, cards, or billiards; gaming; as, to lose a fortune in play. 4. Action; use; employment; exercise; practice; as, fair play; sword play; a play of wit. "The next who comes in play." Dryden. 5. A dramatic composition; a comedy or tragedy; a composition in which characters are represented by dialogue and action. A play ought to be a just image of human nature. Dryden. 6. The representation or exhibition of a comedy or tragedy; as, he attends ever play. 7. Performance on an instrument of music. 8. Motion; movement, regular or irregular; as, the play of a wheel or piston; hence, also, room for motion; free and easy action. "To give them play, front and rear." Milton. The joints are let exactly into one another, that they have no play between them. Moxon. 9. Hence, liberty of acting; room for enlargement or display; scope; as, to give full play to mirth. Play actor, an actor of dramas. Prynne. -- Play debt, a gambling debt. Arbuthnot. -- Play pleasure, idle amusement. [Obs.] Bacon. -- A play upon words, the use of a word in such a way as to be capable of double meaning; punning. -- Play of colors, prismatic variation of colors. -- To bring into play, To come into play, to bring or come into use or exercise. -- To hold in play, to keep occupied or employed. I, with two more to help me, Will hold the foe in play. Macaulay.
dance: 1. To move with measured steps, or to a musical accompaniment; to go through, either alone or in company with others, with a regulated succession of movements, (commonly) to the sound of music; to trip or leap rhytmically. Jack shall pipe and Gill shall dance. Wiher. Good shepherd, what fair swain is this Which dances with your dauther Shak. 2. To move nimbly or merrily; to express pleasure by motion; to caper; to frisk; to skip about. Then, 'tis time to dance off. Thackeray. More dances my rapt heart Than when I first my wedded mistress saw. Shak. Shadows in the glassy waters dance. Byron. Where rivulets dance their wayward round. Wordsworth. To dance on a rope, or To dance on nothing, to be hanged.  To cause to dance, or move nimbly or merrily about, or up and down; to dandle. To dance our ringlets to the whistling wind. Shak. Thy grandsire loved thee well; Many a time he danced thee on his knee. Shak. To dance attendance, to come and go obsequiously; to be or remain in waiting, at the beck and call of another, with a view to please or gain favor. A man of his place, and so near our favor, To dance attendance on their lordships' pleasure. Shak.  1. The leaping, tripping, or measured stepping of one who dances; an amusement, in which the movements of the persons are regulated by art, in figures and in accord with music. 2. (Mus.)  A tune by which dancing is regulated, as the minuet, the waltz, the cotillon, etc. Note: The word dance was used ironically, by the older writers, of many proceedings besides dancing. Of remedies of love she knew parchance For of that art she couth the olde dance. Chaucer. Dance of Death (Art), an allegorical representation of the power of death over all, -- the old, the young, the high, and the low, being led by a dancing skeleton. -- Morris dance. See Morris. -- To lead one a dance, to cause one to go through a series of movements or experiences as if guided by a partner in a dance not understood.
idea: 1. The transcript, image, or picture of a visible object, that is formed by the mind; also, a similar image of any object whatever, whether sensible or spiritual. Her sweet idea wandered through his thoughts. Fairfax. Being the right idea of your father Both in your form and nobleness of mind. Shak. This representation or likeness of the object being transmitted from thence [the senses] to the imagination, and lodged there for the view and observation of the pure intellect, is aptly and properly called its idea. P. Browne. 2. A general notion, or a conception formed by generalization. Alice had not the slightest idea what latitude was. L. Caroll. 3. Hence: Any object apprehended, conceived, or thought of, by the mind; a notion, conception, or thought; the real object that is conceived or thought of. Whatsoever the mind perceives in itself, or as the immediate object of perception, thought, or undersanding, that I call idea. Locke. 4. A belief, option, or doctrine; a characteristic or controlling principle; as, an essential idea; the idea of development. That fellow seems to me to possess but one idea, and that is a wrong one. Johnson. What is now "idea" for us How infinite the fall of this word, since the time where Milton sang of the Creator contemplating his newly- created world, -"how it showed . . . Answering his great idea," -to its present use, when this person "has an idea that the train has started," and the other "had no idea that the dinner would be so bad!" Trench. 5. A plan or purpose of action; intention; design. I shortly afterwards set off for that capital, with an idea of undertaking while there the translation of the work. W. Irving. 6. A rational conception; the complete conception of an object when thought of in all its essential elements or constituents; the necessary metaphysical or constituent attributes and relations, when conceived in the abstract. 7. A fiction object or picture created by the imagination; the same when proposed as a pattern to be copied, or a standard to be reached; one of the archetypes or patterns of created things, conceived by the Platonists to have excited objectively from eternity in the mind of the Deity. Thence to behold this new-created world, The addition of his empire, how it showed In prospect from his throne, how good, how fair, Answering his great idea. Milton. Note: "In England, Locke may be said to have been the first who naturalized the term in its Cartesian universality. When, in common language, employed by Milton and Dryden, after Descartes, as before him by Sidney, Spenser, Shakespeare, Hooker, etc., the meaning is Platonic." Sir W. Hamilton. Abstract idea, Association of ideas, etc. See under Abstract, Association, etc. Syn. -- Notion; conception; thought; sentiment; fancy; image; perception; impression; opinion; belief; observation; judgment; consideration; view; design; intention; purpose; plan; model; pattern. There is scarcely any other word which is subjected to such abusive treatment as is the word idea, in the very general and indiscriminative way in which it is employed, as it is used variously to signify almost any act, state, or content of thought.
late: 1. Coming after the time when due, or after the usual or proper time; not early; slow; tardy; long delayed; as, a late spring. 2. Far advanced toward the end or close; as, a late hour of the day; a late period of life. 3. Existing or holding some position not long ago, but not now; lately deceased, departed, or gone out of office; as, the late bishop of London; the late administration. 4. Not long past; happening not long ago; recent; as, the late rains; we have received late intelligence. 5. Continuing or doing until an advanced hour of the night; as, late revels; a late watcher.  1. After the usual or proper time, or the time appointed; after delay; as, he arrived late; -- opposed to early. 2. Not long ago; lately. 3. Far in the night, day, week, or other particular period; as, to lie abed late; to sit up late at night. Of late, in time not long past, or near the present; lately; as, the practice is of late uncommon. -- Too late, after the proper or available time; when the time or opportunity is past.
similar: 1. Exactly corresponding; resembling in all respects; precisely like. 2. Nearly corresponding; resembling in many respects; somewhat like; having a general likeness. 3. Homogenous; uniform. [R.] Boyle. Similar figures (Geom.), figures which differ from each other only in magnitude, being made up of the same number of like parts similarly situated. -- Similar rectilineal figures, such as have their several angles respectively equal, each to each, and their sides about the equal angles proportional. -- Similar solids, such as are contained by the same number of similar planes, similarly situated, and having like inclination to one another.  That which is similar to, or resembles, something else, as in quality, form, etc.
stood: imp. & p. p. of Stand.
sense: 1. (Physiol.)  A faculty, possessed by animals, of perceiving external objects by means of impressions made upon certain organs (sensory or sense organs) of the body, or of perceiving changes in the condition of the body; as, the senses of sight, smell, hearing, taste, and touch. See Muscular sense, under Muscular, and Temperature sense, under Temperature. Let fancy still my sense in Lethe steep. Shak. What surmounts the reach Of human sense I shall delineate. Milton. The traitor Sense recalls The soaring soul from rest. Keble. 2. Perception by the sensory organs of the body; sensation; sensibility; feeling. In a living creature, though never so great, the sense and the affects of any one part of the body instantly make a transcursion through the whole. Bacon. 3. Perception through the intellect; apprehension; recognition; understanding; discernment; appreciation. This Basilius, having the quick sense of a lover. Sir P. Sidney. High disdain from sense of injured merit. Milton. 4. Sound perception and reasoning; correct judgment; good mental capacity; understanding; also, that which is sound, true, or reasonable; rational meaning. "He speaks sense." Shak. He raves; his words are loose As heaps of sand, and scattering wide from sense. Dryden. 5. That which is felt or is held as a sentiment, view, or opinion; judgment; notion; opinion. I speak my private but impartial sense With freedom. Roscommon. The municipal council of the city had ceased to speak the sense of the citizens. Macaulay. 6. Meaning; import; signification; as, the true sense of words or phrases; the sense of a remark. So they read in the book in the law of God distinctly, and gave the sense. Neh. viii. 8. I think 't was in another sense. Shak. 7. Moral perception or appreciation. Some are so hardened in wickedness as to have no sense of the most friendly offices. L' Estrange. 8. (Geom.)  One of two opposite directions in which a line, surface, or volume, may be supposed to be described by the motion of a point, line, or surface. Common sense, according to Sir W. Hamilton: (a) "The complement of those cognitions or convictions which we receive from nature, which all men possess in common, and by which they test the truth of knowledge and the morality of actions." (b) "The faculty of first principles." These two are the philosophical significations. (c) "Such ordinary complement of intelligence, that,if a person be deficient therein, he is accounted mad or foolish." (d) When the substantive is emphasized: "Native practical intelligence, natural prudence, mother wit, tact in behavior, acuteness in the observation of character, in contrast to habits of acquired learning or of speculation." -- Moral sense. See under Moral, (a). -- The inner, or internal, sense, capacity of the mind to be aware of its own states; consciousness; reflection. "This source of ideas every man has wholly in himself, and though it be not sense, as having nothing to do with external objects, yet it is very like it, and might properly enough be called internal sense." Locke. -- Sense capsule (Anat.), one of the cartilaginous or bony cavities which inclose, more or less completely, the organs of smell, sight, and hearing. -- Sense organ (Physiol.), a specially irritable mechanism by which some one natural force or form of energy is enabled to excite sensory nerves; as the eye, ear, an end bulb or tactile corpuscle, etc. -- Sense organule (Anat.), one of the modified epithelial cells in or near which the fibers of the sensory nerves terminate. Syn. -- Understanding; reason. -- Sense, Understanding, Reason. Some philosophers have given a technical signification to these terms, which may here be stated. Sense is the mind's acting in the direct cognition either of material objects or of its own mental states. In the first case it is called the outer, in the second the inner, sense. Understanding is the logical faculty, i. e., the power of apprehending under general conceptions, or the power of classifying, arranging, and making deductions. Reason is the power of apprehending those first or fundamental truths or principles which are the conditions of all real and scientific knowledge, and which control the mind in all its processes of investigation and deduction. These distinctions are given, not as established, but simply because they often occur in writers of the present day.  To perceive by the senses; to recognize. [Obs. or Colloq.] Is he sure that objects are not otherwise sensed by others than they are by him Glanvill.
hit: It. [Obs.] Chaucer.  3d pers. sing. pres. of Hide, contracted from hideth. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. To reach with a stroke or blow; to strike or touch, usually with force; especially, to reach or touch (an object aimed at). I think you have hit the mark. Shak. 2. To reach or attain exactly; to meet according to the occasion; to perform successfully; to attain to; to accord with; to be conformable to; to suit. Birds learning tunes, and their endeavors to hit the notes right. Locke. There you hit him; . . . that argument never fails with him. Dryden. Whose saintly visage is too bright To hit the sense of human sight. Milton. He scarcely hit my humor. Tennyson. 3. To guess; to light upon or discover. "Thou hast hit it." Shak. 4. (Backgammon)  To take up, or replace by a piece belonging to the opposing player; -- said of a single unprotected piece on a point. To hit off, to describe with quick characteristic strokes; as, to hit off a speaker. Sir W. Temple. -- To hit out, to perform by good luck. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. To meet or come in contact; to strike; to clash; -- followed by against or on. If bodies be extension alone, how can they move and hit one against another Locke. Corpuscles, meeting with or hitting on those bodies, become conjoined with them. Woodward. 2. To meet or reach what was aimed at or desired; to succeed, -- often with implied chance, or luck. And oft it hits Where hope is coldest and despair most fits. Shak. And millions miss for one that hits. Swift. To hit on or upon, to light upon; to come to by chance. "None of them hit upon the art." Addison.  1. A striking against; the collision of one body against another; the stroke that touches anything. So he the famed Cilician fencer praised, And, at each hit, with wonder seems amazed. Dryden. 2. A stroke of success in an enterprise, as by a fortunate chance; as, he made a hit. What late he called a blessing, now was wit, And God's good providence, a lucky hit. Pope. 3. A peculiarly apt expression or turn of thought; a phrase which hits the mark; as, a happy hit. 4. A game won at backgammon after the adversary has removed some of his men. It counts less than a gammon. 5. (Baseball)  A striking of the ball; as, a safe hit; a foul hit; -- sometimes used specifically for a base hit. Base hit, Safe hit, Sacrifice hit. (Baseball) See under Base, Safe, etc.  having become very popular or acclaimed; -- said of entertainment performances; as, a hit record, a hit movie.
huge: Very large; enormous; immense; excessive; -- used esp. of material bulk, but often of qualities, extent, etc.; as, a huge ox; a huge space; a huge difference. "The huge confusion." Chapman. "A huge filly." Jer. Taylor. -- Huge"ly, adv. -- Huge"ness, n. Doth it not flow as hugely as the sea. Shak. Syn. -- Enormous; gigantic; colossal; immense; prodigious; vast.
stay: A large, strong rope, employed to support a mast, by being extended from the head of one mast down to some other, or to some part of the vessel. Those which lead forward are called fore-and-aft stays; those which lead to the vessel's side are called backstays. See Illust. of Ship. In stays, or Hove in stays (Naut.), in the act or situation of staying, or going about from one tack to another. R. H. Dana, Jr. -- Stay holes (Naut.), openings in the edge of a staysail through which the hanks pass which join it to the stay. -- Stay tackle (Naut.), a tackle attached to a stay and used for hoisting or lowering heavy articles over the side. -- To miss stays (Naut.), to fail in the attempt to go about. Totten. -- Triatic stay (Naut.), a rope secured at the ends to the heads of the foremast and mainmast with thimbles spliced to its bight into which the stay tackles hook.  1. To stop from motion or falling; to prop; to fix firmly; to hold up; to support. Aaron and Hur stayed up his hands, the one on the one side, and the other on the other side. Ex. xvii. 12. Sallows and reeds . . . for vineyards useful found To stay thy vines. Dryden. 2. To support from sinking; to sustain with strength; to satisfy in part or for the time. He has devoured a whole loaf of bread and butter, and it has not staid his stomach for a minute. Sir W. Scott. 3. To bear up under; to endure; to support; to resist successfully. She will not stay the siege of loving terms, Nor bide the encounter of assailing eyes. Shak. 4. To hold from proceeding; to withhold; to restrain; to stop; to hold. Him backward overthrew and down him stayed With their rude hands grisly grapplement. Spenser. All that may stay their minds from thinking that true which they heartly wish were false. Hooker. 5. To hinde Your ships are stayed at Venice. Shak. This business staid me in London almost a week. Evelyn. I was willing to stay my reader on an argument that appeared to me new. Locke. 6. To remain for the purpose of; to wait for. "I stay dinner there." Shak. 7. To cause to cease; to put an end to. Stay your strife. Shak. For flattering planets seemed to say This child should ills of ages stay. Emerson. 8. (Engin.)  To fasten or secure with stays; as, to stay a flat sheet in a steam boiler. 9. (Naut.)  To tack, as a vessel, so that the other side of the vessel shall be presented to the wind. To stay a mast (Naut.), to incline it forward or aft, or to one side, by the stays and backstays.  1. To remain; to continue in a place; to abide fixed for a space of time; to stop; to stand still. She would command the hasty sun to stay. Spenser. Stay, I command you; stay and hear me first. Dryden. I stay a little longer, as one stays To cover up the embers that still burn. Longfellow. 2. To continue in a state. The flames augment, and stay At their full height, then languish to decay. Dryden. 3. To wait; to attend; to forbear to act. I'll tell thee all my whole device When I am in my coach, which stays for us. Shak. The father can not stay any longer for the fortune. Locke. 4. To dwell; to tarry; to linger. I must stay a little on one action. Dryden. 5. To rest; to depend; to rely; to stand; to insist. I stay here on my bond. Shak. Ye despise this word, and trust in oppression and perverseness, and stay thereon. Isa. xxx. 12. 6. To come to an end; to cease; as, that day the storm stayed. [Archaic] Here my commission stays. Shak. 7. To hold out in a race or other contest; as, a horse stays well. [Colloq.] 8. (Naut.)  To change tack; as a ship.  1. That which serves as a prop; a support. "My only strength and stay." Milton. Trees serve as so many stays for their vines. Addison. Lord Liverpool is the single stay of this ministry. Coleridge. 2. pl.  A corset stiffened with whalebone or other material, worn by women, and rarely by men. How the strait stays the slender waist constrain. Gay. 3. Continuance in a place; abode for a space of time; sojourn; as, you make a short stay in this city. Make haste, and leave thy business and thy care; No mortal interest can be worth thy stay. Dryden. Embrace the hero and his stay implore. Waller. 4. Cessation of motion or progression; stand; stop. Made of sphere metal, never to decay Until his revolution was at stay. Milton. Affairs of state seemed rather to stand at a stay. Hayward. 5. Hindrance; let; check. [Obs.] They were able to read good authors without any stay, if the book were not false. Robynson (more's Utopia). 6. Restraint of passion; moderation; caution; steadiness; sobriety. [Obs.] "Not grudging that thy lust hath bounds and stays." Herbert. The wisdom, stay, and moderation of the king. Bacon. With prudent stay he long deferred The rough contention. Philips. 7. (Engin.)  Strictly, a part in tension to hold the parts together, or stiffen them. Stay bolt (Mech.), a bolt or short rod, connecting opposite plates, so as to prevent them from being bulged out when acted upon by a pressure which tends to force them apart, as in the leg of a steam boiler. -- Stay busk, a stiff piece of wood, steel, or whalebone, for the front support of a woman's stays. Cf. Busk. -- Stay rod, a rod which acts as a stay, particularly in a steam boiler.
dictionary: 1. A book containing the words of a language, arranged alphabetically, with explanations of their meanings; a lexicon; a vocabulary; a wordbook. I applied myself to the perusal of our writers; and noting whatever might be of use to ascertain or illustrate any word or phrase, accumulated in time the materials of a dictionary. Johnson. 2. Hence, a book containing the words belonging to any system or province of knowledge, arranged alphabetically; as, a dictionary of medicine or of botany; a biographical dictionary.
face: 1. The exterior form or appearance of anything; that part which presents itself to the view; especially, the front or upper part or surface; that which particularly offers itself to the view of a spectator. A mist . . . watered the whole face of the ground. Gen. ii. 6. Lake Leman wooes me with its crystal face. Byron. 2. That part of a body, having several sides, which may be seen from one point, or which is presented toward a certain direction; one of the bounding planes of a solid; as, a cube has six faces. 3. (Mach.) (a) The principal dressed surface of a plate, disk, or pulley; the principal flat surface of a part or object. (b) That part of the acting surface of a cog in a cog wheel, which projects beyond the pitch line. (c) The width of a pulley, or the length of a cog from end to end; as, a pulley or cog wheel of ten inches face. 4. (Print.) (a) The upper surface, or the character upon the surface, of a type, plate, etc. (b) The style or cut of a type or font of type. 5. Outside appearance; surface show; look; external aspect, whether natural, assumed, or acquired. To set a face upon their own malignant design. Milton. This would produce a new face of things in Europe. Addison. We wear a face of joy, because We have been glad of yore. Wordsworth. 6. That part of the head, esp. of man, in which the eyes, cheeks, nose, and mouth are situated; visage; countenance. In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread. Gen. iii. 19. 7. Cast of features; expression of countenance; look; air; appearance. We set the best faceon it we could. Dryden. 8. (Astrol.)  Ten degrees in extent of a sign of the zodiac. Chaucer. 9. Maintenance of the countenance free from abashment or confusion; confidence; boldness; shamelessness; effrontery. This is the man that has the face to charge others with false citations. Tillotson. 10. Presence; sight; front; as in the phrases, before the face of, in the immediate presence of; in the face of, before, in, or against the front of; as, to fly in the face of danger; to the face of, directly to; from the face of, from the presenceof. 11. Mode of regard, whether favorable or unfavorable; favor or anger; mostly in Scriptural phrases. The Lord make his face to shine upon thee. Num. vi. 25. My face [favor] will I turn also from them. Ezek. vii. 22. 12. (Mining)  The end or wall of the tunnel, drift, or excavation, at which work is progressing or was last done. 13. (Com.)  The exact amount expressed on a bill, note, bond, or other mercantile paper, without any addition for interest or reduction for discount. McElrath. Note: Face is used either adjectively or as part of a compound; as, face guard or face-guard; face cloth; face plan or face-plan; face hammer. Face ague (Med.), a form of neuralgia, characterized by acute lancinating pains returning at intervals, and by twinges in certain parts of the face, producing convulsive twitches in the corresponding muscles; -- called also tic douloureux. -- Face card, one of a pack of playing cards on which a human face is represented; the king, queen, or jack. -- Face cloth, a cloth laid over the face of a corpse. -- Face guard, a mask with windows for the eyes, worn by workman exposed to great heat, or to flying particles of metal, stone, etc., as in glass works, foundries, etc. -- Face hammer, a hammer having a flat face. -- Face joint (Arch.), a joint in the face of a wall or other structure. -- Face mite (Zoöll.), a small, elongated mite (Demdex folliculorum), parasitic in the hair follicles of the face. -- Face mold, the templet or pattern by which carpenters, ect., outline the forms which are to be cut out from boards, sheet metal, ect. -- Face plate. (a) (Turning) A plate attached to the spindle of a lathe, to which the work to be turned may be attached. (b) A covering plate for an object, to receive wear or shock. (c) A true plane for testing a dressed surface. Knight. -- Face wheel. (Mach.) (a) A crown wheel. (b) A Wheel whose disk face is adapted for grinding and polishing; a lap. Cylinder face (Steam Engine), the flat part of a steam cylinder on which a slide valve moves. -- Face of an anvil, its flat upper surface. -- Face of a bastion (Fort.), the part between the salient and the shoulder angle. -- Face of coal (Mining), the principal cleavage plane, at right angles to the stratification. -- Face of a gun, the surface of metal at the muzzle. -- Face of a place (Fort.), the front comprehended between the flanked angles of two neighboring bastions. Wilhelm. -- Face of a square (Mil.), one of the sides of a battalion when formed in a square. -- Face of a watch, clock, compass, card etc., the dial or graduated surface on which a pointer indicates the time of day, point of the compass, etc. -- Face to face. (a) In the presence of each other; as, to bring the accuser and the accused face to face. (b) Without the interposition of any body or substance. "Now we see through a glass darkly; but then face to face." 1 Cor. xiii. 12. (c) With the faces or finished surfaces turned inward or toward one another; vis à vis; -- opposed to back to back. -- To fly in the face of, to defy; to brave; to withstand. -- To make a face, to distort the countenance; to make a grimace. Shak.  1. To meet in front; to oppose with firmness; to resist, or to meet for the purpose of stopping or opposing; to confront; to encounter; as, to face an enemy in the field of battale. I'll face This tempest, and deserve the name of king. Dryden. 2. To Confront impudently; to bully. I will neither be facednor braved. Shak. 3. To stand opposite to; to stand with the face or front toward; to front upon; as, the apartments of the general faced the park. He gained also with his forces that part of Britain which faces Ireland. Milton. 4. To cover in front, for ornament, protection, etc.; to put a facing upon; as, a building faced with marble. 5. To line near the edge, esp. with a different material; as, to face the front of a coat, or the bottom of a dress. 6. To cover with better, or better appearing, material than the mass consists of, for purpose of deception, as the surface of a box of tea, a barrel of sugar, etc. 7. (Mach.)  To make the surface of (anything) flat or smooth; to dress the face of (a stone, a casting, etc.); esp., in turning, to shape or smooth the flat surface of, as distinguished from the cylindrical surface. 8. To cause to turn or present a face or front, as in a particular direction. To face down, to put down by bold or impudent opposition. "He faced men down." Prior. -- To face (a thing) out, to persist boldly or impudently in an assertion or in a line of conduct. "That thinks with oaths to face the matter out." Shak  1. To carry a false appearance; to play the hypocrite. "To lie, to face, to forge." Spenser. 2. To turn the face; as, to face to the right or left. Face about, man; a soldier, and afraid! Dryden. 3. To present a face or front.
rub: 1. To subject (a body) to the action of something moving over its surface with pressure and friction, especially to the action of something moving back and forth; as, to rub the flesh with the hand; to rub wood with sandpaper. It shall be expedient, after that body is cleaned, to rub the body with a coarse linen cloth. Sir T. Elyot. 2. To move over the surface of (a body) with pressure and friction; to graze; to chafe; as, the boat rubs the ground. 3. To cause (a body) to move with pressure and friction along a surface; as, to rub the hand over the body. Two bones rubbed hard against one another. Arbuthnot. 4. To spread a substance thinly over; to smear. The smoothed plank, . . . New rubbed with balm. Milton. 5. To scour; to burnish; to polish; to brighten; to cleanse; -- often with up or over; as, to rub up silver. The whole business of our redemption is to rub over the defaced copy of the creation. South. 6. To hinder; to cross; to thwart. [R.] 'T is the duke's pleasure, Whose disposition, all the world well knows, Will not be rubbed nor stopped. Shak. To rub down. (a) To clean by rubbing; to comb or curry; as, to down a horse. (b) To reduce or remove by rubbing; as, to rub down the rough points. -- To rub off, to clean anything by rubbing; to separate by friction; as, to rub off rust. -- To rub out, to remove or separate by friction; to erase; to obliterate; as, to rub out a mark or letter; to rub out a stain. -- To rub up. (a) To burnish; to polish; to clean. (b) To excite; to awaken; to rouse to action; as, to rub up the memory.  1. To move along the surface of a body with pressure; to grate; as, a wheel rubs against the gatepost. 2. To fret; to chafe; as, to rub upon a sore. 3. To move or pass with difficulty; as, to rub through woods, as huntsmen; to rub through the world. To rub along or on, to go on with difficulty; as, they manage, with strict economy, to rub along. [Colloq.]  1. The act of rubbing; friction. 2. That which rubs; that which tends to hinder or obstruct motion or progress; hindrance; obstruction, an impediment; especially, a difficulty or obstruction hard to overcome; a pinch. Every rub is smoothed on our way. Shak. To sleep, perchance to dream; ay, there's the rub. Shak. Upon this rub, the English ambassadors thought fit to demur. Hayward. One knows not, certainly, what other rubs might have been ordained for us by a wise Providence. W. Besant. 3. Inequality of surface, as of the ground in the game of bowls; unevenness. Shak. 4. Something grating to the feelings; sarcasm; joke; as, a hard rub. 5. Imperfection; failing; fault. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl. 6. A chance. [Obs.] Flight shall leave no Greek a rub. Chapman. 7. A stone, commonly flat, used to sharpen cutting tools; a whetstone; -- called also rubstone. Rub iron, an iron guard on a wagon body, against which a wheel rubs when cramped too much.
heat: 1. A force in nature which is recognized in various effects, but especially in the phenomena of fusion and evaporation, and which, as manifested in fire, the sun's rays, mechanical action, chemical combination, etc., becomes directly known to us through the sense of feeling. In its nature heat is a mode if motion, being in general a form of molecular disturbance or vibration. It was formerly supposed to be a subtile, imponderable fluid, to which was given the name caloric. Note: As affecting the human body, heat produces different sensations, which are called by different names, as heat or sensible heat, warmth, cold, etc., according to its degree or amount relatively to the normal temperature of the body. 2. The sensation caused by the force or influence of heat when excessive, or above that which is normal to the human body; the bodily feeling experienced on exposure to fire, the sun's rays, etc.; the reverse of cold. 3. High temperature, as distinguished from low temperature, or cold; as, the heat of summer and the cold of winter; heat of the skin or body in fever, etc. Else how had the world . . . Avoided pinching cold and scorching heat! Milton. 4. Indication of high temperature; appearance, condition, or color of a body, as indicating its temperature; redness; high color; flush; degree of temperature to which something is heated, as indicated by appearance, condition, or otherwise. It has raised . . . heats in their faces. Addison. The heats smiths take of their iron are a blood-red heat, a white- flame heat, and a sparking or welding heat. Moxon. 5. A single complete operation of heating, as at a forge or in a furnace; as, to make a horseshoe in a certain number of heats. 6. A violent action unintermitted; a single effort; a single course in a race that consists of two or more courses; as, he won two heats out of three. Many causes . . . for refreshment betwixt the heats. Dryden. [He] struck off at one heat the matchless tale of "Tam o'Shanter." J. C. Shairp. 7. Utmost violence; rage; vehemence; as, the heat of battle or party. "The heat of their division." Shak. 8. Agitation of mind; inflammation or excitement; exasperation. "The head and hurry of his rage." South. 9. Animation, as in discourse; ardor; fervency. With all the strength and heat of eloquence. Addison. 10. Sexual excitement in animals. 11. Fermentation. Animal heat, Blood heat, Capacity for heat, etc. See under Animal, Blood, etc. -- Atomic heat (Chem.), the product obtained by multiplying the atomic weight of any element by its specific heat. The atomic heat of all solid elements is nearly a constant, the mean value being 6.4. -- Dynamical theory of heat, that theory of heat which assumes it to be, not a peculiar kind of matter, but a peculiar motion of the ultimate particles of matter. Heat engine, any apparatus by which a heated substance, as a heated fluid, is made to perform work by giving motion to mechanism, as a hot-air engine, or a steam engine. -- Heat producers. (Physiol.) See under Food. -- Heat rays, a term formerly applied to the rays near the red end of the spectrum, whether within or beyond the visible spectrum. -- Heat weight (Mech.), the product of any quantity of heat by the mechanical equivalent of heat divided by the absolute temperature; -- called also thermodynamic function, and entropy. -- Mechanical equivalent of heat. See under Equivalent. -- Specific heat of a substance (at any temperature), the number of units of heat required to raise the temperature of a unit mass of the substance at that temperature one degree. -- Unit of heat, the quantity of heat required to raise, by one degree, the temperature of a unit mass of water, initially at a certain standard temperature. The temperature usually employed is that of 0º Centigrade, or 32º Fahrenheit.  1. To make hot; to communicate heat to, or cause to grow warm; as, to heat an oven or furnace, an iron, or the like. Heat me these irons hot. Shak. 2. To excite or make hot by action or emotion; to make feverish. Pray, walk softly; do not heat your blood. Shak. 3. To excite ardor in; to rouse to action; to excite to excess; to inflame, as the passions. A noble emulation heats your breast. Dryden.  1. To grow warm or not by the action of fire or friction, etc., or the communication of heat; as, the iron or the water heats slow. 2. To grow warm or hot by fermentation, or the development of heat by chemical action; as, green hay heats in a mow, and manure in the dunghill.  Heated; as, the iron though heat red-hot. [Obs. or Archaic.] Shak.
cut: 1. To sparate the parts of with, or as with, a sharp instrument; to make an incision in; to gash; to sever; to divide. You must cut this flesh from off his breast. Shak. Before the whistling winds the vessels fly, With rapid swiftness cut the liquid way. Pope. 2. To sever and cause to fall for the purpose of gathering; to hew; to mow or reap. Thy servants can skill to cut timer. 2. Chron. ii. 8 3. To sever and remove by cutting; to cut off; to dock; as, to cut the hair; to cut the nails. 4. To castrate or geld; as, to cut a horse. 5. To form or shape by cutting; to make by incision, hewing, etc.; to carve; to hew out. Why should a man. whose blood is warm within, Sit like his grandsire cut in alabaster Shak. Loopholes cut through thickest shade. Milton. 6. To wound or hurt deeply the snsibilities of; to pierce; to lacerate; as, sarcasm cuts to the quick. The man was cut to the heart. Addison. 7. To intersect; to cross; as, one line cuts another at right angles. 8. To refuse to recognize; to ignorre; as, to cut a person in the street; to cut one's acquaintance. [Colloq.] 9. To absent one's self from; as, to cut an appointment, a recitation. etc. [Colloq.] An English tradesman is always solicitous to cut the shop whenever he can do so with impunity. Thomas Hamilton. To cut a caper. See under Caper. -- To cut the cards, to divide a pack of cards into portions, in order to determine the deal or the trump, or to change the cards to be dealt. -- To cut a dash or a figure, to make a display. [Colloq.] -- To cut down. (a) To sever and cause to fall; to fell; to prostrate. "Timber . . . cut down in the mountains of Cilicia." Knolles. (b) To put down; to abash; to humble, [Obs] "So great is his natural eloquence, that he cuts doun the finest orator." Addison (c) To lessen; to retrench; to curtail; as, to cut down expenses. (d) (Naut.) To raze; as, to cut down a frigate into a sloop. -- To cut the knot or the Gordian knot, to dispose of a difficulty summarily; to solve it by prompt, arbitrary action, rather than by skill or patience. -- To cut lots, to determine lots by cuttings cards; to draw lots. -- To cut off. (a) To sever; to separate. I would to God, . . . The king had cut off my brother's. Shak. (b) To put an untimely death; to put an end to; to destroy. "Irencut off by martyrdom." Addison. (c) To interrupt; as, to cut off communication; to cut off (the flow of) steam from (the boiler to) a steam engine. (d) To intercept; as,, to cut off an enemy's retreat. (e) To end; to finish; as, to cut off further debate. -- To cut out. (a) To remove by cutting or carving; as, to cut out a piece from a board. (b) To shape or form by cutting; as, to cut out a garment. " A large forest cut out into walks." Addison. (c) To scheme; to contrive; to prepare; as, to cut out work for another day. "Every man had cut out a place for himself." Addison. (d) To step in and take the place of; to supplant; as, to cut out a rival. [Colloq.] (e) To debar. "I am cut out from anything but common acknowledgments." Pope. (f) To seize and carry off (a vessel) from a harbor, or from under the guns of an enemy. -- To cut to pieces. (a) To cut into pieces; as, to cut cloth to pieces. (b) To slaughter; as, to cut an army to pieces. -- To cut a play (Drama), to shorten it by leaving out passages, to adapt it for the stage. -- To cut rates (Railroads, etc.), to reduce the charges for transportation below the rates established between competing lines. -- To cut short, to arrest or check abruptly; to bring to a sudden termination. "Achilles cut him short, and thus replied." Dryden. -- To cut stick, to make off clandestinely or precipitately. [Slang] -- To cut teeth, to put forth teeth; to have the teeth pierce through the gum and appear. -- To have cut one's eyeteeth, to be sharp and knowing. [Colloq.] -- To cut one's wisdom teeth, to come to years of discretion. -- To cut under, to undersell; as, to cut under a competitor in trade. -- To cut up. (a) To cut to pieces; as, to cut up an animal, or bushes. (b) To damage or destroy; to injure; to wound; as, to cut up a book or its author by severe criticism. "This doctrine cuts up all government by the roots." Locke. (c) To afflict; to discourage; to demoralize; as, the death of his friend cut him up terribly. [Colloq.] Thackeray.  1. To do the work of an edged tool; to serve in dividing or gashing; as, a knife cuts well. 2. To admit of incision or severance; to yield to a cutting instrument. Panels of white wood that cuts like cheese. Holmes. 3. To perform the operation of dividing, severing, incising, intersecting, etc.; to use a cutting instrument. He saved the lives of thousands by manner of cutting for the stone. Pope. 4. To make a stroke with a whip. 5. To interfere, as a horse. 6. To move or make off quickly. [Colloq.] 7. To divide a pack of cards into two portion to decide the deal or trump, or to schange the order of the cards to be dealt. To cut across, to pass over or through in the most direct way; as, to cut across a field. -- To cut and run, to make off suddenly and quickly; -- from the cutting of a ship's cable, when there is not time to raise the anchor. [Colloq.] -- To cut in or into, to interrupt; to jont an anything suddenly. -- To cut up. (a) To play pranks. [Colloq.] (b) To divide into portions well or ill; to have the property left at one's death turn out well or poorly when divided among heirs, legatees, etc. [Slang.] "When I die, may I cut up as well as Morgan Pendennis." Thackeray.  1. An opening made with an edged instrument; a cleft; a gash; a slash; a wound made by cutting; as, a sword cut. 2. A stroke or blow or cutting motion with an edged instrument; a stroke or blow with a whip. 3. That which wounds the feelings, as a harsh remark or criticism, or a sarcasm; personal discourtesy, as neglecting to recognize an acquaintance when meeting him; a slight. Rip called him by name, but the cur snarled, snapped his teeth, and passed on. This was an unkind cut indeed. W. Irving. 4. A notch, passage, or channel made by cutting or digging; a furrow; a groove; as, a cut for a railroad. This great cut or ditch Secostris . . . purposed to have made a great deal wider and deeper. Knolles. 5. The surface left by a cut; as, a smooth or clear cut. 6. A portion severed or cut off; a division; as, a cut of beef; a cut of timber. It should be understood, moreover, . . . that the group are not arbitrary cuts, but natural groups or types. Dana. 7. An engraved block or plate; the impression from such an engraving; as, a book illustrated with fine cuts. 8. (a) The act of dividing a pack cards. (b) The right to divide; as, whose cut is it 9. Manner in which a thing is cut or formed; shape; style; fashion; as, the cut of a garment. With eyes severe and beard of formal cut. Shak. 10. A common work horse; a gelding. [Obs.] He'll buy me a cut, forth for to ride. Beau. & Fl. 11. The failure of a college officer or student to be present at any appointed exercise. [College Cant] 12. A skein of yarn. Wright. A cut in rates (Railroad), a reduction in fare, freight charges, etc., below the established rates. -- A short cut, a cross route which shortens the way and cuts off a circuitous passage. -- The cut of one's jib, the general appearance of a person. [Colloq.] -- To draw cuts, to draw lots, as of paper, etc., cut unequal lengths. Now draweth cut . . . The which that hath the shortest shall begin. Chaucer.  1. Gashed or divided, as by a cutting instrument. 2. Formed or shaped as by cuttting; carved. 3. Overcome by liquor; tipsy. [Slang] Cut and dried, prepered beforehand; not spontaneous. -- Cut glass, glass having a surface ground and polished in facets or figures. -- Cut nail, a nail cut by machinery from a rolled plate of iron, in distinction from a wrought nail. -- Cut stone, stone hewn or chiseled to shape after having been split from the quarry.
fit: imp. & p. p. of Fight. [Obs. or Colloq.]  In Old English, a song; a strain; a canto or portion of a ballad; a passus. [Written also fitte, fytte, etc.] To play some pleasant fit. Spenser.  1. Adapted to an end, object, or design; suitable by nature or by art; suited by character, qualitties, circumstances, education, etc.; qualified; competent; worthy. That which ordinary men are fit for, I am qualified in. Shak. Fit audience find, though few. Milton. 2. Prepared; ready. [Obs.] So fit to shoot, she singled forth among her foes who first her quarry's strength should feel. Fairfax. 3. Conformed to a standart of duty, properiety, or taste; convenient; meet; becoming; proper. Is it fit to say a king, Thou art wicked Job xxxiv. 18. Syn. -- Suitable; proper; appropriate; meet; becoming; expedient; congruous; correspondent; apposite; apt; adapted; prepared; qualified; competent; adequate.  1. To make fit or suitable; to adapt to the purpose intended; to qualify; to put into a condition of readiness or preparation. The time is fitted for the duty. Burke. The very situation for which he was peculiarly fitted by nature. Macaulay. 2. To bring to a required form and size; to shape aright; to adapt to a model; to adjust; -- said especially of the work of a carpenter, machinist, tailor, etc. The carpenter . . . marketh it out with a line; he fitteth it with planes. Is. xliv. 13. 3. To supply with something that is suitable or fit, or that is shaped and adjusted to the use required. No milliner can so fit his customers with gloves. Shak. 4. To be suitable to; to answer the requirements of; to be correctly shaped and adjusted to; as, if the coat fits you, put it on. That's a bountiful answer that fits all questions. Shak. That time best fits the work. Shak. To fit out, to supply with necessaries or means; to furnish; to equip; as, to fit out a privateer. -- To fit up, to firnish with things suitable; to make proper for the reception or use of any person; to prepare; as, to fit up a room for a guest.  1. To be proper or becoming. Nor fits it to prolong the feast. Pope. 2. To be adjusted to a particular shape or size; to suit; to be adapted; as, his coat fits very well.  1. The quality of being fit; adjustment; adaptedness; as of dress to the person of the wearer. 2. (Mach.) (a) The coincidence of parts that come in contact. (b) The part of an object upon which anything fits tightly. Fit rod (Shipbuilding), a gauge rod used to try the depth of a bolt hole in order to determine the length of the bolt required. Knight.  1. A stroke or blow. [Obs. or R.] Curse on that cross, quoth then the Sarazin, That keeps thy body from the bitter fit. Spenser. 2. A sudden and violent attack of a disorder; a stroke of disease, as of epilepsy or apoplexy, which produces convulsions or unconsciousness; a convulsion; a paroxysm; hence, a period of exacerbation of a disease; in general, an attack of disease; as, a fit of sickness. And when the fit was on him, I did mark How he did shake. Shak. 3. A mood of any kind which masters or possesses one for a time; a temporary, absorbing affection; a paroxysm; as, a fit melancholy, of passion, or of laughter. All fits of pleasure we balanced by an equal degree of pain. Swift. The English, however, were on this subject prone to fits of jealously. Macaulay. 4. A passing humor; a caprice; a sudden and unusual effort, activity, or motion, followed by relaxation or insction; an impulse and irregular action. The fits of the season. Shak. 5. A darting point; a sudden emission. [R.] A tongue of light, a fit of flame. Coleridge. By fits, By fits and starts, by intervals of action and re
differ: 1. To be or stand apart; to disagree; to be unlike; to be distinguished; -- with from. One star differeth from another star in glory. 1 Cor. xv. 41. Minds differ, as rivers differ. Macaulay. 2. To be of unlike or opposite opinion; to disagree in sentiment; -- often with from or with. 3. To have a difference, cause of variance, or quarrel; to dispute; to contend. We 'll never differ with a crowded pit. Rowe. Syn. -- To vary; disagree; dissent; dispute; contend; oppose; wrangle. -- To Differ with, Differ from. Both differ from and aiffer with are used in reference to opinions; as, "I differ from you or with you in that opinion."" In all other cases, expressing simple unlikeness, differ from is used; as, these two persons or things differ entirely from each other. Severely punished, not for differing from us in opinion, but for committing a nuisance. Macaulay. Davidson, whom on a former occasion we quoted, to differ from him. M. Arnold. Much as I differ from him concerning an essential part of the historic basis of religion. Gladstone. I differ with the honorable gentleman on that point. Brougham. If the honorable gentleman differs with me on that subject, I differ as heartily with him, and shall always rejoice to differ. Canning.  To cause to be different or unlike; to set at variance. [R.] But something 'ts that differs thee and me. Cowley.
friend: 1. One who entertains for another suo Want gives to know the flatterer from the friend. Dryden. A friend that sticketh closer than a brother. Prov. xviii. 24. 2. One not inimical or hostile; one not a foe or enemy; also, one of the same nation, party, kin, etc., whose friendly feelings may be assumed. The word is some times used as a term of friendly address. Friend, how camest thou in hither Matt. xxii. 12. 3. One who looks propitiously on a cause, an institution, a project, and the like; a favorer; a promoter; as, a friend to commerce, to poetry, to an institution. 4. One of a religious sect characterized by disuse of outward rites and an ordained ministry, by simplicity of dress and speech, and esp. by opposition to war and a desire to live at peace with all men. They are popularly called Quakers. America was first visited by Friends in 1656. T. Chase. 5. A paramour of either sex. [Obs.] Shak. A friend at court or in court, one disposed to act as a friend in a place of special opportunity or influence. -- To be friends with, to have friendly relations with. "He's . . . friends with Cæsar." Shak. -- To make friends with, to become reconciled to or on friendly terms with. "Having now made friends with the Athenians." Jowett (Thucyd. ).  To act as the friend of; to favor; to countenance; to befriend. [Obs.] Fortune friends the bold. Spenser.
fly: 1. To move in or pass thorugh the air with wings, as a bird. 2. To move through the air or before the wind; esp., to pass or be driven rapidly through the air by any impulse. 3. To float, wave, or rise in the air, as sparks or a flag. Man is born unto trouble, as the sparks fly upward. Job v. 7. 4. To move or pass swiftly; to hasten away; to circulate rapidly; as, a ship flies on the deep; a top flies around; rumor flies. Fly, envious Time, till thou run out thy race. Milton. The dark waves murmured as the ships flew on. Bryant. 5. To run from danger; to attempt to escape; to flee; as, an enemy or a coward flies. See Note under Flee. Fly, ere evil intercept thy flight. Milton. Whither shall I fly to escape their hands Shak. 6. To move suddenly, or with violence; to do an act suddenly or swiftly; -- usually with a qualifying word; as, a door flies open; a bomb flies apart. To fly about (Naut.), to change frequently in a short time; -- said of the wind. -- To fly around, to move about in haste. [Colloq.] -- To fly at, to spring toward; to rush on; to attack suddenly. -- To fly in the face of, to insult; to assail; to set at defiance; to oppose with violence; to act in direct opposition to; to resist. -- To fly off, to separate, or become detached suddenly; to revolt. -- To fly on, to attack. -- To fly open, to open suddenly, or with violence. -- To fly out. (a) To rush out. (b) To burst into a passion; to break out into license. -- To let fly. (a) To throw or drive with violence; to discharge. "A man lets fly his arrow without taking any aim." Addison. (b) (Naut.) To let go suddenly and entirely; as, to let fly the sheets.  1. To cause to fly or to float in the air, as a bird, a kite, a flag, etc. The brave black flag I fly. W. S. Gilbert. 2. To fly or flee from; to shun; to avoid. Sleep flies the wretch. Dryden. To fly the favors of so good a king. Shak. 3. To hunt with a hawk. [Obs.] Bacon. To fly a kite (Com.), to raise money on commercial notes. [Cant or Slang]  1. (Zoöl.) (a) Any winged insect; esp., one with transparent wings; as, the Spanish fly; firefly; gall fly; dragon fly. (b) Any dipterous insect; as, the house fly; flesh fly; black fly. See Diptera, and Illust. in Append. 2. A hook dressed in imitation of a fly, -- used for fishing. "The fur-wrought fly." Gay. 3. A familiar spirit; a witch's attendant. [Obs.] A trifling fly, none of your great familiars. B. Jonson. 4. A parasite. [Obs.] Massinger. 5. A kind of light carriage for rapid transit, plying for hire and usually drawn by one horse. [Eng.] 6. The length of an extended flag from its staff; sometimes, the length from the "union" to the extreme end. 7. The part of a vane pointing the direction from which the wind blows. 8. (Naut.)  That part of a compass on which the points are marked; the compass card. Totten. 9. (Mech.) (a) Two or more vanes set on a revolving axis, to act as a fanner, or to equalize or impede the motion of machinery by the resistance of the air, as in the striking part of a clock. (b) A heavy wheel, or cross arms with weights at the ends on a revolving axis, to regulate or equalize the motion of machinery by means of its inertia, where the power communicated, or the resistance to be overcome, is variable, as in the steam engine or the coining press. See Fly wheel (below). 10. (Knitting Machine)  The piece hinged to the needle, which holds the engaged loop in position while the needle is penetrating another loop; a latch. Knight. 11. The pair of arms revolving around the bobbin, in a spinning wheel or spinning frame, to twist the yarn. 12. (Weaving)  A shuttle driven through the shed by a blow or jerk. Knight. 13. (a) Formerly, the person who took the printed sheets from the press. (b) A vibrating frame with fingers, attached to a power to a power printing press for doing the same work. 14. The outer canvas of a tent with double top, usually drawn over the ridgepole, but so extended as to touch the roof of the tent at no other place. 15. One of the upper screens of a stage in a theater. 16. The fore flap of a bootee; also, a lap on trousers, overcoats, etc., to conceal a row of buttons. 17. (Baseball)  A batted ball that flies to a considerable distance, usually high in the air; also, the flight of a ball so struck; as, it was caught on the fly. Black fly, Cheese fly, Dragon fly, etc. See under Black, Cheese, etc. -- Fly agaric (Bot.), a mushroom (Agaricus muscarius), having a narcotic juice which, in sufficient quantities, is poisonous. -- Fly block (Naut.), a pulley whose position shifts to suit the working of the tackle with which it is connected; -- used in the hoisting tackle of yards. -- Fly board (Printing Press), the board on which printed sheets are deposited by the fly. -- Fly book, a case in the form of a book for anglers' flies. Kingsley. -- Fly cap, a cap with wings, formerly worn by women. -- Fly drill, a drill having a reciprocating motion controlled by a fly wheel, the driving power being applied by the hand through a cord winding in reverse directions upon the spindle as it rotates backward and forward. Knight. -- Fly fishing, the act or art of angling with a bait of natural or artificial flies. Walton. -- Fly flap, an implement for killing flies. -- Fly governor, a governor for regulating the speed of an engine, etc., by the resistance of vanes revolving in the air. -- Fly honeysuckle (Bot.), a plant of the honeysuckle genus (Lonicera), having a bushy stem and the flowers in pairs, as L. ciliata and L. Xylosteum. -- Fly hook, a fishhook supplied with an artificial fly. -- Fly leaf, an unprinted leaf at the beginning or end of a book, circular, programme, etc. -- Fly maggot, a maggot bred from the egg of a fly. Ray. -- Fly net, a screen to exclude insects. -- Fly nut (Mach.), a nut with wings; a thumb nut; a finger nut. -- Fly orchis (Bot.), a plant (Ophrys muscifera), whose flowers resemble flies. -- Fly paper, poisoned or sticky paper for killing flies that feed upon or are entangled by it. -- Fly powder, an arsenical powder used to poison flies. -- Fly press, a screw press for punching, embossing, etc., operated by hand and having a heavy fly. -- Fly rail, a bracket which turns out to support the hinged leaf of a table. -- Fly rod, a light fishing rod used in angling with a fly. -- Fly sheet, a small loose advertising sheet; a handbill. -- Fly snapper (Zoöl.), an American bird (Phainopepla nitens), allied to the chatterers and shrikes. The male is glossy blue-black; the female brownish gray. -- Fly wheel (Mach.), a heavy wheel attached to machinery to equalize the movement (opposing any sudden acceleration by its inertia and any retardation by its momentum), and to accumulate or give out energy for a variable or intermitting resistance. See Fly, n., 9. -- On the fly (Baseball), still in the air; -- said of a batted ball caught before touching the ground..  Knowing; wide awake; fully understanding another's meaning. [Slang] Dickens.
want: 1. The state of not having; the condition of being without anything; absence or scarcity of what is needed or desired; deficiency; lack; as, a want of power or knowledge for any purpose; want of food and clothing. And me, his parent, would full soon devour For want of other prey. Milton. From having wishes in consequence of our wants, we often feel wants in consequence of our wishes. Rambler. Pride is as loud a beggar as want, and more saucy. Franklin. 2. Specifically, absence or lack of necessaries; destitution; poverty; penury; indigence; need. Nothing is so hard for those who abound in riches, as to conceive how others can be in want. Swift. 3. That which is needed or desired; a thing of which the loss is felt; what is not possessed, and is necessary for use or pleasure. Habitual superfluities become actual wants. Paley. 4. (Mining)  A depression in coal strata, hollowed out before the subsequent deposition took place. [Eng.] Syn. -- Indigence; deficiency; defect; destitution; lack; failure; dearth; scarceness.  1. To be without; to be destitute of, or deficient in; not to have; to lack; as, to want knowledge; to want judgment; to want learning; to want food and clothing. They that want honesty, want anything. Beau. & Fl. Nor think, though men were none, That heaven would want spectators, God want praise. Milton. The unhappy never want enemies. Richardson. 2. To have occasion for, as useful, proper, or requisite; to require; to need; as, in winter we want a fire; in summer we want cooling breezes. 3. To feel need of; to wish or long for; to desire; to crave. " What wants my son" Addison. I want to speak to you about something. A. Trollope.  1. To be absent; to be deficient or lacking; to fail; not to be sufficient; to fall or come short; to lack; -- often used impersonally with of; as, it wants ten minutes of four. The disposition, the manners, and the thoughts are all before it; where any of those are wanting or imperfect, so much wants or is imperfect in the imitation of human life. Dryden. 2. To be in a state of destitution; to be needy; to lack. You have a gift, sir (thank your education), Will never let you want. B. Jonson. For as in bodies, thus in souls, we find What wants in blood and spirits, swelled with wind. Pope. Note: Want was formerly used impersonally with an indirect object. "Him wanted audience." Chaucer. WA'N'T Wa'n't.  A colloquial contraction of was not.
ago: Past; gone by; since; as, ten years ago; gone long ago.
material: 1. Consisting of matter; not spiritual; corporeal; physical; as, material substance or bodies. The material elements of the universe. Whewell. 2. Hence: Pertaining to, or affecting, the physical nature of man, as distinguished from the mental or moral nature; relating to the bodily wants, interests, and comforts. 3. Of solid or weighty character; not insubstantial; of cinsequence; not be dispensed with; important. Discourse, which was always material, never trifling. Evelyn. I shall, in the account of simple ideas, set down only such as are most material to our present purpose. Locke. 4. (Logic.)  Pertaining to the matter, as opposed to the form, of a thing. See Matter. Material cause. See under Cause. -- Material evidence (Law), evidence which conduces to the proof or disproof of a relevant hypothesis. Wharton. Syn. -- Corporeal; bodily; important; weighty; momentous; essential.  The substance or matter of which anything is made or may be made. Raw material, any crude, unfinished, or elementary materials that are adapted to use only by processes of skilled labor. Cotton, wool, ore, logs, etc., are raw material.  To form from matter; to materialize. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne.
division: 1. The act or process of diving anything into parts, or the state of being so divided; separation. I was overlooked in the division of the spoil. Gibbon. 2. That which divides or keeps apart; a partition. 3. The portion separated by the divining of a mass or body; a distinct segment or section. Communities and divisions of men. Addison. 4. Disunion; difference in opinion or feeling; discord; variance; alienation. There was a division among the people. John vii. 43. 5. Difference of condition; state of distinction; distinction; contrast. Chaucer. I will put a division between my people and thy people. Ex. viii. 23. 6. Separation of the members of a deliberative body, esp. of the Houses of Parliament, to ascertain the vote. The motion passed without a division. Macaulay. 7. (Math.)  The process of finding how many times one number or quantity is contained in another; the reverse of multiplication; also, the rule by which the operation is performed. 8. (Logic)  The separation of a genus into its constituent species. 9. (Mil.) (a) Two or more brigades under the command of a general officer. (b) Two companies of infantry maneuvering as one subdivision of a battalion. (c) One of the larger districts into which a country is divided for administering military affairs. 10. (Naut.)  One of the groups into which a fleet is divided. 11. (Mus.)  A course of notes so running into each other as to form one series or chain, to be sung in one breath to one syllable. 12. (Rhet.)  The distribution of a discourse into parts; a part so distinguished. 13. (Biol.)  A grade or rank in classification; a portion of a tribe or of a class; or, in some recent authorities, equivalent to a subkingdom. Cell division (Biol.), a method of cell increase, in which new cells are formed by the division of the parent cell. In this process, the cell nucleus undergoes peculiar differentiations and changes, as shown in the figure (see also Karyokinesis). At the same time the protoplasm of the cell becomes gradually constricted by a furrow transverse to the long axis of the nuclear spindle, followed, on the completion of the division of the nucleus, by a separation of the cell contents into two masses, called the daughter cells. -- Long division (Math.), the process of division when the operations are mostly written down. -- Short division (Math.), the process of division when the operations are mentally performed and only the results written down; -- used principally when the divisor is not greater than ten or twelve. Syn. -- compartment; section; share; allotment; distribution; separation; partition; disjunction; disconnection; difference; variance; discord; disunion.
teeth: pl. of Tooth.  To breed, or grow, teeth.
period: 1. A portion of time as limited and determined by some recurring phenomenon, as by the completion of a revolution of one of the heavenly bodies; a division of time, as a series of years, months, or days, in which something is completed, and ready to recommence and go on in the same order; as, the period of the sun, or the earth, or a comet. 2. Hence: A stated and recurring interval of time; more generally, an interval of time specified or left indefinite; a certain series of years, months, days, or the like; a time; a cycle; an age; an epoch; as, the period of the Roman republic. How by art to make plants more lasting than their ordinary period. Bacon. 3. (Geol.)  One of the great divisions of geological time; as, the Tertiary period; the Glacial period. See the Chart of Geology. 4. The termination or completion of a revolution, cycle, series of events, single event, or act; hence, a limit; a bound; an end; a conclusion. Bacon. So spake the archangel Michael; then paused, As at the world's great period. Milton. Evils which shall never end till eternity hath a period. Jer. Taylor. This is the period of my ambition. Shak. 5. (Rhet.)  A complete sentence, from one full stop to another; esp., a well-proportioned, harmonious sentence. "Devolved his rounded periods." Tennyson. Periods are beautiful when they are not too long. B. Johnson. Note: The period, according to Heyse, is a compound sentence consisting of a protasis and apodosis; according to Becker, it is the appropriate form for the coördinate propositions related by antithesis or causality. Gibbs. 6. (Print.)  The punctuation point [.] that marks the end of a complete sentence, or of an abbreviated word. 7. (Math.)  One of several similar sets of figures or terms usually marked by points or commas placed at regular intervals, as in numeration, in the extraction of roots, and in circulating decimals. 8. (Med.)  The time of the exacerbation and remission of a disease, or of the paroxysm and intermission. 9. (Mus.)  A complete musical sentence. The period, the present or current time, as distinguished from all other times. Syn. -- Time; date; epoch; era; age; duration; limit; bound; end; conclusion; determination.  To put an end to. [Obs.] Shak.  To come to a period; to conclude. [Obs.] "You may period upon this, that," etc. Felthman.
war: Ware; aware. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. A contest between nations or states, carried on by force, whether for defence, for revenging insults and redressing wrongs, for the extension of commerce, for the acquisition of territory, for obtaining and establishing the superiority and dominion of one over the other, or for any other purpose; armed conflict of sovereign powers; declared and open hostilities. Men will ever distinguish war from mere bloodshed. F. W. Robertson. Note: As war is the contest of nations or states, it always implies that such contest is authorized by the monarch or the sovereign power of the nation. A war begun by attacking another nation, is called an offensive war, and such attack is aggressive. War undertaken to repel invasion, or the attacks of an enemy, is called defensive. 2. (Law)  A condition of belligerency to be maintained by physical force. In this sense, levying war against the sovereign authority is treason. 3. Instruments of war. [Poetic] His complement of stores, and total war. Prior. 4. Forces; army. [Poetic] On their embattled ranks the waves return, And overwhelm their war. Milton. 5. The profession of arms; the art of war. Thou art but a youth, and he is a man of war from his youth. 1 Sam. xvii. 33. 6. a state of opposition or contest; an act of opposition; an inimical contest, act, or action; enmity; hostility. "Raised impious war in heaven." Milton. The words of his mouth were smoother than butter, but war was in his heart. Ps. lv. 21. Civil war, a war between different sections or parties of the same country or nation. -- Holy war. See under Holy. -- Man of war. (Naut.) See in the Vocabulary. -- Public war, a war between independent sovereign states. -- War cry, a cry or signal used in war; as, the Indian war cry. -- War dance, a dance among savages preliminary to going to war. Among the North American Indians, it is begun by some distinguished chief, and whoever joins in it thereby enlists as one of the party engaged in a warlike excursion. Schoolcraft. -- War field, a field of war or battle. -- War horse, a horse used in war; the horse of a cavalry soldier; especially, a strong, powerful, spirited horse for military service; a charger. -- War paint, paint put on the face and other parts of the body by savages, as a token of going to war. "Wash the war paint from your faces." Longfellow. -- War song, a song of or pertaining to war; especially, among the American Indians, a song at the war dance, full of incitements to military ardor. -- War whoop, a war cry, especially that uttered by the American Indians.  To make war; to invade or attack a state or nation with force of arms; to carry on hostilities; to be in a state by violence. Rezin the king of Syria, and Pekah the son of Remaliah, king of Israel, went up toward Jerusalem to war against it. Isa. vii. 1. Why should I war without the walls of Troy Shak. Our countrymen were warring on that day! Byron. 2. To contend; to strive violently; to fight. "Lusts which war against the soul." 1 Pet. ii. 11.  1. To make war upon; to fight. [R.] To war the Scot, and borders to defend. Daniel. 2. To carry on, as a contest; to wage. [R.] That thou . . . mightest war a good warfare. Tim. i. 18.
sun: See Sunn.  1. The luminous orb, the light of which constitutes day, and its absence night; the central body round which the earth and planets revolve, by which they are held in their orbits, and from which they receive light and heat. Its mean distance from the earth is about 92,500,000 miles, and its diameter about 860,000. Note: Its mean apparent diameter as seen from the earth is 32' 4", and it revolves on its own axis once in 25photosphere, above which is an envelope consisting partly of hydrogen, called the chromosphere, which can be seen only through the spectroscope, or at the time of a total solar eclipse. Above the chromosphere, and sometimes extending out millions of miles, are luminous rays or streams of light which are visible only at the time of a total eclipse, forming the solar corona. 2. Any heavenly body which forms the center of a system of orbs. 3. The direct light or warmth of the sun; sunshine. Lambs that did frisk in the sun. Shak. 4. That which resembles the sun, as in splendor or importance; any source of light, warmth, or animation. For the Lord God is a sun and shield. Ps. lxxiv. 11. I will never consent to put out the sun of sovereignity to posterity. Eikon Basilike. Sun and planet wheels (Mach.), an ingenious contrivance for converting reciprocating motion, as that of the working beam of a steam engine, into rotatory motion. It consists of a toothed wheel (called the sun wheel), firmly secured to the shaft it is desired to drive, and another wheel (called the planet wheel) secured to the end of a connecting rod. By the motion of the connecting rod, the planet wheel is made to circulate round the central wheel on the shaft, communicating to this latter a velocity of revolution the double of its own. G. Francis. -- Sun angel (Zoöl.), a South American humming bird of the genus Heliangelos, noted for its beautiful colors and the brilliant luster of the feathers of its throat. -- Sun animalcute. (Zoöl.) See Heliozoa. -- Sun bath (Med.), exposure of a patient to the sun's rays; insolation. -- Sun bear (Zoöl.), a species of bear (Helarctos Malayanus) native of Southern Asia and Borneo. It has a small head and short neck, and fine short glossy fur, mostly black, but brownish on the nose. It is easily tamed. Called also bruang, and Malayan bear. -- Sun beetle (Zoöl.), any small lustrous beetle of the genus Amara. -- Sun bittern (Zoöl.), a singular South American bird (Eurypyga helias), in some respects related both to the rails and herons. It is beautifully variegated with white, brown, and black. Called also sunbird, and tiger bittern. -- Sun fever (Med.), the condition of fever produced by sun stroke. -- Sun gem (Zoöl.), a Brazilian humming bird (Heliactin cornutus). Its head is ornamented by two tufts of bright colored feathers, fiery crimson at the base and greenish yellow at the tip. Called also Horned hummer. -- Sun grebe (Zoöl.), the finfoot. -- Sun picture, a picture taken by the agency of the sun's rays; a photograph. -- Sun spots (Astron.), dark spots that appear on the sun's disk, consisting commonly of a black central portion with a surrounding border of lighter shade, and usually seen only by the telescope, but sometimes by the naked eye. They are very changeable in their figure and dimensions, and vary in size from mere apparent points to spaces of 50,000 miles in diameter. The term sun spots is often used to include bright spaces (called faculæ) as well as dark spaces (called maculæ). Called also solar spots. See Illustration in Appendix. -- Sun star (Zoöl.), any one of several species of starfishes belonging to Solaster, Crossaster, and allied genera, having numerous rays. -- Sun trout (Zoöl.), the squeteague. -- Sun wheel. (Mach.) See Sun and planet wheels, above. -- Under the sun, in the world; on earth. "There is no new thing under the sun." Eccl. i. 9. Note: Sun is often used in the formation of compound adjectives of obvious meaning; as, sun-bright, sun-dried, sun-gilt, sunlike, sun- lit, sun-scorched, and the like.  To expose to the sun's rays; to warm or dry in the sun; as, to sun cloth; to sun grain. Then to sun thyself in open air. Dryden.
dream: 1. The thoughts, or series of thoughts, or imaginary transactions, which occupy the mind during sleep; a sleeping vision. Dreams are but interludes which fancy makes. Dryden. I had a dream which was not all a dream. Byron. 2. A visionary scheme; a wild conceit; an idle fancy; a vagary; a revery; -- in this sense, applied to an imaginary or anticipated state of happiness; as, a dream of bliss; the dream of his youth. There sober thought pursued the amusing theme, Till Fancy colored it and formed a dream. Pope. It is not them a mere dream, but a very real aim which they propose. J. C. Shairp.  1. To have ideas or images in the mind while in the state of sleep; to experience sleeping visions; -- often with of; as, to dream of a battle, or of an absent friend. 2. To let the mind run on in idle revery or vagary; to anticipate vaguely as a coming and happy reality; to have a visionary notion or idea; to imagine. Here may we sit and dream Over the heavenly theme. Keble. They dream on in a constant course of reading, but not digesting. Locke.  To have a dream of; to see, or have a vision of, in sleep, or in idle fancy; -- often followed by an objective clause. Your old men shall dream dreams. Acts ii. 17. At length in sleep their bodies they compose, And dreamt the future fight. Dryden. And still they dream that they shall still succeed. Cowper. To dream away, out, through, etc., to pass in revery or inaction; to spend in idle vagaries; as, to dream away an hour; to dream through life. " Why does Antony dream out his hours" Dryden.
flower: 1. In the popular sense, the bloom or blossom of a plant; the showy portion, usually of a different color, shape, and texture from the foliage. 2. (Bot.)  That part of a plant destined to produce seed, and hence including one or both of the sexual organs; an organ or combination of the organs of reproduction, whether inclosed by a circle of foliar parts or not. A complete flower consists of two essential parts, the stamens and the pistil, and two floral envelopes, the corolla and callyx. In mosses the flowers consist of a few special leaves surrounding or subtending organs called archegonia. See Blossom, and Corolla. Note: If we examine a common flower, such for instance as a geranium, we shall find that it consists of: First, an outer envelope or calyx, sometimes tubular, sometimes consisting of separate leaves called sepals; secondly, an inner envelope or corolla, which is generally more or less colored, and which, like the calyx, is sometimes tubular, sometimes composed of separate leaves called petals; thirdly, one or more stamens, consisting of a stalk or filament and a head or anther, in which the pollen is produced; and fourthly, a pistil, which is situated in the center of the flower, and consists generally of three principal parts; one or more compartments at the base, each containing one or more seeds; the stalk or style; and the stigma, which in many familiar instances forms a small head, at the top of the style or ovary, and to which the pollen must find its way in order to fertilize the flower. Sir J. Lubbock. 3. The fairest, freshest, and choicest part of anything; as, the flower of an army, or of a family; the state or time of freshness and bloom; as, the flower of life, that is, youth. The choice and flower of all things profitable the Psalms do more briefly contain. Hooker. The flower of the chivalry of all Spain. Southey. A simple maiden in her flower Is worth a hundred coats of arms. Tennyson. 4. Grain pulverized; meal; flour. [Obs.] The flowers of grains, mixed with water, will make a sort of glue. Arbuthnot. 5. pl. (Old. Chem.)  A substance in the form of a powder, especially when condensed from sublimation; as, the flowers of sulphur. 6. A figure of speech; an ornament of style. 7. pl. (Print.)  Ornamental type used chiefly for borders around pages, cards, etc. W. Savage. 8. pl.  Menstrual discharges. Lev. xv. 24. Animal flower (Zoöl.) See under Animal. -- Cut flowers, flowers cut from the stalk, as for making a bouquet. -- Flower bed, a plat in a garden for the cultivation of flowers. -- Flower beetle (Zoöl.), any beetle which feeds upon flowers, esp. any one of numerous small species of the genus Meligethes, family Nitidulidæ, some of which are injurious to crops. -- Flower bird (Zoöl.), an Australian bird of the genus Anthornis, allied to the honey eaters. -- Flower bud, an unopened flower. -- Flower clock, an assemblage of flowers which open and close at different hours of the day, thus indicating the time. -- Flower head (Bot.), a compound flower in which all the florets are sessile on their receptacle, as in the case of the daisy. -- Flower pecker (Zoöl.), one of a family (Dicæidæ) of small Indian and Australian birds. They resemble humming birds in habits. -- Flower piece. (a) A table ornament made of cut flowers. (b) (Fine Arts) A picture of flowers. -- Flower stalk (Bot.), the peduncle of a plant, or the stem that supports the flower or fructification.  1. To blossom; to bloom; to expand the petals, as a plant; to produce flowers; as, this plant flowers in June. 2. To come into the finest or fairest condition. Their lusty and flowering age. Robynson (More's Utopia). When flowered my youthful spring. Spenser. 3. To froth; to ferment gently, as new beer. That beer did flower a little. Bacon. 4. To come off as flowers by sublimation. [Obs.] Observations which have flowered off. Milton.  To embellish with flowers; to adorn with imitated flowers; as, flowered silk.
bat: 1. A large stick; a club; specifically, a piece of wood with one end thicker or broader than the other, used in playing baseball, cricket, etc. 2. (Mining)  Shale or bituminous shale. Kirwan. 3. A sheet of cotton used for filling quilts or comfortables; batting. 4. A part of a brick with one whole end. Bat bolt (Machinery), a bolt barbed or jagged at its butt or tang to make it hold the more firmly. Knight.  To strike or hit with a bat or a pole; to cudgel; to beat. Holland.  To use a bat, as in a game of baseball.  One of the Cheiroptera, an order of flying mammals, in which the wings are formed by a membrane stretched between the elongated fingers, legs, and tail. The common bats are small and insectivorous. See Cheiroptera and Vampire. Bat tick (Zoöl.), a wingless, dipterous insect of the genus Nycteribia, parasitic on bats.
north: 1. That one of the four cardinal points of the compass, at any place, which lies in the direction of the true meridian, and to the left hand of a person facing the east; the direction opposite to the south. 2. Any country or region situated farther to the north than another; the northern section of a country. 3. Specifically: That part of the United States lying north of Mason and Dixon's line. See under Line.  Lying toward the north; situated at the north, or in a northern direction from the point of observation or reckoning; proceeding toward the north, or coming from the north. North following. See Following, a., 2. -- North pole, that point in the heavens, or on the earth, ninety degrees from the equator toward the north. -- North preceding. See Following, a., 2. -- North star, the star toward which the north pole of the earth very nearly points, and which accordingly seems fixed and immovable in the sky. The star a (alpha) of the Little Bear, is our present north star, being distant from the pole about 1º 25', and from year to year approaching slowly nearer to it. It is called also Cynosura, polestar, and by astronomers, Polaris.  To turn or move toward the north; to veer from the east or west toward the north.  Northward.
lift: The sky; the atmosphere; the firmament. [Obs. or Scot.]  1. To move in a direction opposite to that of gravitation; to raise; to elevate; to bring up from a lower place to a higher; to upheave; sometimes implying a continued support or holding in the higher place; -- said of material things; as, to lift the foot or the hand; to lift a chair or a burden. 2. To raise, elevate, exalt, improve, in rank, condition, estimation, character, etc.; -- often with up. The Roman virtues lift up mortal man. Addison. Lest, being lifted up with pride. I Tim. iii. 6. 3. To bear; to support. [Obs.] Spenser. 4. To collect, as moneys due; to raise. 5. Etym: [Perh. a different word, and akin to Goth. hliftus thief, hlifan to steal, L. clepere, Gr. Shoplifter.]  To steal; to carry off by theft (esp. cattle); as, to lift a drove of cattle. Note: In old writers, lift is sometimes used for lifted. He ne'er lift up his hand but conquered. Shak. To lift up, to raise or elevate; in the Scriptures, specifically, to elevate upon the cross. John viii. 28. -- To lift up the eyes. To look up; to raise the eyes, as in prayer. Ps. cxxi. 1. -- To lift up the feet, to come speedily to one's relief. Ps. lxxiv. 3. -- To lift up the hand. (a) To take an oath. Gen. xiv. 22. (b) To pray. Ps. xxviii. 2. (c) To engage in duty. Heb. xii. 12. -- To lift up the hand against, to rebel against; to assault; to attack; to injure; to oppress. Job xxxi. 21. -- To lift up one's head, to cause one to be exalted or to rejoice. Gen. xl. 13. Luke xxi. 28. -- To lift up the heel against, to treat with insolence or unkindness. John xiii.18. -- To lift up the voice, to cry aloud; to call out. Gen. xxi. 16.  1. To try to raise something; to exert the strength for raising or bearing. Strained by lifting at a weight too heavy. Locke. 2. To rise; to become or appear raised or elevated; as, the fog lifts; the land lifts to a ship approaching it. 3. Etym: [See Lift, v. t., 5.]  To live by theft. Spenser.  1. Act of lifting; also, that which is lifted. 2. The space or distance through which anything is lifted; as, a long lift. Bacon. 3. Help; assistance, as by lifting; as, to give one a lift in a wagon. [Colloq.] The goat gives the fox a lift. L'Estrange. 4. That by means of which a person or thing lifts or is lifted; as: (a) A hoisting machine; an elevator; a dumb waiter. (b) An exercising machine. 5. A rise; a degree of elevation; as, the lift of a lock in canals. 6. A lift gate. See Lift gate, below. [Prov. Eng.] 7. (Naut.)  A rope leading from the masthead to the extremity of a yard below; -- used for raising or supporting the end of the yard. 8. (Mach.)  One of the steps of a cone pulley. 9. (Shoemaking)  A layer of leather in the heel. 10. (Horology)  That portion of the vibration of a balance during which the impulse is given. Saunier. Dead lift. See under Dead. Swift. -- Lift bridge, a kind of drawbridge, the movable part of which is lifted, instead of being drawn aside. -- Lift gate, a gate that is opened by lifting. -- Lift hammer. See Tilt hammer. -- Lift lock, a canal lock. -- Lift pump, a lifting pump. -- Lift tenter (Windmills), a governor for regulating the speed by adjusting the sails, or for adjusting the action of grinding machinery according to the speed. -- Lift wall (Canal Lock), the cross wall at the head of the lock.
hurry: 1. To hasten; to impel to greater speed; to urge on. Impetuous lust hurries him on. South. They hurried him abroad a bark. Shak. 2. To impel to precipitate or thoughtless action; to urge to confused or irregular activity. And wild amazement hurries up and down The little number of your doubtful friends. Shak. 3. To cause to be done quickly. Syn. -- To hasten; precipitate; expedite; quicken; accelerate; urge.  To move or act with haste; to proceed with celerity or precipitation; as, let us hurry. To hurry up, to make haste. [Colloq.]  The act of hurrying in motion or business; pressure; urgency; bustle; confusion. Ambition raises a tumult in the soul, it inflames the mind, and puts into a violent hurry of thought. Addison. Syn. -- Haste; speed; dispatch. See Haste.
order: 1. Regular arrangement; any methodical or established succession or harmonious relation; method; system; as: (a) Of material things, like the books in a library. (b) Of intellectual notions or ideas, like the topics of a discource. (c) Of periods of time or occurrences, and the like. The side chambers were . . . thirty in order. Ezek. xli. 6. Bright-harnessed angels sit in order serviceable. Milton. Good order is the foundation of all good things. Burke. 2. Right arrangement; a normal, correct, or fit condition; as, the house is in order; the machinery is out of order. Locke. 3. The customary mode of procedure; established system, as in the conduct of debates or the transaction of business; usage; custom; fashion. Dantiel. And, pregnant with his grander thought, Brought the old order into doubt. Emerson. 4. Conformity with law or decorum; freedom from disturbance; general tranquillity; public quiet; as, to preserve order in a community or an assembly. 5. That which prescribes a method of procedure; a rule or regulation made by competent authority; as, the rules and orders of the senate. The church hath authority to establish that for an order at one time which at another time it may abolish. Hooker. 6. A command; a mandate; a precept; a direction. Upon this new fright, an order was made by both houses for disarming all the papists in England. Clarendon. 7. Hence: A commission to purchase, sell, or supply goods; a direction, in writing, to pay money, to furnish supplies, to admit to a building, a place of entertainment, or the like; as, orders for blankets are large. In those days were pit orders -- beshrew the uncomfortable manager who abolished them. Lamb. 8. A number of things or persons arranged in a fixed or suitable place, or relative position; a rank; a row; a grade; especially, a rank or class in society; a group or division of men in the same social or other position; also, a distinct character, kind, or sort; as, the higher or lower orders of society; talent of a high order. They are in equal order to their several ends. Jer. Taylor. Various orders various ensigns bear. Granville. Which, to his order of mind, must have seemed little short of crime. Hawthorne. 9. A body of persons having some common honorary distinction or rule of obligation; esp., a body of religious persons or aggregate of convents living under a common rule; as, the Order of the Bath; the Franciscan order. Find a barefoot brother out, One of our order, to associate me. Shak. The venerable order of the Knights Templars. Sir W. Scott. 10. An ecclesiastical grade or rank, as of deacon, priest, or bishop; the office of the Christian ministry; -- often used in the plural; as, to take orders, or to take holy orders, that is, to enter some grade of the ministry. 11. (Arch.)  The disposition of a column and its component parts, and of the entablature resting upon it, in classical architecture; hence (as the column and entablature are the characteristic features of classical architecture) a style or manner of architectural designing. Note: The Greeks used three different orders, easy to distinguish, Doric, Ionic, and Corinthian. The Romans added the Tuscan, and changed the Doric so that it is hardly recognizable, and also used a modified Corinthian called Composite. The Renaissance writers on architecture recognized five orders as orthodox or classical, -- Doric (the Roman sort), Ionic, Tuscan, Corinthian, and Composite. See Illust. of Capital. 12. (Nat. Hist.)  An assemblage of genera having certain important characters in common; as, the Carnivora and Insectivora are orders of Mammalia. Note: The Linnæan artificial orders of plants rested mainly on identity in the numer of pistils, or agreement in some one character. Natural orders are groups of genera agreeing in the fundamental plan of their flowers and fruit. A natural order is usually (in botany) equivalent to a family, and may include several tribes. 13. (Rhet.)  The placing of words and members in a sentence in such a manner as to contribute to force and beauty or clearness of expression. 14. (Math.)  Rank; degree; thus, the order of a curve or surface is the same as the degree of its equation. Artificial order or system. See Artificial classification, under Artificial, and Note to def. 12 above. -- Close order (Mil.), the arrangement of the ranks with a distance of about half a pace between them; with a distance of about three yards the ranks are in Ant: open order. -- The four Orders, The Orders four, the four orders of mendicant friars. See Friar. Chaucer. -- General orders (Mil.), orders issued which concern the whole command, or the troops generally, in distinction from special orders. -- Holy orders. (a) (Eccl.) The different grades of the Christian ministry; ordination to the ministry. See def. 10 above. (b) (R. C. Ch.) A sacrament for the purpose of conferring a special grace on those ordained. -- In order to, for the purpose of; to the end; as means to. The best knowledge is that which is of greatest use in order to our eternal happiness. Tillotson. -- Minor orders (R. C. Ch.), orders beneath the diaconate in sacramental dignity, as acolyte, exorcist, reader, doorkeeper. -- Money order. See under Money. -- Natural order. (Bot.) See def. 12, Note. -- Order book. (a) A merchant's book in which orders are entered. (b) (Mil.) A book kept at headquarters, in which all orders are recorded for the information of officers and men. (c) A book in the House of Commons in which proposed orders must be entered. [Eng.] -- Order in Council, a royal order issed with and by the advice of the Privy Council. [Great Britain] -- Order of battle (Mil.), the particular disposition given to the troops of an army on the field of battle. -- Order of the day, in legislative bodies, the special business appointed for a specified day. -- Order of a differential equation (Math.), the greatest index of differentiation in the equation. -- Sailing orders (Naut.), the final instructions given to the commander of a ship of war before a cruise. -- Sealed orders, orders sealed, and not to be opended until a certain time, or arrival at a certain place, as after a ship is at sea. -- Standing order. (a) A continuing regulation for the conduct of parliamentary business. (b) (Mil.) An order not subject to change by an officer temporarily in command. -- To give order, to give command or directions. Shak. -- To take order for, to take charge of; to make arrangements concerning. Whiles I take order for mine own affairs. Shak. Syn. -- Arrangement; management. See Direction.  1. To put in order; to reduce to a methodical arrangement; to arrange in a series, or with reference to an end. Hence, to regulate; to dispose; to direct; to rule. To him that ordereth his conversation aright. Ps. 1. 23. Warriors old with ordered spear and shield. Milton. 2. To give an order to; to command; as, to order troops to advance. 3. To give an order for; to secure by an order; as, to order a carriage; to order groceries. 4. (Eccl.)  To admit to holy orders; to ordain; to receive into the ranks of the ministry. These ordered folk be especially titled to God. Chaucer. Persons presented to be ordered deacons. Bk. of Com. Prayer. Order arms (Mil.), the command at which a rifle is brought to a position with its but resting on the ground; also, the position taken at such a command.  To give orders; to issue commands.
finish: 1. To arrive at the end of; to bring to an end; to put an end to; to make an end of; to terminate. And heroically hath finished A life heroic. Milton. 2. To bestow the last required labor upon; to complete; to bestow the utmost possible labor upon; to perfect; to accomplish; to polish. Syn. -- To end; terminate; close; conclude; complete; accomplish; perfect.  1. To come to an end; to terminate. His days may finish ere that hapless time. Shak. 2. To end; to die. [R.] Shak.  1. That which finishes, puts an end to 2. (Arch.)  The joiner work and other finer work required for the completion of a building, especially of the interior. See Inside finish, and Outside finish. 3. (Fine Arts) (a) The labor required to give final completion to any work; hence, minute detail, careful elaboration, or the like. (b) See Finishing coat, under Finishing. 4. The result of completed labor, as on the surface of an object; manner or style of finishing; as, a rough, dead, or glossy finish given to cloth, stone, metal, etc. 5. Completion; -- opposed to Ant: start, or Ant: beginning.
oil: Any one of a great variety of unctuous combustible substances, not miscible with water; as, olive oil, whale oil, rock oil, etc. They are of animal, vegetable, or mineral origin and of varied composition, and they are variously used for food, for solvents, for anointing, lubrication, illumination, etc. By extension, any substance of an oily consistency; as, oil of vitriol. Note: The mineral oils are varieties of petroleum. See Petroleum. The vegetable oils are of two classes, essential oils (see under Essential), and natural oils which in general resemble the animal oils and fats. Most of the natural oils and the animal oils and fats consist of ethereal salts of glycerin, with a large number of organic acids, principally stearic, oleic, and palmitic, forming respectively stearin, olein, and palmitin. Stearin and palmitin prevail in the solid oils and fats, and olein in the liquid oils. Mutton tallow, beef tallow, and lard are rich in stearin, human fat and palm oil in palmitin, and sperm and cod-liver oils in olein. In making soaps, the acids leave the glycerin and unite with the soda or potash. Animal oil, Bone oil, Dipple's oil, etc. (Old Chem.), a complex oil obtained by the distillation of animal substances, as bones. See Bone oil, under Bone. -- Drying oils, Essential oils. (Chem.) See under Drying, and Essential. -- Ethereal oil of wine, Heavy oil of wine. (Chem.) See under Ethereal. -- Fixed oil. (Chem.) See under Fixed. -- Oil bag (Zoöl.), a bag, cyst, or gland in animals, containing oil. -- Oil beetle (Zoöl.), any beetle of the genus Meloe and allied genera. When disturbed they emit from the joints of the legs a yellowish oily liquor. Some species possess vesicating properties, and are used instead of cantharides. -- Oil box, or Oil cellar (Mach.), a fixed box or reservoir, for lubricating a bearing; esp., the box for oil beneath the journal of a railway-car axle. -- Oil cake. See under Cake. -- Oil cock, a stopcock connected with an oil cup. See Oil cup. -- Oil color. (a) A paint made by grinding a coloring substance in oil. (b) Such paints, taken in a general sense. -- Oil cup, a cup, or small receptacle, connected with a bearing as a lubricator, and usually provided with a wick, wire, or adjustable valve for regulating the delivery of oil. -- Oil engine, a gas engine worked with the explosive vapor of petroleum. -- Oil gas, inflammable gas procured from oil, and used for lighting streets, houses, etc. -- Oil gland. (a) (Zoöl.) A gland which secretes oil; especially in birds, the large gland at the base of the tail. (b) (Bot.) A gland, in some plants, producing oil. -- Oil green, a pale yellowish green, like oil. -- Oil of brick, empyreumatic oil obtained by subjecting a brick soaked in oil to distillation at a high temperature, -- used by lapidaries as a vehicle for the emery by which stones and gems are sawn or cut. Brande & C. -- Oil of talc, a nostrum made of calcined talc, and famous in the 17th century as a cosmetic. [Obs.] B. Jonson. -- Oil of vitriol (Chem.), strong sulphuric acid; -- so called from its oily consistency and from its forming the vitriols or sulphates. -- Oil of wine, . -- Oil painting. (a) The art of painting in oil colors. (b) Any kind of painting of which the pigments are originally ground in oil. -- Oil palm (Bot.), a palm tree whose fruit furnishes oil, esp. Elæis Guineensis. See Elæis. -- Oil sardine (Zoöl.), an East Indian herring (Clupea scombrina), valued for its oil. -- Oil shark (Zoöl.) (a) The liver shark. (b) The tope. -- Oil still, a still for hydrocarbons, esp. for petroleum. -- Oil test, a test for determining the temperature at which petroleum oils give off vapor which is liable to explode. -- Oil tree. (Bot.) (a) A plant of the genus Ricinus (R. communis), from the seeds of which castor oil is obtained. (b) An Indian tree, the mahwa. See Mahwa. (c) The oil palm. -- To burn the midnight oil, to study or work late at night. -- Volatle oils. See Essential oils, under Essential.  To smear or rub over with oil; to lubricate with oil; to anoint with oil.
match: Anything used for catching and retaining or communicating fire, made of some substance which takes fire readily, or remains burning some time; esp., a small strip or splint of wood dipped at one end in a substance which can be easily ignited by friction, as a preparation of phosphorus or chlorate of potassium. Match box, a box for holding matches. -- Match tub, a tub with a perforated cover for holding slow matches for firing cannon, esp. on board ship. The tub contains a little water in the bottom, for extinguishing sparks from the lighted matches. -- Quick match, threads of cotton or cotton wick soaked in a solution of gunpowder mixed with gum arabic and boiling water and afterwards strewed over with mealed powder. It burns at the rate of one yard in thirteen seconds, and is used as priming for heavy mortars, fireworks, etc. -- Slow match, slightly twisted hempen rope soaked in a solution of limewater and saltpeter or washed in a lye of water and wood ashes. It burns at the rate of four or five inches an hour, and is used for firing cannon, fireworks, etc.  1. A person or thing equal or similar to another; one able to mate or cope with another; an equal; a mate. Government . . . makes an innocent man, though of the lowest rank, a match for the mightiest of his fellow subjects. Addison. 2. A bringing together of two parties suited to one another, as for a union, a trial of skill or force, a contest, or the like; as, specifically: (a) A contest to try strength or skill, or to determine superiority; an emulous struggle. "Many a warlike match." Drayton. A solemn match was made; he lost the prize. Dryden. (b) A matrimonial union; a marriage. 3. An agreement, compact, etc. "Thy hand upon that match." Shak. Love doth seldom suffer itself to be confined by other matches than those of its own making. Boyle. 4. A candidate for matrimony; one to be gained in marriage. "She . . . was looked upon as the richest match of the West." Clarendon. 5. Equality of conditions in contest or competition. It were no match, your nail against his horn. Shak. 6. Suitable combination or bringing together; that which corresponds or harmonizes with something else; as, the carpet and curtains are a match. 7. (Founding)  A perforated board, block of plaster, hardened sand, etc., in which a pattern is partly imbedded when a mold is made, for giving shape to the surfaces of separation between the parts of the mold. Match boarding (Carp.), boards fitted together with tongue and groove, or prepared to be so fitted. -- Match game, a game arranged as a test of superiority. -- Match plane (Carp.), either of the two planes used to shape the edges of boards which are joined by grooving and tonguing. -- Match plate (Founding), a board or plate on the opposite sides of which the halves of a pattern are fastened, to facilitate molding. Knight. -- Match wheel (Mach.), a cogwheel of suitable pitch to work with another wheel; specifically, one of a pair of cogwheels of equal size.  1. To be a mate or match for; to be able to complete with; to rival successfully; to equal. No settled senses of the world can match The pleasure of that madness. Shak. 2. To furnish with its match; to bring a match, or equal, against; to show an equal competitor to; to set something in competition with, or in opposition to, as equal. No history or antiquity can matchis policies and his conduct. South. 3. To oppose as equal; to contend successfully against. Eternal might To match with their inventions they presumed So easy, and of his thunder made a scorn. Milton. 4. To make or procure the equal of, or that which is exactly similar to, or corresponds with; as, to match a vase or a horse; to match cloth. "Matching of patterns and colors." Swift. 5. To make equal, proportionate, or suitable; to adapt, fit, or suit (one thing to another). Let poets match their subject to their strength. Roscommon. 6. To marry; to give in marriage. A senator of Rome survived, Would not have matched his daughter with a king. Addison. 7. To fit together, or make suitable for fitting together; specifically, to furnish with a tongue and a groove, at the edges; as, to match boards. Matching machine, a planing machine for forming a tongue or a groove on the edge of a board.  1. To be united in marriage; to mate. I hold it a sin to match in my kindred. Shak. Let tigers match with hinds, and wolves with sheep. Dryden. 2. To be of equal, or similar, size, figure, color, or quality; to tally; to suit; to correspond; as, these vases match.
speech: 1. The faculty of uttering articulate sounds or words; the faculty of expressing thoughts by words or articulate sounds; the power of speaking. There is none comparable to the variety of instructive expressions by speech, wherewith man alone is endowed for the communication of his thoughts. Holder. 2. he act of speaking; that which is spoken; words, as expressing ideas; language; conversation. Note: Speech is voice modulated by the throat, tongue, lips, etc., the modulation being accomplished by changing the form of the cavity of the mouth and nose through the action of muscles which move their walls. O goode God! how gentle and how kind Ye seemed by your speech and your visage The day that maked was our marriage. Chaucer. The acts of God . . . to human ears Can nort without process of speech be told. Milton. 3. A particular language, as distinct from others; a tongue; a dialect. People of a strange speech and of an hard language. Ezek. iii. 6. 4. Talk; mention; common saying. The duke . . . did of me demand What was the speech among the Londoners Concerning the French journey. Shak. 5. formal discourse in public; oration; harangue. The constant design of these orators, in all their speeches, was to drive some one particular point. Swift. 6. ny declaration of thoughts. I. with leave of speech implored, . . . replied. Milton. Syn. Harangue; language; address; oration. See Harangue, and Language.  To make a speech; to harangue. [R.]
find: 1. To meet with, or light upon, accidentally; to gain the first sight or knowledge of, as of something new, or unknown; hence, to fall in with, as a person. Searching the window for a flint, I found This paper, thus sealed up. Shak. In woods and forests thou art found. Cowley. 2. To learn by experience or trial; to perceive; to experience; to discover by the intellect or the feelings; to detect; to feel. "I find you passing gentle." Shak. The torrid zone is now found habitable. Cowley. 3. To come upon by seeking; as, to find something lost. (a) To discover by sounding; as, to find bottom. (b) To discover by study or experiment direct to an object or end; as, water is found to be a compound substance. (c) To gain, as the object of desire or effort; as, to find leisure; to find means. (d) To attain to; to arrive at; to acquire. Seek, and ye shall find. Matt. vii. 7. Every mountain now hath found a tongue. Byron. 4. To provide for; to supply; to furnish; as, to find food for workemen; he finds his nephew in money. Wages £14 and all found. London Times. Nothing a day and find yourself. Dickens. 5. To arrive at, as a conclusion; to determine as true; to establish; as, to find a verdict; to find a true bill (of indictment) against an accused person. To find his title with some shows of truth. Shak. To find out, to detect (a thief); to discover (a secret) -- to solve or unriddle (a parable or enigma); to understand. "Canst thou by searching find out God" Job. xi. 7. "We do hope to find out all your tricks." Milton. -- To find fault with, to blame; to censure. -- To find one's self, to be; to fare; -- often used in speaking of health; as, how do you find yourself this morning  To determine an issue of fact, and to declare such a determination to a court; as, the jury find for the plaintiff. Burrill.  Anything found; a discovery of anything valuable; especially, a deposit, discovered by archæologists, of objects of prehistoric or unknown origin.
follow: 1. To go or come after; to move behind in the same path or direction; hence, to go with (a leader, guide, etc.); to accompany; to attend. It waves me forth again; I'll follow it. Shak. 2. To endeavor to overtake; to go in pursuit of; to chase; to pursue; to prosecute. I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they shall follow them. Ex. xiv. 17. 3. To accept as authority; to adopt the opinions of; to obey; to yield to; to take as a rule of action; as, to follow good advice. Approve the best, and follow what I approve. Milton. Follow peace with all men. Heb. xii. 14. It is most agreeable to some men to follow their reason; and to others to follow their appetites. J. Edwards. 4. To copy after; to take as an example. We had rather follow the perfections of them whom we like not, than in defects resemble them whom we love. Hooker. 5. To succeed in order of time, rank, or office. 6. To result from, as an effect from a cause, or an inference from a premise. 7. To watch, as a receding object; to keep the eyes fixed upon while in motion; to keep the mind upon while in progress, as a speech, musical performance, etc.; also, to keep up with; to understand the meaning, connection, or force of, as of a course of thought or argument. He followed with his eyes the flitting shade. Dryden. 8. To walk in, as a road or course; to attend upon closely, as a profession or calling. O, had I but followed the arts! Shak. O Antony! I have followed thee to this. Shak. Follow board (Founding), a board on which the pattern and the flask lie while the sand is rammed into the flask. Knight. -- To follow the hounds, to hunt with dogs. -- To follow suit (Card Playing), to play a card of the same suit as the leading card; hence, colloquially, to follow an example set. -- To follow up, to pursue indefatigably. Syn.- To pursue; chase; go after; attend; accompany; succeed; imitate; copy; embrace; maintain. - To Follow, Pursue. To follow (v.t.) denotes simply to go after; to pursue denotes to follow with earnestness, and with a view to attain some definite object; as, a hound pursues the deer. So a person follows a companion whom he wishes to overtake on a journey; the officers of justice pursue a felon who has escaped from prison.  To go or come after; -- used in the various senses of the transitive verb: To pursue; to attend; to accompany; to be a result; to imitate. Syn.- To Follow, Succeed, Ensue. To follow (v.i.) means simply to come after; as, a crowd followed. To succeed means to come after in some regular series or succession; as, day succeeds to day, and night to night. To ensue means to follow by some established connection or principle of sequence. As wave follows wave, revolution succeeds to revolution; and nothing ensues but accumulated wretchedness.
glass: 1. A hard, brittle, translucent, and commonly transparent substance, white or colored, having a conchoidal fracture, and made by fusing together sand or silica with lime, potash, soda, or lead oxide. It is used for window panes and mirrors, for articles of table and culinary use, for lenses, and various articles of ornament. Note: Glass is variously colored by the metallic oxides; thus, manganese colors it violet; copper (cuprous), red, or (cupric) green; cobalt, blue; uranium, yellowish green or canary yellow; iron, green or brown; gold, purple or red; tin, opaque white; chromium, emerald green; antimony, yellow. 2. (Chem.)  Any substance having a peculiar glassy appearance, and a conchoidal fracture, and usually produced by fusion. 3. Anything made of glass. Especially: (a) A looking-glass; a mirror. (b) A vessel filled with running sand for measuring time; an hourglass; and hence, the time in which such a vessel is exhausted of its sand. She would not live The running of one glass. Shak. (c) A drinking vessel; a tumbler; a goblet; hence, the contents of such a vessel; especially; spirituous liquors; as, he took a glass at dinner. (d) An optical glass; a lens; a spyglass; -- in the plural, spectacles; as, a pair of glasses; he wears glasses. (e) A weatherglass; a barometer. Note: Glass is much used adjectively or in combination; as, glass maker, or glassmaker; glass making or glassmaking; glass blower or glassblower, etc. Bohemian glass, Cut glass, etc. See under Bohemian, Cut, etc. -- Crown glass, a variety of glass, used for making the finest plate or window glass, and consisting essentially of silicate of soda or potash and lime, with no admixture of lead; the convex half of an achromatic lens is composed of crown glass; -- so called from a crownlike shape given it in the process of blowing. -- Crystal glass, or Flint glass. See Flint glass, in the Vocabulary. -- Cylinder glass, sheet glass made by blowing the glass in the form of a cylinder which is then split longitudinally, opened out, and flattened. -- Glass of antimony, a vitreous oxide of antimony mixed with sulphide. -- Glass blower, one whose occupation is to blow and fashion glass. -- Glass blowing, the art of shaping glass, when reduced by heat to a viscid state, by inflating it through a tube. -- Glass cloth, a woven fabric formed of glass fibers. -- Glass coach, a coach superior to a hackney-coach, hired for the day, or any short period, as a private carriage; -- so called because originally private carriages alone had glass windows. [Eng.] Smart. Glass coaches are [allowed in English parks from which ordinary hacks are excluded], meaning by this term, which is never used in America, hired carriages that do not go on stands. J. F. Cooper. -- Glass cutter. (a) One who cuts sheets of glass into sizes for window panes, ets. (b) One who shapes the surface of glass by grinding and polishing. (c) A tool, usually with a diamond at the point, for cutting glass. -- Glass cutting. (a) The act or process of dividing glass, as sheets of glass into panes with a diamond. (b) The act or process of shaping the surface of glass by appylying it to revolving wheels, upon which sand, emery, and, afterwards, polishing powder, are applied; especially of glass which is shaped into facets, tooth ornaments, and the like. Glass having ornamental scrolls, etc., cut upon it, is said to be engraved. -- Glass metal, the fused material for making glass. -- Glass painting, the art or process of producing decorative effects in glass by painting it with enamel colors and combining the pieces together with slender sash bars of lead or other metal. In common parlance, glass painting and glass staining (see Glass staining, below) are used indifferently for all colored decorative work in windows, and the like. -- Glass paper, paper faced with pulvirezed glass, and used for abrasive purposes. -- Glass silk, fine threads of glass, wound, when in fusion, on rapidly rotating heated cylinders. -- Glass silvering, the process of transforming plate glass into mirrors by coating it with a reflecting surface, a deposit of silver, or a mercury amalgam. -- Glass soap, or Glassmaker's soap, the black oxide of manganese or other substances used by glass makers to take away color from the materials for glass. -- Glass staining, the art or practice of coloring glass in its whole substance, or, in the case of certain colors, in a superficial film only; also, decorative work in glass. Cf. Glass painting. -- Glass tears. See Rupert's drop. -- Glass works, an establishment where glass is made. -- Heavy glass, a heavy optical glass, consisting essentially of a borosilicate of potash. -- Millefiore glass. See Millefiore. -- Plate glass, a fine kind of glass, cast in thick plates, and flattened by heavy rollers, -- used for mirrors and the best windows. -- Pressed glass, glass articles formed in molds by pressure when hot. -- Soluble glass (Chem.), a silicate of sodium or potassium, found in commerce as a white, glassy mass, a stony powder, or dissolved as a viscous, sirupy liquid; -- used for rendering fabrics incombustible, for hardening artificial stone, etc.; -- called also water glass. -- Spun glass, glass drawn into a thread while liquid. -- Toughened glass, Tempered glass, glass finely tempered or annealed, by a peculiar method of sudden cooling by plunging while hot into oil, melted wax, or paraffine, etc.; -- called also, from the name of the inventor of the process, Bastie glass. -- Water glass. (Chem.) See Soluble glass, above. -- Window glass, glass in panes suitable for windows.  1. To reflect, as in a mirror; to mirror; -- used reflexively. Happy to glass themselves in such a mirror. Motley. Where the Almighty's form glasses itself in tempests. Byron. 2. To case in glass. [R.] Shak. 3. To cover or furnish with glass; to glaze. Boyle. 4. To smooth or polish anything, as leater, by rubbing it with a glass burnisher.
consonant: 1. Having agreement; congruous; consistent; according; -- usually followed by with or to. Each one pretends that his opinion . . . is consonant to the words there used. Bp. Beveridge. That where much is given shall be much required is a thing consonant with natural equity. Dr. H. More. 2. Having like sounds. Consonant words and syllables. Howell. 3. (Mus.)  harmonizing together; accordant; as, consonant tones, consonant chords. 4. Of or pertaining to consonants; made up of, or containing many, consonants. No Russian whose dissonant consonant name Almost shatters to fragments the trumpet of fame. T. Moore.  An articulate sound which in utterance is usually combined and sounded with an open sound called a vowel; a member of the spoken alphabet other than a vowel; also, a letter or character representing such a sound. Note: Consonants are divided into various classes, as mutes, spirants, sibilants, nasals, semivowels, etc. All of them are sounds uttered through a closer position of the organs than that of a vowel proper, although the most open of them, as the semivowels and nasals, are capable of being used as if vowels, and forming syllables with other closer consonants, as in the English feeble (taken ( Note: "A consonant is the result of audible friction, squeezing, or stopping of the breath in some part of the mouth (or occasionally of the throath.) The main distinction between vowels and consonants is, that while in the former the mouth configuration merely modifies the vocalized breath, which is therefore an essential element of the vowels, in consonants the narrowing or stopping of the oral passage is the foundation of the sound, and the state of the glottis is something secondary." H. Sweet.
more: A hill. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell.  A root. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. Greater; superior; increased; as: (a) Greater in quality, amount, degree, quality, and the like; with the singular. He gat more money. Chaucer. If we procure not to ourselves more woe. Milton. Note: More, in this sense, was formerly used in connection with some other qualifying word, -- a, the, this, their, etc., -- which now requires the substitution of greater, further, or the like, for more. Whilst sisters nine, which dwell on Parnasse height, Do make them music for their more delight. Spenser. The more part knew not wherefore they were come together. Acts xix. 32. Wrong not that wrong with a more contempt. Shak. (b) Greater in number; exceeding in numbers; -- with the plural. The people of the children of Israel are more and mighter than we. Ex. i. 9. 2. Additional; other; as, he wept because there were no more words to conquer. With open arms received one poet more. Pope.  1. A greater quantity, amount, or number; that which exceeds or surpasses in any way what it is compared with. And the children of Israel did so, and gathered, some more, some less. Ex. xvi. 17. 2. That which is in addition; something other and further; an additional or greater amount. They that would have more and more can never have enough. L'Estrange. O! That pang where more than madness lies. Byron. Any more. (a) Anything or something additional or further; as, I do not need any more. (b) Adverbially: Further; beyond a certain time; as, do not think any more about it. -- No more, not anything more; nothing in addition. -- The more and less, the high and low. [Obs.] Shak. "All cried, both less and more." Chaucer.  1. In a greater quantity; in or to a greater extent or degree. (a) With a verb or participle. Admiring more The riches of Heaven's pavement. Milton. (b) With an adjective or adverb (instead of the suffix -er) to form the comparative degree; as, more durable; more active; more sweetly. Happy here, and more happy hereafter. Bacon. Note: Double comparatives were common among writers of the Elizabeth period, and for some time later; as, more brighter; more dearer. The duke of Milan And his more braver daughter. Shak. 2. In addition; further; besides; again. Yet once more, Oye laurels, and once more, Ye myrtles brown, with ivy never sere, I come to pluck your berries harsh and crude. Milton. More and more, with continual increase. "Amon trespassed more and more." 2 Chron. xxxiii. 23. -- The more, to a greater degree; by an added quantity; for a reason already specified. -- The more -- the more, by how much more -- by so much more. "The more he praised in himself, the more he seems to suspect that in very deed it was not in him." Milton. -- To be no more, to have ceased to be; as, Cassius is no more; Troy is no more. Those oracles which set the world in flames, Nor ceased to burn till kingdoms were no more. Byron.  To make more; to increase. [Obs.] Gower.
expect: 1. To wait for; to await. [Obs.] Let's in, and there expect their coming. Shak. 2. To look for (mentally); to look forward to, as to something that is believed to be about to happen or come; to have a previous apprehension of, whether of good or evil; to look for with some confidence; to anticipate; -- often followed by an infinitive, sometimes by a clause (with, or without, that); as I expect to receive wages; I expect that the troops will be defeated. "Good: I will expect you." Shak. "Expecting thy reply." Shak. The Somersetshire or yellow regiment . . . was expected to arrive on the following day. Macaulay. Syn. -- To anticipate; look for; await; hope. -- To Expect, Think, Believe, Await. Expect is a mental act and has aways a reference to the future, to some coming event; as a person expects to die, or he expects to survive. Think and believe have reference to the past and present, as well as to the future; as I think the mail has arrived; I believe he came home yesterday, that he is he is at home now. There is a not uncommon use of expect, which is a confusion of the two; as, I expect the mail has arrived; I expect he is at home. This misuse should be avoided. Await is a physical or moral act. We await that which, when it comes, will affect us personally. We expect what may, or may not, interest us personally. See Anticipate.  To wait; to stay. [Obs.] Sandys.  Expectation. [Obs.] Shak.
strange: 1. Belonging to another country; foreign. "To seek strange strands." Chaucer. One of the strange queen's lords. Shak. I do not contemn the knowledge of strange and divers tongues. Ascham. 2. Of or pertaining to others; not one's own; not pertaining to one's self; not domestic. So she, impatient her own faults to see, Turns from herself, and in strange things delights. Sir J. Davies. 3. Not before known, heard, or seen; new. Here is the hand and seal of the duke; you know the character, I doubt not; and the signet is not strange to you. Shak. 4. Not according to the common way; novel; odd; unusual; irregular; extraordinary; unnatural; queer. "He is sick of a strange fever." Shak. Sated at length, erelong I might perceive Strange alteration in me. Milton. 5. Reserved; distant in deportment. Shak. She may be strange and shy at first, but will soon learn to love thee. Hawthorne. 6. Backward; slow. [Obs.] Who, loving the effect, would not be strange In favoring the cause. Beau. & Fl. 7. Not familiar; unaccustomed; inexperienced. In thy fortunes am unlearned and strange. Shak. Note: Strange is often used as an exclamation. Strange! what extremes should thus preserve the snow High on the Alps, or in deep caves below. Waller. Strange sail (Naut.), an unknown vessel. -- Strange woman (Script.), a harlot. Prov. v. 3. -- To make it strange. (a) To assume ignorance, suspicion, or alarm, concerning it. Shak. (b) To make it a matter of difficulty. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To make strange, To make one's self strange. (a) To profess ignorance or astonishment. (b) To assume the character of a stranger. Gen. xlii. 7. Syn. -- Foreign; new; outlandish; wonderful; astonishing; marvelous; unusual; odd; uncommon; irregular; queer; eccentric.  Strangely. [Obs.] Most strange, but yet most truly, will I speak. Shak.  To alienate; to estrange. [Obs.]  1. To be estranged or alienated. [Obs.] 2. To wonder; to be astonished. [Obs.] Glanvill.
create: Created; composed; begotte. [Obs.] Hearts create of duty and zeal. Shak.  1. To bring into being; to form out of nothing; to cause to exist. In the beginning, God created the heaven and the earth. Gen. i. 1. 2. To effect by the agency, and under the laws, of causation; to be the occasion of; to cause; to produce; to form or fashion; to renew. Your eye in Scotland Would create soldiers. Shak. Create in me a clean heart. Ps. li. 10. 3. To invest with a new form, office, or character; to constitute; to appoint; to make; as, to create one a peer. "I create you companions to our person." Shak.
band: 1. A fillet, strap, or any narrow ligament with which a thing is encircled, or fastened, or by which a number of things are tied, bound together, or confined; a fetter. Every one's bands were loosed. Acis xvi 26. 2. (Arch.) (a) A continuous tablet, stripe, or series of ornaments, as of carved foliage, of color, or of brickwork, etc. (b) In Gothic architecture, the molding, or suite of moldings, which encircles the pillars and small shafts. 3. That which serves as the means of union or connection between persons; a tie. "To join in Hymen's bands." Shak. 4. A linen collar or ruff worn in the 16th and 17th centuries. 5. pl.  Two strips of linen hanging from the neck in front as part of a clerical, legal, or academic dress. 6. A narrow strip of cloth or other material on any article of dress, to bind, strengthen, ornament, or complete it. "Band and gusset and seam." Hood. 7. A company of persons united in any common design, especially a body of armed men. Troops of horsemen with his bands of foot. Shak. 8. A number of musicians who play together upon portable musical instruments, especially those making a loud sound, as certain wind instruments (trumpets, clarinets, etc.), and drums, or cymbals. 9. (Bot.)  A space between elevated lines or ribs, as of the fruits of umbelliferous plants. 10. (Zoöl.)  A stripe, streak, or other mark transverse to the axis of the body. 11. (Mech.)  A belt or strap. 12. A bond [Obs.] "Thy oath and band." Shak. 13. Pledge; security. [Obs.] Spenser. Band saw, a saw in the form of an endless steel belt, with teeth on one edge, running over wheels.  1. To bind or tie with a band. 2. To mark with a band. 3. To unite in a troop, company, or confederacy. "Banded against his throne." Milton. Banded architrave, pier, shaft, etc. (Arch.), an architrave, pier, etc., of which the regular profile is interrupted by blocks or projections crossing it at right angles.  To confederate for some common purpose; to unite; to conspire together. Certain of the Jews banded together. Acts xxiii. 12.  To bandy; to drive away. [Obs.]  of Bind. [Obs.]
probable: 1. Capable of being proved. [Obs.] 2. Having more evidence for than against; supported by evidence which inclines the mind to believe, but leaves some room for doubt; likely. That is accounted probable which has better arguments producible for it than can be brought against it. South. I do not say that the principles of religion are merely probable; I have before asserted them to be morally certain. Bp. Wilkins. 3. Rendering probable; supporting, or giving ground for, belief, but not demonstrating; as, probable evidence; probable presumption. Blackstone. Probable cause (Law), a reasonable ground of presumption that a charge is, or my be, well founded. -- Probable error (of an observation, or of the mean of a number), that within which, taken positively and negatively, there is an even chance that the real error shall lie. Thus, if 3" is the probable error in a given case, the chances that the real error is greater than 3" are equal to the chances that it is less. The probable error is computed from the observations made, and is used to express their degree of accuracy. -- The probable, that which is within the bounds of probability; that which is not unnatural or preternatural; -- opposed to the marvelous.
each: 1. Every one of the two or more individuals composing a number of objects, considered separately from the rest. It is used either with or without a following noun; as, each of you or each one of you. "Each of the combatants." Fielding. Note: To each corresponds other. "Let each esteem other better than himself." Each other, used elliptically for each the other. It is our duty to assist each other; that is, it is our duty, each to assist the other, each being in the nominative and other in the objective case. It is a bad thing that men should hate each other; but it is far worse that they should contract the habit of cutting one another's throats without hatred. Macaulay. Let each His adamantine coat gird well. Milton. In each cheek appears a pretty dimple. Shak. Then draw we nearer day by day, Each to his brethren, all to God. Keble. The oak and the elm have each a distinct character. Gilpin. 2. Every; -- sometimes used interchangeably with every. Shak. I know each lane and every alley green. Milton. In short each man's happiness depends upon himself. Sterne. Note: This use of each for every, though common in Scotland and in America, is now un-English. Fitzed. Hall. Syn. -- See Every.
valley: 1. The space inclosed between ranges of hills or mountains; the strip of land at the bottom of the depressions intersecting a country, including usually the bed of a stream, with frequently broad alluvial plains on one or both sides of the stream. Also used figuratively. The valley of the shadow of death. Ps. xxiii. 4. Sweet interchange Of hill and valley, rivers, woods, and plains. Milton. Note: Deep and narrow valleys with abrupt sides are usually the results of erosion by water, and are called gorges, ravines, cañons, gulches, etc. 2. (Arch.) (a) The place of meeting of two slopes of a roof, which have their plates running in different directions, and form on the plan a reëntrant angle. (b) The depression formed by the meeting of two slopes on a flat roof. Valley board (Arch.), a board for the reception of the lead gutter in the valley of a roof. The valley board and lead gutter are not usual in the United States. -- Valley rafter, or Valley piece (Arch.), the rafter which supports the valley. -- Valley roof (Arch.), a roof having one or more valleys. See Valley, 2, above.
trade: 1. A track; a trail; a way; a path; also, passage; travel; resort. [Obs.] A postern with a blind wicket there was, A common trade to pass through Priam's house. Surrey. Hath tracted forth some salvage beastes trade. Spenser. Or, I'll be buried in the king's highway, Some way of common trade, where subjects' feet May hourly trample on their sovereign's head. Shak. 2. Course; custom; practice; occupation; employment. [Obs.] "The right trade of religion." Udall. There those five sisters had continual trade. Spenser. Long did I love this lady, Long was my travel, long my trade to win her. Massinger. Thy sin's not accidental but a trade. Shak. 3. Business of any kind; matter of mutual consideration; affair; dealing. [Obs.] Have you any further trade with us Shak. 4. Specifically: The act or business of exchanging commodities by barter, or by buying and selling for money; commerce; traffic; barter. Note: Trade comprehends every species of exchange or dealing, either in the produce of land, in manufactures, in bills, or in money; but it is chiefly used to denote the barter or purchase and sale of goods, wares, and merchandise, either by wholesale or retail. Trade is either foreign or domestic. Foreign trade consists in the exportation and importation of goods, or the exchange of the commodities of different countries. Domestic, or home, trade is the exchange, or buying and selling, of goods within a country. Trade is also by the wholesale, that is, by the package or in large quantities, generally to be sold again, or it is by retail, or in small parcels. The carrying trade is the business of transporting commodities from one country to another, or between places in the same country, by land or water. 5. The business which a person has learned, and which he engages in, for procuring subsistence, or for profit; occupation; especially, mechanical employment as distinguished from the liberal arts, the learned professions, and agriculture; as, we speak of the trade of a smith, of a carpenter, or mason, but not now of the trade of a farmer, or a lawyer, or a physician. Accursed usury was all his trade. Spenser. The homely, slighted, shepherd's trade. Milton. I will instruct thee in my trade. Shak. 6. Instruments of any occupation. [Obs.] The house and household goods, his trade of war. Dryden. 7. A company of men engaged in the same occupation; thus, booksellers and publishers speak of the customs of the trade, and are collectively designated as the trade. 8. pl.  The trade winds. 9. Refuse or rubbish from a mine. [Prov. Eng.] Syn. -- Profession; occupation; office; calling; avocation; employment; commerce; dealing; traffic. Board of trade. See under Board. -- Trade dollar. See under Dollar. -- Trade price, the price at which goods are sold to members of the same trade, or by wholesale dealers to retailers. Trade sale, an auction by and for the trade, especially that of the booksellers. -- Trade wind, a wind in the torrid zone, and often a little beyond at, which blows from the same quarter throughout the year, except when affected by local causes; -- so called because of its usefulness to navigators, and hence to trade. Note: The general direction of the trade winds is from N. E. to S. W. on the north side of the equator, and from S. E. to N. W. on the south side of the equator. They are produced by the joint effect of the rotation of the earth and the movement of the air from the polar toward the equatorial regions, to supply the vacancy caused by heating, rarefaction, and consequent ascent of the air in the latter regions. The trade winds are principally limited to two belts in the tropical regions, one on each side of the equator, and separated by a belt which is characterized by calms or variable weather.  1. To barter, or to buy and sell; to be engaged in the exchange, purchase, or sale of goods, wares, merchandise, or anything else; to traffic; to bargain; to carry on commerce as a business. A free port, where nations . . . resorted with their goods and traded. Arbuthnot. 2. To buy and sell or exchange property in a single instance. 3. To have dealings; to be concerned or associated; -- usually followed by with. How did you dare to trade and traffic with Macbeth Shak.  To sell or exchange in commerce; to barter. They traded the persons of men. Ezek. xxvii. 13. To dicker and to swop, to trade rifles and watches. Cooper.  imp. of Tread.
even: Evening. See Eve, n. 1. [Poetic.] Shak.  1. Level, smooth, or equal in surface; not rough; free from irregularities; hence uniform in rate of motion of action; as, even ground; an even speed; an even course of conduct. 2. Equable; not easily ruffed or disturbed; calm; uniformly self- possessed; as, an even temper. 3. Parallel; on a level; reaching the same limit. And shall lay thee even with the ground. Luke xix. 44. 4. Balanced; adjusted; fair; equitable; impartial; just to both side; owing nothing on either side; -- said of accounts, bargains, or persons indebted; as, our accounts are even; an even bargain. To make the even truth in pleasure flow. Shak. 5. Without an irregularity, flaw, or blemish; pure. "I know my life so even." Shak. 6. Associate; fellow; of the same condition. [Obs.] "His even servant." Wyclif (Matt. 7. Not odd; capable of division by two without a remainder; -- said of numbers; as, 4 and 10 are even numbers. Whether the number of the stars is even or odd. Jer. Taylor. On even ground, with equal advantage. -- On even keel (Naut.), in a level or horizontal position.  1. To make even or level; to level; to lay smooth. His temple Xerxes evened with the soil. Sir. W. Raleigh. It will even all inequalities Evelyn. 2. To equal [Obs.] "To even him in valor." Fuller. 3. To place in an equal state, as to obligation, or in a state in which nothing is due on either side; to balance, as accounts; to make quits. Shak. 4. To set right; to complete. 5. To act up to; to keep pace with. Shak.  To be equal. [Obs.] R. Carew.  1. In an equal or precisely similar manner; equally; precisely; just; likewise; as well. "Is it even so" Shak. Even so did these Gauls possess the coast. Spenser. 2. Up to, or down to, an unusual measure or level; so much as; fully; quite. Thou wast a soldier Even to Cato's wish. Shak. Without . . . making us even sensible of the change. Swift. 3. As might not be expected; -- serving to introduce what is unexpected or less expected. I have made several discoveries, which appear new, even to those who are versed in critical learning. Addison. 4. At the very time; in the very case. I knew they were had enough to please, even when I wrote them. Dryden. Note: Even is sometimes used to emphasize a word or phrase. "I have debated even in my soul." Shak. By these presence, even the presence of Lord Mortimer. Shak.
imagine: 1. To form in the mind a notion or idea of; to form a mental image of; to conceive; to produce by the imagination. In the night, imagining some fear, How easy is a bush supposed a bear! Shak. 2. To contrive in purpose; to scheme; to devise; to compass; to purpose. See Compass, v. t., 5. How long will ye imagine mischief against a man Ps. lxii. 3. 3. To represent to one's self; to think; to believe. Shak. Syn. -- To fancy; conceive; apprehend; think; believe; suppose; opine; deem; plan; scheme; devise.  1. To form images or conceptions; to conceive; to devise. 2. To think; to suppose. My sister is not so defenseless left As you imagine. Milton.
page: 1. A serving boy; formerly, a youth attending a person of high degree, especially at courts, as a position of honor and education; now commonly, in England, a youth employed for doin errands, waiting on the door, and similar service in households; in the United States, a boy emploed to wait upon the members of a legislative body. He had two pages of honor -- on either hand one. Bacon. 2. A boy child. [Obs.] Chaucer. 3. A contrivance, as a band, pin, snap, or the like, to hold the skirt of a woman's dress from the ground. 4. (Brickmaking.)  A track along which pallets carrying newly molded bricks are conveyed to the hack. 5. (Zoöl.)  Any one of several species of beautiful South American moths of the genus Urania.  To attend (one) as a page. [Obs.] Shak.  1. One side of a leaf of a book or manuscript. Such was the book from whose pages she sang. Longfellow. 2. Fig.: A record; a writing; as, the page of history. 3. (Print.)  The type set up for printing a page.  To mark or number the pages of, as a book or manuskript; to furnish with folios.
cloud: 1. A collection of visible vapor, or watery particles, susponded in the upper atmosphere. I do set my bow in the cloud. Gen. ix. 13. Note: A classification of clouds according to their chief forms was first proposed by the meteorologist Howard, and this is still substantially employed. The following varieties and subvarieties are recognized: (a) Cirrus. This is the most elevated of all the forms of clouds; is thin, long-drawn, sometimes looking like carded wool or hair, sometimes like a brush or room, sometimes in curl-like or fleecelike patches. It is the cat's-tail of the sailor, and the mare's-tail of the landsman. (b) Cumulus. This form appears in large masses of a hemispherical form, or nearly so, above, but flat below, one often piled above another, forming great clouds, common in the summer, and presenting the appearance of gigantic mountains crowned with snow. It often affords rain and thunder gusts. (c) Stratus. This form appears in layers or bands extending horizontally. (d) Nimbus. This form is characterized by its uniform gray tint and ragged edges; it covers the sky in seasons of continued rain, as in easterly storms, and is the proper rain cloud. The name is sometimes used to denote a raining cumulus, or cumulostratus. (e) Cirro-cumulus. This form consists, like the cirrus, of thin, broken, fleecelice clouds, but the parts are more or less rounded and regulary grouped. It is popularly called mackerel sky. (f) Cirro-stratus. In this form the patches of cirrus coalesce in long strata, between cirrus and stratus. (g) Cumulo-stratus. A form between cumulus and stratus, often assuming at the horizon a black or bluish tint. -- Fog, cloud, motionless, or nearly so, lying near or in contact with the earth's surface. -- Storm scud, cloud lying quite low, without form, and driven rapidly with the wind. 2. A mass or volume of smoke, or flying dust, resembling vapor. "A thick cloud of incense." Ezek. viii. 11. 3. A dark vein or spot on a lighter material, as in marble; hence, a blemish or defect; as, a cloud upon one's reputation; a cloud on a title. 4. That which has a dark, lowering, or threatening aspect; that which temporarily overshadows, obscures, or depresses; as, a cloud of sorrow; a cloud of war; a cloud upon the intellect. 5. A great crowd or multitude; a vast collection. "So great a cloud of witnesses." Heb. xii. 1. 6. A large, loosely-knitted scarf, worn by women about the head. Cloud on a (or the) title (Law), a defect of title, usually superficial and capable of removal by release, decision in equity, or legislation. -- To be under a cloud, to be under suspicion or in disgrace; to be in disfavor. -- In the clouds, in the realm of facy and imagination; beyond reason; visionary.  1. To overspread or hide with a cloud or clouds; as, the sky is clouded. 2. To darken or obscure, as if by hiding or enveloping with a cloud; hence, to render gloomy or sullen. One day too late, I fear me, noble lord, Hath clouded all thy happy days on earth. Shak. Be not disheartened, then, nor cloud those looks. Milton. Nothing clouds men's minds and impairs their honesty like prejudice. M. Arnold. 3. To blacken; to sully; to stain; to tarnish; to damage; -- esp. used of reputation or character. I would not be a stander-by to hear My sovereign mistress clouded so, without My present vengeance taken. Shak. 4. To mark with, or darken in, veins or sports; to variegate with colors; as, to cloud yarn. And the nice conduct of a clouded cane. Pope.  To grow cloudy; to become obscure with clouds; -- often used with up. Worthies, away! The scene begins to cloud. Shak.
phrase: 1. A brief expression, sometimes a single word, but usually two or more words forming an expression by themselves, or being a portion of a sentence; as, an adverbial phrase. "Convey" the wise it call. "Steal!" foh! a fico for the phrase. Shak. 2. A short, pithy expression; especially, one which is often employed; a peculiar or idiomatic turn of speech; as, to err is human. 3. A mode or form of speech; the manner or style in which any one expreses himself; diction; expression. "Phrases of the hearth." Tennyson. Thou speak'st In better phrase and matter than thou didst. Shak. 4. (Mus.)  A short clause or portion of a period. Note: A composition consists first of sentences, or periods; these are subdivided into sections, and these into phrases. Phrase book, a book of idiomatic phrases. J. S. Blackie.  To express in words, or in peculiar words; to call; to style. "These suns -- for so they phrase 'em." Shak.  1. To use proper or fine phrases. [R.] 2. (Mus.)  To group notes into phrases; as, he phrases well. See Phrase, n., 4.
in: The specific signification of in is situation or place with respect to surrounding, environment, encompassment, etc. It is used with verbs signifying being, resting, or moving within limits, or within circumstances or conditions of any kind conceived of as limiting, confining, or investing, either wholly or in part. In its different applications, it approaches some of the meanings of, and sometimes is interchangeable with, within, into, on, at, of, and among. It is used: -- 1. With reference to space or place; as, he lives in Boston; he traveled in Italy; castles in the air. The babe lying in a manger. Luke ii. 16. Thy sun sets weeping in the lowly west. Shak. Situated in the forty-first degree of latitude. Gibbon. Matter for censure in every page. Macaulay. 2. With reference to circumstances or conditions; as, he is in difficulties; she stood in a blaze of light. "Fettered in amorous chains." Shak. Wrapt in sweet sounds, as in bright veils. Shelley. 3. With reference to a whole which includes or comprises the part spoken of; as, the first in his family; the first regiment in the army. Nine in ten of those who enter the ministry. Swift. 4. With reference to physical surrounding, personal states, etc., abstractly denoted; as, I am in doubt; the room is in darkness; to live in fear. When shall we three meet again, In thunder, lightning, or in rain Shak. 5. With reference to character, reach, scope, or influence considered as establishing a limitation; as, to be in one's favor. "In sight of God's high throne." Milton. Sounds inharmonious in themselves, and harsh. Cowper. 6. With reference to movement or tendency toward a certain limit or environment; -- sometimes equivalent to into; as, to put seed in the ground; to fall in love; to end in death; to put our trust in God. He would not plunge his brother in despair. Addison. She had no jewels to deposit in their caskets. Fielding. 7. With reference to a limit of time; as, in an hour; it happened in the last century; in all my life. In as much as, or Inasmuch as, in the degree that; in like manner as; in consideration that; because that; since. See Synonym of Because, and cf. For as much as, under For, prep. -- In that, because; for the reason that. "Some things they do in that they are men . . . ; some things in that they are men misled and blinded with error." Hooker. -- In the name of, in behalf of; on the part of; by authority; as, it was done in the name of the people; -- often used in invocation, swearing, praying, and the like. -- To be in for it. (a) To be in favor of a thing; to be committed to a course. (b) To be unable to escape from a danger, penalty, etc. [Colloq.] -- To be (or keep) in with. (a) To be close or near; as, to keep a ship in with the land. (b) To be on terms of friendship, familiarity, or intimacy with; to secure and retain the favor of. [Colloq.] Syn. -- Into; within; on; at. See At.  1. Not out; within; inside. In, the preposition, becomes an adverb by omission of its object, leaving it as the representative of an adverbial phrase, the context indicating what the omitted object is; as, he takes in the situation (i. e., he comprehends it in his mind); the Republicans were in (i. e., in office); in at one ear and out at the other (i. e., in or into the head); his side was in (i. e., in the turn at the bat); he came in (i. e., into the house). Their vacation . . . falls in so pat with ours. Lamb. Note: The sails of a vessel are said, in nautical language, to be in when they are furled, or when stowed. In certain cases in has an adjectival sense; as, the in train (i. e., the incoming train); compare up grade, down grade, undertow, afterthought, etc. 2. (Law)  With privilege or possession; -- used to denote a holding, possession, or seisin; as, in by descent; in by purchase; in of the seisin of her husband. Burrill. In and in breeding. See under Breeding. -- In and out (Naut.), through and through; -- said of a through bolt in a ship's side. Knight. -- To be in, to be at home; as, Mrs. A. is in. -- To come in. See under Come.  1. One who is in office; -- the opposite of Ant: out. 2. A reëntrant angle; a nook or corner. Ins and outs, nooks and corners; twists and turns. All the ins and outs of this neighborhood. D. Jerrold.  To inclose; to take in; to harvest. [Obs.] He that ears my land spares my team and gives me leave to in the crop. Shak.
shoe: 1. A covering for the human foot, usually made of leather, having a thick and somewhat stiff sole and a lighter top. It differs from a boot on not extending so far up the leg. Your hose should be ungartered, . . . yourshoe untied. Shak. Spare none but such as go in clouted shoon. Shak. 2. Anything resembling a shoe in form, position, or use. Specifically: (a) A plate or rim of iron nailed to the hoof of an animal to defend it from injury. (b) A band of iron or steel, or a ship of wood, fastened to the bottom of the runner of a sleigh, or any vehicle which slides on the snow. (c) A drag, or sliding piece of wood or iron, placed under the wheel of a loaded vehicle, to retard its motion in going down a hill. (d) The part of a railroad car brake which presses upon the wheel to retard its motion. (e) (Arch.) A trough-shaped or spout-shaped member, put at the bottom of the water leader coming from the eaves gutter, so as to throw the water off from the building. (f) (Milling.) The trough or spout for conveying the grain from the hopper to the eye of the millstone. (g) An inclined trough in an ore-crushing mill. (h) An iron socket or plate to take the thrust of a strut or rafter. (i) An iron socket to protect the point of a wooden pile. (j) (Mach.) A plate, or notched piece, interposed between a moving part and the stationary part on which it bears, to take the wear and afford means of adjustment; -- called also slipper, and gib. Note: Shoe is often used adjectively, or in composition; as, shoe buckle, or shoe-buckle; shoe latchet, or shoe-latchet; shoe leathet, or shoe-leather; shoe string, shoe-string, or shoestring. Shoe of an anchor. (Naut.) (a) A small block of wood, convex on the back, with a hole to receive the point of the anchor fluke, -- used to prevent the anchor from tearing the planks of the vessel when raised or lowered. (b) A broad, triangular piece of plank placed upon the fluke to give it a better hold in soft ground. -- Shoe block (Naut.), a block with two sheaves, one above the other, and at right angles to each other. -- Shoe bolt, a bolt with a flaring head, for fastening shoes on sleigh runners. -- Shoe pac, a kind of moccasin. See Pac. -- Shoe stone, a sharpening stone used by shoemakers and other workers in leather.  1. To furnish with a shoe or shoes; to put a shoe or shoes on; as, to shoe a horse, a sled, an anchor. 2. To protect or ornament with something which serves the purpose of a shoe; to tip. The sharp and small end of the billiard stick, which is shod with brass or silver. Evelyn.
send: 1. To cause to go in any manner; to dispatch; to commission or direct to go; as, to send a messenger. I have not sent these prophets, yet they ran. Jer. xxiii. 21. I proceeded forth and came from God; neither came I of myself, but he sent me. John viii. 42. Servants, sent on messages, stay out somewhat longer than the message requires. Swift. 2. To give motion to; to cause to be borne or carried; to procure the going, transmission, or delivery of; as, to send a message. He . . . sent letters by posts on horseback. Esther viii. 10. O send out thy light an thy truth; let them lead me. Ps. xliii. 3. 3. To emit; to impel; to cast; to throw; to hurl; as, to send a ball, an arrow, or the like. 4. To cause to be or to happen; to bestow; to inflict; to grant; -- sometimes followed by a dependent proposition. "God send him well!" Shak. The Lord shall send upon thee cursing, vexation, and rebuke. Deut. xxviii. 20. And sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust. Matt. v. 45. God send your mission may bring back peace. Sir W. Scott.  1. To dispatch an agent or messenger to convey a message, or to do an errand. See ye how this son of a murderer hath sent to take away my head 2 Kings vi. 32. 2. (Naut.)  To pitch; as, the ship sends forward so violently as to endanger her masts. Totten. To send for, to request or require by message to come or be brought.  The impulse of a wave by which a vessel is carried bodily. [Written also scend.] W. C. Russell. "The send of the sea". Longfellow.
product: 1. Anything that is produced, whether as the result of generation, growth, labor, or thought, or by the operation of involuntary causes; as, the products of the season, or of the farm; the products of manufactures; the products of the brain. There are the product Of those ill-mated marriages. Milton. These institutions are the products of enthusiasm. Burke. 2. (Math.)  The number or sum obtained by adding one number or quantity to itself as many times as there are units in another number; the number resulting from the multiplication of two or more numbers; as, the product of the multiplication of 7 by 5 is 35. In general, the result of any kind of multiplication. See the Note under Multiplication. Syn. -- Produce; production; fruit; result; effect; consequence; outcome; work; performance.  1. To produce; to bring forward. "Producted to . . . examination." [Obs.] Foxe. 2. To lengthen out; to extend. [Obs.] He that doth much . . . products his mortality. Hackett. 3. To produce; to make. [Obs.] Holinshed.
touch: 1. To come in contact with; to hit or strike lightly against; to extend the hand, foot, or the like, so as to reach or rest on. Him thus intent Ithuriel with his spear Touched lightly. Milton. 2. To perceive by the sense of feeling. Nothing but body can be touched or touch. Greech. 3. To come to; to reach; to attain to. The god, vindictive, doomed them never more-Ah, men unblessed! -- to touch their natal shore. Pope. 4. To try; to prove, as with a touchstone. [Obs.] Wherein I mean to touch your love indeed. Shak. 5. To relate to; to concern; to affect. The quarrel toucheth none but us alone. Shak. 6. To handle, speak of, or deal with; to treat of. Storial thing that toucheth gentilesse. Chaucer. 7. To meddle or interfere with; as, I have not touched the books. Pope. 8. To affect the senses or the sensibility of; to move; to melt; to soften. What of sweet before Hath touched my sense, flat seems to this and harsh. Milton. The tender sire was touched with what he said. Addison. 9. To mark or delineate with touches; to add a slight stroke to with the pencil or brush. The lines, though touched but faintly, are drawn right. Pope. 10. To infect; to affect slightly. Bacon. 11. To make an impression on; to have effect upon. Its face . . . so hard that a file will not touch it. Moxon. 12. To strike; to manipulate; to play on; as, to touch an instrument of music. [They] touched their golden harps. Milton. 13. To perform, as a tune; to play. A person is the royal retinue touched a light and lively air on the flageolet. Sir W. Scott. 14. To influence by impulse; to impel forcibly. " No decree of mine, . . . [to] touch with lightest moment of impulse his free will," Milton. 15. To harm, afflict, or distress. Let us make a covenant with thee, that thou wilt do us no hurt, as we have not touched thee. Gen. xxvi. 28, 29. 16. To affect with insanity, especially in a slight degree; to make partially insane; -- rarely used except in the past participle. She feared his head was a little touched. Ld. Lytton. 17. (Geom.)  To be tangent to. See Tangent, a. 18. To lay a hand upon for curing disease. To touch a sail (Naut.), to bring it so close to the wind that its weather leech shakes. -- To touch the wind (Naut.), to keep the ship as near the wind as possible. -- To touch up, to repair; to improve by touches or emendation.  1. To be in contact; to be in a state of junction, so that no space is between; as, two spheres touch only at points. Johnson. 2. To fasten; to take effect; to make impression. [R.] Strong waters pierce metals, and will touch upon gold, that will not touch upon silver. Bacon. 3. To treat anything in discourse, especially in a slight or casual manner; -- often with on or upon. If the antiquaries have touched upon it, they immediately quitted it. Addison. 4. (Naut)  To be brought, as a sail, so close to the wind that its weather leech shakes. To touch and go (Naut.), to touch bottom lightly and without damage, as a vessel in motion. -- To touch at, to come or go to, without tarrying; as, the ship touched at Lisbon. -- To touch on or upon, to come or go to for a short time. [R.] I made a little voyage round the lake, and touched on the several towns that lie on its coasts. Addison.  1. The act of touching, or the state of being touched; contact. Their touch affrights me as a serpent's sting. Shak. 2. (Physiol.)  The sense by which pressure or traction exerted on the skin is recognized; the sense by which the properties of bodies are determined by contact; the tactile sense. See Tactile sense, under Tactile. The spider's touch, how exquisitely fine. Pope. Note: Pure tactile feelings are necessarily rare, since temperature sensations and muscular sensations are more or less combined with them. The organs of touch are found chiefly in the epidermis of the skin and certain underlying nervous structures. 3. Act or power of exciting emotion. Not alone The death of Fulvia, with more urgent touches, Do strongly speak to us. Shak. 4. An emotion or affection. A true, natural, and a sensible touch of mercy. Hooker. 5. Personal reference or application. [Obs.] Speech of touch toward others should be sparingly used. Bacon. 6. A stroke; as, a touch of raillery; a satiric touch; hence, animadversion; censure; reproof. I never bare any touch of conscience with greater regret. Eikon Basilike. 7. A single stroke on a drawing or a picture. Never give the least touch with your pencil till you have well examined your design. Dryden. 8. Feature; lineament; trait. Of many faces, eyes, and hearts, To have the touches dearest prized. Shak. 9. The act of the hand on a musical instrument; bence, in the plural, musical notes. Soft stillness and the night Become the touches of sweet harmony. Shak. 10. A small quantity intermixed; a little; a dash. Eyes La touch of Sir Peter Lely in them. Hazlitt. Madam, I have a touch of your condition. Shak. 11. A hint; a suggestion; slight notice. A small touch will put him in mind of them. Bacon. 12. A slight and brief essay. [Colloq.] Print my preface in such form as, in the booksellers' phrase, will make a sixpenny touch. Swift. 13. A touchstone; hence, stone of the sort used for touchstone. [Obs.] " Now do I play the touch." Shak. A neat new monument of touch and alabaster. Fuller. 14. Hence, examination or trial by some decisive standard; test; proof; tried quality. Equity, the true touch of all laws. Carew. Friends of noble touch . Shak. 15. (Mus.)  The particular or characteristic mode of action, or the resistance of the keys of an instrument to the fingers; as, a heavy touch, or a light touch, also, the manner of touching, striking, or pressing the keys of a piano; as, a legato touch; a staccato touch. 16. (Shipbilding)  The broadest part of a plank worked top and but (see Top and but, under Top, n.), or of one worked anchor-stock fashion (that is, tapered from the middle to both ends); also, the angles of the stern timbers at the counters. J. Knowles. 17. (Football)  That part of the field which is beyond the line of flags on either side. Encyc. of Rural Sports. 18. A boys' game; tag. In touch (Football), outside of bounds. T. Hughes. -- To be in touch, to be in contact, or in sympathy. -- To keep touch. (a) To be true or punctual to a promise or engagement [Obs.]; hence, to fulfill duly a function. My mind and senses keep touch and time. Sir W. Scott. (b) To keep in contact; to maintain connection or sympathy;-with with or of. -- Touch and go, a phrase descriptive of a narrow escape. -- True as touch (i.e., touchstone), quite true. [Obs.]
round: To whisper. [obs.] Shak. Holland. The Bishop of Glasgow rounding in his ear, "Ye are not a wise man," . . . he rounded likewise to the bishop, and said, "Wherefore brought ye me here" Calderwood.  1. Having every portion of the surface or of the circumference equally distant from the center; spherical; circular; having a form approaching a spherical or a circular shape; orbicular; globular; as, a round ball. "The big, round tears." Shak. Upon the firm opacous globe Of this round world. Milton. 2. Having the form of a cylinder; cylindrical; as, the barrel of a musket is round. 3. Having a curved outline or form; especially, one like the arc of a circle or an ellipse, or a portion of the surface of a sphere; rotund; bulging; protuberant; not angular or pointed; as, a round arch; round hills. "Their round haunches gored." Shak. 4. Full; complete; not broken; not fractional; approximately in even units, tens, hundreds, thousands, etc.; -- said of numbers. Pliny put a round number near the truth, rather than the fraction. Arbuthnot. 5. Not inconsiderable; large; hence, generous; free; as, a round price. Three thousand ducats; 'tis a good round sum. Shak. Round was their pace at first, but slackened soon. Tennyson. 6. Uttered or emitted with a full tone; as, a round voice; a round note. 7. (Phonetics)  Modified, as a vowel, by contraction of the lip opening, making the opening more or less round in shape; rounded; labialized; labial. See Guide to Pronunciation, § 11. 8. Outspoken; plain and direct; unreserved; unqualified; not mincing; as, a round answer; a round oath. "The round assertion." M. Arnold. Sir Toby, I must be round with you. Shak. 9. Full and smoothly expanded; not defective or abrupt; finished; polished; -- said of style, or of authors with reference to their style. [Obs.] In his satires Horace is quick, round, and pleasant. Peacham. 10. Complete and consistent; fair; just; -- applied to conduct. Round dealing is the honor of man's nature. Bacon. At a round rate, rapidly. Dryden. -- In round numbers, approximately in even units, tens, hundreds, etc.; as, a bin holding 99 or 101 bushels may be said to hold in round numbers 100 bushels. -- Round bodies (Geom.), the sphere right cone, and right cylinder. -- Round clam (Zoöl.), the quahog. -- Round dance one which is danced by couples with a whirling or revolving motion, as the waltz, polka, etc. -- Round game, a game, as of cards, in which each plays on his own account. -- Round hand, a style of penmanship in which the letters are formed in nearly an upright position, and each separately distinct; -- distinguished from running hand. -- Round robin. Etym: [Perhaps F. round round + ruban ribbon.] (a) A written petition, memorial, remonstrance, protest, etc., the signatures to which are made in a circle so as not to indicate who signed first. "No round robins signed by the whole main deck of the Academy or the Porch." De Quincey. (b) (Zoöl.) The cigar fish. -- Round shot, a solid spherical projectile for ordnance. -- Round Table, the table about which sat King Arthur and his knights. See Knights of the Round Table, under Knight. -- Round tower, one of certain lofty circular stone towers, tapering from the base upward, and usually having a conical cap or roof, which crowns the summit, -- found chiefly in Ireland. They are of great antiquity, and vary in heigh from thirty-five to one hundred and thiry feet. -- Round trot, one in which the horse throws out his feet roundly; a full, brisk, quick trot. Addison. -- Round turn (Naut.), one turn of a rope round a timber, a belaying pin, etc. -- To bring up with a round turn, to stop abruptly. [Colloq.] Syn. -- Circular; spherical; globular; globase; orbicular; orbed; cylindrical; full; plump; rotund.  1. Anything round, as a circle, round" [the crown]. Shak. In labyrinth of many a round self-rolled. Milton. 2. A series of changes or events ending where it began; a series of like events recurring in continuance; a cycle; a periodical revolution; as, the round of the seasons; a round of pleasures. 3. A course of action or conduct performed by a number of persons in turn, or one after another, as if seated in a circle. Women to cards may be compared: we play A round or two; which used, we throw away. Granville. The feast was served; the bowl was crowned; To the king's pleasure went the mirthful round. Prior. 4. A series of duties or tasks which must be performed in turn, and then repeated. the trivial round, the common task. Keble. 5. A circular dance. Come, knit hands, and beat the ground, In a light fantastic round. Milton. 6. That which goes round a whole circle or company; as, a round of applause. 7. Rotation, as in office; succession. Holyday. 8. The step of a ladder; a rundle or rung; also, a crosspiece which joins and braces the legs of a chair. All the rounds like Jacob's ladder rise. Dryden. 9. A course ending where it began; a circuit; a beat; especially, one freguently or regulary traversed; also, the act of traversing a circuit; as, a watchman's round; the rounds of the postman. 10. (Mil.) (a) A walk performed by a guard or an officer round the rampart of a garrison, or among sentinels, to see that the sentinels are faithful and all things safe; also, the guard or officer, with his attendants, who performs this duty; -- usually in the plural. (b) A general discharge of firearms by a body of troops in which each soldier fires once. (c) Ammunition for discharging a piece or pieces once; as, twenty rounds of ammunition were given out. 11. (Mus.)  A short vocal piece, resembling a catch in which three or four voices follow each other round in a species of canon in the unison. 12. The time during which prize fighters or boxers are in actual contest without an intermission, as prescribed by their rules; a bout. 13. A brewer's vessel in which the fermentation is concluded, the yeast escaping through the bunghole. 14. A vessel filled, as for drinking. [R.] 15. An assembly; a group; a circle; as, a round of politicians. Addison. 16. (Naut.)  See Roundtop. 17. Same as Round of beef, below. Gentlemen of the round. (a) Gentlemen soldiers of low rank who made the rounds. See 10 (a), above. (b) Disbanded soldiers who lived by begging. [Obs.] Worm-eaten gentlemen of the round, such as have vowed to sit on the skirts of the city, let your provost and his half dozen of halberdiers do what they can. B. Jonson. -- Round of beef, the part of the thigh below the aitchbone, or between the rump and the leg. See Illust. of beef. -- Round steak, a beefsteak cut from the round. -- Sculpture in the round, sculpture giving the full form, as of man; statuary, distinguished from relief.  1. On all sides; around. Round he throws his baleful eyes. Milton. 2. Circularly; in a circular form or manner; by revolving or reversing one's position; as, to turn one's head round; a wheel turns round. 3. In circumference; as, a ball is ten inches round. 4. From one side or party to another; as to come or turn round, -- that is, to change sides or opinions. 5. By or in a circuit; by a course longer than the direct course; back to the starting point. 6. Through a circle, as of friends or houses. The invitations were sent round accordingly. Sir W. Scott. 7. Roundly; fully; vigorously. [Obs.] Chaucer. All round, over the whole place; in every direction. -- All-round, of general capacity; as, an all-round man. [Colloq.] - - To bring one round. (a) To cause one to change his opinions or line of conduct. (b) To restore one to health. [Colloq.]  On every side of, so as to encompass or encircle; around; about; as, the people atood round him; to go round the city; to wind a cable round a windlass. The serpent Error twines round human hearts. Cowper. Round about, an emphatic form for round or about. "Moses . . . set them [The elders] round about the tabernacle." Num. xi. 24. -- To come round, to gain the consent of, or circumvent, (a person) by flattery or deception. [Colloq.]  1. To make circular, spherical, or cylindrical; to give a round or convex figure to; as, to round a silver coin; to round the edges of anything. Worms with many feet, which round themselves into balls, are bred chiefly under logs of timber. Bacon. The figures on our modern medals are raised and rounded to a very great perfection. Addison. 2. To surround; to encircle; to encompass. The inclusive verge Of golden metal that must round my brow. Shak. 3. To bring to fullness or completeness; to complete; hence, to bring to a fit conclusion. We are such stuff As dreams are made on, and our little life Is rounded with a sleep. Shak. 4. To go round wholly or in part; to go about (a corner or point); as, to round a corner; to round Cape Horn. 5. To make full, smooth, and flowing; as, to round periods in writing. Swift. To round in (Naut.) To haul up; usually, to haul the slack of (a rope) through its leading block, or to haul up (a tackle which hangs loose) by its fall. Totten. (b) To collect together (cattle) by riding around them, as on cattle ranches. [Western U.S.]  1. To grow round or full; hence, to attain to fullness, completeness, or perfection. The queen your mother rounds apace. Shak. So rounds he to a separate mind, From whence clear memory may begin. Tennyson. 2. To go round, as a guard. [Poetic] They . . . nightly rounding walk. Milton. 3. To go or turn round; to wheel about. Tennyson. To round to (Naut.), to turn the head of a ship toward the wind.
wild: 1. Living in a state of nature; inhabiting natural haunts, as the forest or open field; not familiar with, or not easily approached by, man; not tamed or domesticated; as, a wild boar; a wild ox; a wild cat. Winter's not gone yet, if the wild geese fly that way. Shak. 2. Growing or produced without culture; growing or prepared without the aid and care of man; native; not cultivated; brought forth by unassisted nature or by animals not domesticated; as, wild parsnip, wild camomile, wild strawberry, wild honey. The woods and desert caves, With wild thyme and gadding vine o'ergrown. Milton. 3. Desert; not inhabited or cultivated; as, wild land. "To trace the forests wild." Shak. 4. Savage; uncivilized; not refined by culture; ferocious; rude; as, wild natives of Africa or America. 5. Not submitted to restraint, training, or regulation; turbulent; tempestuous; violent; ungoverned; licentious; inordinate; disorderly; irregular; fanciful; imaginary; visionary; crazy. "Valor grown wild by pride." Prior. "A wild, speculative project." Swift. What are these So withered and so wild in their attire Shak. With mountains, as with weapons, armed; which makes Wild work in heaven. Milton. The wild winds howl. Addison. Search then the ruling passion, there, alone The wild are constant, and the cunning known. Pope. 6. Exposed to the wind and sea; unsheltered; as, a wild roadstead. 7. Indicating strong emotion, intense excitement, or as, a wild look. 8. (Naut.)  Hard to steer; -- said of a vessel. Note: Many plants are named by prefixing wild to the names of other better known or cultivated plants to which they a bear a real or fancied resemblance; as, wild allspice, wild pink, etc. See the Phrases below. To run wild, to go unrestrained or untamed; to live or untamed; to live or grow without culture or training. -- To sow one's wild oats. See under Oat. Wild allspice. (Bot.), spicewood. -- Wild balsam apple (Bot.), an American climbing cucurbitaceous plant (Echinocystis lobata). -- Wild basil (Bot.), a fragrant labiate herb (Calamintha Clinopodium) common in Europe and America. -- Wild bean (Bot.), a name of several leguminous plants, mostly species of Phaseolus and Apios. -- Wild bee (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of undomesticated social bees, especially the domestic bee when it has escaped from domestication and built its nest in a hollow tree or among rocks. -- Wild bergamot. (Bot.) See under Bergamot. -- Wild boar (Zoöl.), the European wild hog (Sus scrofa), from which the common domesticated swine is descended. -- Wild brier (Bot.), any uncultivated species of brier. See Brier. -- Wild bugloss (Bot.), an annual rough-leaved plant (Lycopsis arvensis) with small blue flowers. -- Wild camomile (Bot.), one or more plants of the composite genus Matricaria, much resembling camomile. -- Wild cat. (Zoöl.) (a) A European carnivore (Felis catus) somewhat resembling the domestic cat, but larger stronger, and having a short tail. It is destructive to the smaller domestic animals, such as lambs, kids, poultry, and the like. (b) The common American lynx, or bay lynx. (c) (Naut.) A wheel which can be adjusted so as to revolve either with, or on, the shaft of a capstan. Luce. -- Wild celery. (Bot.) See Tape grass, under Tape. -- Wild cherry. (Bot.) (a) Any uncultivated tree which bears cherries. The wild red cherry is Prunus Pennsylvanica. The wild black cherry is P. serotina, the wood of which is much used for cabinetwork, being of a light red color and a compact texture. (b) The fruit of various species of Prunus. -- Wild cinnamon. See the Note under Canella. -- Wild comfrey (Bot.), an American plant (Cynoglossum Virginicum) of the Borage family. It has large bristly leaves and small blue flowers. -- Wild cumin (Bot.), an annual umbelliferous plant (Lagoecia cuminoides) native in the countries about the Mediterranean. -- Wild drake (Zoöl.) the mallard. -- Wild elder (Bot.), an American plant (Aralia hispida) of the Ginseng family. -- Wild fowl (Zoöl.) any wild bird, especially any of those considered as game birds. -- Wild goose (Zoöl.), any one of several species of undomesticated geese, especially the Canada goose (Branta Canadensis), the European bean goose, and the graylag. See Graylag, and Bean goose, under Bean. -- Wild goose chase, the pursuit of something unattainable, or of something as unlikely to be caught as the wild goose. Shak. -- Wild honey, honey made by wild bees, and deposited in trees, rocks, the like. -- Wild hyacinth. (Bot.) See Hyacinth, 1 (b). Wild Irishman (Bot.), a thorny bush (Discaria Toumatou) of the Buckthorn family, found in New Zealand, where the natives use the spines in tattooing. -- Wild land. (a) Land not cultivated, or in a state that renders it unfit for cultivation. (b) Land which is not settled and cultivated. -- Wild licorice. (Bot.) See under Licorice. -- Wild mammee (Bot.), the oblong, yellowish, acid fruit of a tropical American tree (Rheedia lateriflora); -- so called in the West Indies. -- Wild marjoram (Bot.), a labiate plant (Origanum vulgare) much like the sweet marjoram, but less aromatic. -- Wild oat. (Bot.) (a) A tall, oatlike kind of soft grass (Arrhenatherum avenaceum). (b) See Wild oats, under Oat. -- Wild pieplant (Bot.), a species of dock (Rumex hymenosepalus) found from Texas to California. Its acid, juicy stems are used as a substitute for the garden rhubarb. -- Wild pigeon. (Zoöl.) (a) The rock dove. (b) The passenger pigeon. -- Wild pink (Bot.), an American plant (Silene Pennsylvanica) with pale, pinkish flowers; a kind of catchfly. -- Wild plantain (Bot.), an arborescent endogenous herb (Heliconia Bihai), much resembling the banana. Its leaves and leaf sheaths are much used in the West Indies as coverings for packages of merchandise. -- Wild plum. (Bot.) (a) Any kind of plum growing without cultivation. (b) The South African prune. See under Prune. -- Wild rice. (Bot.) See Indian rice, under Rice. -- Wild rosemary (Bot.), the evergreen shrub Andromeda polifolia. See Marsh rosemary, under Rosemary. -- Wild sage. (Bot.) See Sagebrush. -- Wild sarsaparilla (Bot.), a species of ginseng (Aralia nudicaulis) bearing a single long-stalked leaf. -- Wild sensitive plant (Bot.), either one of two annual leguminous herbs (Cassia Chamæcrista, and C. nictitans), in both of which the leaflets close quickly when the plant is disturbed. -- Wild service.(Bot.) See Sorb. -- Wild Spaniard (Bot.), any one of several umbelliferous plants of the genus Aciphylla, natives of New Zealand. The leaves bear numerous bayonetlike spines, and the plants form an impenetrable thicket. -- Wild turkey. (Zoöl.) See 2d Turkey.  An uninhabited and uncultivated tract or region; a forest or desert; a wilderness; a waste; as, the wilds of America; the wilds of Africa. then Libya first, of all her moisture drained, Became a barren waste, a wild of sand. Addison.  Wildly; as, to talk wild. Shak.
he: 1. The man or male being (or object personified to which the masculine gender is assigned), previously designated; a pronoun of the masculine gender, usually referring to a specified subject already indicated. Thy desire shall be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee. Gen. iii. 16. Thou shalt fear the Lord thy God; him shalt thou serve. Deut. x. 20. 2. Any one; the man or person; -- used indefinitely, and usually followed by a relative pronoun. He that walketh with wise men shall be wise. Prov. xiii. 20. 3. Man; a male; any male person; -- in this sense used substantively. Chaucer. I stand to answer thee, Or any he, the proudest of thy sort. Shak. Note: When a collective noun or a class is referred to, he is of common gender. In early English, he referred to a feminine or neuter noun, or to one in the plural, as well as to noun in the masculine singular. In composition, he denotes a male animal; as, a he-goat.
hair: 1. The collection or mass of filaments growing from the skin of an animal, and forming a covering for a part of the head or for any part or the whole of the body. 2. One the above-mentioned filaments, consisting, in invertebrate animals, of a long, tubular part which is free and flexible, and a bulbous root imbedded in the skin. Then read he me how Sampson lost his hairs. Chaucer. And draweth new delights with hoary hairs. Spenser. 3. Hair (human or animal) used for various purposes; as, hair for stuffing cushions. 4. (Zoöl.)  A slender outgrowth from the chitinous cuticle of insects, spiders, crustaceans, and other invertebrates. Such hairs are totally unlike those of vertebrates in structure, composition, and mode of growth. 5. An outgrowth of the epidermis, consisting of one or of several cells, whether pointed, hooked, knobbed, or stellated. Internal hairs occur in the flower stalk of the yellow frog lily (Nuphar). 6. A spring device used in a hair-trigger firearm. 7. A haircloth. [Obc.] Chaucer. 8. Any very small distance, or degree; a hairbreadth. Note: Hairs is often used adjectively or in combination; as, hairbrush or hair brush, hair dye, hair oil, hairpin, hair powder, a brush, a dye, etc., for the hair. Against the hair, in a rough and disagreeable manner; against the grain. [Obs.] "You go against the hair of your professions." Shak. -- Hair bracket (Ship Carp.), a molding which comes in at the back of, or runs aft from, the figurehead. -- Hair cells (Anat.), cells with hairlike processes in the sensory epithelium of certain parts of the internal ear. -- Hair compass, Hair divider, a compass or divider capable of delicate adjustment by means of a screw. -- Hair glove, a glove of horsehair for rubbing the skin. -- Hair lace, a netted fillet for tying up the hair of the head. Swift. -- Hair line, a line made of hair; a very slender line. -- Hair moth (Zoöl.), any moth which destroys goods made of hair, esp. Tinea biselliella. -- Hair pencil, a brush or fine hair, for painting; -- generally called by the name of the hair used; as, a camel's hair pencil, a sable's hair pencil, etc. -- Hair plate, an iron plate forming the back of the hearth of a bloomery fire. -- Hair powder, a white perfumed powder, as of flour or starch, formerly much used for sprinkling on the hair of the head, or on wigs. -- Hair seal (Zoöl.), any one of several species of eared seals which do not produce fur; a sea lion. -- Hair seating, haircloth for seats of chairs, etc. -- Hair shirt, a shirt, or a band for the loins, made of horsehair, and worn as a penance. -- Hair sieve, a strainer with a haircloth bottom. -- Hair snake. See Gordius. -- Hair space (Printing), the thinnest metal space used in lines of type. -- Hair stroke, a delicate stroke in writing. -- Hair trigger, a trigger so constructed as to discharge a firearm by a very slight pressure, as by the touch of a hair. Farrow. -- Not worth a hair, of no value. -- To a hair, with the nicest distinction. -- To split hairs, to make distinctions of useless nicety.
sand: 1. Fine particles of stone, esp. of siliceous stone, but not reduced to dust; comminuted stone in the form of loose grains, which are not coherent when wet. That finer matter, called sand, is no other than very small pebbles. Woodsward. 2. A single particle of such stone. [R.] Shak. 3. The sand in the hourglass; hence, a moment or interval of time; the term or extent of one's life. The sands are numbered that make up my life. Shak. 4. pl.  Tracts of land consisting of sand, like the deserts of Arabia and Africa; also, extensive tracts of sand exposed by the ebb of the tide. "The Libyan sands." Milton. "The sands o'Dee." C. Kingsley. 5. Courage; pluck; grit. [Slang] Sand badger (Zoöl.), the Japanese badger (Meles ankuma). -- Sand bag (a) A bag filled with sand or earth, used for various purposes, as in fortification, for ballast, etc. (b) A long bag filled with sand, used as a club by assassins. -- Sand ball, soap mixed with sand, made into a ball for use at the toilet. -- Sand bath. (a) (Chem.) A vessel of hot sand in a laboratory, in which vessels that are to be heated are partially immersed. (b) A bath in which the body is immersed in hot sand. -- Sand bed, a thick layer of sand, whether deposited naturally or artificially; specifically, a thick layer of sand into which molten metal is run in casting, or from a reducing furnace. -- Sand birds (Zoöl.), a collective name for numerous species of limicoline birds, such as the sandpipers, plovers, tattlers, and many others; -- called also shore birds. -- Sand blast, a process of engraving and cutting glass and other hard substances by driving sand against them by a steam jet or otherwise; also, the apparatus used in the process. -- Sand box. (a) A box with a perforated top or cover, for sprinkling paper with sand. (b) A box carried on locomotives, from which sand runs on the rails in front of the driving wheel, to prevent slipping. -- Sand-box tree (Bot.), a tropical American tree (Hura crepitans). Its fruit is a depressed many-celled woody capsule which, when completely dry, bursts with a loud report and scatters the seeds. See Illust. of Regma. -- Sand bug (Zoöl.), an American anomuran crustacean (Hippa talpoidea) which burrows in sandy seabeaches. It is often used as bait by fishermen. See Illust. under Anomura. -- Sand canal (Zoöl.), a tubular vessel having a calcareous coating, and connecting the oral ambulacral ring with the madreporic tubercle. It appears to be excretory in function. -- Sand cock (Zoöl.), the redshank. [Prov. Eng.] -- Sand collar. (Zoöl.) Same as Sand saucer, below. -- Sand crab. (Zoöl.) (a) The lady crab. (b) A land crab, or ocypodian. -- Sand crack (Far.), a crack extending downward from the coronet, in the wall of a horse's hoof, which often causes lameness. -- Sand cricket (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large terrestrial crickets of the genus Stenophelmatus and allied genera, native of the sandy plains of the Western United States. -- Sand cusk (Zoöl.), any ophidiod fish. See Illust. under Ophidiod. -- Sand dab (Zoöl.), a small American flounder (Limanda ferruginea); -- called also rusty dab. The name is also applied locally to other allied species. -- Sand darter (Zoöl.), a small etheostomoid fish of the Ohio valley (Ammocrypta pellucida). -- Sand dollar (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small flat circular sea urchins, which live on sandy bottoms, especially Echinarachnius parma of the American coast. -- Sand drift, drifting sand; also, a mound or bank of drifted sand. -- Sand eel. (Zoöl.) (a) A lant, or launce. (b) A slender Pacific Ocean fish of the genus Gonorhynchus, having barbels about the mouth. -- Sand flag, sandstone which splits up into flagstones. -- Sand flea. (Zoöl.) (a) Any species of flea which inhabits, or breeds in, sandy places, especially the common dog flea. (b) the chigoe. (c) Any leaping amphipod crustacean; a beach flea, or orchestian. See Beach flea, under Beach. -- Sand flood, a vast body of sand borne along by the wind. James Bruce. -- Sand fluke. (Zoöl.) (a) The sandnecker. (b) The European smooth dab (Pleuronectes microcephalus); -- called also kitt, marysole, smear dab, town dab. -- Sand fly (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small dipterous flies of the genus Simulium, abounding on sandy shores, especially Simulium nocivum of the United States. They are very troublesome on account of their biting habits. Called also no-see-um, punky, and midge. -- Sand gall (Geol.) See Sand pipe, below. -- Sand grass (Bot.), any species of grass which grows in sand; especially, a tufted grass (Triplasis purpurea) with numerous bearded joints, and acid awl-shaped leaves, growing on the Atlantic coast. -- Sand grouse (Zoöl.), any one of many species of Old World birds belonging to the suborder Pterocletes, and resembling both grouse and pigeons. Called also rock grouse, rock pigeon, and ganga. They mostly belong to the genus Pterocles, as the common Indian species (P. exustus). The large sand grouse (P. arenarius), the painted sand grouse (P. fasciatus), and the pintail sand grouse (P. alchata) are also found in India. See Illust. under Pterocletes. -- Sand hill, a hill of sand; a dune. -- Sand-hill crane (Zoöl.), the American brown crane (Grus Mexicana). -- Sand hopper (Zoöl.), a beach flea; an orchestian. -- Sand hornet (Zoöl.), a sand wasp. -- Sand lark. (Zoöl.) (a) A small lark (Alaudala raytal), native of India. (b) A small sandpiper, or plover, as the ringneck, the sanderling, and the common European sandpiper. (c) The Australian red-capped dotterel (Ægialophilus ruficapillus); -- called also red- necked plover. -- Sand launce (Zoöl.), a lant, or launce. -- Sand lizard (Zoöl.), a common European lizard (Lacerta agilis). -- Sand martin (Zoöl.), the bank swallow. -- Sand mole (Zoöl.), the coast rat. -- Sand monitor (Zoöl.), a large Egyptian lizard (Monitor arenarius) which inhabits dry localities. -- Sand mouse (Zoöl.), the dunlin. [Prov. Eng.] -- Sand myrtle. (Bot.) See under Myrtle. -- Sand partridge (Zoöl.), either of two small Asiatic partridges of the genus Ammoperdix. The wings are long and the tarsus is spurless. One species (A. Heeji) inhabits Palestine and Arabia. The other species (A. Bonhami), inhabiting Central Asia, is called also seesee partridge, and teehoo. -- Sand picture, a picture made by putting sand of different colors on an adhesive surface. -- Sand pike. (Zoöl.) (a) The sauger. (b) The lizard fish. -- Sand pillar, a sand storm which takes the form of a whirling pillar in its progress in desert tracts like those of the Sahara and Mongolia. -- Sand pipe (Geol.), a tubular cavity, from a few inches to several feet in dept, occurring especially in calcareous rocks, and often filled with gravel, sand, etc.; -- called also sand gall. -- Sand pride (Zoöl.), a small british lamprey now considered to be the young of larger species; -- called also sand prey. -- Sand pump, in artesian well boring, a long, slender bucket with a valve at the bottom for raising sand from the well. -- Sand rat (Zoöl.), the pocket gopher. -- Sand rock, a rock made of cemented sand. -- Sand runner (Zoöl.), the turnstone. -- Sand saucer (Zoöl.), the mass of egg capsules, or oöthecæ, of any mollusk of the genus Natica and allied genera. It has the shape of a bottomless saucer, and is coated with fine sand; -- called also sand collar. -- Sand screw (Zoöl.), an amphipod crustacean (Lepidactylis arenarius), which burrows in the sandy seabeaches of Europe and America. -- Sand shark (Zoöl.), an American shark (Odontaspis littoralis) found on the sandy coasts of the Eastern United States; -- called also gray shark, and dogfish shark. See Illust. under Remora. -- Sand skink (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Old World lizards belonging to the genus Seps; as, the ocellated sand skink (Seps ocellatus) of Southern Europe. -- Sand skipper (Zoöl.), a beach flea, or orchestian. -- Sand smelt (Zoöl.), a silverside. -- Sand snake. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of several species of harmless burrowing snakes of the genus Eryx, native of Southern Europe, Africa, and Asia, especially E. Jaculus of India and E. Johnii, used by snake charmers. (b) Any innocuous South African snake of the genus Psammophis, especially P. sibilans. -- Sand snipe (Zoöl.), the sandpiper. -- Sand star (Zoöl.), an ophiurioid starfish living on sandy sea bottoms; a brittle star. -- Sand storm, a cloud of sand driven violently by the wind. -- Sand sucker, the sandnecker. -- Sand swallow (Zoöl.), the bank swallow. See under Bank. -- Sand tube, a tube made of sand. Especially: (a) A tube of vitrified sand, produced by a stroke of lightning; a fulgurite. (b) (Zoöl.) Any tube made of cemented sand. (c) (Zoöl. ) In starfishes, a tube having calcareous particles in its wall, which connects the oral water tube with the madreporic plate. -- Sand viper. (Zoöl.) See Hognose snake. -- Sand wasp (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of hymenopterous insects belonging to the families Pompilidæ and Spheridæ, which dig burrows in sand. The female provisions the nest with insects or spiders which she paralyzes by stinging, and which serve as food for her young.  1. To sprinkle or cover with sand. 2. To drive upon the sand. [Obs.] Burton. 3. To bury (oysters) beneath drifting sand or mud. 4. To mix with sand for purposes of fraud; as, to sand sugar. [Colloq.]
you: The pronoun of the second person, in the nominative, dative, and objective case, indicating the person or persons addressed. See the Note under Ye. Ye go to Canterbury; God you speed. Chaucer. Good sir, I do in friendship counsel you To leave this place. Shak. In vain you tell your parting lover You wish fair winds may waft him over. Prior. Note: Though you is properly a plural, it is in all ordinary discourse used also in addressing a single person, yet properly always with a plural verb. "Are you he that hangs the verses on the trees, wherein Rosalind is so admired " Shak. You and your are sometimes used indefinitely, like we, they, one, to express persons not specified. "The looks at a distance like a new-plowed land; but as you come near it, you see nothing but a long heap of heavy, disjointed clods." Addison. "Your medalist and critic are much nearer related than the world imagine." Addison. "It is always pleasant to be forced to do what you wish to do, but what, until pressed, you dare not attempt." Hook. You is often used reflexively for yourself of yourselves. "Your highness shall repose you at the tower." Shak.
lie: See Lye.  1. A falsehood uttered or acted for the purpose of deception; an intentional violation of truth; an untruth spoken with the intention to deceive. It is willful deceit that makes a lie. A man may act a lie, as by pointing his finger in a wrong direction when a traveler inquires of him his road. Paley. 2. A fiction; a fable; an untruth. Dryden. 3. Anything which misleads or disappoints. Wishing this lie of life was o'er. Trench. To give the lie to. (a) To charge with falsehood; as, the man gave him the lie. (b) To reveal to be false; as, a man's actions may give the lie to his words. -- White lie, a euphemism for such lies as one finds it convenient to tell, and excuses himself for telling. Syn. -- Untruth; falsehood; fiction; deception. -- lie, Untruth. A man may state what is untrue from ignorance or misconception; hence, to impute an untruth to one is not necessarily the same as charging him with a lie. Every lie is an untruth, but not every untruth is a lie. Cf. Falsity.  To utter falsehood with an intention to deceive; to say or do that which is intended to deceive another, when he a right to know the truth, or when morality requires a just representation.  1. To rest extended on the ground, a bed, or any support; to be, or to put one's self, in an horizontal position, or nearly so; to be prostate; to be stretched out; -- often with down, when predicated of living creatures; as, the book lies on the table; the snow lies on the roof; he lies in his coffin. The watchful traveler . . . Lay down again, and closed his weary eyes. Dryden. 2. To be situated; to occupy a certain place; as, Ireland lies west of England; the meadows lie along the river; the ship lay in port. 3. To abide; to remain for a longer or shorter time; to be in a certain state or condition; as, to lie waste; to lie fallow; to lie open; to lie hid; to lie grieving; to lie under one's displeasure; to lie at the mercy of the waves; the paper does not lie smooth on the wall. 4. To be or exist; to belong or pertain; to have an abiding place; to consist; -- with in. Envy lies between beings equal in nature, though unequal in circumstances. Collier. He that thinks that diversion may not lie in hard labor, forgets the early rising and hard riding of huntsmen. Locke. 5. To lodge; to sleep. Whiles I was now trifling at home, I saw London, . . . where I lay one night only. Evelyn. Mr. Quinion lay at our house that night. Dickens. 6. To be still or quiet, like one lying down to rest. The wind is loud and will not lie. Shak. 7. (Law)  To be sustainable; to be capable of being maintained. "An appeal lies in this case." Parsons. Note: Through ignorance or carelessness speakers and writers often confuse the forms of the two distinct verbs lay and lie. Lay is a transitive verb, and has for its preterit laid; as, he told me to lay it down, and I laid it down. Lie is intransitive, and has for its preterit lay; as, he told me to lie down, and I lay down. Some persons blunder by using laid for the preterit of lie; as, he told me to lie down, and I laid down. So persons often say incorrectly, the ship laid at anchor; they laid by during the storm; the book was laying on the shelf, etc. It is only necessary to remember, in all such cases, that laid is the preterit of lay, and not of lie. To lie along the shore (Naut.), to coast, keeping land in sight. -- To lie at the door of, to be imputable to; as, the sin, blame, etc., lies at your door. -- To lie at the heart, to be an object of affection, desire, or anxiety. Sir W. Temple. -- To lie at the mercy of, to be in the power of. -- To lie by. (a) To remain with; to be at hand; as, he has the manuscript lying by him. (b) To rest; to intermit labor; as, we lay by during the heat of the day. -- To lie hard or heavy, to press or weigh; to bear hard. -- To lie in, to be in childbed; to bring forth young. -- To lie in one, to be in the power of; to belong to. "As much as lieth in you, live peaceably with all men." Rom. xii. 18. -- To lie in the way, to be an obstacle or impediment. -- To lie in wait , to wait in concealment; to lie in ambush. -- To lie on or upon. (a) To depend on; as, his life lies on the result. (b) To bear, rest, press, or weigh on. -- To lie low, to remain in concealment or inactive. [Slang] -- To lie on hand, To lie on one's hands, to remain unsold or unused; as, the goods are still lying on his hands; they have too much time lying on their hands. -- To lie on the head of, to be imputed to. What he gets more of her than sharp words, let it lie on my head. Shak. -- To lie over. (a) To remain unpaid after the time when payment is due, as a note in bank. (b) To be deferred to some future occasion, as a resolution in a public deliberative body. -- To lie to (Naut.), to stop or delay; especially, to head as near the wind as possible as being the position of greatest safety in a gale; -- said of a ship. Cf. To bring to, under Bring. -- To lie under, to be subject to; to suffer; to be oppressed by. -- To lie with. (a) To lodge or sleep with. (b) To have sexual intercourse with. (c) To belong to; as, it lies with you to make amends.  The position or way in which anything lies; the lay, as of land or country. J. H. Newman. He surveyed with his own eyes . . . the lie of the country on the side towards Thrace. Jowett (Thucyd.).
ease: 1. Satisfaction; pleasure; hence, accommodation; entertainment. [Obs.] They him besought Of harbor and or ease as for hire penny. Chaucer. 2. Freedom from anything that pains or troubles; as: (a) Relief from labor or effort; rest; quiet; relaxation; as, ease of body. Usefulness comes by labor, wit by ease. Herbert. Give yourself ease from the fatigue of watching. Swift. (b) Freedom from care, solicitude, or anything that annoys or disquiets; tranquillity; peace; comfort; security; as, ease of mind. Among these nations shalt thou find no ease. Deut. xxviii. 65. Take thine ease, eat, drink, and be merry. Luke xii. 19. (c) Freedom from constraint, formality, difficulty, embarrassment, etc.; facility; liberty; naturalness; -- said of manner, style, etc.; as, ease of style, of behavior, of address. True ease in writing comes from art, not chance. Pope. Whate'er he did was done with so much ease, In him alone 't was natural to please. Dryden. At ease, free from pain, trouble, or anxiety. "His soul shall dwell at ease." Ps. xxv. 12. -- Chapel of ease. See under Chapel. -- Ill at ease, not at ease, disquieted; suffering; anxious. -- To stand at ease (Mil.), to stand in a comfortable attitude in one's place in the ranks. -- With ease, easily; without much effort. Syn. -- Rest; quiet; repose; comfortableness; tranquility; facility; easiness; readiness.  1. To free from anything that pains, disquiets, or oppresses; to relieve from toil or care; to give rest, repose, or tranquility to; - - often with of; as, to ease of pain; ease the body or mind. Eased [from] the putting off These troublesome disguises which we wear. Milton. Sing, and I 'll ease thy shoulders of thy load. Dryden. 2. To render less painful or oppressive; to mitigate; to alleviate. My couch shall ease my complaint. Job vii. 13. 3. To release from pressure or restraint; to move gently; to lift slightly; to shift a little; as, to ease a bar or nut in machinery. 4. To entertain; to furnish with accommodations. [Obs.] Chaucer. To ease off, To ease away (Naut.), to slacken a rope gradually. -- To ease a ship (Naut.), to put the helm hard, or regulate the sail, to prevent pitching when closehauled. -- To ease the helm (Naut.), to put the helm more nearly amidships, to lessen the effect on the ship, or the strain on the wheel rope. Ham. Nav. Encyc. Syn. -- To relieve; disburden; quiet; calm; tranquilize; assuage; alleviate; allay; mitigate; appease; pacify.
to: 1. The preposition to primarily indicates approach and arrival, motion made in the direction of a place or thing and attaining it, access; and also, motion or tendency without arrival; movement toward; -- opposed to Ant: from. "To Canterbury they wend." Chaucer. Stay with us, go not to Wittenberg. Shak. So to the sylvan lodge They came, that like Pomona's arbor smiled. Milton. I'll to him again, . . . He'll tell me all his purpose. She stretched her arms to heaven. Dryden. 2. Hence, it indicates motion, course, or tendency toward a time, a state or condition, an aim, or anything capable of being regarded as a limit to a tendency, movement, or action; as, he is going to a trade; he is rising to wealth and honor. Note: Formerly, by omission of the verb denoting motion, to sometimes followed a form of be, with the sense of at, or in. "When the sun was [gone or declined] to rest." Chaucer. 3. In a very general way, and with innumerable varieties of application, to connects transitive verbs with their remoter or indirect object, and adjectives, nouns, and neuter or passive verbs with a following noun which limits their action. Its sphere verges upon that of for, but it contains less the idea of design or appropriation; as, these remarks were addressed to a large audience; let us keep this seat to ourselves; a substance sweet to the taste; an event painful to the mind; duty to God and to our parents; a dislike to spirituous liquor. Marks and points out each man of us to slaughter. B. Jonson. Whilst they, distilled Almost to jelly with the act of fear, Stand dumb and speak not to him. Shak. Add to your faith virtue; and to virtue knowledge; and to knowledge temperance; and to temperance patience; and to patience godliness; and to godliness brotherly kindness; and to brotherly kindness charity. 2 Pet. i. 5,6,7. I have a king's oath to the contrary. Shak. Numbers were crowded to death. Clarendon. Fate and the dooming gods are deaf to tears. Dryden. Go, buckle to the law. Dryden. 4. As sign of the infinitive, to had originally the use of last defined, governing the infinitive as a verbal noun, and connecting it as indirect object with a preceding verb or adjective; thus, ready to go, i.e., ready unto going; good to eat, i.e., good for eating; I do my utmost to lead my life pleasantly. But it has come to be the almost constant prefix to the infinitive, even in situations where it has no prepositional meaning, as where the infinitive is direct object or subject; thus, I love to learn, i.e., I love learning; to die for one's country is noble, i.e., the dying for one's country. Where the infinitive denotes the design or purpose, good usage formerly allowed the prefixing of for to the to; as, what went ye out for see (Matt. xi. 8). Then longen folk to go on pilgrimages, And palmers for to seeken strange stranders. Chaucer. Note: Such usage is now obsolete or illiterate. In colloquial usage, to often stands for, and supplies, an infinitive already mentioned; thus, he commands me to go with him, but I do not wish to. 5. In many phrases, and in connection with many other words, to has a pregnant meaning, or is used elliptically. Thus, it denotes or implies: (a) Extent; limit; degree of comprehension; inclusion as far as; as, they met us to the number of three hundred. We ready are to try our fortunes To the last man. Shak. Few of the Esquimaux can count to ten. Quant. Rev. (b) Effect; end; consequence; as, the prince was flattered to his ruin; he engaged in a war to his cost; violent factions exist to the prejudice of the state. (c) Apposition; connection; antithesis; opposition; as, they engaged hand to hand. Now we see through a glass, darkly; but then face to face. 1 Cor. xiii. 12. (d) Accord; adaptation; as, an occupation to his taste; she has a husband to her mind. He to God's image, she to his was made. Dryden. (e) Comparison; as, three is to nine as nine is to twenty-seven; it is ten to one that you will offend him. All that they did was piety to this. B. Jonson. (f) Addition; union; accumulation. Wisdom he has, and to his wisdom, courage. Denham. (g) Accompaniment; as, she sang to his guitar; they danced to the music of a piano. Anon they move In perfect phalanx to the Dorian mood Of flutes and soft recorders. Milton. (h) Character; condition of being; purpose subserved or office filled. [In this sense archaic] "I have a king here to my flatterer." Shak. Made his masters and others . . . to consider him to a little wonder. Walton. Note: To in to-day, to-night, and to-morrow has the sense or force of for or on; for, or on, (this) day, for, or on, (this) night, for, or on, (the) morrow. To-day, to-night, to-morrow may be considered as compounds, and usually as adverbs; but they are sometimes used as nouns; as, to-day is ours. To-morrow, and to-morrow, and to-morrow; Creeps in this petty pace from day to day. Shak. To and again, to and fro. [R.] -- To and fro, forward and back. In this phrase, to is adverbial. There was great showing both to and fro. Chaucer. -- To-and-fro, a pacing backward and forward; as, to commence a to- and-fro. Tennyson. -- To the face, in front of; in behind; hence, in the presence of. -- To wit, to know; namely. See Wit, v. i. Note: To, without an object expressed, is used adverbially; as, put to the door, i. e., put the door to its frame, close it; and in the nautical expressions, to heave to, to come to, meaning to a certain position. To, like on, is sometimes used as a command, forward, set to. "To, Achilles! to, Ajax! to!" Shak.
up: 1. Aloft; on high; in a direction contrary to that of gravity; toward or in a higher place or position; above; -- the opposite of Ant: down. But up or down, By center or eccentric, hard to tell. Milton. 2. Hence, in many derived uses, specifically: -- (a) From a lower to a higher position, literally or figuratively; as, from a recumbent or sitting position; from the mouth, toward the source, of a river; from a dependent or inferior condition; from concealment; from younger age; from a quiet state, or the like; -- used with verbs of motion expressed or implied. But they presumed to go up unto the hilltop. Num. xiv. 44. I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up. Ps. lxxxviii. 15. Up rose the sun, and up rose Emelye. Chaucer. We have wrought ourselves up into this degree of Christian indifference. Atterbury. (b) In a higher place or position, literally or figuratively; in the state of having arisen; in an upright, or nearly upright, position; standing; mounted on a horse; in a condition of elevation, prominence, advance, proficiency, excitement, insurrection, or the like; -- used with verbs of rest, situation, condition, and the like; as, to be up on a hill; the lid of the box was up; prices are up. And when the sun was up, they were scorched. Matt. xiii. 6. Those that were up themselves kept others low. Spenser. Helen was up -- was she Shak. Rebels there are up, And put the Englishmen unto the sword. Shak. His name was up through all the adjoining provinces, even to Italy and Rome; many desiring to see who he was that could withstand so many years the Roman puissance. Milton. Thou hast fired me; my soul's up in arms. Dryden. Grief and passion are like floods raised in little brooks by a sudden rain; they are quickly up. Dryden. A general whisper ran among the country people, that Sir Roger was up. Addison. Let us, then, be up and doing, With a heart for any fate. Longfellow. (c) To or in a position of equal advance or equality; not short of, back of, less advanced than, away from, or the like; -- usually followed by to or with; as, to be up to the chin in water; to come up with one's companions; to come up with the enemy; to live up to engagements. As a boar was whetting his teeth, up comes a fox to him. L'Estrange. (d) To or in a state of completion; completely; wholly; quite; as, in the phrases to eat up; to drink up; to burn up; to sum up; etc.; to shut up the eyes or the mouth; to sew up a rent. Note: Some phrases of this kind are now obsolete; as, to spend up (Prov. xxi. 20); to kill up (B. Jonson). (e) Aside, so as not to be in use; as, to lay up riches; put up your weapons. Note: Up is used elliptically for get up, rouse up, etc., expressing a command or exhortation. "Up, and let us be going." Judg. xix. 28. Up, up, my friend! and quit your books, Or surely you 'll grow double. Wordsworth. It is all up with him, it is all over with him; he is lost. -- The time is up, the allotted time is past. -- To be up in, to be informed about; to be versed in. "Anxious that their sons should be well up in the superstitions of two thousand years ago." H. Spencer. -- To be up to. (a) To be equal to, or prepared for; as, he is up to the business, or the emergency. [Colloq.] (b) To be engaged in; to purpose, with the idea of doing ill or mischief; as, I don't know what he's up to. [Colloq.] -- To blow up. (a) To inflate; to distend. (b) To destroy by an explosion from beneath. (c) To explode; as, the boiler blew up. (d) To reprove angrily; to scold. [Slang] -- To bring up. See under Bring, v. t. -- To come up with. See under Come, v. i. -- To cut up. See under Cut, v. t. & i. -- To draw up. See under Draw, v. t. -- To grow up, to grow to maturity. -- Up anchor (Naut.), the order to man the windlass preparatory to hauling up the anchor. -- Up and down. (a) First up, and then down; from one state or position to another. See under Down, adv. Fortune . . . led him up and down. Chaucer. (b) (Naut.) Vertical; perpendicular; -- said of the cable when the anchor is under, or nearly under, the hawse hole, and the cable is taut. Totten. -- Up helm (Naut.), the order given to move the tiller toward the upper, or windward, side of a vessel. -- Up to snuff. See under Snuff. [Slang] -- What is up What is going on [Slang]  1. From a lower to a higher place on, upon, or along; at a higher situation upon; at the top of. In going up a hill, the knees will be most weary; in going down, the thihgs. Bacon. 2. From the coast towards the interior of, as a country; from the mouth towards the source of, as a stream; as, to journey up the country; to sail up the Hudson. 3. Upon. [Obs.] "Up pain of death." Chaucer.  The state of being up or above; a state of elevation, prosperity, or the like; -- rarely occurring except in the phrase ups and downs. [Colloq.] Ups and downs, alternate states of elevation and depression, or of prosperity and the contrary. [Colloq.] They had their ups and downs of fortune. Thackeray.  Inclining up; tending or going up; upward; as, an up look; an up grade; the up train.
again: 1. In return, back; as, bring us word again. 2. Another time; once more; anew. If a man die, shall he live again Job xiv. 14. 3. Once repeated; -- of quantity; as, as large again, half as much again. 4. In any other place. [Archaic] Bacon. 5. On the other hand. "The one is my sovereign . . . the other again is my kinsman." Shak. 6. Moreover; besides; further. Again, it is of great consequence to avoid, etc. Hersche Again and again, more than once; often; repeatedly. -- Now and again, now and then; occasionally. -- To and again, to and fro. [Obs.] De Foe. Note: Again was formerly used in many verbal combinations, as, again- witness, to witness against; again-ride, to ride against; again-come, to come against, to encounter; again-bring, to bring back, etc.  Against; also, towards (in order to meet). [Obs.] Albeit that it is again his kind. Chaucer.
after: 1. Next; later in time; subsequent; succeeding; as, an after period of life. Marshall. Note: In this sense the word is sometimes needlessly combined with the following noun, by means of a hyphen, as, after-ages, after-act, after-days, after-life. For the most part the words are properly kept separate when after has this meaning. 2. Hinder; nearer the rear. (Naut.)  To ward the stern of the ship; -- applied to any object in the rear part of a vessel; as the after cabin, after hatchway. Note: It is often combined with its noun; as, after-bowlines, after- braces, after-sails, after-yards, those on the mainmasts and mizzenmasts. After body (Naut.), the part of a ship abaft the dead flat, or middle part.  1. Behind in place; as, men in line one after another. "Shut doors after you." Shak. 2. Below in rank; next to in order. Shak. Codrus after PhDryden. 3. Later in time; subsequent; as, after supper, after three days. It often precedes a clause. Formerly that was interposed between it and the clause. After I am risen again, I will go before you into Galilee. Matt. xxvi. 32. 4. Subsequent to and in consequence of; as, after what you have said, I shall be careful. 5. Subsequent to and notwithstanding; as, after all our advice, you took that course. 6. Moving toward from behind; following, in search of; in pursuit of. Ye shall not go after other gods. Deut. vi. 14. After whom is the king of Israel come out 1 Sam. xxiv. 14. 7. Denoting the aim or object; concerning; in relation to; as, to look after workmen; to inquire after a friend; to thirst after righteousness. 8. In imitation of; in conformity with; after the manner of; as, to make a thing after a model; a picture after Rubens; the boy takes after his father. To name or call after, to name like and reference to. Our eldest son was named George after his uncle. Goldsmith. 9. According to; in accordance with; in conformity with the nature of; as, he acted after his kind. He shall not judge after the sight of his eyes. Isa. xi. 3. They that are after the flesh do mind the things of the flesh. Rom. viii. 5. 10. According to the direction and influence of; in proportion to; befitting. [Archaic] He takes greatness of kingdoms according to bulk and currency, and not after their intrinsic value. Bacon. After all, when everything has been considered; upon the whole. -- After (with the same noun preceding and following), as, wave after wave, day after day, several or many (waves, etc.) successively. -- One after another, successively. -- To be after, to be in pursuit of in order to reach or get; as, he is after money.  Subsequently in time or place; behind; afterward; as, he follows after. It was about the space of three hours after. Acts. v. 7. Note: After is prefixed to many words, forming compounds, but retaining its usual signification. The prefix may be adverbial, prepositional, or adjectival; as in after- described, after-dinner, after-part. The hyphen is sometimes needlessly used to connect the adjective after with its noun. See Note under After, a., 1.
nation: 1. (Ethnol.)  A part, or division, of the people of the earth, distinguished from the rest by common descent, language, or institutions; a race; a stock. All nations, and kindreds, and people, and tongues. Rev. vii. 9. 2. The body of inhabitants of a country, united under an independent government of their own. A nation is the unity of a people. Coleridge. Praise the power that hath made and preserved us a nation. F. S. Key. 3. Family; lineage. [Obs.] Chaucer. 4. (a) One of the divisions of university students in a classification according to nativity, formerly common in Europe. (b) (Scotch Universities) One of the four divisions (named from the parts of Scotland) in which students were classified according to their nativity. 5. A great number; a great deal; -- by way of emphasis; as, a nation of herbs. Sterne. Five nations. See under Five. -- Law of nations. See International law, under International, and Law. Syn. -- people; race. See People.
mass: 1. (R. C. Ch.)  The sacrifice in the sacrament of the Eucharist, or the consecration and oblation of the host. 2. (Mus.)  The portions of the Mass usually set to music, considered as a musical composition; -- namely, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Credo, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei, besides sometimes an Offertory and the Benedictus. Canon of the Mass. See Canon. -- High Mass, Mass with incense, music, the assistance of a deacon, subdeacon, etc. -- Low Mass, Mass which is said by the priest through-out, without music. -- Mass bell, the sanctus bell. See Sanctus. -- Mass book, the missal or Roman Catholic service book.  To celebrate Mass. [Obs.] Hooker.  1. A quantity of matter cohering together so as to make one body, or an aggregation of particles or things which collectively make one body or quantity, usually of considerable size; as, a mass of ore, metal, sand, or water. If it were not for these principles, the bodies of the earth, planets, comets, sun, and all things in them, would grow cold and freeze, and become inactive masses. Sir I. Newton. A deep mass of continual sea is slower stirred To rage. Savile. 2. (Phar.)  A medicinal substance made into a cohesive, homogeneous lump, of consistency suitable for making pills; as, blue mass. 3. A large quantity; a sum. All the mass of gold that comes into Spain. Sir W. Raleigh. He had spent a huge mass of treasure. Sir J. Davies. 4. Bulk; magnitude; body; size. This army of such mass and charge. Shak. 5. The principal part; the main body. Night closed upon the pursuit, and aided the mass of the fugitives in their escape. Jowett (Thucyd.). 6. (Physics)  The quantity of matter which a body contains, irrespective of its bulk or volume. Note: Mass and weight are often used, in a general way, as interchangeable terms, since the weight of a body is proportional to its mass (under the same or equal gravitative forces), and the mass is usually ascertained from the weight. Yet the two ideas, mass and weight, are quite distinct. Mass is the quantity of matter in a body; weight is the comparative force with which it tends towards the center of the earth. A mass of sugar and a mass of lead are assumed to be equal when they show an equal weight by balancing each other in the scales. Blue mass. See under Blue. -- Mass center (Geom.), the center of gravity of a triangle. -- Mass copper, native copper in a large mass. -- Mass meeting, a large or general assembly of people, usually a meeting having some relation to politics. -- The masses, the great body of the people, as contrasted with the higher classes; the populace.  To form or collect into a mass; to form into a collective body; to bring together into masses; to assemble. But mass them together and they are terrible indeed. Coleridge.
spell: A spelk, or splinter. [Obs.] Holland.  To supply the place of for a time; to take the turn of, at work; to relieve; as, to spell the helmsman.  1. The relief of one person by another in any piece of work or wathing; also, a turn at work which is carried on by one person or gang relieving another; as, a spellat the pumps; a spell at the masthead. A spell at the wheel isc called a trick. Ham. Nav. Encyc. 2. The time during which one person or gang works until relieved; hence, any relatively short period of time, whether a few hours, days, or weeks. Nothing new hass happened in this quarter, except the setting in of a severe spell of cold weather. Washington. 3. One of two or more persons or gangs who work by spells. [R.] Their toil is so extreme that they can not endure it above four hours in a day, but are succeeded by spells. Garew. 4. A gratuitous helping forward of another's work; as, a logging spell. [Local, U.S.]  1. A story; a tale. [Obs.] "Hearken to my spell." Chaucer. 2. A stanza, verse, or phrase supposed to be endowed with magical power; an incantation; hence, any charm. Start not; her actions shall be holy as You hear my spell is lawful. Shak.  1. To tell; to relate; to teach. [Obs.] Might I that legend find, By fairies spelt in mystic rhymes. T. Warton. 2. To put under the influence of a spell; to affect by a spell; to bewitch; to fascinate; to charm. "Spelled with words of power." Dryden. He was much spelled with Eleanor Talbot. Sir G. Buck. 3. To constitute; to measure. [Obs.] The Saxon heptarchy, when seven kings put together did spell but one in effect. Fuller. 4. To tell or name in their proper order letters of, as a word; to write or print in order the letters of, esp. the proper letters; to form, as words, by correct orthography. The word "satire" ought to be spelled with i, and not with y. Dryden. 5. To discover by characters or marks; to read with difficulty; -- usually with out; as, to spell out the sense of an author; to spell out a verse in the Bible. To spell out a God in the works of creation. South. To sit spelling and observing divine justice upon every accident. Milton.  1. To form words with letters, esp. with the proper letters, either orally or in writing. When what small knowledge was, in them did dwell, And he a god, who could but read or spell. Dryden. 2. To study by noting characters; to gain knowledge or learn the meaning of anything, by study. [Obs.] Where I may sit and rightly spell Of every star that heaven doth shew, And every herb that sips the dew. Milton.
blue: 1. Having the color of the clear sky, or a hue resembling it, whether lighter or darker; as, the deep, blue sea; as blue as a sapphire; blue violets. "The blue firmament." Milton. 2. Pale, without redness or glare, -- said of a flame; hence, of the color of burning brimstone, betokening the presence of ghosts or devils; as, the candle burns blue; the air was blue with oaths. 3. Low in spirits; melancholy; as, to feel blue. 4. Suited to produce low spirits; gloomy in prospect; as, thongs looked blue. [Colloq.] 5. Severe or over strict in morals; gloom; as, blue and sour religionists; suiting one who is over strict in morals; inculcating an impracticable, severe, or gloomy mortality; as, blue laws. 6. Literary; -- applied to women; -- an abbreviation of bluestocking. [Colloq.] The ladies were very blue and well informed. Thackeray. Blue asbestus. See Crocidolite. -- Blue black, of, or having, a very dark blue color, almost black. -- Blue blood. See under Blood. -- Blue buck (Zoöl.), a small South African antelope (Cephalophus pygmæus); also applied to a larger species (Ægoceras leucophæus); the blaubok. -- Blue cod (Zoöl.), the buffalo cod. -- Blue crab (Zoöl.), the common edible crab of the Atlantic coast of the United States (Callinectes hastatus). -- Blue curls (Bot.), a common plant (Trichostema dichotomum), resembling pennyroyal, and hence called also bastard pennyroyal. -- Blue devils, apparitions supposed to be seen by persons suffering with delirium tremens; hence, very low spirits. "Can Gumbo shut the hall door upon blue devils, or lay them all in a red sea of claret" Thackeray. -- Blue gage. See under Gage, a plum. -- Blue gum, an Australian myrtaceous tree (Eucalyptus globulus), of the loftiest proportions, now cultivated in tropical and warm temperate regions for its timber, and as a protection against malaria. The essential oil is beginning to be used in medicine. The timber is very useful. See Eucalyptus. -- Blue jack, Blue stone, blue vitriol; sulphate of copper. -- Blue jacket, a man-of war's man; a sailor wearing a naval uniform. -- Blue jaundice. See under Jaundice. -- Blue laws, a name first used in the eighteenth century to describe certain supposititious laws of extreme rigor reported to have been enacted in New Haven; hence, any puritanical laws. [U. S.] -- Blue light, a composition which burns with a brilliant blue flame; -- used in pyrotechnics and as a night signal at sea, and in military operations. -- Blue mantle (Her.), one of the four pursuivants of the English college of arms; -- so called from the color of his official robes. -- Blue mass, a preparation of mercury from which is formed the blue pill. McElrath. -- Blue mold, or mould, the blue fungus (Aspergillus glaucus) which grows on cheese. Brande & C. -- Blue Monday, a Monday following a Sunday of dissipation, or itself given to dissipation (as the Monday before Lent). -- Blue ointment (Med.), mercurial ointment. -- Blue Peter (British Marine), a blue flag with a white square in the center, used as a signal for sailing, to recall boats, etc. It is a corruption of blue repeater, one of the British signal flags. -- Blue pill. (Med.) (a) A pill of prepared mercury, used as an aperient, etc. (b) Blue mass. -- Blue ribbon. (a) The ribbon worn by members of the order of the Garter; -- hence, a member of that order. (b) Anything the attainment of which is an object of great ambition; a distinction; a prize. "These [scholarships] were the blue ribbon of the college." Farrar. (c) The distinctive badge of certain temperance or total abstinence organizations, as of the Blue ribbon Army. -- Blue ruin, utter ruin; also, gin. [Eng. Slang] Carlyle. -- Blue spar (Min.), azure spar; lazulite. See Lazulite. -- Blue thrush (Zoöl.), a European and Asiatic thrush (Petrocossyphus cyaneas). -- Blue verditer. See Verditer. -- Blue vitriol (Chem.), sulphate of copper, a violet blue crystallized salt, used in electric batteries, calico printing, etc. -- Blue water, the open ocean. -- To look blue, to look disheartened or dejected. -- True blue, genuine and thorough; not modified, nor mixed; not spurious; specifically, of uncompromising Presbyterianism, blue being the color adopted by the Covenanters. For his religion . . . 'T was Presbyterian, true blue. Hudibras.  1. One of the seven colors into which the rays of light divide themselves, when refracted through a glass prism; the color of the clear sky, or a color resembling that, whether lighter or darker; a pigment having such color. Sometimes, poetically, the sky. 2. A pedantic woman; a bluestocking. [Colloq.] 3. pl. Etym: [Short for blue devils.]  Low spirits; a fit of despondency; melancholy. [Colloq.] Berlin blue, Prussian blue. -- Mineral blue. See under Mineral. -- Prussian blue. See under Prussian.  To make blue; to dye of a blue color; to make blue by heating, as metals, etc.
mean: 1. To have in the mind, as a purpose, intention, etc.; to intend; to purpose; to design; as, what do you mean to do What mean ye by this service Ex. xii. 26. Ye thought evil against me; but God meant it unto good. Gen. 1. 20. I am not a Spaniard To say that it is yours and not to mean it. Longfellow. 2. To signify; to indicate; to import; to denote. What mean these seven ewe lambs Gen. xxi. 29. Go ye, and learn what that me. Matt. ix. 13.  To have a purpose or intention. [Rare, except in the phrase to mean well, or ill.] Shak.  1. Destitute of distinction or eminence; common; low; vulgar; humble. "Of mean parentage." Sir P. Sidney. The mean man boweth down, and the great man humbleth himself. Is. ii. 9. 2. Wanting dignity of mind; low-minded; base; destitute of honor; spiritless; as, a mean motive. Can you imagine I so mean could prove, To save my life by changing of my love Dryden. 3. Of little value or account; worthy of little or no regard; contemptible; despicable. The Roman legions and great Cæsar found Our fathers no mean foes. J. Philips. 4. Of poor quality; as, mean fare. 5. Penurious; stingy; close-fisted; illiberal; as, mean hospitality. Note: Mean is sometimes used in the formation of compounds, the sense of which is obvious without explanation; as, meanborn, mean-looking, etc. Syn. -- Base; ignoble; abject; beggarly; wretched; degraded; degenerate; vulgar; vile; servile; menial; spiritless; groveling; slavish; dishonorable; disgraceful; shameful; despicable; contemptible; paltry; sordid. See Base.  1. Occupying a middle position; middle; being about midway between extremes. Being of middle age and a mean stature. Sir. P. Sidney. 2. Intermediate in excellence of any kind. According to the fittest style of lofty, mean, or lowly. Milton. 3. (Math.)  Average; having an intermediate value between two extremes, or between the several successive values of a variable quantity during one cycle of variation; as, mean distance; mean motion; mean solar day. Mean distance (of a planet from the sun) (Astron.), the average of the distances throughout one revolution of the planet, equivalent to the semi-major axis of the orbit. -- Mean error (Math. Phys.), the average error of a number of observations found by taking the mean value of the positive and negative errors without regard to sign. -- Mean-square error, or Error of the mean square (Math. Phys.), the error the square of which is the mean of the squares of all the errors; -- called also, especially by European writers, mean error. -- Mean line. (Crystallog.) Same as Bisectrix. -- Mean noon, noon as determined by mean time. -- Mean proportional (between two numbers) (Math.), the square root of their product. -- Mean sun, a fictitious sun supposed to move uniformly in the equator so as to be on the meridian each day at mean noon. -- Mean time, time as measured by an equable motion, as of a perfect clock, or as reckoned on the supposition that all the days of the year are of a mean or uniform length, in contradistinction from apparent time, or that actually indicated by the sun, and from sidereal time, or that measured by the stars.  1. That which is mean, or intermediate, between two extremes of place, time, or number; the middle point or place; middle rate or degree; mediocrity; medium; absence of extremes or excess; moderation; measure. But to speak in a mean, the virtue of prosperity is temperance; the virtue of adversity is fortitude. Bacon. There is a mean in all things. Dryden. The extremes we have mentioned, between which the wellinstracted Christian holds the mean, are correlatives. I. Taylor. 2. (Math.)  A quantity having an intermediate value between several others, from which it is derived, and of which it expresses the resultant value; usually, unless otherwise specified, it is the simple average, formed by adding the quantities together and dividing by their number, which is called an arithmetical mean. A geometrical mean is the square root of the product of the quantities. 3. That through which, or by the help of which, an end is attained; something tending to an object desired; intermediate agency or measure; necessary condition or coagent; instrument. Their virtuous conversation was a mean to work the conversion of the heathen to Christ. Hooker. You may be able, by this mean, to review your own scientific acquirements. Coleridge. Philosophical doubt is not an end, but a mean. Sir W. Hamilton. Note: In this sense the word is usually employed in the plural form means, and often with a singular attribute or predicate, as if a singular noun. By this means he had them more at vantage. Bacon. What other means is left unto us. Shak. 4. pl.  Hence: Resources; property, revenue, or the like, considered as the condition of easy livelihood, or an instrumentality at command for effecting any purpose; disposable force or substance. Your means are very slender, and your waste is great. Shak. 5. (Mus.)  A part, whether alto or tenor, intermediate between the soprano and base; a middle part. [Obs.] The mean is drowned with your unruly base. Shak. 6. Meantime; meanwhile. [Obs.] Spenser. 7. A mediator; a go-between. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. He wooeth her by means and by brokage. Chaucer. By all means, certainly; without fail; as, go, by all means. -- By any means, in any way; possibly; at all. If by any means I might attain to the resurrection of the dead. Phil. iii. ll. -- By no means, or By no manner of means, not at all; certainly not; not in any degree. The wine on this side of the lake is by no means so good as that on the other. Addison.
multiply: 1. To increase in number; to make more numerous; to add quantity to. Impunity will multiply motives to disobedience. Ames. 2. (Math.)  To add (any given number or quantity) to itself a certain number of times; to find the product of by multiplication; thus 7 multiplied by 8 produces the number 56; to multiply two numbers. See the Note under Multiplication. 3. To increase (the amount of gold or silver) by the arts of alchemy. [Obs.] Multiplying gear (Mach.), gear for increasing speed. -- Multiplying lens. (Opt.) See under Lens.  1. To become greater in number; to become numerous. When men began to multiply on the face of the earth, and daughters were born unto them. Gen. vi. 1. 2. To increase in extent and influence; to spread. The word of God grew and multiplied. Acts xii. 24. 3. To increase amount of gold or silver by the arts of alchemy. [Obs.] Chaucer.
young: 1. Not long born; still in the first part of life; not yet arrived at adolescence, maturity, or age; not old; juvenile; -- said of animals; as, a young child; a young man; a young fawn. For he so young and tender was of age. Chaucer. "Whom the gods love, die young," has been too long carelessly said; . . . whom the gods love, live young forever. Mrs. H. H. Jackson. 2. Being in the first part, pr period, of growth; as, a young plant; a young tree. While the fears of the people were young. De Foe. 3. Having little experience; inexperienced; unpracticed; ignorant; weak. Come, come, elder brother, you are too young in this. Shak.  The offspring of animals, either a single animal or offspring collectively. [The egg] bursting with kindly rupture, forth disclosed Their callow young. Milton. With young, with child; pregnant.
opposite: 1. Placed over against; standing or situated over against or in front; facing; -- often with to; as, a house opposite to the Exchange. 2. Applied to the other of two things which are entirely different; other; as, the opposite sex; the opposite extreme. 3. Extremely different; inconsistent; contrary; repugnant; antagonistic. Novels, by which the reader is misled into another sort of pieasure opposite to that which is designed in an epic poem. Dryden. Particles of speech have divers, and sometimes almost opposite, significations. Locke. 4. (Bot.) (a) Set over against each other, but separated by the whole diameter of the stem, as two leaves at the same node. (b) Placed directly in front of another part or organ, as a stamen which stands before a petal.  1. One who opposes; an opponent; an antagonist. [Obs.] The opposites of this day's strife. Shak. 2. That which is opposed or contrary; as, sweetness and its opposite. The virtuous man meets with more opposites and opponents than any other. Landor.
dog: 1. (Zoöl.)  A quadruped of the genus Canis, esp. the domestic dog (C. familiaris). Note: The dog is distinguished above all others of the inferior animals for intelligence, docility, and attachment to man. There are numerous carefully bred varieties, as the beagle, bloodhound, bulldog, coachdog, collie, Danish dog, foxhound, greyhound, mastiff, pointer, poodle, St. Bernard, setter, spaniel, spitz dog, terrier, etc. There are also many mixed breeds, and partially domesticated varieties, as well as wild dogs, like the dingo and dhole. (See these names in the Vocabulary.) 2. A mean, worthless fellow; a wretch. What is thy servant, which is but a dog, that he should do this great thing 2 Kings viii. 13 (Rev. Ver. ) 3. A fellow; -- used humorously or contemptuously; as, a sly dog; a lazy dog. [Colloq.] 4. (Astron.)  One of the two constellations, Canis Major and Canis Minor, or the Greater Dog and the Lesser Dog. Canis Major contains the Dog Star (Sirius). 5. An iron for holding wood in a fireplace; a firedog; an andiron. 6. (Mech.) (a) A grappling iron, with a claw or claws, for fastening into wood or other heavy articles, for the purpose of raising or moving them. (b) An iron with fangs fastening a log in a saw pit, or on the carriage of a sawmill. (c) A piece in machinery acting as a catch or clutch; especially, the carrier of a lathe, also, an adjustable stop to change motion, as in a machine tool. Note: Dog is used adjectively or in composition, commonly in the sense of relating to, or characteristic of, a dog. It is also used to denote a male; as, dog fox or g-fox, a male fox; dog otter or dog- otter, dog wolf, etc.; -- also to denote a thing of cheap or mean quality; as, dog Latin. A dead dog, a thing of no use or value. 1 Sam. xxiv. 14. -- A dog in the manger, an ugly-natured person who prevents others from enjoying what would be an advantage to them but is none to him. -- Dog ape (Zoöl.), a male ape. -- Dog cabbage, or Dog's cabbage (Bot.), a succulent herb, native to the Mediterranean region (Thelygonum Cynocrambe). -- Dog cheap, very cheap. See under Cheap. -- Dog ear (Arch.), an acroterium. [Colloq.] -- Dog flea (Zoöl.), a species of flea (Pulex canis) which infests dogs and cats, and is often troublesome to man. In America it is the common flea. See Flea, and Aphaniptera. -- Dog grass (Bot.), a grass (Triticum caninum) of the same genus as wheat. -- Dog Latin, barbarous Latin; as, the dog Latin of pharmacy. -- Dog lichen (Bot.), a kind of lichen (Peltigera canina) growing on earth, rocks, and tree trunks, -- a lobed expansion, dingy green above and whitish with fuscous veins beneath. -- Dog louse (Zoöl.), a louse that infests the dog, esp. Hæmatopinus piliferus; another species is Trichodectes latus. -- Dog power, a machine operated by the weight of a dog traveling in a drum, or on an endless track, as for churning. -- Dog salmon (Zoöl.), a salmon of northwest America and northern Asia; -- the gorbuscha; -- called also holia, and hone. -- Dog shark. (Zoöl.) See Dogfish. -- Dog's meat, meat fit only for dogs; refuse; offal. -- Dog Star. See in the Vocabulary. -- Dog wheat (Bot.), Dog grass. -- Dog whelk (Zoöl.), any species of univalve shells of the family Nassidæ, esp. the Nassa reticulata of England. -- To give, or throw, to the dogs, to throw away as useless. "Throw physic to the dogs; I'll none of it." Shak. -- To go to the dogs, to go to ruin; to be ruined.  To hunt or track like a hound; to follow insidiously or indefatigably; to chase with a dog or dogs; to worry, as if by dogs; to hound with importunity. I have been pursued, dogged, and waylaid. Pope. Your sins will dog you, pursue you. Burroughs. Eager ill-bred petitioners, who do not so properly supplicate as hunt the person whom they address to, dogging him from place to place, till they even extort an answer to their rude requests. South.
nose: 1. (Anat.)  The prominent part of the face or anterior extremity of the head containing the nostrils and olfactory cavities; the olfactory organ. See Nostril, and Olfactory organ under Olfactory. 2. The power of smelling; hence, scent. We are not offended with a dog for a better nose than his master. Collier. 3. A projecting end or beak at the front of an object; a snout; a nozzle; a spout; as, the nose of a bellows; the nose of a teakettle. Nose bit (Carp.), a bit similar to a gouge bit, but having a cutting edge on one side of its boring end. -- Nose hammer (Mach.), a frontal hammer. -- Nose hole (Glass Making), a small opening in a furnace, before which a globe of crown glass is held and kept soft at the beginning of the flattening process. -- Nose key (Carp.), a fox wedge. -- Nose leaf (Zoöl.), a thin, broad, membranous fold of skin on the nose of many species of bats. It varies greatly in size and form. -- Nose of wax, fig., a person who is pliant and easily influenced. "A nose of wax to be turned every way." Massinger -- Nose piece, the nozzle of a pipe, hose, bellows, etc.; the end piece of a microscope body, to which an objective is attached. -- To hold, put, or bring one's nose to the grindstone. See under Grindstone. -- To lead by the nose, to lead at pleasure, or to cause to follow submissively; to lead blindly, as a person leads a beast. Shak. -- To put one's nose out of joint, to humiliate one's pride, esp. by supplanting one in the affections of another. [Slang] -- To thrust one's nose into, to meddle officiously in. -- To wipe one's nose of, to deprive of; to rob. [Slang]  1. To smell; to scent; hence, to track, or trace out. 2. To touch with the nose; to push the nose into or against; hence, to interfere with; to treat insolently. Lambs . . . nosing the mother's udder. Tennyson. A sort of national convention, dubious in its nature . . . nosed Parliament in the very seat of its authority. Burke. 3. To utter in a nasal manner; to pronounce with a nasal twang; as, to nose a prayer. [R.] Cowley.  1. To smell; to sniff; to scent. Audubon. 2. To pry officiously into what does not concern one.
sure: 1. Certainly knowing and believing; confident beyond doubt; implicity trusting; unquestioning; positive. We are sure that the judgment of God is according to truth against them which commit such things. Rom. ii. 2. I'm sure care 's an enemy of life. Shak. 2. Certain to find or retain; as, to be sure of game; to be sure of success; to be sure of life or health. 3. Fit or worthy to be depended on; certain not to fail or disappoint expectation; unfailing; strong; permanent; enduring. "His sure word." Keble. The Lord will certainly make my lord a sure house; because my lord fighteth the battles of the Lord. 1 Sam. xxv. 28. The testimony of the Lord is sure. Ps. xix. 7. Which put in good sure leather sacks. Chapman. 4. Betrothed; engaged to marry. [Obs.] The king was sure to Dame Elizabeth Lucy, and her husband before God. Sir T. More. I presume . . . that you had been sure as fast as faith could bind you, man and wife. Brome. 5. Free from danger; safe; secure. Fear not; the forest is not three leagues off; If we recover that we are sure enough. Shak. -- To be sure, or Be sure, certainly; without doubt; as, Shall you do To be sure I shall. -- To make sure. (a) To make certain; to secure so that there can be no failure of the purpose or object. "Make Cato sure." Addison. "A peace can not fail, provided we make sure of Spain." Sir W. Temple. (b) To betroth. [Obs.] She that's made sure to him she loves not well. Cotgrave. Syn. -- Certain; unfailing; infallible; safe; firm; permanent; steady; stable; strong; secure; indisputable; confident; positive.  In a sure manner; safely; certainly. "Great, sure, shall be thy meed." Spenser. 'T is pleasant, sure, to see one's name in print. Byron.
off: In a general sense, denoting from or away from; as: 1. Denoting distance or separation; as, the house is a mile off. 2. Denoting the action of removing or separating; separation; as, to take off the hat or cloak; to cut off, to pare off, to clip off, to peel off, to tear off, to march off, to fly off, and the like. 3. Denoting a leaving, abandonment, departure, abatement, interruption, or remission; as, the fever goes off; the pain goes off; the game is off; all bets are off. 4. Denoting a different direction; not on or towards: away; as, to look off. 5. Denoting opposition or negation. [Obs.] The questions no way touch upon puritanism, either off or on. Bp. Sanderson. From off, off from; off. "A live coal...taken with the tongs from off the altar." Is. vi. 6. -- Off and on. (a) Not constantly; not regularly; now and then; occasionally. (b) (Naut.) On different tacks, now toward, and now away from, the land. -- To be off. (a) To depart; to escape; as, he was off without a moment's warning. (b) To be abandoned, as an agreement or purpose; as, the bet was declared to be off. [Colloq.] -- To come off, To cut off, To fall off, To go off, etc. See under Come, Cut, Fall, Go, etc. -- To get off. (a) To utter; to discharge; as, to get off a joke. (b) To go away; to escape; as, to get off easily from a trial. [Colloq.] -- To take off, to mimic or personate. -- To tell off (Mil.), to divide and practice a regiment or company in the several formations, preparatory to marching to the general parade for field exercises. Farrow. -- To be well off, to be in good condition. -- To be ill off, To be badly off, to be in poor condition.  Away; begone; -- a command to depart.  Not on; away from; as, to be off one's legs or off the bed; two miles off the shore. Addison. Off hand. See Offhand. -- Off side (Football), out of play; -- said when a player has got in front of the ball in a scrimmage, or when the ball has been last touched by one of his own side behind him. -- To be off color, to be of a wrong color. -- To be off one's food, to have no appetite. (Colloq.)  1. On the farther side; most distant; on the side of an animal or a team farthest from the driver when he is on foot; in the United States, the right side; as, the off horse or ox in a team, in distinction from the Ant: nigh or Ant: near horse or ox; the off leg. 2. Designating a time when one is not strictly attentive to business or affairs, or is absent from his post, and, hence, a time when affairs are not urgent; as, he took an off day for fishing: an off year in politics. "In the off season." Thackeray. Off side. (a) The right hand side in driving; the farther side. See Gee. (b) (Cricket) See Off, n.  The side of the field that is on the right of the wicket keeper.
guide: 1. To lead or direct in a way; to conduct in a course or path; to pilot; as, to guide a traveler. I wish . . . you 'ld guide me to your sovereign's court. Shak. 2. To regulate and manage; to direct; to order; to superintend the training or education of; to instruct and influence intellectually or morally; to train. He will guide his affairs with discretion. Ps. cxii. 5. The meek will he guide in judgment. Ps. xxv. 9.  1. A person who leads or directs another in his way or course, as in a strange land; one who exhibits points of interest to strangers; a conductor; also, that which guides; a guidebook. 2. One who, or that which, directs another in his conduct or course of lifo; a director; a regulator. He will be our guide, even unto death. Ps. xlviii. 14. 3. Any contrivance, especially one having a directing edge, surface, or channel, for giving direction to the motion of anything, as water, an instrument, or part of a machine, or for directing the hand or eye, as of an operator; as: (a) (Water Wheels) A blade or channel for directing the flow of water to the wheel buckets. (b) (Surgery)  A grooved director for a probe or knife. (c) (Printing) A strip or device to direct the compositor's eye to the line of copy he is setting. 4. (Mil.)  A noncommissioned officer or soldier placed on the directiug flank of each subdivision of a column of troops, or at the end of a line, to mark the pivots, formations, marches, and alignments in tactics. Farrow. Guide bar (Mach.), the part of a steam engine on which the crosshead slides, and by which the motion of the piston rod is kept parallel to the cylinder, being a substitute for the parallel motion; -- called also guide, and slide bar. -- Guide block (Steam Engine), a block attached in to the crosshead to work in contact with the guide bar. -- Guide meridian. (Surveying) See under Meridian. -- Guide pile (Engin.), a pile driven to mark a place, as a point to work to. -- Guide pulley (Mach.), a pulley for directing or changing the line of motion of belt; an idler. Knight. -- Guide rail (Railroads), an additional rail, between the others, gripped by horizontal driving wheels on the locomotive, as a means of propulsion on steep gradients.
bed: 1. An article of furniture to sleep or take rest in or on; a couch. Specifically: A sack or mattress, filled with some soft material, in distinction from the bedstead on which it is placed (as, a feather bed), or this with the bedclothes added. In a general sense, any thing or place used for sleeping or reclining on or in, as a quantity of hay, straw, leaves, or twigs. And made for him [a horse] a leafy bed. Byron. I wash, wring, brew, bake, . . . make the beds. Shak. In bed he slept not for my urging it. Shak. 2. (Used as the symbol of matrimony) Marriage. George, the eldest son of his second bed. Clarendon. 3. A plat or level piece of ground in a garden, usually a little raised above the adjoining ground. "Beds of hyacinth and roses." Milton. 4. A mass or heap of anything arranged like a bed; as, a bed of ashes or coals. 5. The bottom of a watercourse, or of any body of water; as, the bed of a river. So sinks the daystar in the ocean bed. Milton. 6. (Geol.)  A layer or seam, or a horizontal stratum between layers; as, a bed of coal, iron, etc. 7. (Gun.)  See Gun carriage, and Mortar bed. 8. (Masonry) (a) The horizontal surface of a building stone; as, the upper and lower beds. (b) A course of stone or brick in a wall. (c) The place or material in which a block or brick is laid. (d) The lower surface of a brick, slate, or tile. Knight. 9. (Mech.)  The foundation or the more solid and fixed part or framing of a machine; or a part on which something is laid or supported; as, the bed of an engine. 10. The superficial earthwork, or ballast, of a railroad. 11. (Printing)  The flat part of the press, on which the form is laid. Note: Bed is much used adjectively or in combination; as, bed key or bedkey; bed wrench or bedwrench; bedchamber; bedmaker, etc. Bed of justice (French Hist.), the throne (F. lit bed) occupied by the king when sitting in one of his parliaments (judicial courts); hence, a session of a refractory parliament, at which the king was present for the purpose of causing his decrees to be registered. -- To be brought to bed, to be delivered of a child; -- often followed by of; as, to be brought to bed of a son. -- To make a bed, to prepare a bed; to arrange or put in order a bed and its bedding. -- From bed and board (Law), a phrase applied to a separation by partial divorce of man and wife, without dissolving the bonds of matrimony. If such a divorce (now commonly called a judicial separation) be granted at the instance of the wife, she may have alimony.  1. To place in a bed. [Obs.] Bacon. 2. To make partaker of one's bed; to cohabit with. I'll to the Tuscan wars, and never bed her. Shak. 3. To furnish with a bed or bedding. 4. To plant or arrange in beds; to set, or cover, as in a bed of soft earth; as, to bed the roots of a plant in mold. 5. To lay or put in any hollow place, or place of rest and security, surrounded or inclosed; to embed; to furnish with or place upon a bed or foundation; as, to bed a stone; it was bedded on a rock. Among all chains or clusters of mountains where large bodies of still water are bedded. Wordsworth. 6. (Masonry)  To dress or prepare the surface of stone) so as to serve as a bed. 7. To lay flat; to lay in order; to place in a horizontal or recumbent position. "Bedded hair." Shak.  To go to bed; to cohabit. If he be married, and bed with his wife. Wiseman.
capital: 1. Of or pertaining to the head. [Obs.] Needs must the Serpent now his capital bruise Expect with mortal pain. Milton. 2. Having reference to, or involving, the forfeiture of the head or life; affecting life; punishable with death; as, capital trials; capital punishment. Many crimes that are capital among us. Swift. To put to death a capital offender. Milton. 3. First in importance; chief; principal. A capital article in religion Atterbury. Whatever is capital and essential in Christianity. I. Taylor. 4. Chief, in a political sense, as being the seat of the general government of a state or nation; as, Washington and Paris are capital cities. 5. Of first rate quality; excellent; as, a capital speech or song. [Colloq.] Capital letter Etym: [F, lettre capitale] (Print.), a leading or heading letter, used at the beginning of a sentence and as the first letter of certain words, distinguished, for the most part, both by different form and larger size, from the small (lower-case) letters, which form the greater part of common print or writing. -- Small capital letters have the form of capital letters and height of the body of the lower-case letters. -- Capital stock, money, property, or stock invested in any business, or the enterprise of any corporation or institution. Abbott. Syn. -- Chief; leading; controlling; prominent.  1. (Arch.)  The head or uppermost member of a column, pilaster, etc. It consists generally of three parts, abacus, bell (or vase), and necking. See these terms, and Column. 2. Etym: [Cf. F. capilate, fem., sc. ville.] (Geog.)  The seat of government; the chief city or town in a country; a metropolis. "A busy and splendid capital" Macauly. 3. Etym: [Cf. F. capital.]  Money, property, or stock employed in trade, manufactures, etc.; the sum invested or lent, as distinguished from the income or interest. See Capital stock, under Capital, a. 4. (Polit. Econ.)  That portion of the produce of industry, which may be directly employed either to support human beings or to assist in production. M'Culloch. Note: When wealth is used to assist production it is called capital. The capital of a civilized community includes fixed capital (i.e. buildings, machines, and roads used in the course of production and exchange) amd circulating capital (i.e., food, fuel, money, etc., spent in the course of production and exchange). T. Raleing. 5. Anything which can be used to increase one's power or influence. He tried to make capital out of his rival's discomfiture. London Times. 6. (Fort.)  An imaginary line dividing a bastion, ravelin, or other work, into two equal parts. 7. A chapter, or section, of a book. [Obs.] Holy St. Bernard hath said in the 59th capital. Sir W. Scott. 8. (Print.)  See Capital letter, under Capital, a. Active capital. See under Active, -- Small capital (Print.), a small capital letter. See under Capital, a. -- To live on one's capital, to consume one's capital without producing or accumulating anything to replace it.
rule: 1. That which is prescribed or laid down as a guide for conduct or action; a governing direction for a specific purpose; an authoritative enactment; a regulation; a prescription; a precept; as, the rules of various societies; the rules governing a school; a rule of etiquette or propriety; the rules of cricket. We profess to have embraced a religion which contains the most exact rules for the government of our lives. Tillotson. 2. Hence: (a) Uniform or established course of things. 'T is against the rule of nature. Shak. (b) Systematic method or practice; as, my ule is to rise at six o'clock. (c) Ordibary course of procedure; usual way; comon state or condition of things; as, it is a rule to which there are many exeptions. (d) Conduct in general; behavior. [Obs.] This uncivil rule; she shall know of it. Shak. 3. The act of ruling; administration of law; government; empire; authority; control. Obey them that have the rule over you. Heb. xiii. 17. His stern rule the groaning land obeyed. Pope. 4. (Law)  An order regulating the practice of the courts, or an order made between parties to an action or a suit. Wharton. 5. (Math.)  A determinate method prescribed for performing any operation and producing a certain result; as, a rule for extracting the cube root. 6. (Gram.)  A general principle concerning the formation or use of words, or a concise statement thereof; thus, it is a rule in England, that s or es , added to a noun in the singular number, forms the plural of that noun; but "man" forms its plural "men", and is an exception to the rule. 7. (a) A straight strip of wood, metal, or the like, which serves as a guide in drawing a straight line; a ruler. (b) A measuring instrument consisting of a graduated bar of wood, ivory, metal, or the like, which is usually marked so as to show inches and fractions of an inch, and jointed so that it may be folded compactly. A judicious artist will use his eye, but he will trust only to his rule. South. 8. (Print.) (a) A thin plate of metal (usually brass) of the same height as the type, and used for printing lines, as between columns on the same page, or in tabular work. (b) A composing rule. See under Conposing. As a rule, as a general thing; in the main; usually; as, he behaves well, as a rule. -- Board rule, Caliber rule,etc. See under Board, Caliber, etc. -- Rule joint, a knuckle joint having shoulders that abut when the connected pieces come in line with each other, and thus permit folding in one direction only. -- Rule of three (Arith.), that rule which directs, when three terms are given, how to find a fourth, which shall have the same ratio to the third term as the second has to the first; proportion. See Proportion, 5 (b). -- Rule of thumb, any rude process or operation, like that of using the thumb as a rule in measuring; hence, judgment and practical experience as distinguished from scientific knowledge. Syn. -- regulation; law; precept; maxim; guide; canon; order; method; direction; control; government; sway; empire.  1. To control the will and actions of; to exercise authority or dominion over; to govern; to manage. Chaucer. A bishop then must be blameless; . . . one that ruleth well his own house, having his children in subjection. 1 Tim. iii. 2, 4. 2. To control or direct by influence, counsel, or persuasion; to guide; -- used chiefly in the passive. I think she will be ruled In all respects by me. Shak. 3. To establish or settle by, or as by, a rule; to fix by universal or general consent, or by common practice. That's are ruled case with the schoolmen. Atterbury. 4. (Law)  To require or command by rule; to give as a direction or order of court. 5. To mark with lines made with a pen, pencil, etc., guided by a rule or ruler; to print or mark with lines by means of a rule or other contrivance effecting a similar result; as, to rule a sheet of paper of a blank book. Ruled surface (Geom.), any surface that may be described by a straight line moving according to a given law; -- called also a scroll.  1. To have power or command; to exercise supreme authority; -- often followed by over. By me princes rule, and nobles. Prov. viii. 16. We subdue and rule over all other creatures. Ray. 2. (Law)  To lay down and settle a rule or order of court; to decide an incidental point; to enter a rule. Burril. Bouvier. 3. (Com.)  To keep within a (certain) range for a time; to be in general, or as a rule; as, prices ruled lower yesterday than the day before.
poem: 1. A metrical composition; a composition in verse written in certain measures, whether in blank verse or in rhyme, and characterized by imagination and poetic diction; -- contradistinguished from prose; as, the poems of Homer or of Milton. 2. A composition, not in verse, of which the language is highly imaginative or impassioned; as, a prose poem; the poems of Ossian.
stream: 1. A current water or other fluid; a liquid flowing continuously in a line or course, either on the earth, as a river, brook, etc., or from a vessel, reservoir, or fountain; specifically, any course of running water; as, many streams are blended in the Mississippi; gas and steam came from the earth in streams; a stream of molten lead from a furnace; a stream of lava from a volcano. 2. A beam or ray of light. "Sun streams." Chaucer. 3. Anything issuing or moving with continued succession of parts; as, a stream of words; a stream of sand. "The stream of beneficence." Atterbury. "The stream of emigration." Macaulay. 4. A continued current or course; as, a stream of weather. "The very stream of his life." Shak. 5. Current; drift; tendency; series of tending or moving causes; as, the stream of opinions or manners. Gulf stream. See under Gulf. -- Stream anchor, Stream cable. (Naut.) See under Anchor, and Cable. -- Stream ice, blocks of ice floating in a mass together in some definite direction. -- Stream tin, particles or masses of tin ore found in alluvial ground; -- so called because a stream of water is the principal agent used in separating the ore from the sand and gravel. -- Stream works (Cornish Mining), a place where an alluvial deposit of tin ore is worked. Ure. -- To float with the stream, figuratively, to drift with the current of opinion, custom, etc., so as not to oppose or check it. Syn. -- Current; flow; rush; tide; course. -- Stream, Current. These words are often properly interchangeable; but stream is the broader word, denoting a prevailing onward course. The stream of the Mississippi rolls steadily on to the Gulf of Mexico, but there are reflex currents in it which run for a while in a contrary direction.  1. To issue or flow in a stream; to flow freely or in a current, as a fluid or whatever is likened to fluids; as, tears streamed from her eyes. Beneath those banks where rivers stream. Milton. 2. To pour out, or emit, a stream or streams. A thousand suns will stream on thee. Tennyson. 3. To issue in a stream of light; to radiate. 4. To extend; to stretch out with a wavy motion; to float in the wind; as, a flag streams in the wind.  To send forth in a current or stream; to cause to flow; to pour; as, his eyes streamed tears. It may so please that she at length will stream Some dew of grace into my withered heart. Spenser. 2. To mark with colors or embroidery in long tracts. The herald's mantle is streamed with gold. Bacon. 3. To unfurl. Shak. To stream the buoy. (Naut.) See under Buoy.
go: Gone. Chaucer.  1. To pass from one place to another; to be in motion; to be in a state not motionless or at rest; to proced; to advance; to make progress; -- used, in various applications, of the movement of both animate and inanimate beings, by whatever means, and also of the movements of the mind; also figuratively applied. 2. To move upon the feet, or step by step; to walk; also, to walk step by step, or leisurely. Note: In old writers go is much used as opposed to run, or ride. "Whereso I go or ride." Chaucer. You know that love Will creep in service where it can not go. Shak. Thou must run to him; for thou hast staid so long that going will scarce serve the turn. Shak. He fell from running to going, and from going to clambering upon his hands and his knees. Bunyan. Note: In Chaucer go is used frequently with the pronoun in the objective used reflexively; as, he goeth him home. 3. To be passed on fron one to another; to pass; to circulate; hence, with for, to have currency; to be taken, accepted, or regarded. The man went among men for an old man in the days of Saul. 1 Sa. xvii. 12. [The money] should go according to its true value. Locke. 4. To proceed or happen in a given manner; to fare; to move on or be carried on; to have course; to come to an issue or result; to succeed; to turn out. How goes the night, boy Shak. I think, as the world goes, he was a good sort of man enough. Arbuthnot. Whether the cause goes for me or against me, you must pay me the reward. I Watts. 5. To proceed or tend toward a result, consequence, or product; to tend; to conduce; to be an ingredient; to avail; to apply; to contribute; -- often with the infinitive; as, this goes to show. Against right reason all your counsels go. Dryden. To master the foul flend there goeth some complement knowledge of theology. Sir W. Scott. 6. To apply one's self; to set one's self; to undertake. Seeing himself confronted by so many, like a resolute orator, he went not to denial, but to justify his cruel falsehood. Sir P. Sidney. Note: Go, in this sense, is often used in the present participle with the auxiliary verb to be, before an infinitive, to express a future of intention, or to denote design; as, I was going to say; I am going to begin harvest. 7. To proceed by a mental operation; to pass in mind or by an act of the memory or imagination; -- generally with over or through. By going over all these particulars, you may receive some tolerable satisfaction about this great subject. South. 8. To be with young; to be pregnant; to gestate. The fruit she goes with, I pray for heartily, that it may find Good time, and live. Shak. 9. To move from the person speaking, or from the point whence the action is contemplated; to pass away; to leave; to depart; -- in opposition to stay and come. I will let you go, that ye may sacrifice to the Lord your God; . . . only ye shall not go very far away. Ex. viii. 28. 10. To pass away; to depart forever; to be lost or ruined; to perish; to decline; to decease; to die. By Saint George, he's gone! That spear wound hath our master sped. Sir W. Scott. 11. To reach; to extend; to lead; as, a line goes across the street; his land goes to the river; this road goes to New York. His amorous expressions go no further than virtue may allow. Dryden. 12. To have recourse; to resort; as, to go to law. Note: Go is used, in combination with many prepositions and adverbs, to denote motion of the kind indicated by the preposition or adverb, in which, and not in the verb, lies the principal force of the expression; as, to go against to go into, to go out, to go aside, to go astray, etc. Go to, come; move; go away; -- a phrase of exclamation, serious or ironical. -- To go a-begging, not to be in demand; to be undesired. -- To go about. (a) To set about; to enter upon a scheme of action; to undertake. "They went about to slay him." Acts ix. 29. They never go about . . . to hide or palliate their vices. Swift. (b) (Naut.) To tack; to turn the head of a ship; to wear. -- To go abraod. (a) To go to a foreign country. (b) To go out of doors. (c) To become public; to be published or disclosed; to be current. Then went this saying abroad among the brethren. John xxi. 23. -- To go against. (a) To march against; to attack. (b) To be in opposition to; to be disagreeable to. -- To go ahead. (a) To go in advance. (b) To go on; to make progress; to proceed. -- To go and come. See To come and go, under Come. -- To go aside. (a) To withdraw; to retire. He . . . went aside privately into a desert place. Luke. ix. 10. (b) To go from what is right; to err. Num. v. 29.-- To go back on. (a) To retrace (one's path or footsteps). (b) To abandon; to turn against; to betray. [Slang, U. S.] -- To go below (Naut), to go below deck. -- To go between, to interpose or mediate between; to be a secret agent between parties; in a bad sense, to pander. -- To go beyond. See under Beyond. -- To go by, to pass away unnoticed; to omit. -- To go by the board (Naut.), to fall or be carried overboard; as, the mast went by the board. -- To go down. (a) To descend. (b) To go below the horizon; as, the sun has gone down. (c) To sink; to founder; -- said of ships, etc. (d) To be swallowed; -- used literally or figuratively. [Colloq.] Nothing so ridiculous, . . . but it goes down whole with him for truth. L' Estrange. -- To go far. (a) To go to a distance. (b) To have much weight or influence. -- To go for. (a) To go in quest of. (b) To represent; to pass for. (c) To favor; to advocate. (d) To attack; to assault. [Low] (e) To sell for; to be parted with for (a price). -- To go for nothing, to be parted with for no compensation or result; to have no value, efficacy, or influence; to count for nothing. -- To go forth. (a) To depart from a place. (b) To be divulged or made generally known; to emanate. The law shall go forth of Zion, and the word of the Lord from Jerusalem. Micah iv. 2. -- To go hard with, to trouble, pain, or endanger. -- To go in, to engage in; to take part. [Colloq.] -- To go in and out, to do the business of life; to live; to have free access. John x. 9. -- To go in for. [Colloq.] (a) To go for; to favor or advocate (a candidate, a measure, etc.). (b) To seek to acquire or attain to (wealth, honor, preferment, etc.) (c) To complete for (a reward, election, etc.). (d) To make the object of one's labors, studies, etc. He was as ready to go in for statistics as for anything else. Dickens. -- To go in to or unto. (a) To enter the presence of. Esther iv. 16.(b) To have sexual intercourse with. [Script.] -- To go into. (a) To speak of, investigate, or discuss (a question, subject, etc.). (b) To participate in (a war, a business, etc.). -- To go large. (Naut) See under Large. -- To go off. (a) To go away; to depart. The leaders . . . will not go off until they hear you. Shak. (b) To cease; to intermit; as, this sickness went off. (c) To die. Shak. (d) To explode or be discharged; -- said of gunpowder, of a gun, a mine, etc. (e) To find a purchaser; to be sold or disposed of. (f) To pass off; to take place; to be accomplished. The wedding went off much as such affairs do. Mrs. Caskell. -- To go on. (a) To proceed; to advance further; to continue; as, to go on reading. (b) To be put or drawn on; to fit over; as, the coat will not go on. -- To go all fours, to correspond exactly, point for point. It is not easy to make a simile go on all fours. Macaulay. -- To go out. (a) To issue forth from a place. (b) To go abroad; to make an excursion or expedition. There are other men fitter to go out than I. Shak. What went ye out for to see Matt. xi. 7, 8, 9. (c) To become diffused, divulged, or spread abroad, as news, fame etc. (d) To expire; to die; to cease; to come to an end; as, the light has gone out. Life itself goes out at thy displeasure. Addison. -- To go over. (a) To traverse; to cross, as a river, boundary, etc.; to change sides. I must not go over Jordan. Deut. iv. 22. Let me go over, and see the good land that is beyond Jordan. Deut. iii. 25. Ishmael . . . departed to go over to the Ammonites. Jer. xli. 10. (b) To read, or study; to examine; to review; as, to go over one's accounts. If we go over the laws of Christianity, we shall find that . . . they enjoin the same thing. Tillotson. (c) To transcend; to surpass. (d) To be postponed; as, the bill went over for the session. (e) (Chem.) To be converted (into a specified substance or material); as, monoclinic sulphur goes over into orthorhombic, by standing; sucrose goes over into dextrose and levulose. -- To go through. (a) To accomplish; as, to go through a work. (b) To suffer; to endure to the end; as, to go through a surgical operation or a tedious illness. (c) To spend completely; to exhaust, as a fortune. (d) To strip or despoil (one) of his property. [Slang] (e) To botch or bungle a business. [Scot.] -- To go through with, to perform, as a calculation, to the end; to complete. -- To go to ground. (a) To escape into a hole; -- said of a hunted fox. (b) To fall in battle. -- To go to naught (Colloq.), to prove abortive, or unavailling. -- To go under. (a) To set; -- said of the sun. (b) To be known or recognized by (a name, title, etc.). (c) To be overwhelmed, submerged, or defeated; to perish; to succumb. -- To go up, to come to nothing; to prove abortive; to fail. [Slang] -- To go upon, to act upon, as a foundation or hypothesis. -- To go with. (a) To accompany. (b) To coincide or agree with. (c) To suit; to harmonize with. -- To go (well, ill, or hard) with, to affect (one) in such manner. -- To go without, to be, or to remain, destitute of. -- To go wrong. (a) To take a wrong road or direction; to wander or stray. (b) To depart from virtue. (c) To happen unfortunately. (d) To miss success. -- To let go, to allow to depart; to quit one's hold; to release.  1. To take, as a share in an enterprise; to undertake or become responsible for; to bear a part in. They to go equal shares in the booty. L'Estrange. 2. To bet or wager; as, I'll go you a shilling. [Colloq.] To go halves, to share with another equally. -- To go it, to behave in a wild manner; to be uproarious; to carry on; also, to proceed; to make progress. [Colloq.] -- To go it alone (Card Playing), to play a hand without the assistance of one's partner. -- To go it blind. (a) To act in a rash, reckless, or headlong manner. [Slang] (b) (Card Playing) To bet without having examined the cards. -- To go one's way, to set forth; to depart.  1. Act; working; operation. [Obs.] So gracious were the goes of marriage. Marston. 2. A circumstance or occurrence; an incident. [Slang] This is a pretty go. Dickens. 3. The fashion or mode; as, quite the go. [Colloq.] 4. Noisy merriment; as, a high go. [Colloq.] 5. A glass of spirits. [Slang] 6. Power of going or doing; energy; vitality; perseverance; push; as, there is no go in him. [Colloq.] 7. (Cribbage)  That condition in the course of the game when a player can not lay down a card which will not carry the aggregate count above thirty-one. Great go, Little go, the final and the preliminary examinations for a degree. [Slang, Eng. Univ.] -- No go, a failure; a fiasco. [Slang] Thackeray. -- On the go, moving about; unsettled. [Colloq.]
fraction: 1. The act of breaking, or state of being broken, especially by violence. [Obs.] Neither can the natural body of Christ be subject to any fraction or breaking up. Foxe. 2. A portion; a fragment. Some niggard fractions of an hour. Tennyson. 3. (Arith. or Alg.)  One or more aliquot parts of a unit or whole number; an expression for a definite portion of a unit or magnitude. Common, or Vulgar, fraction, a fraction in which the number of equal parts into which the integer is supposed to be divided is indicated by figures or letters, called the denominator, written below a line, over which is the numerator, indicating the number of these parts included in the fraction; as -- Complex fraction, a fraction having a fraction or mixed number in the numerator or denominator, or in both. Davies & Peck. -- Compound fraction, a fraction of a fraction; two or more fractions connected by of. -- Continued fraction, Decimal fraction, Partial fraction, etc. See under Continued, Decimal, Partial, etc. -- Improper fraction, a fraction in which the numerator is greater than the denominator. -- Proper fraction, a fraction in which the numerator is less than the denominator.  To separate by means of, or to subject to, fractional distillation or crystallization; to fractionate; -- frequently used with out; as, to fraction out a certain grade of oil from pretroleum.
his: 1. Belonging or pertaining to him; -- used as a pronominal adjective or adjective pronoun; as, tell John his papers are ready; formerly used also for its, but this use is now obsolete. No comfortable star did lend his light. Shak. Who can impress the forest, bid the tree Unfix his earth-bound root Shak. Note: Also formerly used in connection with a noun simply as a sign of the possessive. "The king his son." Shak. "By young Telemachus his blooming years." Pope. This his is probably a corruption of the old possessive ending -is or -es, which, being written as a separate word, was at length confounded with the pronoun his. 2. The possessive of he; as, the book is his. "The sea is his, and he made it." Ps. xcv. 5.
answer: 1. To speak in defense against; to reply to in defense; as, to answer a charge; to answer an accusation. 2. To speak or write in return to, as in return to a call or question, or to a speech, declaration, argument, or the like; to reply to (a question, remark, etc.); to respond to. She answers him as if she knew his mind. Shak. So spake the apostate angel, though in pain: . . . And him thus answered soon his bold compeer. Milton. 3. To respond to satisfactorily; to meet successfully by way of explanation, argument, or justification, and the like; to refute. No man was able to answer him a word. Matt. xxii. 46. These shifts refuted, answer thine appellant. Milton. The reasoning was not and could not be answered. Macaulay. 4. To be or act in return or response to. Hence: (a) To be or act in compliance with, in fulfillment or satisfaction of, as an order, obligation, demand; as, he answered my claim upon him; the servant answered the bell. This proud king . . . studies day and night To answer all the debts he owes unto you. Shak. (b) To render account to or for. I will . . . send him to answer thee. Shak. (c) To atone; to be punished for. And grievously hath Cæzar answered it. Shak. (d) To be opposite to; to face. The windows answering each other, we could just discern the glowing horizon them. Gilpin. (e) To be or act an equivalent to, or as adequate or sufficient for; to serve for; to repay. [R.] Money answereth all things. Eccles. x. 19. (f) To be or act in accommodation, conformity, relation, or proportion to; to correspond to; to suit. Weapons must needs be dangerous things, if they answered the bulk of so prodigious a person. Swift.  1. To speak or write by way of return (originally, to a charge), or in reply; to make response. There was no voice, nor any that answered. 1 Kings xviii. 26. 2. To make a satisfactory response or return. Hence: To render account, or to be responsible; to be accountable; to make amends; as, the man must answer to his employer for the money intrusted to his care. Let his neck answer for it, if there is any martial law. Shak. 3. To be or act in return. Hence: (a) To be or act by way of compliance, fulfillment, reciprocation, or satisfaction; to serve the purpose; as, gypsum answers as a manure on some soils. Do the strings answer to thy noble hand Dryden. (b) To be opposite, or to act in opposition. (c) To be or act as an equivalent, or as adequate or sufficient; as, a very few will answer. (d) To be or act in conformity, or by way of accommodation, correspondence, relation, or proportion; to conform; to correspond; to suit; -- usually with to. That the time may have all shadow and silence in it, and the place answer to convenience. Shak. If this but answer to my just belief, I 'll remember you. Shak. As in water face answereth to face, so the heart of man to man. Pro  1. A reply to a change; a defense. At my first answer no man stood with me. 2 Tim. iv. 16. 2. Something said or written in reply to a question, a call, an argument, an address, or the like; a reply. A soft answer turneth away wrath. Prov. xv. 1. I called him, but he gave me no answer. Cant. v. 6. 3. Something done in return for, or in consequence of, something else; a responsive action. Great the slaughter is Here made by the Roman; great the answer be Britons must take. Shak. 4. A solution, the result of a mathematical operation; as, the answer to a problem. 5. (Law)  A counter-statement of facts in a course of pleadings; a confutation of what the other party has alleged; a responsive declaration by a witness in reply to a question. In Equity, it is the usual form of defense to the complainant's charges in his bill. Bouvier. Syn. -- Reply; rejoinder; response. See Reply.
person: 1. A character or part, as in a play; a specific kind or manifestation of individual character, whether in real life, or in literary or dramatic representation; an assumed character. [Archaic] His first appearance upon the stage in his new person of a sycophant or juggler. Bacon. No man can long put on a person and act a part. Jer. Taylor. To bear rule, which was thy part And person, hadst thou known thyself aright. Milton. How different is the same man from himself, as he sustains the person of a magistrate and that of a friend! South. 2. The bodily form of a human being; body; outward appearance; as, of comely person. A fair persone, and strong, and young of age. Chaucer. If it assume my noble father's person. Shak. Love, sweetness, goodness, in her person shined. Milton. 3. , self-conscious being, as distinct from an animal or a thing; a moral agent; a human being; a man, woman, or child. Consider what person stands for; which, I think, is a thinking, intelligent being, that has reason and reflection. Locke. 4. A human being spoken of indefinitely; one; a man; as, any person present. 5. A parson; the parish priest. [Obs.] Chaucer. 6. (Theol.)  Among Trinitarians, one of the three subdivisions of the Godhead (the Father, the Son, and the Holy Ghost); an hypostasis. "Three persons and one God." Bk. of Com. Prayer. 7. (Gram.)  One of three relations or conditions (that of speaking, that of being spoken to, and that of being spoken of) pertaining to a noun or a pronoun, and thence also to the verb of which it may be the subject. Note: A noun or pronoun, when representing the speaker, is said to be in the first person; when representing what is spoken to, in the second person; when representing what is spoken of, in the third person. 8. (Biol.)  A shoot or bud of a plant; a polyp or zooid of the compound Hydrozoa Anthozoa, etc.; also, an individual, in the narrowest sense, among the higher animals. Haeckel. True corms, composed of united personæ . . . usually arise by gemmation, . . . yet in sponges and corals occasionally by fusion of several originally distinct persons. Encyc. Brit. Artificial, or Fictitious, person (Law), a corporation or body politic. blackstone. -- Natural person (Law), a man, woman, or child, in distinction from a corporation. -- In person, by one's self; with bodily presence; not by representative. "The king himself in person is set forth." Shak. -- In the person of, in the place of; acting for. Shak.  To represent as a person; to personify; to impersonate. [Obs.] Milton.
run: 1. To move, proceed, advance, pass, go, come, etc., swiftly, smoothly, or with quick action; -- said of things animate or inanimate. Hence, to flow, glide, or roll onward, as a stream, a snake, a wagon, etc.; to move by quicker action than in walking, as a person, a horse, a dog. Specifically: -- 2. Of voluntary or personal action: (a) To go swiftly; to pass at a swift pace; to hasten. "Ha, ha, the fox!" and after him they ran. Chaucer. (b) To flee, as from fear or danger. As from a bear a man would run for life. Shak. (c) To steal off; to depart secretly. My conscience will serve me to run from this jew. Shak. (d) To contend in a race; hence, to enter into a contest; to become a candidate; as, to run for Congress. Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the prize So run, that ye may obtain. 1 Cor. ix. 24. (e) To pass from one state or condition to another; to come into a certain condition; -- often with in or into; as, to run into evil practices; to run in debt. Have I not cause to rave and beat my breast, to rend my heart with grief and run distracted Addison. (f) To exert continuous activity; to proceed; as, to run through life; to run in a circle. (g) To pass or go quickly in thought or conversation; as, to run from one subject to another. Virgil, in his first Georgic, has run into a set of precepts foreign to his subject. Addison. (h) To discuss; to continue to think or speak about something; -- with on. (i) To make numerous drafts or demands for payment, as upon a bank; - - with on. (j) To creep, as serpents. 3. Of involuntary motion: (a) To flow, as a liquid; to ascend or descend; to course; as, rivers run to the sea; sap runs up in the spring; her blood ran cold. (b) To proceed along a surface; to extend; to spread. The fire ran along upon the ground. Ex. ix. 23. (c) To become fluid; to melt; to fuse. As wax dissolves, as ice begins to run. Addison. Sussex iron ores run freely in the fire. Woodward. (d) To turn, as a wheel; to revolve on an axis or pivot; as, a wheel runs swiftly round. (e) To travel; to make progress; to be moved by mechanical means; to go; as, the steamboat runs regularly to Albany; the train runs to Chicago. (f) To extend; to reach; as, the road runs from Philadelphia to New York; the memory of man runneth not the contrary. She saw with joy the line immortal run, Each sire impressed, and glaring in his son. Pope. (g) To go back and forth from place to place; to ply; as, the stage runs between the hotel and the station. (h) To make progress; to proceed; to pass. As fast as our time runs, we should be very glad in most part of our lives that it ran much faster. Addison. (i) To continue in operation; to be kept in action or motion; as, this engine runs night and day; the mill runs six days in the week. When we desire anything, our minds run wholly on the good circumstances of it; when it is obtained, our minds run wholly on the bad ones. Swift. (j) To have a course or direction; as, a line runs east and west. Where the generally allowed practice runs counter to it. Locke. Little is the wisdom, where the flight So runs against all reason. Shak. (k) To be in form thus, as a combination of words. The king's ordinary style runneth, "Our sovereign lord the king." Bp. Sanderson. (l) To be popularly known; to be generally received. Men gave them their own names, by which they run a great while in Rome. Sir W. Temple. Neither was he ignorant what report ran of himself. Knolle (m) To have growth or development; as, boys and girls run up rapidly. if the richness of the ground cause turnips to run to leaves. Mortimer. (n) To tend, as to an effect or consequence; to incline. A man's nature runs either to herbs or weeds. Bacon. Temperate climates run into moderate governments. Swift. (o) To spread and blend together; to unite; as, colors run in washing. In the middle of a rainbow the colors are . . . distinguished, but near the borders they run into one another. I. Watts. (p) To have a legal course; to be attached; to continue in force, effect, or operation; to follow; to go in company; as, certain covenants run with the land. Customs run only upon our goods imported or exported, and that but once for all; whereas interest runs as well upon our ships as goods, and must be yearly paid. Sir J. Child. (q) To continue without falling due; to hold good; as, a note has thirty days to run. (r) To discharge pus or other matter; as, an ulcer runs. (s) To be played on the stage a number of successive days or nights; as, the piece ran for six months. (t) (Naut.) To sail before the wind, in distinction from reaching or sailing closehauled; -- said of vessels. 4. Specifically, of horse: To move rapidly in a gait in which each leg acts in turn as a propeller and a supporter, and in which for an instant all the limbs are gathered in the air under the body. Stillman (The Horse in Motion). 5. (Athletics)  To move rapidly by springing steps so that there is an instant in each step when neither foot touches the ground; -- so distinguished from walking in athletic competition. As thing run, according to the usual order, conditions, quality, etc.; on the average; without selection or specification. -- To let run (Naut.), to allow to pass or move freely; to slacken or loosen. -- To run after, to pursue or follow; to search for; to endeavor to find or obtain; as to run after similies. Locke. -- To run away, to flee; to escape; to elope; to run without control or guidance. -- To run away with. (a) To convey away hurriedly; to accompany in escape or elopement. (b) To drag rapidly and with violence; as, a horse runs away with a carriage. -- To run down. (a) To cease to work or operate on account of the exhaustion of the motive power; -- said of clocks, watches, etc. (b) To decline in condition; as, to run down in health. -- To run down a coast, to sail along it. -- To run for an office, to stand as a candidate for an office. -- To run in or into. (a) To enter; to step in. (b) To come in collision with. -- To run in trust, to run in debt; to get credit. [Obs.] -- To run in with. (a) To close; to comply; to agree with. [R.] T. Baker. (b) (Naut.) To make toward; to near; to sail close to; as, to run in with the land. -- To run mad, To run mad after or on. See under Mad. -- To run on. (a) To be continued; as, their accounts had run on for a year or two without a settlement. (b) To talk incessantly. (c) To continue a course. (d) To press with jokes or ridicule; to abuse with sarcasm; to bear hard on. (e) (Print.) To be continued in the same lines, without making a break or beginning a new paragraph. -- To run out. (a) To come to an end; to expire; as, the lease runs out Michaelmas. (b) To extend; to spread. "Insectile animals . . . run all out into legs." Hammond. (c) To expatiate; as, to run out into beautiful digressions. (d) To be wasted or exhausted; to become poor; to become extinct; as, an estate managed without economy will soon run out. And had her stock been less, no doubt She must have long ago run out. Dryden. -- To run over. (a) To overflow; as, a cup runs over, or the liquor runs over. (b) To go over, examine, or rehearse cursorily. (c) To ride or drive over; as, to run over a child. -- To run riot, to go to excess. -- To run through. (a) To go through hastily; as to run through a book. (b) To spend wastefully; as, to run through an estate. -- To run to seed, to expend or exhaust vitality in producing seed, as a plant; figuratively and colloquially, to cease growing; to lose vital force, as the body or mind. -- To run up, to rise; to swell; to grow; to increase; as, accounts of goods credited run up very fast. But these, having been untrimmed for many years, had run up into great bushes, or rather dwarf trees. Sir W. Scott. -- To run with. (a) To be drenched with, so that streams flow; as, the streets ran with blood. (b) To flow while charged with some foreign substance. "Its rivers ran with gold." J. H. Newman.  1. To cause to run (in the various senses of Run, v. i.); as, to run a horse; to run a stage; to run a machine; to run a rope through a block. 2. To pursue in thought; to carry in contemplation. To run the world back to its first original. South. I would gladly understand the formation of a soul, and run it up to its "punctum saliens." Collier. 3. To cause to enter; to thrust; as, to run a sword into or through the body; to run a nail into the foot. You run your head into the lion's mouth. Sir W. Scott. Having run his fingers through his hair. Dickens. 4. To drive or force; to cause, or permit, to be driven. They ran the ship aground. Acts xxvii. 41. A talkative person runs himself upon great inconveniences by blabbing out his own or other's secrets. Ray. Others, accustomed to retired speculations, run natural philosophy into metaphysical notions. Locke. 5. To fuse; to shape; to mold; to cast; as, to run bullets, and the like. The purest gold must be run and washed. Felton. 6. To cause to be draw; to mark out; to indicate; to determine; as, to run a line. 7. To cause to pass, to evade, offical restrictions; to smuggle; -- said of contraband or dutiable goods. heavy impositions . . . are a strong temptation of running goods. Swift. 8. To go through or accomplish by running; as, to run a race; to run a certain career. 9. To cause to stand as a candidate for office; to support for office; as, to run some one for Congress. [Colloq. U.S.] 10. To encounter or incur, as a danger or risk; as, to run the risk of losing one's life. See To run the chance, below. "He runneth two dangers." Bacon. 11. To put at hazard; to venture; to risk. He would himself be in the Highlands to receive them, and run his fortune with them. Clarendon. 12. To discharge; to emit; to give forth copiously; to be bathed with; as, the pipe or faucet runs hot water. At the base of Pompey's statua, Which all the while ran blood, great Cæsar fell. Shak. 13. To be charged with, or to contain much of, while flowing; as, the rivers ran blood. 14. To conduct; to manage; to carry on; as, to run a factory or a hotel. [Colloq. U.S.] 15. To tease with sarcasms and ridicule. [Colloq.] 16. To sew, as a seam, by passing the needle through material in a continuous line, generally taking a series of stitches on the needle at the same time. 17. To migrate or move in schools; -- said of fish; esp., to ascend a river in order to spawn. To run a blockade, to get to, or away from, a blockaded port in safety. -- To run down. (a) (Hunting) To chase till the object pursued is captured or exhausted; as, to run down, a stag. (b) (Naut.) To run against and sink, as a vessel. (c) To crush; to overthrow; to overbear. "religion is run down by the license of these times." Berkeley. (d) To disparage; to traduce. F. W. Newman. -- To run hard. (a) To press in competition; as, to run one hard in a race. (b) To urge or press importunately. (c) To banter severely. -- To run into the ground, to carry to an absurd extreme; to overdo. [Slang, U.S.] -- To run off, to cause to flow away, as a charge of molten metal from a furnace. -- To run on (Print.), to carry on or continue, as the type for a new sentence, without making a break or commencing a new paragraph. -- To run out. (a) To thrust or push out; to extend. (b) To waste; to exhaust; as, to run out an estate. (c) (Baseball) To put out while running between two bases. -- To run the chances, or one's chances, to encounter all the risks of a certain course. -- To run through, to transfix; to pierce, as with a sword. "[He] was run through the body by the man who had asked his advice." Addison. -- To run up. (a) To thrust up, as anything long and slender. (b) To increase; to enlarge by additions, as an account.run up a bill (c) To erect hastily, as a building.  1. The act of running; as, a long run; a good run; a quick run; to go on the run. 2. A small stream; a brook; a creek. 3. That which runs or flows in the course of a certain operation, or during a certain time; as, a run of must in wine making; the first run of sap in a maple orchard. 4. A course; a series; that which continues in a certain course or series; as, a run of good or bad luck. They who made their arrangements in the first run of misadventure . . . put a seal on their calamities. Burke. 5. State of being current; currency; popularity. it is impossible for detached papers to have a general run, or long continuance, if not diversified with humor. Addison. 6. Continued repetition on the stage; -- said of a play; as, to have a run of a hundred successive nights. A canting, mawkish play . . . had an immense run. Macaulay. 7. A continuing urgent demand; especially, a pressure on a bank or treasury for payment of its notes. 8. A range or extent of ground for feeding stock; as, a sheep run. Howitt. 9. (Naut.) (a) The aftermost part of a vessel's hull where it narrows toward the stern, under the quarter (b) The distance sailed by a ship; as, a good run; a run of fifty miles. (c) A voyage; as, run to China. 10. A pleasure excursion; a trip. [Colloq.] A think of giving her a run in London. Dickens. 11. (Mining)  The horizontal distance to which a drift may be carried, either by license of the proprietor of a mine or by the nature of the formation; also, the direction which a vein of ore or other substance takes. 12. (Mus.)  A roulade, or series of running tones. 13. (Mil.)  The greatest degree of swiftness in marching. It is executed upon the same principles as the double-quick, but with greater speed. 14. The act of migrating, or ascending a river to spawn; -- said of fish; also, an assemblage or school of fishes which migrate, or ascend a river for the purpose of spawning. 15. In baseball, a complete circuit of the bases made by a player, which enables him to score one; in cricket, a passing from one wicket to the other, by which one point is scored; as, a player made three runs; the side went out with two hundred runs. The "runs" are made from wicket to wicket, the batsmen interchanging ends at each run. R. A. Proctor. 16. A pair or set of millstones. At the long run, now, commonly, In the long run, in or during the whole process or course of things taken together; in the final result; in the end; finally. [Man] starts the inferior of the brute animals, but he surpasses them in the long run. J. H. Newman. -- Home run. (a) A running or returning toward home, or to the point from which the start was made. Cf. Home stretch. (b) (Baseball) See under Home. -- The run, or The common run, etc., ordinary persons; the generality or average of people or things; also, that which ordinarily occurs; ordinary current, course, or kind. I saw nothing else that is superior to the common run of parks. Walpole. Burns never dreamed of looking down on others as beneath him, merely because he was conscious of his own vast superiority to the common run of men. Prof. Wilson. His whole appearance was something out of the common run. W. Irving. -- To let go by the run (Naut.), to loosen and let run freely, as lines; to let fall without restraint, as a sail.  1. Melted, or made from molten material; cast in a mold; as, run butter; run iron or lead. 2. Smuggled; as, run goods. [Colloq.] Miss Edgeworth. Run steel, malleable iron castings. See under Malleable. Raymond.
instant: 1. Pressing; urgent; importunate; earnest. Rejoicing in hope; patient in tribulation; continuing instant in prayer. Rom. xii. 12. I am beginning to be very instant for some sort of occupation. Carlyle. 2. Closely pressing or impending in respect to time; not deferred; immediate; without delay. Impending death is thine, and instant doom. Prior. 3. Present; current. The instant time is always the fittest time. Fuller. Note: The word in this sense is now used only in dates, to indicate the current month; as, the tenth of July instant.  Instantly. [Poetic] Instant he flew with hospitable haste. Pope.  1. A point in duration; a moment; a portion of time too short to be estimated; also, any particular moment. There is scarce an instant between their flourishing and their not being. Hooker. 2. A day of the present or current month; as, the sixth instant; -- an elliptical expression equivalent to the sixth of the month instant, i. e., the current month. See Instant, a., 3. Syn. -- Moment; flash; second.
fact: 1. A doing, making, or preparing. [Obs.] A project for the fact and vending Of a new kind of fucus, paint for ladies. B. Jonson. 2. An effect produced or achieved; anything done or that comes to pass; an act; an event; a circumstance. What might instigate him to this devilish fact, I am not able to conjecture. Evelyn. He who most excels in fact of arms. Milton. 3. Reality; actuality; truth; as, he, in fact, excelled all the rest; the fact is, he was beaten. 4. The assertion or statement of a thing done or existing; sometimes, even when false, improperly put, by a transfer of meaning, for the thing done, or supposed to be done; a thing supposed or asserted to be done; as, history abounds with false facts. I do not grant the fact. De Foe. This reasoning is founded upon a fact which is not true. Roger Long. Note: TheTerm fact has in jurisprudence peculiar uses in contrast with low; as, attorney at low, and attorney in fact; issue in low, and issue in fact. There is also a grand distinction between low and fact with reference to the province of the judge and that of the jury, the latter generally determining the fact, the former the low. Burrill Bouvier. Accessary before, or after, the fact. See under Accessary. -- Matter of fact, an actual occurrence; a verity; used adjectively: of or pertaining to facts; prosaic; unimaginative; as, a matter-of- fact narration. Syn. -- Act; deed; performance; event; incident; occurrence; circumstance.
provide: 1. To look out for in advance; to procure beforehand; to get, collect, or make ready for future use; to prepare. "Provide us all things necessary." Shak. 2. To supply; to afford; to contribute. Bring me berries, or such cooling fruit As the kind, hospitable woods provide. Milton. 3. To furnish; to supply; -- formerly followed by of, now by with. "And yet provided him of but one." Jer. Taylor. "Rome . . . was well provided with corn." Arbuthnot. 4. To establish as a previous condition; to stipulate; as, the contract provides that the work be well done. 5. To foresee. Note: [A Latinism] [Obs.] B. Jonson. 6. To appoint to an ecclesiastical benefice before it is vacant. See Provisor. Prescott.  1. To procure supplies or means in advance; to take measures beforehand in view of an expected or a possible future need, especially a danger or an evil; -- followed by against or for; as, to provide against the inclemency of the weather; to provide for the education of a child. Government is a contrivance of human wisdom to provide for human wants. Burke. 2. To stipulate previously; to condition; as, the agreement provides for an early completion of the work.
middle: 1. Equally distant from the extreme either of a number of things or of one thing; mean; medial; as, the middle house in a row; a middle rank or station in life; flowers of middle summer; men of middle age. 2. Intermediate; intervening. Will, seeking good, finds many middle ends. Sir J. Davies. Note: Middle is sometimes used in the formation of selfexplaining compounds; as, middle-sized, middle-witted. Middle Ages, the period of time intervening between the decline of the Roman Empire and the revival of letters. Hallam regards it as beginning with the sixth and ending with the fifteenth century. -- Middle class, in England, people who have an intermediate position between the aristocracy and the artisan class. It includes professional men, bankers, merchants, and small landed proprietors The middle-class electorate of Great Britain. M. Arnold. -- Middle distance. (Paint.) See Middle-ground. -- Middle English. See English, n., 2. -- Middle Kingdom, China. -- Middle oil (Chem.), that part of the distillate obtained from coal tar which passes over between 170º and 230º Centigrade; -- distinguished from the light, and the heavy or dead, oil. -- Middle passage, in the slave trade, that part of the Atlantic Ocean between Africa and the West Indies. -- Middle post. (Arch.) Same as King-post. -- Middle States, New York, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Delaware; which, at the time of the formation of the Union, occupied a middle position between the Eastern States (or New England) and the Southern States. [U.S.] -- Middle term (Logic), that term of a syllogism with which the two extremes are separately compared, and by means of which they are brought together in the conclusion. Brande. -- Middle tint (Paint.), a subdued or neutral tint. Fairholt. -- Middle voice. (Gram.) See under Voice. -- Middle watch, the period from midnight to four A. M.; also, the men on watch during that time. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- Middle weight, a pugilist, boxer, or wrestler classed as of medium weight, i. e., over 140 and not over 160 lbs., in distinction from those classed as light weights, heavy weights, etc.  The point or part equally distant from the extremities or exterior limits, as of a line, a surface, or a solid; an intervening point or part in space, time, or order of series; the midst; central portion; specif., the waist. Chaucer. "The middle of the land." Judg. ix. 37. In this, as in most questions of state, there is a middle. Burke. Syn. -- See Midst.
sat: imp. of Sit. [Written also sate.]
bit: 1. The part of a bridle, usually of iron, which is inserted in the mouth of a horse, and having appendages to which the reins are fastened. Shak. The foamy bridle with the bit of gold. Chaucer. 2. Fig.: Anything which curbs or restrains.  To put a bridle upon; to put the bit in the mouth of.  imp. & p. p. of Bite.  1. A part of anything, such as may be bitten off or taken into the mouth; a morsel; a bite. Hence: A small piece of anything; a little; a mite. 2. Somewhat; something, but not very great. My young companion was a bit of a poet. T. Hook. Note: This word is used, also, like jot and whit, to express the smallest degree; as, he is not a bit wiser. 3. A tool for boring, of various forms and sizes, usually turned by means of a brace or bitstock. See Bitstock. 4. The part of a key which enters the lock and acts upon the bolt and tumblers. Knight. 5. The cutting iron of a plane. Knight. 6. In the Southern and Southwestern States, a small silver coin (as the real) formerly current; commonly, one worth about 12 1/2 cents; also, the sum of 12 1/2 cents. Bit my bit, piecemeal. Pope.  of Bid, for biddeth. [Obs.] Chaucer.
word: 1. The spoken sign of a conception or an idea; an articulate or vocal sound, or a combination of articulate and vocal sounds, uttered by the human voice, and by custom expressing an idea or ideas; a single component part of human speech or language; a constituent part of a sentence; a term; a vocable. "A glutton of words." Piers Plowman. You cram these words into mine ears, against The stomach of my sense. Shak. Amongst men who confound their ideas with words, there must be endless disputes. Locke. 2. Hence, the written or printed character, or combination of characters, expressing such a term; as, the words on a page. 3. pl.  Talk; discourse; speech; language. Why should calamity be full of words Shak. Be thy words severe; Sharp as he merits, but the sword forbear. Dryden. 4. Account; tidings; message; communication; information; -- used only in the singular. I pray you . . . bring me word thither How the world goes. Shak. 5. Signal; order; command; direction. Give the word through. Shak. 6. Language considered as implying the faith or authority of the person who utters it; statement; affirmation; declaration; promise. Obey thy parents; keep thy word justly. Shak. I know you brave, and take you at your word. Dryden. I desire not the reader should take my word. Dryden. 7. pl.  Verbal contention; dispute. Some words there grew 'twixt Somerset and me. Shak. 8. A brief remark or observation; an expression; a phrase, clause, or short sentence. All the law is fulfilled in one word, even in this; Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. Gal. v. 14. She said; but at the happy word "he lives," My father stooped, re- fathered, o'er my wound. Tennyson. There is only one other point on which I offer a word of remark. Dickens. By word of mouth, orally; by actual speaking. Boyle. -- Compound word. See under Compound, a. -- Good word, commendation; favorable account. "And gave the harmless fellow a good word." Pope. -- In a word, briefly; to sum up. -- In word, in declaration; in profession. "Let us not love in word, . . . but in deed and in truth." 1 John iii. 8. -- Nuns of the Word Incarnate (R. C. Ch.), an order of nuns founded in France in 1625, and approved in 1638. The order, which also exists in the United States, was instituted for the purpose of doing honor to the "Mystery of the Incarnation of the Son of God." -- The word, or The Word. (Theol.) (a) The gospel message; esp., the Scriptures, as a revelation of God. "Bold to speak the word without fear." Phil. i. 14. (b) The second person in the Trinity before his manifestation in time by the incarnation; among those who reject a Trinity of persons, some one or all of the divine attributes personified. John i. 1. -- To eat one's words, to retract what has been said. -- To have the words for, to speak for; to act as spokesman. [Obs.] "Our host hadde the wordes for us all." Chaucer. -- Word blindness (Physiol.), inability to understand printed or written words or symbols, although the person affected may be able to see quite well, speak fluently, and write correctly. Landois & Stirling. -- Word deafness (Physiol.), inability to understand spoken words, though the person affected may hear them and other sounds, and hence is not deaf. -- Word dumbness (Physiol.), inability to express ideas in verbal language, though the power of speech is unimpaired. -- Word for word, in the exact words; verbatim; literally; exactly; as, to repeat anything word for word. -- Word painting, the act of describing an object fully and vividly by words only, so as to present it clearly to the mind, as if in a picture. -- Word picture, an accurate and vivid description, which presents an object clearly to the mind, as if in a picture. -- Word square, a series of words so arranged that they can be read vertically and horizontally with like results. Syn. -- See Term.  To use words, as in discussion; to argue; to dispute. [R.]  1. To express in words; to phrase. The apology for the king is the same, but worded with greater deference to that great prince. Addison. 2. To ply with words; also, to cause to be by the use of a word or words. [Obs.] Howell. 3. To flatter with words; to cajole. [Obs.] Shak. To word it, to bandy words; to dispute. [Obs.] "To word it with a shrew." L'Estrange.
instrument: 1. That by means of which any work is performed, or result is effected; a tool; a utensil; an implement; as, the instruments of a mechanic; astronomical instruments. All the lofty instruments of war. Shak. 2. A contrivance or implement, by which musical sounds are produced; as, a musical instrument. Praise him with stringed instruments and organs. Ps. cl. 4. But signs when songs and instruments he hears. Dryden. 3. (Law)  A writing, as the means of giving formal expression to some act; a writing expressive of some act, contract, process, as a deed, contract, writ, etc. Burrill. 4. One who, or that which, is made a means, or is caused to serve a purpose; a medium, means, or agent. Or useful serving man and instrument, To any sovereign state. Shak. The bold are but the instruments of the wise. Dryden. Syn. -- Tool; implement; utensil; machine; apparatus; channel; agent.  To perform upon an instrument; to prepare for an instrument; as, a sonata instrumented for orchestra.
noise: 1. Sound of any kind. The heavens turn about in a most rapid motion without noise to us perceived. Bacon. Note: Noise is either a sound of too short a duration to be determined, like the report of a cannon; or else it is a confused mixture of many discordant sounds, like the rolling of thunder or the noise of the waves. Nevertheless, the difference between sound and noise is by no means precise. Ganot. 2. Especially, loud, confused, or senseless sound; clamor; din. 3. Loud or continuous talk; general talk or discussion; rumor; report. "The noise goes." Shak. What noise have we had about transplantation of diseases and transfusion of blood! T. Baker. Soerates lived in Athens during the great plague which has made so much noise in all ages. Spectator. 4. Music, in general; a concert; also, a company of musicians; a band. [Obs.] Milton. The king has his noise of gypsies. B. Jonson. Syn. -- Cry; outcry; clamor; din; clatter; uproar.  To sound; to make a noise. Milton.  1. To spread by rumor or report. All these sayings were noised abroad. Luke i. 65. 2. To disturb with noise. [Obs.] Dryden.
shop: imp. of Shape. Shaped. Chaucer.  1. A building or an apartment in which goods, wares, drugs, etc., are sold by retail. From shop to shop Wandering, and littering with unfolded silks The polished counter. Cowper. 2. A building in which mechanics or artisans work; as, a shoe shop; a car shop. A tailor called me in his shop. Shak. Note: Shop is often used adjectively or in composition; as, shop rent, or shop-rent; shop thief, or shop-thief; shop window, or shop- window, etc. To smell of the shop, to indicate too distinctively one's occupation or profession. -- To talk shop, to make one's business the topic of social conversation; also, to use the phrases peculiar to one's employment. [Colloq.] Syn. -- Store; warehouse. See Store.  To visit shops for the purpose of purchasing goods. He was engaged with his mother and some ladies to go shopping. Byron.
no: Not any; not one; none. Let there be no strife ... between me and thee. Gen. xiii. 8. That goodness is no name, and happiness no dream. Byron. Note: In Old England before a vowel the form non or noon was used. "No man." "Noon apothercary." Chaucer.  Nay; not; not at all; not in any respect or degree; -- a word expressing negation, denial, or refusal. Before or after another negative, no is emphatic. We do no otherwise than we are willed. Shak. I am perplx'd and doubtful whether or no I dare accept this your congratulation. Coleridge. There is none righteous, no, not one. Rom. iii. 10. No! Nay, Heaven forbid. Coleridge.  1. A refusal by use of the wordd no; a denial. 2. A negative vote; one who votes in the negative; as, to call for the ayes and noes; the noes have it.
green: 1. Having the color of grass when fresh and growing; resembling that color of the solar spectrum which is between the yellow and the blue; verdant; emerald. 2. Having a sickly color; wan. To look so green and pale. Shak. 3. Full of life aud vigor; fresh and vigorous; new; recent; as, a green manhood; a green wound. As valid against such an old and beneficent government as against . . . the greenest usurpation. Burke. 4. Not ripe; immature; not fully grown or ripened; as, green fruit, corn, vegetables, etc. 5. Not roasted; half raw. [R.] We say the meat is green when half roasted. L. Watts. 6. Immature in age or experience; young; raw; not trained; awkward; as, green in years or judgment. I might be angry with the officious zeal which supposes that its green conceptions can instruct my gray hairs. Sir W. Scott. 7. Not seasoned; not dry; containing its natural juices; as, green wood, timber, etc. Shak. Green brier (Bot.), a thorny climbing shrub (Emilaz rotundifolia) having a yellowish green stem and thick leaves, with small clusters of flowers, common in the United States; -- called also cat brier. -- Green con (Zoöl.), the pollock. -- Green crab (Zoöl.), an edible, shore crab (Carcinus menas) of Europe and America; -- in New England locally named joe-rocker. -- Green crop, a crop used for food while in a growing or unripe state, as distingushed from a grain crop, root crop, etc. -- Green diallage. (Min.) (a) Diallage, a variety of pyroxene. (b) Smaragdite. -- Green dragon (Bot.), a North American herbaceous plant (Arisæma Dracontium), resembling the Indian turnip; -- called also dragon root. -- Green earth (Min.), a variety of glauconite, found in cavities in amygdaloid and other eruptive rock, and used as a pigment by artists; -- called also mountain green. -- Green ebony. (a) A south American tree (Jacaranda ovalifolia), having a greenish wood, used for rulers, turned and inlaid work, and in dyeing. (b) The West Indian green ebony. See Ebony. -- Green fire (Pyrotech.), a composition which burns with a green flame. It consists of sulphur and potassium chlorate, with some salt of barium (usually the nitrate), to which the color of the flame is due. -- Green fly (Zoöl.), any green species of plant lice or aphids, esp. those that infest greenhouse plants. -- Green gage, (Bot.) See Greengage, in the Vocabulary. -- Green gland (Zoöl.), one of a pair of large green glands in Crustacea, supposed to serve as kidneys. They have their outlets at the bases of the larger antennæ. -- Green hand, a novice. [Colloq.] -- Green heart (Bot.), the wood of a lauraceous tree found in the West Indies and in South America, used for shipbuilding or turnery. The green heart of Jamaica and Guiana is the Nectandra Rodioei, that of Martinique is the Colubrina ferruginosa. -- Green iron ore (Min.) dufrenite. -- Green laver (Bot.), an edible seaweed (Ulva latissima); -- called also green sloke. -- Green lead ore (Min.), pyromorphite. -- Green linnet (Zoöl.), the greenfinch. -- Green looper (Zoöl.), the cankerworm. -- Green marble (Min.), serpentine. -- Green mineral, a carbonate of copper, used as a pigment. See Greengill. -- Green monkey (Zoöl.) a West African long-tailed monkey (Cercopithecus callitrichus), very commonly tamed, and trained to perform tricks. It was introduced into the West Indies early in the last century, and has become very abundant there. -- Green salt of Magnus (Old Chem.), a dark green crystalline salt, consisting of ammonia united with certain chlorides of platinum. -- Green sand (Founding) molding sand used for a mold while slightly damp, and not dried before the cast is made. -- Green sea (Naut.), a wave that breaks in a solid mass on a vessel's deck. -- Green sickness (Med.), chlorosis. -- Green snake (Zoöl.), one of two harmless American snakes (Cyclophis vernalis, and C. æstivus). They are bright green in color. -- Green turtle (Zoöl.), an edible marine turtle. See Turtle. -- Green vitriol. (a) (Chem.) Sulphate of iron; a light green crystalline substance, very extensively used in the preparation of inks, dyes, mordants, etc. (b) (Min.) Same as copperas, melanterite and sulphate of iron. -- Green ware, articles of pottery molded and shaped, but not yet baked. -- Green woodpecker (Zoöl.), a common European woodpecker (Picus viridis); -- called also yaffle.  1. The color of growing plants; the color of the solar spectrum intermediate between the yellow and the blue. 2. A grassy plain or plat; a piece of ground covered with verdant herbage; as, the village green. O'er the smooth enameled green. Milton. 3. Fresh leaves or branches of trees or other plants; wreaths; -- usually in the plural. In that soft season when descending showers Call forth the greens, and wake the rising flowers. Pope. 4. pl. Leaves and stems of young plants, as spinach, beets, etc., which in their green state are boiled for food. 5. Any substance or pigment of a green color. Alkali green (Chem.), an alkali salt of a sulphonic acid derivative of a complex aniline dye, resembling emerald green; -- called also Helvetia green.-- Berlin green. (Chem.) See under Berlin. -- Brilliant green (Chem.), a complex aniline dye, resembling emerald green in composition. -- Brunswick green an oxychloride of copper. -- Chrome green. See under Chrome. -- Emerald green. (Chem.) (a) A complex basic derivative of aniline produced as a metallic, green crystalline substance, and used for dyeing silk, wool, and mordanted vegetable fiber a brilliant green; - - called also aldehyde green, acid green, malachite green, Victoria green, solid green, etc. It is usually found as a double chloride, with zinc chloride, or as an oxalate. (b) See Paris green (below). -- Gaignet's green (Chem.) a green pigment employed by the French artist, Adrian Gusgnet, and consisting essentially of a basic hydrate of chromium. -- Methyl green (Chem.), an artificial rosaniline dyestuff, obtained as a green substance having a brilliant yellow luster; -- called also light-green. -- Mineral green. See under Mineral. -- Mountain green. See Green earth, under Green, a. -- Paris green (Chem.), a poisonous green powder, consisting of a mixture of several double salts of the acetate and arsenite of copper. It has found very extensive use as a pigment for wall paper, artificial flowers, etc., but particularly as an exterminator of insects, as the potato bug; -- called also Schweinfurth green, imperial green, Vienna green, emerald qreen, and mitis green. -- Scheele's green (Chem.), a green pigment, consisting essentially of a hydrous arsenite of copper; -- called also Swedish green. It may enter into various pigments called parrot green, pickel green, Brunswick green, nereid green, or emerald green.  To make green. Great spring before Greened all the year. Thomson.  To become or grow green. Tennyson. By greening slope and singing flood. Whittier.
dead: 1. Deprived of life; -- opposed to alive and living; reduced to that state of a being in which the organs of motion and life have irrevocably ceased to perform their functions; as, a dead tree; a dead man. "The queen, my lord, is dead." Shak. The crew, all except himself, were dead of hunger. Arbuthnot. Seek him with candle, bring him dead or living. Shak. 2. Destitute of life; inanimate; as, dead matter. 3. Resembling death in appearance or quality; without show of life; deathlike; as, a dead sleep. 4. Still as death; motionless; inactive; useless; as, dead calm; a dead load or weight. 5. So constructed as not to transmit sound; soundless; as, a dead floor. 6. Unproductive; bringing no gain; unprofitable; as, dead capital; dead stock in trade. 7. Lacking spirit; dull; lusterless; cheerless; as, dead eye; dead fire; dead color, etc. 8. Monotonous or unvaried; as, a dead level or pain; a dead wall. "The ground is a dead flat." C. Reade. 9. Sure as death; unerring; fixed; complete; as, a dead shot; a dead certainty. I had them a dead bargain. Goldsmith. 10. Bringing death; deadly. Shak. 11. Wanting in religious spirit and vitality; as, dead faith; dead works. "Dead in trespasses." Eph. ii. 1. 12. (Paint.) (a) Flat; without gloss; -- said of painting which has been applied purposely to have this effect. (b) Not brilliant; not rich; thus, brown is a dead color, as compared with crimson. 13. (Law)  Cut off from the rights of a citizen; deprived of the power of enjoying the rights of property; as, one banished or becoming a monk is civilly dead. 14. (Mach.)  Not imparting motion or power; as, the dead spindle of a lathe, etc. See Spindle. Dead ahead (Naut.), directly ahead; -- said of a ship or any object, esp. of the wind when blowing from that point toward which a vessel would go. -- Dead angle (Mil.), an angle or space which can not be seen or defended from behind the parapet. -- Dead block, either of two wooden or iron blocks intended to serve instead of buffers at the end of a freight car. -- Dead calm (Naut.), no wind at all. -- Dead center, or Dead point (Mach.), either of two points in the orbit of a crank, at which the crank and connecting rod lie a straight line. It corresponds to the end of a stroke; as, A and B are dead centers of the crank mechanism in which the crank C drives, or is driven by, the lever L. -- Dead color (Paint.), a color which has no gloss upon it. -- Dead coloring (Oil paint.), the layer of colors, the preparation for what is to follow. In modern painting this is usually in monochrome. -- Dead door (Shipbuilding), a storm shutter fitted to the outside of the quarter-gallery door. -- Dead flat (Naut.), the widest or midship frame. -- Dead freight (Mar. Law), a sum of money paid by a person who charters a whole vessel but fails to make out a full cargo. The payment is made for the unoccupied capacity. Abbott. -- Dead ground (Mining), the portion of a vein in which there is no ore. -- Dead hand, a hand that can not alienate, as of a person civilly dead. "Serfs held in dead hand." Morley. See Mortmain. -- Dead head (Naut.), a rough block of wood used as an anchor buoy. -- Dead heat, a heat or course between two or more race horses, boats, etc., in which they come out exactly equal, so that neither wins. -- Dead horse, an expression applied to a debt for wages paid in advance. [Law] -- Dead language, a language which is no longer spoken or in common use by a people, and is known only in writings, as the Hebrew, Greek, and Latin. -- Dead letter. (a) A letter which, after lying for a certain fixed time uncalled for at the post office to which it was directed, is then sent to the general post office to be opened. (b) That which has lost its force or authority; as, the law has become a dead letter. -- Dead-letter office, a department of the general post office where dead letters are examined and disposed of. -- Dead level, a term applied to a flat country. -- Dead lift, a direct lift, without assistance from mechanical advantage, as from levers, pulleys, etc.; hence, an extreme emergency. "(As we say) at a dead lift." Robynson (More's Utopia). -- Dead line (Mil.), a line drawn within or around a military prison, to cross which involves for a prisoner the penalty of being instantly shot. -- Dead load (Civil Engin.), a constant, motionless load, as the weight of a structure, in distinction from a moving load, as a train of cars, or a variable pressure, as of wind. -- Dead march (Mus.), a piece of solemn music intended to be played as an accompaniment to a funeral procession. -- Dead nettle (Bot.), a harmless plant with leaves like a nettle (Lamium album). -- Dead oil (Chem.), the heavy oil obtained in the distillation of coal tar, and containing phenol, naphthalus, etc. -- Dead plate (Mach.), a solid covering over a part of a fire grate, to prevent the entrance of air through that part. -- Dead pledge, a mortgage. See Mortgage. -- Dead point. (Mach.) See Dead center. -- Dead reckoning (Naut.), the method of determining the place of a ship from a record kept of the courses sailed as given by compass, and the distance made on each course as found by log, with allowance for leeway, etc., without the aid of celestial observations. -- Dead rise, the transverse upward curvature of a vessel's floor. -- Dead rising, an elliptical line drawn on the sheer plan to determine the sweep of the floorheads throughout the ship's length. -- Dead-Sea apple. See under Apple. -- Dead set. See under Set. -- Dead shot. (a) An unerring marksman. (b) A shot certain to be made. -- Dead smooth, the finest cut made; -- said of files. -- Dead wall (Arch.), a blank wall unbroken by windows or other openings. -- Dead water (Naut.), the eddy water closing in under a ship's stern when sailing. -- Dead weight. (a) A heavy or oppressive burden. Dryden. (b) (Shipping) A ship's lading, when it consists of heavy goods; or, the heaviest part of a ship's cargo. (c) (Railroad) The weight of rolling stock, the live weight being the load. Knight. -- Dead wind (Naut.), a wind directly ahead, or opposed to the ship's course. -- To be dead, to die. [Obs.] I deme thee, thou must algate be dead. Chaucer. Syn. -- Inanimate; deceased; extinct. See Lifeless.  To a degree resembling death; to the last degree; completely; wholly. [Colloq.] I was tired of reading, and dead sleepy. Dickens. Dead drunk, so drunk as to be unconscious.  1. The most quiet or deathlike time; the period of profoundest repose, inertness, or gloom; as, the dead of winter. When the drum beat at dead of night. Campbell. 2. One who is dead; -- commonly used collectively. And Abraham stood up from before his dead. Gen. xxiii. 3.  To make dead; to deaden; to deprive of life, force, or vigor. [Obs.] Heaven's stern decree, With many an ill, hath numbed and deaded me. Chapman.  To die; to lose life or force. [Obs.] So iron, as soon as it is out of the fire, deadeth straightway. Bacon.
able: 1. Fit; adapted; suitable. [Obs.] A many man, to ben an abbot able. Chaucer. 2. Having sufficient power, strength, force, skill, means, or resources of any kind to accomplish the object; possessed of qualifications rendering competent for some end; competent; qualified; capable; as, an able workman, soldier, seaman, a man able to work; a mind able to reason; a person able to be generous; able to endure pain; able to play on a piano. 3. Specially: Having intellectual qualifications, or strong mental powers; showing ability or skill; talented; clever; powerful; as, the ablest man in the senate; an able speech. No man wrote abler state papers. Macaulay. 4. (Law)  Legally qualified; possessed of legal competence; as, able to inherit or devise property. Note: Able for, is Scotticism. "Hardly able for such a march." Robertson. Syn. -- Competent; qualified; fitted; efficient; effective; capable; skillful; clever; vigorous; powerful.  1. To make able; to enable; to strengthen. Chaucer. 2. To vouch for. "I 'll able them." Shak.  An adjective suffix now usually in a passive sense; able to be; fit to be; expressing capacity or worthiness in a passive sense; as, movable, able to be moved; amendable, able to be amended; blamable, fit to be blamed; salable. Note: The form ible is used in the same sense. Note: It is difficult to say when we are not to use -able instead of -ible. "Yet a rule may be laid down as to when we are to use it. To all verbs, then, from the Anglo-Saxon, to all based on the uncorrupted infinitival stems of Latin verbs of the first conjugation, and to all substantives, whencesoever sprung, we annex - able only." Fitzed. Hall.
make: A companion; a mate; often, a husband or a wife. [Obs.] For in this world no woman is Worthy to be my make. Chaucer.  1. To cause to exist; to bring into being; to form; to produce; to frame; to fashion; to create. Hence, in various specific uses or applications: (a) To form of materials; to cause to exist in a certain form; to construct; to fabricate. He . . . fashioned it with a graving tool, after he had made it a molten calf. Ex. xxxii. 4. (b) To produce, as something artificial, unnatural, or false; -- often with up; as, to make up a story. And Art, with her contending, doth aspire To excel the natural with made delights. Spenser. (c) To bring about; to bring forward; to be the cause or agent of; to effect, do, perform, or execute; -- often used with a noun to form a phrase equivalent to the simple verb that corresponds to such noun; as, to make complaint, for to complain; to make record of, for to record; to make abode, for to abide, etc. Call for Samson, that he may make us sport. Judg. xvi. 25. Wealth maketh many friends. Prov. xix. 4. I will neither plead my age nor sickness in excuse of the faults which I have made. Dryden. (d) To execute with the requisite formalities; as, to make a bill, note, will, deed, etc. (e) To gain, as the result of one's efforts; to get, as profit; to make acquisition of; to have accrue or happen to one; as, to make a large profit; to make an error; to make a loss; to make money. He accuseth Neptune unjustly who makes shipwreck a second time. Bacon. (f) To find, as the result of calculation or computation; to ascertain by enumeration; to find the number or amount of, by reckoning, weighing, measurement, and the like; as, he made the distance of; to travel over; as, the ship makes ten knots an hour; he made the distance in one day. (h) To put a desired or desirable condition; to cause to thrive. Who makes or ruins with a smile or frown. Dryden. 2. To cause to be or become; to put into a given state verb, or adjective; to constitute; as, to make known; to make public; to make fast. Who made thee a prince and a judge over us Ex. ii. 14. See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh. Ex. vii. 1. Note: When used reflexively with an adjective, the reflexive pronoun is often omitted; as, to make merry; to make bold; to make free, etc. 3. To cause to appear to be; to constitute subjectively; to esteem, suppose, or represent. He is not that goose and ass that Valla would make him. Baker. 4. To require; to constrain; to compel; to force; to cause; to occasion; -- followed by a noun or pronoun and infinitive. Note: In the active voice the to of the infinitive is usually omitted. I will make them hear my words. Deut. iv. 10. They should be made to rise at their early hour. Locke. 5. To become; to be, or to be capable of being, changed or fashioned into; to do the part or office of; to furnish the material for; as, he will make a good musician; sweet cider makes sour vinegar; wool makes warm clothing. And old cloak makes a new jerkin. Shak. 6. To compose, as parts, ingredients, or materials; to constitute; to form; to amount to. The heaven, the air, the earth, and boundless sea, Make but one temple for the Deity. Waller. 7. To be engaged or concerned in. [Obs.] Gomez, what makest thou here, with a whole brotherhood of city bailiffs Dryden. 8. To reach; to attain; to arrive at or in sight of. "And make the Libyan shores." Dryden. They that sail in the middle can make no land of either side. Sir T. Browne. To make a bed, to prepare a bed for being slept on, or to put it in order. -- To make a card (Card Playing), to take a trick with it. -- To make account. See under Account, n. -- To make account of, to esteem; to regard. -- To make away. (a) To put out of the way; to kill; to destroy. [Obs.] If a child were crooked or deformed in body or mind, they made him away. Burton. (b) To alienate; to transfer; to make over. [Obs.] Waller. -- To make believe, to pretend; to feign; to simulate. -- To make bold, to take the liberty; to venture. -- To make the cards (Card Playing), to shuffle the pack. -- To make choice of, to take by way of preference; to choose. -- To make danger, to make experiment. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl. -- To make default (Law), to fail to appear or answer. -- To make the doors, to shut the door. [Obs.] Make the doors upon a woman's wit, and it will out at the casement. Shak. - To make free with. See under Free, a. -- To make good. See under Good. -- To make head, to make headway. -- To make light of. See under Light, a. -- To make little of. (a) To belittle. (b) To accomplish easily. -- To make love to. See under Love, n. -- To make meat, to cure meat in the open air. [Colloq. Western U. S.] -- To make merry, to feast; to be joyful or jovial. -- To make much of, to treat with much consideration,, attention, or fondness; to value highly. -- To make no bones. See under Bone, n. -- To make no difference, to have no weight or influence; to be a matter of indifference. -- To make no doubt, to have no doubt. -- To make no matter, to have no weight or importance; to make no difference. -- To make oath (Law), to swear, as to the truth of something, in a prescribed form of law. -- To make of. (a) To understand or think concerning; as, not to know what to make of the news. (b) To pay attention to; to cherish; to esteem; to account. "Makes she no more of me than of a slave." Dryden. -- To make one's law (Old Law), to adduce proof to clear one's self of a charge. -- To make out. (a) To find out; to discover; to decipher; as, to make out the meaning of a letter. (b) To prove; to establish; as, the plaintiff was unable to make out his case. (c) To make complete or exact; as, he was not able to make out the money. -- To make over, to transfer the title of; to convey; to alienate; as, he made over his estate in trust or in fee. -- To make sail. (Naut.) (a) To increase the quantity of sail already extended. (b) To set sail. -- To make shift, to manage by expedients; as, they made shift to do without it. [Colloq.]. -- To make sternway, to move with the stern foremost; to go or drift backward. -- To make strange, to act in an unfriendly manner or as if surprised; to treat as strange; as, to make strange of a request or suggestion. -- To make suit to, to endeavor to gain the favor of; to court. -- To make sure. See under Sure. -- To make up. (a) To collect into a sum or mass; as, to make up the amount of rent; to make up a bundle or package. (b) To reconcile; to compose; as, to make up a difference or quarrel. (c) To supply what is wanting in; to complete; as, a dollar is wanted to make up the stipulated sum. (d) To compose, as from ingredients or parts; to shape, prepare, or fabricate; as, to make up a mass into pills; to make up a story. He was all made up of love and charms! Addison. (e) To compensate; to make good; as, to make up a loss. (f) To adjust, or to arrange for settlement; as, to make up accounts. (g) To dress and paint for a part, as an actor; as, he was well made up. -- To make up a face, to distort the face as an expression of pain or derision. -- To make up one's mind, to reach a mental determination; to resolve. -- To make water. (a) (Naut.) To leak. (b) To urinate. -- To make way, or To make one's way. (a) To make progress; to advance. (b) To open a passage; to clear the way. -- To make words, to multiply words.  1. To act in a certain manner; to have to do; to manage; to interfere; to be active; -- often in the phrase to meddle or make. [Obs.] A scurvy, jack-a-nape priest to meddle or make. Shak. 2. To proceed; to tend; to move; to go; as, he made toward home; the tiger made at the sportsmen. Note: Formerly, authors used to make on, to make forth, to make about; but these phrases are obsolete. We now say, to make at, to make away, to make for, to make off, to make toward, etc. 3. To tend; to contribute; to have effect; -- with for or against; as, it makes for his advantage. M. Arnold. Follow after the things which make for peace. Rom. xiv. 19. Considerations infinite Do make against it. Shak. 4. To increase; to augment; to accrue. 5. To compose verses; to write poetry; to versify. [Archaic] Chaucer. Tennyson. To solace him some time, as I do when I make. P. Plowman. To make as if, or To make as though, to pretend that; to make show that; to make believe (see under Make, v. t.). Joshua and all Israel made as if they were beaten before them, and fled. Josh. viii. 15. My lord of London maketh as though he were greatly displeased with me. Latimer. -- To make at, to go toward hastily, or in a hostile manner; to attack. -- To make away with. (a) To carry off. (b) To transfer or alienate; hence, to spend; to dissipate. (c) To kill; to destroy. -- To make off, to go away suddenly. -- To make out, to succeed; to be able at last; to make shift; as, he made out to reconcile the contending parties. -- To make up, to become reconciled or friendly. -- To make up for, to compensate for; to supply an equivalent for. -- To make up to. (a) To approach; as, a suspicious boat made up to us. (b) To pay addresses to; to make love to. -- To make up with, to become reconciled to. [Colloq.] -- To make with, to concur or agree with. Hooker.  Structure, texture, constitution of parts; construction; shape; form. It our perfection of so frail a make As every plot can undermine and shake Dryden. On the make,bent upon making great profits; greedy of gain. [Low, U. S.]
train: 1. To draw along; to trail; to drag. In hollow cube Training his devilish enginery. Milton. 2. To draw by persuasion, artifice, or the like; to attract by stratagem; to entice; to allure. [Obs.] If but a dozen French Were there in arms, they would be as a call To train ten thousand English to their side. Shak. O, train me not, sweet mermaid, with thy note. Shak. This feast, I'll gage my life, Is but a plot to train you to your ruin. Ford. 3. To teach and form by practice; to educate; to exercise; to discipline; as, to train the militia to the manual exercise; to train soldiers to the use of arms. Our trained bands, which are the trustiest and most proper strength of a free nation. Milton. The warrior horse here bred he's taught to train. Dryden. 4. To break, tame, and accustom to draw, as oxen. 5. (Hort.)  To lead or direct, and form to a wall or espalier; to form to a proper shape, by bending, lopping, or pruning; as, to train young trees. He trained the young branches to the right hand or to the left. Jeffrey. 6. (Mining)  To trace, as a lode or any mineral appearance, to its head. To train a gun (Mil. & Naut.), to point it at some object either forward or else abaft the beam, that is, not directly on the side. Totten. -- To train, or To train up, to educate; to teach; to form by instruction or practice; to bring up. Train up a child in the way he should go; and when he is old, he will not depart from it. Prov. xxii. 6. The first Christians were, by great hardships, trained up for glory. Tillotson.  1. To be drilled in military exercises; to do duty in a military company. 2. To prepare by exercise, diet, instruction, etc., for any physical contest; as, to train for a boat race.  1. That which draws along; especially, persuasion, artifice, or enticement; allurement. [Obs.] "Now to my charms, and to my wily trains." Milton. 2. Hence, something tied to a lure to entice a hawk; also, a trap for an animal; a snare. Halliwell. With cunning trains him to entrap un wares. Spenser. 3. That which is drawn along in the rear of, or after, something; that which is in the hinder part or rear. Specifically : -- (a) That part of a gown which trails behind the wearer. (b) (Mil.) The after part of a gun carriage; the trail. (c) The tail of a bird. "The train steers their flights, and turns their bodies, like the rudder of ship." Ray. 4. A number of followers; a body of attendants; a retinue; a suite. The king's daughter with a lovely train. Addison. My train are men of choice and rarest parts. Shak. 5. A consecution or succession of connected things; a series. "A train of happy sentiments." I. Watts. The train of ills our love would draw behind it. Addison. Rivers now Stream and perpetual draw their humid train. Milton. Other truths require a train of ideas placed in order. Locke. 6. Regular method; process; course; order; as, things now in a train for settlement. If things were once in this train, . . . our duty would take root in our nature. Swift. 7. The number of beats of a watch in any certain time. 8. A line of gunpowder laid to lead fire to a charge, mine, or the like. 9. A connected line of cars or carriages on a railroad. 10. A heavy, long sleigh used in Canada for the transportation of merchandise, wood, and the like. 11. (Rolling Mill)  A roll train; as, a 12-inch train. Roll train, or Train of rolls (Rolling Mill), a set of plain or grooved rolls for rolling metal into various forms by a series of consecutive operations. -- Train mile (Railroads), a unit employed in estimating running expenses, etc., being one of the total number of miles run by all the trains of a road, or system of roads, as within a given time, or for a given expenditure; -- called also mile run. -- Train of artillery, any number of cannon, mortars, etc., with the attendants and carriages which follow them into the field. Campbell (Dict. Mil. Sci.). -- Train of mechanism, a series of moving pieces, as wheels and pinions, each of which is follower to that which drives it, and driver to that which follows it. -- Train road, a slight railway for small cars, -- used for construction, or in mining. -- Train tackle (Naut.), a tackle for running guns in and out. Syn. -- Cars. -- Train, Cars. Train is the word universally used in England with reference to railroad traveling; as, I came in the morning train. In the United States, the phrase the cars has been extensively introduced in the room of train; as, the cars are late; I came in the cars. The English expression is obviously more appropriate, and is prevailing more and more among Americans, to the exclusion of the cars.
coast: 1. The side of a thing. [Obs.] Sir I. Newton. 2. The exterior line, limit, or border of a country; frontier border. [Obs.] From the river, the river Euphrates, even to the uttermost sea, shall your coast be. Deut. xi. 24. 3. The seashore, or land near it. He sees in English ships the Holland coast. Dryden. We the Arabian coast do know At distance, when the species blow. Waller. The coast is clear, the danger is over; no enemy in sight. Dryden. Fig.: There are no obstacles. "Seeing that the coast was clear, Zelmane dismissed Musidorus." Sir P. Sidney. Coast guard. (a) A body of men originally employed along the coast to prevent smuggling; now, under the control of the admiralty, drilled as a naval reserve. [Eng.] (b) The force employed in lifesaving stations along the seacoast. [U. S.] -- Coast rat (Zoöl.), a South African mammal (Bathyergus suillus), about the size of a rabbit, remarkable for its extensive burrows; -- called also sand mole. -- Coast waiter, a customhouse officer who superintends the landing or shipping of goods for the coast trade. [Eng.]  1. To draw or keep near; to approach. [Obs.] Anon she hears them chant it lustily, And all in haste she coasteth to the cry. Shak. 2. To sail by or near the shore. The ancients coasted only in their navigation. Arbuthnot. 3. To sail from port to port in the same country. 4. Etym: [Cf. OF. coste, F. côte, hill, hillside.]  To slide down hill; to slide on a sled, upon snow or ice. [Local, U. S.]  1. To draw near to; to approach; to keep near, or by the side of. [Obs.] Hakluyt. 2. To sail by or near; to follow the coast line of. Nearchus, . . . not knowing the compass, was fain to coast that shore. Sir T. Browne. 3. To conduct along a coast or river bank. [Obs.] The Indians . . . coasted me along the river. Hakluyt.
what: 1. As an interrogative pronoun, used in asking questions regarding either persons or things; as, what is this what did you say what poem is this what child is lost What see'st thou in the ground Shak. What is man, that thou art mindful of him Ps. viii. 4. What manner of man is this, that even the winds and the sea obey him! Matt. viii. 27. Note: Originally, what, when, where, which, who, why, etc., were interrogatives only, and it is often difficult to determine whether they are used as interrogatives or relatives. What in this sense, when it refers to things, may be used either substantively or adjectively; when it refers to persons, it is used only adjectively with a noun expressed, who being the pronoun used substantively. 2. As an exclamatory word: -- (a) Used absolutely or independently; - - often with a question following. "What welcome be thou." Chaucer. What, could ye not watch with me one hour Matt. xxvi. 40. (b) Used adjectively, meaning how remarkable, or how great; as, what folly! what eloquence! what courage! What a piece of work is man! Shak. O what a riddle of absurdity! Young. Note: What in this use has a or an between itself and its noun if the qualitative or quantitative importance of the object is emphasized. (c) Sometimes prefixed to adjectives in an adverbial sense, as nearly equivalent to how; as, what happy boys! What partial judges are our and hate! Dryden. 3. As a relative pronoun: -- (a) Used substantively with the antecedent suppressed, equivalent to that which, or those [persons] who, or those [things] which; -- called a compound relative. With joy beyond what victory bestows. Cowper. I'm thinking Captain Lawton will count the noses of what are left before they see their whaleboats. Cooper. What followed was in perfect harmony with this beginning. Macaulay. I know well . . . how little you will be disposed to criticise what comes to you from me. J. H. Newman. (b) Used adjectively, equivalent to the . . . which; the sort or kind of . . . which; rarely, the . . . on, or at, which. See what natures accompany what colors. Bacon. To restrain what power either the devil or any earthly enemy hath to work us woe. Milton. We know what master laid thy keel, What workmen wrought thy ribs of steel. Longfellow. (c) Used adverbially in a sense corresponding to the adjectival use; as, he picked what good fruit he saw. 4. Whatever; whatsoever; what thing soever; -- used indefinitely. "What after so befall." Chaucer. Whether it were the shortness of his foresight, the strength of his will, . . . or what it was. Bacon. 5. Used adverbially, in part; partly; somewhat; -- with a following preposition, especially, with, and commonly with repetition. What for lust [pleasure] and what for lore. Chaucer. Thus, what with the war, what with the sweat, what with the gallows, and what with poverty, I am custom shrunk. Shak. The year before he had so used the matter that what by force, what by policy, he had taken from the Christians above thirty small castles. Knolles. Note: In such phrases as I tell you what, what anticipates the following statement, being elliptical for what I think, what it is, how it is, etc. "I tell thee what, corporal Bardolph, I could tear her." Shak. Here what relates to the last clause, "I could tear her;" this is what I tell you. What not is often used at the close of an enumeration of several particulars or articles, it being an abbreviated clause, the verb of which, being either the same as that of the principal clause or a general word, as be, say, mention, enumerate, etc., is omitted. "Men hunt, hawk, and what not." Becon. "Some dead puppy, or log, orwhat not." C. Kingsley. "Battles, tournaments, hunts, and what not." De Quincey. Hence, the words are often used in a general sense with the force of a substantive, equivalent to anything you please, a miscellany, a variety, etc. From this arises the name whatnot, applied to an étagère, as being a piece of furniture intended for receiving miscellaneous articles of use or ornament. But what is used for but that, usually after a negative, and excludes everything contrary to the assertion in the following sentence. "Her needle is not so absolutely perfect in tent and cross stitch but what my superintendence is advisable." Sir W. Scott. "Never fear but what our kite shall fly as high." Ld. Lytton. What ho! an exclamation of calling. -- What if, what will it matter if; what will happen or be the result if. "What if it be a poison" Shak. -- What of this that it etc., what follows from this, that, it, etc., often with the implication that it is of no consequence. "All this is so; but what of this, my lord" Shak. "The night is spent, why, what of that" Shak. -- What though, even granting that; allowing that; supposing it true that. "What though the rose have prickles, yet't is plucked." Shak. -- What time, or What time as, when. [Obs. or Archaic] "What time I am afraid, I will trust in thee." Ps. lvi. 3. What time the morn mysterious visions brings. Pope.  Something; thing; stuff. [Obs.] And gave him for to feed, Such homely what as serves the simple Spenser.  Why For what purpose On what account [Obs.] What should I tell the answer of the knight. Chaucer. But what do I stand reckoning upon advantages and gains lost by the misrule and turbulency of the prelates What do I pick up so thriftily their scatterings and diminishings of the meaner subject Milton. WHATE'ER What*e'er", pron.  A contraction of what-ever; -- used in poetry. "Whate'er is in his way." Shak.
ride: 1. To be carried on the back of an animal, as a horse. To-morrow, when ye riden by the way. Chaucer. Let your master ride on before, and do you gallop after him. Swift. 2. To be borne in a carriage; as, to ride in a coach, in a car, and the like. See Synonym, below. The richest inhabitants exhibited their wealth, not by riding in gilden carriages, but by walking the streets with trains of servants. Macaulay. 3. To be borne or in a fluid; to float; to lie. Men once walked where ships at anchor ride. Dryden. 4. To be supported in motion; to rest. Strong as the exletree On which heaven rides. Shak. On whose foolish honesty My practices ride easy! Shak. 5. To manage a horse, as an equestrian. He rode, he fenced, he moved with graceful ease. Dryden. 6. To support a rider, as a horse; to move under the saddle; as, a horse rides easy or hard, slow or fast. To ride easy (Naut.), to lie at anchor without violent pitching or straining at the cables. -- To ride hard (Naut.), to pitch violently. -- To ride out. (a) To go upon a military expedition. [Obs.] Chaucer. (b) To ride in the open air. [Colloq.] -- To ride to hounds, to ride behind, and near to, the hounds in hunting. Syn. -- Drive. -- Ride, Drive. Ride originally meant (and is so used throughout the English Bible) to be carried on horseback or in a vehicle of any kind. At present in England, drive is the word applied in most cases to progress in a carriage; as, a drive around the park, etc.; while ride is appropriated to progress on a horse. Johnson seems to sanction this distinction by giving "to travel on horseback" as the leading sense of ride; though he adds "to travel in a vehicle" as a secondary sense. This latter use of the word still occurs to some extent; as, the queen rides to Parliament in her coach of state; to ride in an omnibus. "Will you ride over or drive" said Lord Willowby to his quest, after breakfast that morning. W. Black.  1. To sit on, so as to be carried; as, to ride a horse; to ride a bicycle. [They] rend up both rocks and hills, and ride the air In whirlwind. Milton. 2. To manage insolently at will; to domineer over. The nobility could no longer endure to be ridden by bakers, cobblers, and brewers. Swift. 3. To convey, as by riding; to make or do by riding. Tue only men that safe can ride Mine errands on the Scottish side. Sir W. Scott. 4. (Surg.)  To overlap (each other); -- said of bones or fractured fragments. To ride a hobby, to have some favorite occupation or subject of talk. -- To ride and tie, to take turn with another in labor and rest; -- from the expedient adopted by two persons with one horse, one of whom rides the animal a certain distance, and then ties him for the use of the other, who is coming up on foot. Fielding. -- To ride down. (a) To ride over; to trample down in riding; to overthrow by riding against; as, to ride down an enemy. (b) (Naut.) To bear down, as on a halyard when hoisting a sail. -- To ride out (Naut.), to keep safe afloat during (a storm) while riding at anchor or when hove to on the open sea; as, to ride out the gale. to ride the lightning, (Colloq.) to be executed by electrocution in an electric chair.  1. The act of riding; an excursion on horseback or in a vehicle. 2. A saddle horse. [Prov. Eng.] Wright. 3. A road or avenue cut in a wood, or through grounds, to be used as a place for riding; a riding.
weather: 1. The state of the air or atmosphere with respect to heat or cold, wetness or dryness, calm or storm, clearness or cloudiness, or any other meteorological phenomena; meteorological condition of the atmosphere; as, warm weather; cold weather; wet weather; dry weather, etc. Not amiss to cool a man's stomach this hot weather. Shak. Fair weather cometh out of the north. Job xxxvii. 22. 2. Vicissitude of season; meteorological change; alternation of the state of the air. Bacon. 3. Storm; tempest. What gusts of weather from that gathering cloud My thoughts presage! Dryden. 4. A light rain; a shower. [Obs.] Wyclif. Stress of weather, violent winds; force of tempests. -- To make fair weather, to flatter; to give flattering representations. [R.] -- To make good, or bad, weather (Naut.), to endure a gale well or ill; -- said of a vessel. Shak. -- Under the weather, ill; also, financially embarrassed. [Colloq. U. S.] Bartlett. -- Weather box. Same as Weather house, below. Thackeray. -- Weather breeder, a fine day which is supposed to presage foul weather. -- Weather bureau, a popular name for the signal service. See Signal service, under Signal, a. [U.S.] -- Weather cloth (Naut.), a long piece of canvas of tarpaulin used to preserve the hammocks from injury by the weather when stowed in the nettings. -- Weather door. (Mining) See Trapdoor, 2. -- Weather gall. Same as Water gall, 2. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell. -- Weather house, a mechanical contrivance in the form of a house, which indicates changes in atmospheric conditions by the appearance or retirement of toy images. Peace to the artist whose ingenious thought Devised the weather house, that useful toy! Cowper. -- Weather molding, or Weather moulding (Arch.), a canopy or cornice over a door or a window, to throw off the rain. -- Weather of a windmill sail, the obliquity of the sail, or the angle which it makes with its plane of revolution. -- Weather report, a daily report of meteorological observations, and of probable changes in the weather; esp., one published by government authority. -- Weather spy, a stargazer; one who foretells the weather. [R.] Donne. -- Weather strip (Arch.), a strip of wood, rubber, or other material, applied to an outer door or window so as to cover the joint made by it with the sill, casings, or threshold, in order to exclude rain, snow, cold air, etc.  1. To expose to the air; to air; to season by exposure to air. [An eagle] soaring through his wide empire of the air To weather his broad sails. Spenser. This gear lacks weathering. Latimer. 2. Hence, to sustain the trying effect of; to bear up against and overcome; to sustain; to endure; to resist; as, to weather the storm. For I can weather the roughest gale. Longfellow. You will weather the difficulties yet. F. W. Robertson. 3. (Naut.)  To sail or pass to the windward of; as, to weather a cape; to weather another ship. 4. (Falconry)  To place (a hawk) unhooded in the open air. Encyc. Brit. To weather a point. (a) (Naut.) To pass a point of land, leaving it on the lee side. (b) Hence, to gain or accomplish anything against opposition. -- To weather out, to encounter successfully, though with difficulty; as, to weather out a storm.  To undergo or endure the action of the atmosphere; to suffer meteorological influences; sometimes, to wear away, or alter, under atmospheric influences; to suffer waste by weather. The organisms . . . seem indestructible, while the hard matrix in which they are imbedded has weathered from around them. H. Miller.  Being toward the wind, or windward -- opposed to lee; as, weather bow, weather braces, weather gauge, weather lifts, weather quarter, weather shrouds, etc. Weather gauge. (a) (Naut.) The position of a ship to the windward of another. (b) Fig.: A position of advantage or superiority; advantage in position. To veer, and tack, and steer a cause Against the weather gauge of laws. Hudibras. -- Weather helm (Naut.), a tendency on the part of a sailing vessel to come up into the wind, rendering it necessary to put the helm up, that is, toward the weather side. -- Weather shore (Naut.), the shore to the windward of a ship. Totten. -- Weather tide (Naut.), the tide which sets against the lee side of a ship, impelling her to the windward. Mar. Dict.
plural: Relating to, or containing, more than one; designating two or more; as, a plural word. Plural faith, which is too much by one. Shak. Plural number (Gram.), the number which designates more than one. See Number, n., 8.  The plural number; that form of a word which expresses or denotes more than one; a word in the plural form.
depend: 1. To hang down; to be sustained by being fastened or attached to something above. And ever-living lamps depend in rows. Pope. 2. To hang in suspense; to be pending; to be undetermined or undecided; as, a cause depending in court. You will not think it unnatural that those who have an object depending, which strongly engages their hopes and fears, should be somewhat inclined to superstition. Burke. 3. To rely for support; to be conditioned or contingent; to be connected with anything, as a cause of existence, or as a necessary condition; -- followed by on or upon, formerly by of. The truth of God's word dependeth not of the truth of the congregation. Tyndale. The conclusion . . . that our happiness depends little on political institutions, and much on the temper and regulation of our own minds. Macaulay. Heaven forming each on other to depend. Pope. 4. To trust; to rest with confidence; to rely; to confide; to be certain; -- with on or upon; as, we depend on the word or assurance of our friends; we depend on the mail at the usual hour. But if you 're rough, and use him like a dog, Depend upon it -- he 'll remain incog. Addison. 5. To serve; to attend; to act as a dependent or retainer. [Obs.] Shak. 6. To impend. [Obs.] Shak.
correct: Set right, or made straight; hence, conformable to truth, rectitude, or propriety, or to a just standard; nnot faulty or imperfect; free from error; as, correct behavior; correct views. Always use the most correct editions. Felton. Syn. -- Accurate; right, exact; precise; regular; faultless. See Accurate.  1. To make right; to bring to the standard of truth, justice, or propriety; to rectify; as, to correct manners or principles. This is a defect in the first make of same men's minds which can scarce ever be corrected afterwards. T. Burnet. 2. To remove or retrench the faults or errors of; to amend; to set right; as, to correct the proof (that is, to mark upon the margin the changes to be made, or to make in the type the changes so marked). 3. To bring back, or attempt to bring back, to propriety in morals; to reprove or punish for faults or deviations from moral rectitude; to chastise; to discipline; as, a child should be corrected for lying. My accuser is my 'prentice; and when I did correct him for his fault the other day, he did vow upon his knees he would be even with me. Shak. 4. To counteract the qualities of one thing by those of another; -- said of whatever is wrong or injurious; as, to correct the acidity of the stomach by alkaline preparations. Syn. -- To amend; rectify; emend; reform; improve; chastise; punish; discipline; chasten. See Amend.
shape: 1. To form or create; especially, to mold or make into a particular form; to give proper form or figure to. I was shapen in iniquity. Ps. li. 5. Grace shaped her limbs, and beauty decked her face. Prior. 2. To adapt to a purpose; to regulate; to adjust; to direct; as, to shape the course of a vessel. To the stream, when neither friends, nor force, Nor spead nor art avail, he shapes his course. Denham. Charmed by their eyes, their manners I acqire, And shape my foolishness to their desire. Prior. 3. To image; to conceive; to body forth. Oft my jealousy Shapes faults that are not. Shak. 4. To design; to prepare; to plan; to arrange. When shapen was all this conspiracy, From point to point. Chaucer. Shaping machine. (Mach.) Same as Shaper. -- To shape one's self, to prepare; to make ready. [Obs.] I will early shape me therefor. Chaucer.  To suit; to be adjusted or conformable. [R.] Shak.  1. Character or construction of a thing as determining its external appearance; outward aspect; make; figure; form; guise; as, the shape of a tree; the shape of the head; an elegant shape. He beat me grievously, in the shape of a woman. Shak. 2. That which has form or figure; a figure; an appearance; a being. Before the gates three sat, On either side, a formidable shape. Milton. 3. A model; a pattern; a mold. 4. Form of embodiment, as in words; form, as of thought or conception; concrete embodiment or example, as of some quality. Milton. 5. Dress for disguise; guise. [Obs.] Look better on this virgin, and consider This Persian shape laid by, and she appearing In a Greekish dress. Messinger. 6. (Iron Manuf.) (a) A rolled or hammered piece, as a bar, beam, angle iron, etc., having a cross section different from merchant bar. (b) A piece which has been roughly forged nearly to the form it will receive when completely forged or fitted. To take shape, to assume a definite form.
board: 1. A piece of timber sawed thin, and of considerable length and breadth as compared with the thickness, -- used for building, etc. Note: When sawed thick, as over one and a half or two inches, it is usually called a plank. 2. A table to put food upon. Note: The term board answers to the modern table, but it was often movable, and placed on trestles. Halliwell. Fruit of all kinds . . . She gathers, tribute large, and on the board Heaps with unsparing hand. Milton. 3. Hence: What is served on a table as food; stated meals; provision; entertainment; -- usually as furnished for pay; as, to work for one's board; the price of board. 4. A table at which a council or court is held. Hence: A council, convened for business, or any authorized assembly or meeting, public or private; a number of persons appointed or elected to sit in council for the management or direction of some public or private business or trust; as, the Board of Admiralty; a board of trade; a board of directors, trustees, commissioners, etc. Both better acquainted with affairs than any other who sat then at that board. Clarendon. We may judge from their letters to the board. Porteus. 5. A square or oblong piece of thin wood or other material used for some special purpose, as, a molding board; a board or surface painted or arranged for a game; as, a chessboard; a backgammon board. 6. Paper made thick and stiff like a board, for book covers, etc.; pasteboard; as, to bind a book in boards. 7. pl.  The stage in a theater; as, to go upon the boards, to enter upon the theatrical profession. 8. Etym: [In this use originally perh. a different word meaning border, margin; cf. D. boord, G. bord, shipboard, and G. borte trimming; also F. bord (fr. G.) the side of a ship. Cf. Border.]  The border or side of anything. (Naut.) (a) The side of a ship. "Now board to board the rival vessels row." Dryden. See On board, below. (b) The stretch which a ship makes in one tack. Note: Board is much used adjectively or as the last part of a compound; as, fir board, clapboard, floor board, shipboard, sideboard, ironing board, chessboard, cardboard, pasteboard, seaboard; board measure. The American Board, a shortened form of "The American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions" (the foreign missionary society of the American Congregational churches). -- Bed and board. See under Bed. -- Board and board (Naut.), side by side. -- Board of control, six privy councilors formerly appointed to superintend the affairs of the British East Indies. Stormonth. -- Board rule, a figured scale for finding without calculation the number of square feet in a board. Haldeman. -- Board of trade, in England, a committee of the privy council appointed to superintend matters relating to trade. In the United States, a body of men appointed for the advancement and protection of their business interests; a chamber of commerce. -- Board wages. (a) Food and lodging supplied as compensation for services; as, to work hard, and get only board wages. (b) Money wages which are barely sufficient to buy food and lodging. (c) A separate or special allowance of wages for the procurement of food, or food and lodging. Dryden. -- By the board, over the board, or side. "The mast went by the board." Totten. Hence (Fig.), To go by the board, to suffer complete destruction or overthrow. -- To enter on the boards, to have one's name inscribed on a board or tablet in a college as a student. [Cambridge, England.] "Having been entered on the boards of Trinity college." Hallam. -- To make a good board (Naut.), to sail in a straight line when close-hauled; to lose little to leeward. -- To make short boards, to tack frequently. -- On board. (a) On shipboard; in a ship or a boat; on board of; as, I came on board early; to be on board ship. (b) In or into a railway car or train. [Colloq. U. S.] -- Returning board, a board empowered to canvass and make an official statement of the votes cast at an election. [U.S.]  1. To cover with boards or boarding; as, to board a house. "The boarded hovel." Cowper. 2. Etym: [Cf. Board to accost, and see Board, n.]  To go on board of, or enter, as a ship, whether in a hostile or a friendly way. You board an enemy to capture her, and a stranger to receive news or make a communication. Totten. 3. To enter, as a railway car. [Colloq. U. S.] 4. To furnish with regular meals, or with meals and lodgings, for compensation; to supply with daily meals. 5. To place at board, for compensation; as, to board one's horse at a livery stable.  To obtain meals, or meals and lodgings, statedly for compensation; as, he boards at the hotel. We are several of us, gentlemen and ladies, who board in the same house. Spectator.  To approach; to accost; to address; hence, to woo. [Obs.] I will board her, though she chide as loud As thunder when the clouds in autumn crack. Shak.
strong: 1. Having active physical power, or great physical power to act; having a power of exerting great bodily force; vigorous. That our oxen may be strong to labor. Ps. cxliv. 14. Orses the strong to greater strength must yield. Dryden. 2. Having passive physical power; having ability to bear or endure; firm; hale; sound; robust; as, a strong constitution; strong health. 3. Solid; tough; not easily broken or injured; able to withstand violence; able to sustain attacks; not easily subdued or taken; as, a strong beam; a strong rock; a strong fortress or town. 4. Having great military or naval force; powerful; as, a strong army or fleet; a nation strong at sea. 5. Having great wealth, means, or resources; as, a strong house, or company of merchants. 6. Reaching a certain degree or limit in respect to strength or numbers; as, an army ten thousand strong. 7. Moving with rapidity or force; violent; forcible; impetuous; as, a strong current of water or wind; the wind was strong from the northeast; a strong tide. 8. Adapted to make a deep or effectual impression on the mind or imagination; striking or superior of the kind; powerful; forcible; cogent; as, a strong argument; strong reasons; strong evidence; a strong example; strong language. 9. Ardent; eager; zealous; earnestly engaged; as, a strong partisan; a strong Whig or Tory. Her mother, ever strong against that match. Shak. 10. Having virtues of great efficacy; or, having a particular quality in a great degree; as, a strong powder or tincture; a strong decoction; strong tea or coffee. 11. Full of spirit; containing a large proportion of alcohol; intoxicating; as, strong liquors. 12. Affecting any sense powerfully; as, strong light, colors, etc.; a strong flavor of onions; a strong scent. 13. Solid; nourishing; as, strong meat. Heb. v. 12. 14. Well established; firm; not easily overthrown or altered; as, a strong custom; a strong belief. 15. Violent; vehement; earnest; ardent. He had offered up prayers and supplications with strong crying and tears. Heb. v. 7. 16. Having great force, vigor, power, or the like, as the mind, intellect, or any faculty; as, a man of a strong mind, memory, judgment, or imagination. I was stronger in prophecy than in criticism. Dryden. 17. Vigorous; effective; forcible; powerful. Like her sweet voice is thy harmonious song, As high, as sweet, as easy, and as strong. E. Smith. 18. (Stock Exchange)  Tending to higher prices; rising; as, a strong market. 19. (Gram.) (a) Pertaining to, or designating, a verb which forms its preterit (imperfect) by a variation in the root vowel, and the past participle (usually) by the addition of -en (with or without a change of the root vowel); as in the verbs strive, strove, striven; break, broke, broken; drink, drank, drunk. Opposed to weak, or regular. See Weak. (b) Applied to forms in Anglo-Saxon, etc., which retain the old declensional endings. In the Teutonic languages the vowel stems have held the original endings most firmly, and are called strong; the stems in -n are called weak other constant stems conform, or are irregular. F. A. March. Strong conjugation (Gram.), the conjugation of a strong verb; -- called also old, or irregular, conjugation, and distinguished from the weak, or regular, conjugation. Note: Strong is often used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, strong-backed, strong-based, strong-bodied, strong- colored, strong-fisted, strong-handed, strong-ribbed, strong- smelling, strong-voiced, etc. Syn. -- Vigorous; powerful; stout; solid; firm; hardy; muscular; forcible; cogent; valid. See Robust.
fresh: 1. Possessed of original life and vigor; new and strong; unimpaired; sound. 2. New; original; additional. "Fear of fresh mistakes." Sir W. Scott. A fresh pleasure in every fresh posture of the limbs. Landor. 3. Lately produced, gathered, or prepared for market; not stale; not dried or preserved; not wilted, faded, or tainted; in good condition; as, fresh vegetables, flowers, eggs, meat, fruit, etc.; recently made or obtained; occurring again; repeated; as, a fresh supply of goods; fresh tea, raisins, etc.; lately come or made public; as, fresh news; recently taken from a well or spring; as, fresh water. 4. Youthful; florid; as, these fresh nymphs. Shak. 5. In a raw, green, or untried state; uncultivated; uncultured; unpracticed; as, a fresh hand on a ship. 6. Renewed in vigor, alacrity, or readiness for action; as, fresh for a combat; hence, tending to renew in vigor; rather strong; cool or brisk; as, a fresh wind. 7. Not salt; as, fresh water, in distinction from that which is from the sea, or brackish; fresh meat, in distinction from that which is pickled or salted. Fresh breeze (Naut.), a breeze between a moderate and a strong breeze; one blowinq about twenty miles an hour. -- Fresh gale, a gale blowing about forty-five miles an hour. -- Fresh way (Naut.), increased speed. Syn. -- Sound; unimpaired; recent; unfaded: ruddy; florid; sweet; good: inexperienced; unpracticed: unused; lively; vigorous; strong.  1. A stream or spring of fresh water. He shall drink naught but brine; for I'll not show him Where the quick freshes are. Shak. 2. A flood; a freshet. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell. 3. The mingling of fresh water with salt in rivers or bays, as by means of a flood of fresh water flowing toward or into the sea. Beverly.  To refresh; to freshen. [Obs.] Rom. of R.
heavy: Having the heaves.  1. Heaved or lifted with labor; not light; weighty; ponderous; as, a heavy stone; hence, sometimes, large in extent, quantity, or effects; as, a heavy fall of rain or snow; a heavy failure; heavy business transactions, etc.; often implying strength; as, a heavy barrier; also, difficult to move; as, a heavy draught. 2. Not easy to bear; burdensome; oppressive; hard to endure or accomplish; hence, grievous, afflictive; as, heavy yokes, expenses, undertakings, trials, news, etc. The hand of the Lord was heavy upon them of Ashdod. 1 Sam. v. 6. The king himself hath a heavy reckoning to make. Shak. Sent hither to impart the heavy news. Wordsworth. Trust him not in matter of heavy consequence. Shak. 3. Laden with that which is weighty; encumbered; burdened; bowed down, either with an actual burden, or with care, grief, pain, disappointment. The heavy [sorrowing] nobles all in council were. Chapman. A light wife doth make a heavy husband. Shak. 4. Slow; sluggish; inactive; or lifeless, dull, inanimate, stupid; as, a heavy gait, looks, manners, style, and the like; a heavy writer or book. Whilst the heavy plowman snores. Shak. Of a heavy, dull, degenerate mind. Dryden. Neither [is] his ear heavy, that it can not hear. Is. lix. 1. 5. Strong; violent; forcible; as, a heavy sea, storm, cannonade, and the like. 6. Loud; deep; -- said of sound; as, heavy thunder. But, hark! that heavy sound breaks in once more. Byron. 7. Dark with clouds, or ready to rain; gloomy; -- said of the sky. 8. Impeding motion; cloggy; clayey; -- said of earth; as, a heavy road, soil, and the like. 9. Not raised or made light; as, heavy bread. 10. Not agreeable to, or suitable for, the stomach; not easily digested; -- said of food. 11. Having much body or strength; -- said of wines, or other liquors. 12. With child; pregnant. [R.] Heavy artillery. (Mil.) (a) Guns of great weight or large caliber, esp. siege, garrison, and seacoast guns. (b) Troops which serve heavy guns. -- Heavy cavalry. See under Cavalry. -- Heavy fire (Mil.), a continuous or destructive cannonading, or discharge of small arms. -- Heavy metal (Mil.), large guns carrying balls of a large size; also, large balls for such guns. -- Heavy metals. (Chem.) See under Metal. -- Heavy weight, in wrestling, boxing, etc., a term applied to the heaviest of the classes into which contestants are divided. Cf. Feather weight (c), under Feather. Note: Heavy is used in composition to form many words which need no special explanation; as, heavy-built, heavy-browed, heavy-gaited, etc.  , adv. Heavily; -- sometimes used in composition; as, heavy- laden.  To make heavy. [Obs.] Wyclif.
whole: 1. Containing the total amount, number, etc.; comprising all the parts; free from deficiency; all; total; entire; as, the whole earth; the whole solar system; the whole army; the whole nation. "On their whole host I flew unarmed." Milton. The whole race of mankind. Shak. 2. Complete; entire; not defective or imperfect; not broken or fractured; unimpaired; uninjured; integral; as, a whole orange; the egg is whole; the vessel is whole. My life is yet whole in me. 2 Sam. i. 9. 3. Possessing, or being in a state of, heath and soundness; healthy; sound; well. [She] findeth there her friends hole and sound. Chaucer. They that be whole need not a physician. Matt. ix. 12. When Sir Lancelot's deadly hurt was whole. Tennyson. Whole blood. (Law of Descent) See under Blood, n., 2. -- Whole note (Mus.), the note which represents a note of longest duration in common use; a semibreve. -- Whole number (Math.), a number which is not a fraction or mixed number; an integer. Whole snipe (Zoöl.), the common snipe, as distinguished from the smaller jacksnipe. [Prov. Eng.] Syn. -- All; total; complete; entire; integral; undivided; uninjured; unimpaired; unbroken; healthy. -- Whole, Total, Entire, Complete. When we use the word whole, we refer to a thing as made up of parts, none of which are wanting; as, a whole week; a whole year; the whole creation. When we use the word total, we have reference to all as taken together, and forming a single totality; as, the total amount; the total income. When we speak of a thing as entire, we have no reference to parts at all, but regard the thing as an integer, i. e., continuous or unbroken; as, an entire year; entire prosperity. When we speak of a thing as complete, there is reference to some progress which results in a filling out to some end or object, or a perfected state with no deficiency; as, complete success; a complete victory. All the whole army stood agazed on him. Shak. One entire and perfect chrysolite. Shak. Lest total darkness should by night regain Her old possession, and extinguish life. Milton. So absolute she seems, And in herself complete. Milton.  1. The entire thing; the entire assemblage of parts; totality; all of a thing, without defect or exception; a thing complete in itself. "This not the whole of life to live, Nor all of death to die. J. Montgomery. 2. A regular combination of parts; a system. Parts answering parts shall slide into a whole. Pope. Committee of the whole. See under Committee. -- Upon the whole, considering all things; taking everything into account; in view of all the circumstances or conditions. Syn. -- Totality; total; amount; aggregate; gross.
represent: 1. To present again or anew; to present by means of something standing in the place of; to exhibit the counterpart or image of; to typify. Before him burn Seven lamps, as in a zodiac representing The heavenly fires. Milton. 2. To portray by pictoral or plastic art; to delineate; as, to represent a landscape in a picture, a horse in bronze, and the like. 3. To portray by mimicry or action of any kind; to act the part or character of; to personate; as, to represent Hamlet. 4. To stand in the place of; to supply the place, perform the duties, exercise the rights, or receive the share, of; to speak and act with authority in behalf of; to act the part of (another); as, an heir represents his ancestor; an attorney represents his client in court; a member of Congress represents his district in Congress. 5. To exhibit to another mind in language; to show; to give one's own impressions and judgement of; to bring before the mind; to set forth; sometimes, to give an account of; to describe. He represented Rizzio's credit with the queen to be the chief and only obstacle to his success in that demand. Robertson. This bank is thought the greatest load on the Genoese, and the managers of it have been represented as a second kind of senate. Addison. 6. To serve as a sign or symbol of; as, mathematical symbols represent quantities or relations; words represent ideas or things. 7. To bring a sensation of into the mind or sensorium; to cause to be known, felt, or apprehended; to present. Among these. Fancy next Her office holds; of all external things Which he five watchful senses represent, She forms imaginations, aery shapes. Milton. 8. (Metaph.)  To form or image again in consciousness, as an object of cognition or apprehension (something which was originally apprehended by direct presentation). See Presentative,3. The general capability of knowledge necessarily requires that, besides the power of evoking out of unconsciousness one portion of our retained knowledge in preference to another, we posses the faculty of representing in consciousness what is thus evoked . . . This representative Faculty is Imagination or Phantasy. Sir. W. Hamilton.
got: imp. & p. p. of Get. See Get.
month: One of the twelve portions into which the year is divided; the twelfth part of a year, corresponding nearly to the length of a synodic revolution of the moon, -- whence the name. In popular use, a period of four weeks is often called a month. Note: In the common law, a month is a lunar month, or twenty-eight days, unless otherwise expressed. Blackstone. In the United States the rule of the common law is generally cahanged, and a month is declared to mean a calendar month. Cooley's Blackstone. A month mind. (a) A strong or abnormal desire. [Obs.] Shak. (b) A celebration made in remembrance of a deceased person a month after death. Strype. -- Calendar months, the months as adjusted in the common or Gregorian calendar; April, June, September, and November, containing 30 days, and the rest 31, except February, which, in common years, has 28, and in leap years 29. -- Lunar month, the period of one revolution of the moon, particularly a synodical revolution; but several kinds are distinguished, as the synodical month, or period from one new moon to the next, in mean length 29 d. 12 h. 44 m. 2.87 s.; the nodical month, or time of revolution from one node to the same again, in length 27 d. 5 h. 5 m. 36 s.; the sidereal, or time of revolution from a star to the same again, equal to 27 d. 7 h. 43 m. 11.5 s.; the anomalistic, or time of revolution from perigee to perigee again, in length 27 d. 13 h. 18 m. 37.4 s.; and the tropical, or time of passing from any point of the ecliptic to the same again, equal to 27 d. 7 h. 43 m. 4.7 s. -- Solar month, the time in which the sun passes through one sign of the zodiac, in mean length 30 d. 10 h. 29 m. 4.1 s.
might: imp. of May. Etym: [AS. meahte, mihte.]  Force or power of any kind, whether of body or mind; energy or intensity of purpose, feeling, or action; means or resources to effect an object; strength; force; power; ability; capacity. What so strong, But wanting rest, will also want of might Spenser. Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy might. Deut. vi. 5. With might and main. See under 2d Main.
floor: 1. The bottom or lower part of any room; the part upon which we stand and upon which the movables in the room are supported. 2. The structure formed of beams, girders, etc., with proper covering, which divides a building horizontally into stories. Floor in sense 1 is, then, the upper surface of floor in sense 2. 3. The surface, or the platform, of a structure on which we walk or travel; as, the floor of a bridge. 4. A story of a building. See Story. 5. (Legislative Assemblies) (a) The part of the house assigned to the members. (b) The right to speak. [U.S.] Note: Instead of he has the floor, the English say, he is in possession of the house. 6. (Naut.)  That part of the bottom of a vessel on each side of the keelson which is most nearly horizontal. 7. (Mining) (a) The rock underlying a stratified or nearly horizontal deposit. (b) A horizontal, flat ore body. Raymond. Floor cloth, a heavy fabric, painted, varnished, or saturated, with waterproof material, for covering floors; oilcloth. -- Floor cramp, an implement for tightening the seams of floor boards before nailing them in position. -- Floor light, a frame with glass panes in a floor. -- Floor plan. (a) (Shipbuilding) A longitudinal section, showing a ship as divided at the water line. (b) (Arch.) A horizontal section, showing the thickness of the walls and partitions, arrangement of passages, apartments, and openings at the level of any floor of a house.  1. To cover with a floor; to furnish with a floor; as, to floor a house with pine boards. 2. To strike down or lay level with the floor; to knock down; hence, to silence by a conclusive answer or retort; as, to floor an opponent. Floored or crushed by him. Coleridge. 3. To finish or make an end of; as, to floor a college examination. [Colloq.] I've floored my little-go work. T. Hughes.
range: 1. To set in a row, or in rows; to place in a regular line or lines, or in ranks; to dispose in the proper order; to rank; as, to range soldiers in line. Maccabeus ranged his army by hands. 2 Macc. xii. 20. 2. To place (as a single individual) among others in a line, row, or order, as in the ranks of an army; -- usually, reflexively and figuratively, (in the sense) to espouse a cause, to join a party, etc. It would be absurd in me to range myself on the side of the Duke of Bedford and the corresponding society. Burke. 3. To separate into parts; to sift. [Obs.] Holland. 4. To dispose in a classified or in systematic order; to arrange regularly; as, to range plants and animals in genera and species. 5. To rove over or through; as, to range the fields. Teach him to range the ditch, and force the brake. Gay. 6. To sail or pass in a direction parallel to or near; as, to range the coast. Note: Compare the last two senses (5 and 6) with the French ranger une côte. 7. (Biol.)  To be native to, or to live in; to frequent.  1. To rove at large; to wander without restraint or direction; to roam. Like a ranging spaniel that barks at every bird he sees. Burton. 2. To have range; to change or differ within limits; to be capable of projecting, or to admit of being projected, especially as to horizontal distance; as, the temperature ranged through seventy degrees Fahrenheit; the gun ranges three miles; the shot ranged four miles. 3. To be placed in order; to be ranked; to admit of arrangement or classification; to rank. And range with humble livers in content. Shak. 4. To have a certain direction; to correspond in direction; to be or keep in a corresponding line; to trend or run; -- often followed by with; as, the front of a house ranges with the street; to range along the coast. Which way the forests range. Dryden. 5. (Biol.)  To be native to, or live in, a certain district or region; as, the peba ranges from Texas to Paraguay. Syn. -- To rove; roam; ramble; wander; stroll.  1. A series of things in a line; a row; a rank; as, a range of buildings; a range of mountains. 2. An aggregate of individuals in one rank or degree; an order; a class. The next range of beings above him are the immaterial intelligences. Sir M. Hale. 3. The step of a ladder; a rung. Clarendon. 4. A kitchen grate. [Obs.] He was bid at his first coming to take off the range, and let down the cinders. L'Estrange. 5. Am extended cooking apparatus of cast iron, set in brickwork, and affording conveniences for various ways 6. A bolting sieve to sift meal. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.] 7. A wandering or roving; a going to and fro; an excursion; a ramble; an expedition. He may take a range all the world over. South. 8. That which may be ranged over; place or room for excursion; especially, a region of country in which cattle or sheep may wander and pasture. 9. Extent or space taken in by anything excursive; compass or extent of excursion; reach; scope; discursive; as, the range of one's voice, or authority. Far as creation's ample range extends. Pope. The range and compass of Hammond's knowledge filled the whole circle of the arts. Bp. Fell. A man has not enough range of thought. Addison. 10. (Biol.)  The region within which a plant or animal naturally lives. 11. (Gun.) (a) The horizontal distance to which a shot or other projectile is carried. (b) Sometimes, less properly, the trajectory of a shot or projectile. (c) A place where shooting, as with cannons or rifles, is practiced. 12. In the public land system of the United States, a row or line of townships lying between two succession meridian lines six miles apart. Note: The meridians included in each great survey are numbered in order east and west from the "principal meridian" of that survey, and the townships in the range are numbered north and south from the "base line," which runs east and west; as, township No. 6, N., range 7, W., from the fifth principal meridian. 13. (Naut.)  See Range of cable, below. Range of accommodation (Optics), the distance between the near point and the far point of distinct vision, -- usually measured and designated by the strength of the lens which if added to the refracting media of the eye would cause the rays from the near point to appear as if they came from the far point. -- Range finder (Gunnery), an instrument, or apparatus, variously constructed, for ascertaining the distance of an inaccessible object, -- used to determine what elevation must be given to a gun in order to hit the object; a position finder. -- Range of cable (Naut.), a certain length of slack cable ranged along the deck preparatory to letting go the anchor. -- Range work (Masonry), masonry of squared stones laid in courses each of which is of even height throughout the length of the wall; -- distinguished from broken range work, which consists of squared stones laid in courses not continuously of even height. -- To get the range of (an object) (Gun.), to find the angle at which the piece must be raised to reach (the object) without carrying beyond.
famous: Celebrated in fame or public report; renowned; mach talked of; distinguished in story; -- used in either a good or a bad sense, chiefly the former; often followed by for; as, famous for erudition, for eloquence, for military skill; a famous pirate. Famous for a scolding tongue. Shak. Syn. -- Noted; remarkable; signal; conspicuous; celebrated; renowned; illustrious; eminent; transcendent; excellent. -- Famous, Renowned, Illustrious. Famous is applied to a person or thing widely spoken of as extraordinary; renowned is applied to those who are named again and again with honor; illustrious, to those who have dazzled the world by the splendor of their deeds or their virtues. See Distinguished.
include: 1. To confine within; to hold; to contain; to shut up; to inclose; as, the shell of a nut includes the kernel; a pearl is included in a shell. 2. To comprehend or comprise, as a genus the species, the whole a part, an argument or reason the inference; to contain; to embrace; as, this volume of Shakespeare includes his sonnets; he was included in the invitation to the family; to and including page twenty-five. The whole included race, his purposed prey. Milton. The loss of such a lord includes all harm. Shak. 3. To conclude; to end; to terminate. [Obs.] Come, let us go; we will include all jars With triumphs, mirth, and rare solemnity. Shak. Syn. -- To contain; inclose; comprise; comprehend; embrace; involve.
office: 1. That which a person does, either voluntarily or by appointment, for, or with reference to, others; customary duty, or a duty that arises from the relations of man to man; as, kind offices, pious offices. I would I could do a good office between you. Shak. 2. A special duty, trust, charge, or position, conferred by authority and for a public purpose; a position of trust or authority; as, an executive or judical office; a municipal office. 3. A charge or trust, of a sacred nature, conferred by God himself; as, the office of a priest under the old dispensation, and that of the apostles in the new. Inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office. Rom. xi. 13. 4. That which is performed, intended, or assigned to be done, by a particular thing, or that which anything is fitted to perform; a function; -- answering to duty in intelligent beings. They [the eyes] resign their office and their light. Shak. Hesperus, whose office is to bring Twilight upon the earth. Milton. In this experiment the several intervals of the teeth of the comb do the office of so many prisms. Sir I. Newton. 5. The place where a particular kind of business or service for others is transacted; a house or apartment in which public officers and others transact business; as, the register's office; a lawyer's office. 6. The company or corporation, or persons collectively, whose place of business is in an office; as, I have notified the office. 7. pl.  The apartments or outhouses in which the domestics discharge the duties attached to the service of a house, as kitchens, pantries, stables, etc. [Eng.] As for the offices, let them stand at distance. Bacon. 8. (Eccl.)  Any service other than that of ordination and the Mass; any prescribed religious service. This morning was read in the church, after the office was done, the declaration setting forth the late conspiracy against the king's person. Evelyn. Holy office. Same as Inquisition, n., 3. -- Houses of office. Same as def. 7 above. Chaucer. -- Little office (R.C.Ch.), an office recited in honor of the Virgin Mary. -- Office bearer, an officer; one who has a specific office or duty to perform. -- Office copy (Law), an authenticated or certified copy of a record, from the proper office. See Certified copies, under Copy. Abbott. -- Office-found (Law), the finding of an inquest of office. See under Inquest. -- Office holder. See Officeholder in the Vocabulary  To perform, as the duties of an office; to discharge. [Obs.] Shak.
rest: To arrest. [Obs.]  1. A state of quiet or repose; a cessation from motion or labor; tranquillity; as, rest from mental exertion; rest of body or mind. Chaucer. Sleep give thee all his rest! Shak. 2. Hence, freedom from everything which wearies or disturbs; peace; security. And the land had rest fourscore years. Judges iii. 30. 3. Sleep; slumber; hence, poetically, death. How sleep the brave who sink to rest, By all their country's wishes blest. Collins. 4. That on which anything rests or leans for support; as, a rest in a lathe, for supporting the cutting tool or steadying the work. He made narrowed rests round about, that the beams should not be fastened in the walls of the house. 1 Kings vi. 6. 5. (Anc. Armor)  A projection from the right side of the cuirass, serving to support the lance. Their visors closed, their lances in the rest. Dryden. 6. A place where one may rest, either temporarily, as in an inn, or permanently, as, in an abode. "Halfway houses and travelers' rests." J. H. Newman. In dust our final rest, and native home. Milton. Ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance which the Lord your God giveth you. Deut. xii. 9. 7. (Pros.)  A short pause in reading verse; a cæsura. 8. The striking of a balance at regular intervals in a running account. "An account is said to be taken with annual or semiannual rests." Abbott. 9. A set or game at tennis. [Obs.] 10. (Mus.)  Silence in music or in one of its parts; the name of the character that stands for such silence. They are named as notes are, whole, half, quarter,etc. Rest house, an empty house for the accomodation of travelers; a caravansary. [India] -- To set, or To set up, one's rest, to have a settled determination; -- from an old game of cards, when one so expressed his intention to stand or rest upon his hand. [Obs.] Shak. Bacon. Syn. -- Cessation; pause; intermission; stop; stay; repose; slumber; quiet; ease; quietness; stillness; tranquillity; peacefulness; pease. -- Rest, Repose. Rest is a ceasing from labor or exertion; repose is a mode of resting which gives relief and refreshment after toil and labor. The words are commonly interchangeable.  1. To cease from action or motion, especially from action which has caused weariness; to desist from labor or exertion. God . . . rested on the seventh day from all his work which he had made. Gen. ii. 2. Six days thou shalt do thy work, and on the seventh day thou shalt rest. Ex. xxiii. 12. 2. To be free from whanever wearies or disturbs; to be quiet or still. There rest, if any rest can harbor there. Milton. 3. To lie; to repose; to recline; to lan; as, to rest on a couch. 4. To stand firm; to be fixed; to be supported; as, a column rests on its pedestal. 5. To sleep; to slumber; hence, poetically, to be dead. Fancy . . . then retries Into her private cell when Nature rests. Milton. 6. To lean in confidence; to trust; to rely; to repose without anxiety; as, to rest on a man's promise. On him I rested, after long debate, And not without considering, fixed Dryden. 7. To be satisfied; to acquiesce. To rest in Heaven's determination. Addison. To rest with, to be in the power of; to depend upon; as, it rests with him to decide.  1. To lay or place at rest; to quiet. Your piety has paid All needful rites, to rest my wandering shade. Dryden. 2. To place, as on a support; to cause to lean. Her weary head upon your bosom rest. Waller.  1. That which is left, or which remains after the separation of a part, either in fact or in contemplation; remainder; residue. Religion gives part of its reward in hand, the present comfort of having done our duty, and, for the rest, it offers us the best security that Heaven can give. Tillotson. 2. Those not included in a proposition or description; the remainder; others. "Plato and the rest of the philosophers." Bp. Stillingfleet. Armed like the rest, the Trojan prince appears. DRyden. 3. (Com.)  A surplus held as a reserved fund by a bank to equalize its dividends, etc.; in the Bank of England, the balance of assets above liabilities. [Eng.] Syn. -- Remainder; overplus; surplus; remnant; residue; reserve; others.  To be left; to remain; to continue to be. The affairs of men rest still uncertain. Shak.
stand: 1. To be at rest in an erect position; to be fixed in an upright or firm position; as: (a) To be supported on the feet, in an erect or nearly erect position; -- opposed to lie, sit, kneel, etc. "I pray you all, stand up!" Shak. (b) To continue upright in a certain locality, as a tree fixed by the roots, or a building resting on its foundation. It stands as it were to the ground yglued. Chaucer. The ruined wall Stands when its wind worn battlements are gone. Byron. 2. To occupy or hold a place; to have a situation; to be situated or located; as, Paris stands on the Seine. Wite ye not where there stands a little town Chaucer. 3. To cease from progress; not to proceed; to stop; to pause; to halt; to remain stationary. I charge thee, stand, And tell thy name. Dryden. The star, which they saw in the east, went before them, till it came and stood over where the young child was. Matt. ii. 9. 4. To remain without ruin or injury; to hold good against tendencies to impair or injure; to be permanent; to endure; to last; hence, to find endurance, strength, or resources. My mind on its own center stands unmoved. Dryden. 5. To maintain one's ground; to be acquitted; not to fail or yield; to be safe. Readers by whose judgment I would stand or fall. Spectator. 6. To maintain an invincible or permanent attitude; to be fixed, steady, or firm; to take a position in resistance or opposition. "The standing pattern of their imitation." South. The king granted the Jews . . . to gather themselves together, and to stand for their life. Esther viii. 11. 7. To adhere to fixed principles; to maintain moral rectitude; to keep from falling into error or vice. We must labor so as to stand with godliness, according to his appointment. Latimer. 8. To have or maintain a position, order, or rank; to be in a particular relation; as, Christian charity, or love, stands first in the rank of gifts. 9. To be in some particular state; to have essence or being; to be; to consist. "Sacrifices . . . which stood only in meats and drinks." Heb. ix. 10. Accomplish what your signs foreshow; I stand resigned, and am prepared to go. Dryden. Thou seest how it stands with me, and that I may not tarry. Sir W. Scott. 10. To be consistent; to agree; to accord. Doubt me not; by heaven, I will do nothing But what may stand with honor. Massinger. 11. (Naut.)  To hold a course at sea; as, to stand from the shore; to stand for the harbor. From the same parts of heaven his navy stands. Dryden. 12. To offer one's self, or to be offered, as a candidate. He stood to be elected one of the proctors of the university. Walton. 13. To stagnate; not to flow; to be motionless. Or the black water of Pomptina stands. Dryden. 14. To measure when erect on the feet. Six feet two, as I think, he stands. Tennyson. 15. (Law) (a) To be or remain as it is; to continue in force; to have efficacy or validity; to abide. Bouvier. (b) To appear in court. Burrill. Stand by (Naut.), a preparatory order, equivalent to Be ready. -- To stand against, to opposite; to resist. -- To stand by. (a) To be near; to be a spectator; to be present. (b) To be aside; to be aside with disregard. "In the interim [we] let the commands stand by neglected." Dr. H. More. (c) To maintain; to defend; to support; not to desert; as, to stand by one's principles or party. (d) To rest on for support; to be supported by. Whitgift. -- To stand corrected, to be set right, as after an error in a statement of fact. Wycherley. -- To stand fast, to be fixed; to be unshaken or immovable. -- To stand firmly on, to be satisfied or convinced of. "Though Page be a secure fool, and stands so firmly on his wife's frailty." Shak. -- To stand for. (a) To side with; to espouse the cause of; to support; to maintain, or to profess or attempt to maintain; to defend. "I stand wholly for you." Shak. (b) To be in the place of; to be the substitute or to represent; as, a cipher at the left hand of a figure stands for nothing. "I will not trouble myself, whether these names stand for the same thing, or really include one another." Locke. -- To stand in, to cost. "The same standeth them in much less cost." Robynson (More's Utopia). The Punic wars could not have stood the human race in less than three millions of the species. Burke. -- To stand in hand, to conduce to one's interest; to be serviceable or advantageous. -- To stand off. (a) To keep at a distance. (b) Not to comply. (c) To keep at a distance in friendship, social intercourse, or acquaintance. (d) To appear prominent; to have relief. "Picture is best when it standeth off, as if it were carved." Sir H. Wotton. -- To stand off and on (Naut.), to remain near a coast by sailing toward land and then from it. -- To stand on (Naut.), to continue on the same tack or course. -- To stand out. (a) To project; to be prominent. "Their eyes stand out with fatness." Psalm lxxiii. 7. (b) To persist in opposition or resistance; not to yield or comply; not to give way or recede. His spirit is come in, That so stood out against the holy church. Shak. -- To stand to. (a) To ply; to urge; to persevere in using. "Stand to your tackles, mates, and stretch your oars." Dryden. (b) To remain fixed in a purpose or opinion. "I will stand to it, that this is his sense." Bp. Stillingfleet. (c) To abide by; to adhere to; as to a contrast, assertion, promise, etc.; as, to stand to an award; to stand to one's word. (d) Not to yield; not to fly; to maintain, as one's ground. "Their lives and fortunes were put in safety, whether they stood to it or ran away." Bacon. (e) To be consistent with; to agree with; as, it stands to reason that he could not have done so. (f) To support; to uphold. "Stand to me in this cause." Shak. -- To stand together, to be consistent; to agree. -- To stand to sea (Naut.), to direct the course from land. -- To stand under, to undergo; to withstand. Shak. -- To stand up. (a) To rise from sitting; to be on the feet. (b) To arise in order to speak or act. "Against whom, when the accusers stood up, they brought none accusation of such things as I supposed." Acts xxv. 18. (c) To rise and stand on end, as the hair. (d) To put one's self in opposition; to contend. "Once we stood up about the corn." Shak. -- To stand up for, to defend; to justify; to support, or attempt to support; as, to stand up for the administration. -- To stand upon. (a) To concern; to interest. (b) To value; to esteem. "We highly esteem and stand much upon our birth." Ray. (c) To insist on; to attach much importance to; as, to stand upon security; to stand upon ceremony. (d) To attack; to assault. [A Hebraism] "So I stood upon him, and slew him." 2 Sam. i. 10. -- To stand with, to be consistent with. "It stands with reason that they should be rewarded liberally." Sir J. Davies.  1. To endure; to sustain; to bear; as, I can not stand the cold or the heat. 2. To resist, without yielding or receding; to withstand. "Love stood the siege." Dryden. He stood the furious foe. Pope. 3. To abide by; to submit to; to suffer. Bid him disband his legions, . . . And stand the judgment of a Roman senate. Addison. 4. To set upright; to cause to stand; as, to stand a book on the shelf; to stand a man on his feet. 5. To be at the expense of; to pay for; as, to stand a treat. [Colloq.] Tackeray. To stand fire, to receive the fire of arms from an enemy without giving way. -- To stand one's ground, to keep the ground or station one has taken; to maintain one's position. "Pleasants and burghers, however brave, are unable to stand their ground against veteran soldiers." Macaulay. -- To stand trial, to sustain the trial or examination of a cause; not to give up without trial.  1. The act of standing. I took my stand upon an eminence . . . to look into thier several ladings. Spectator. 2. A halt or stop for the purpose of defense, resistance, or opposition; as, to come to, or to make, a stand. Vice is at stand, and at the highest flow. Dryden. 3. A place or post where one stands; a place where one may stand while observing or waiting for something. I have found you out a stand most fit, Where you may have such vantage on the duke, He shall not pass you. Shak. 4. A station in a city or town where carriages or wagons stand for hire; as, a cab stand. Dickens. 5. A raised platform or station where a race or other outdoor spectacle may be viewed; as, the judge's or the grand stand at a race course. 6. A small table; also, something on or in which anything may be laid, hung, or placed upright; as, a hat stand; an umbrella stand; a music stand. 7. A place where a witness stands to testify in court. 8. The situation of a shop, store, hotel, etc.; as, a good, bad, or convenient stand for business. [U. S.] 9. Rank; post; station; standing. Father, since your fortune did attain So high a stand, I mean not to descend. Daniel. 10. A state of perplexity or embarrassment; as, to be at a stand what to do. L'Estrange. 11. A young tree, usually reserved when other trees are cut; also, a tree growing or standing upon its own root, in distinction from one produced from a scion set in a stock, either of the same or another kind of tree. 12. (Com.)  A weight of from two hundred and fifty to three hundred pounds, -- used in weighing pitch. Microscope stand, the instrument, excepting the eyepiece, objective, and other removable optical parts. -- Stand of ammunition, the projectile, cartridge, and sabot connected together. -- Stand of arms. (Mil.) See under Arms. -- Stand of colors (Mil.), a single color, or flag. Wilhelm (Mil. Dict.) -- To be at a stand, to be stationary or motionless; to be at a standstill; hence, to be perplexed; to be embarrassed. -- To make a stand, to halt for the purpose of offering resistance to a pursuing enemy. Syn. -- Stop; halt; rest; interruption; obstruction; perplexity; difficulty; embarrassment; hesitation.
glad: 1. Pleased; joyous; happy; cheerful; gratified; -- opposed to sorry, sorrowful, or unhappy; -- said of persons, and often followed by of, at, that, or by the infinitive, and sometimes by with, introducing the cause or reason. A wise son maketh a glad father. Prov. x. 1. He that is glad at calamities shall not be unpunished. Prov. xvii. 5. The Trojan, glad with sight of hostile blood. Dryden. He, glad of her attention gained. Milton. As we are now glad to behold your eyes. Shak. Glad am I that your highness is so armed. Shak. Glad on 't, glad of it. [Colloq.] Shak. 2. Wearing a gay or bright appearance; expressing or exciting joy; producing gladness; exhilarating. Her conversation More glad to me than to a miser money is. Sir P. Sidney. Glad evening and glad morn crowned the fourth day. Milton. Syn. -- Pleased; gratified; exhilarated; animated; delighted; happy; cheerful; joyous; joyful; cheering; exhilarating; pleasing; animating. -- Glad, Delighted, Gratified. Delighted expresses a much higher degree of pleasure than glad. Gratified always refers to a pleasure conferred by some human agent, and the feeling is modified by the consideration that we owe it in part to another. A person may be glad or delighted to see a friend, and gratified at the attention shown by his visits.  To make glad; to cheer; to gladden; to exhilarate. Chaucer. That which gladded all the warrior train. Dryden. Each drinks the juice that glads the heart of man. Pope.  To be glad; to rejoice. [Obs.] Massinger.
mind: 1. The intellectual or rational faculty in man; the understanding; the intellect; the power that conceives, judges, or reasons; also, the entire spiritual nature; the soul; -- often in distinction from the body. By the mind of man we understand that in him which thinks, remembers, reasons, wills. Reid. What we mean by mind is simply that which perceives, thinks, feels, wills, and desires. Sir W. Hamilton. Let every man be fully persuaded in his own mind. Rom. xiv. 5. The mind shall banquet, though the body pine. Shak. 2. The state, at any given time, of the faculties of thinking, willing, choosing, and the like; psychical activity or state; as: (a) Opinion; judgment; belief. A fool uttereth all his mind. Prov. xxix. 11. Being so hard to me that brought your mind, I fear she'll prove as hard to you in telling her mind. Shak. (b) Choice; inclination; liking; intent; will. If it be your minds, then let none go forth. 2 Kings ix. 15. (c) Courage; spirit. Chapman. 3. Memory; remembrance; recollection; as, to have or keep in mind, to call to mind, to put in mind, etc. To have a mind or great mind, to be inclined or strongly inclined in purpose; -- used with an infinitive. "Sir Roger de Coverly... told me that he had a great mind to see the new tragedy with me." Addison. -- To lose one's mind, to become insane, or imbecile. -- To make up one's mind, to come to an opinion or decision; to determine. -- To put in mind, to remind. "Regard us simply as putting you in mind of what you already know to be good policy." Jowett (Thucyd. ).  1. To fix the mind or thoughts on; to regard with attention; to treat as of consequence; to consider; to heed; to mark; to note. "Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate." Rom. xii. 16. My lord, you nod: you do not mind the play. Shak. 2. To occupy one's self with; to employ one's self about; to attend to; as, to mind one's business. Bidding him be a good child, and mind his book. Addison. 3. To obey; as, to mind parents; the dog minds his master. 4. To have in mind; to purpose. Beaconsfield. I mind to tell him plainly what I think. Shak. 5. To put in mind; to remind. [Archaic] M. Arnold. He minded them of the mutability of all earthly things. Fuller. I do thee wrong to mind thee of it. Shak. Never mind, do not regard it; it is of no consequence; no matter. Syn. -- To notice; mark; regard; obey. See Attend.  To give attention or heed; to obey; as, the dog minds well.
cook: To make the noise of the cuckoo. [Obs. or R.] Constant cuckoos cook on every side. The Silkworms (1599).  To throw. [Prov.Eng.] "Cook me that ball." Grose.  1. One whose occupation is to prepare food for the table; one who dresses or cooks meat or vegetables for eating. 2. (Zoöl.)  A fish, the European striped wrasse.  1. To prepare, as food, by boiling, roasting, baking, broiling, etc.; to make suitable for eating, by the agency of fire or heat. 2. To concoct or prepare; hence, to tamper with or alter; to garble; -- often with up; as, to cook up a story; to cook an account. [Colloq.] They all of them receive the same advices from abroad, and very often in the same words; but their way of cooking it is so different. Addison.  To prepare food for the table.
seed: 1. (Bot.) (a) A ripened ovule, consisting of an embryo with one or more integuments, or coverings; as, an apple seed; a currant seed. By germination it produces a new plant. (b) Any small seedlike fruit, though it may consist of a pericarp, or even a calyx, as well as the seed proper; as, parsnip seed; thistle seed. And God said, Let the earth bring forth grass, the herb yielding seed, and the fruit tree yielding fruit after his kind, whose seed is in itself. Gen. i. 11. Note: The seed proper has an outer and an inner coat, and within these the kernel or nucleus. The kernel is either the embryo alone, or the embryo inclosed in the albumen, which is the material for the nourishment of the developing embryo. The scar on a seed, left where the stem parted from it, is called the hilum, and the closed orifice of the ovule, the micropyle. 2. (Physiol.)  The generative fluid of the male; semen; sperm; -- not used in the plural. 3. That from which anything springs; first principle; original; source; as, the seeds of virtue or vice. 4. The principle of production. Praise of great acts he scatters as a seed, Which may the like in coming ages breed. Waller. 5. Progeny; offspring; children; descendants; as, the seed of Abraham; the seed of David. Note: In this sense the word is applied to one person, or to any number collectively, and admits of the plural form, though rarely used in the plural. 6. Race; generation; birth. Of mortal seed they were not held. Waller. Seed bag (Artesian well), a packing to prevent percolation of water down the bore hole. It consists of a bag encircling the tubing and filled with flax seed, which swells when wet and fills the space between the tubing and the sides of the hole. -- Seed bud (Bot.), the germ or rudiment of the plant in the embryo state; the ovule. -- Seed coat (Bot.), the covering of a seed. -- Seed corn, or Seed grain (Bot.), corn or grain for seed. -- Seed down (Bot.), the soft hairs on certain seeds, as cotton seed. -- Seed drill. See 6th Drill, 2 (a). -- Seed eater (Zoöl.), any finch of the genera Sporophila, and Crithagra. They feed mainly on seeds. -- Seed gall (Zoöl.), any gall which resembles a seed, formed, on the leaves of various plants, usually by some species of Phylloxera. -- Seed leaf (Bot.), a cotyledon. -- Seed lobe (Bot.), a cotyledon; a seed leaf. -- Seed oil, oil expressed from the seeds of plants. -- Seed oyster, a young oyster, especially when of a size suitable for transplantation to a new locality. -- Seed pearl, a small pearl of little value. -- Seed plat, or Seed plot, the ground on which seeds are sown, to produce plants for transplanting; a nursery. -- Seed stalk (Bot.), the stalk of an ovule or seed; a funicle. -- Seed tick (Zoöl.), one of several species of ticks resembling seeds in form and color. -- Seed vessel (Bot.), that part of a plant which contains the seeds; a pericarp. -- Seed weevil (Zoöl.), any one of numerous small weevels, especially those of the genus Apion, which live in the seeds of various plants. -- Seed wool, cotton wool not yet cleansed of its seeds. [Southern U.S.]  1. To sprinkle with seed; to plant seeds in; to sow; as, to seed a field. 2. To cover thinly with something scattered; to ornament with seedlike decorations. A sable mantle seeded with waking eyes. B. Jonson. To seed down, to sow with grass seed.
child: 1. A son or a daughter; a male or female descendant, in the first degree; the immediate progeny of human parents; -- in law, legitimate offspring. Used also of animals and plants. 2. A descendant, however remote; -- used esp. in the plural; as, the children of Israel; the children of Edom. 3. One who, by character of practice, shows signs of relationship to, or of the influence of, another; one closely connected with a place, occupation, character, etc.; as, a child of God; a child of the devil; a child of disobedience; a child of toil; a child of the people. 4. A noble youth. See Childe. [Obs.] Chaucer. 5. A young person of either sex. esp. one between infancy and youth; hence, one who exhibits the characteristics of a very young person, as innocence, obedience, trustfulness, limited understanding, etc. When I was child. I spake as a child, I understood as a child, I thought as a child; but when I became a man, I put away childish things. 1. Cor. xii. 11. 6. A female infant. [Obs.] A boy or a child, I wonder Shak. To be with child, to be pregnant. -- Child's play, light work; a trifling contest.  To give birth; to produce young. This queen Genissa childing died. Warner. It chanced within two days they childed both. Latimer.
part: 1. One of the portions, equal or unequal, into which anything is divided, or regarded as divided; something less than a whole; a number, quantity, mass, or the like, regarded as going to make up, with others, a larger number, quantity, mass, etc., whether actually separate or not; a piece; a fragment; a fraction; a division; a member; a constituent. And kept back part of the price, . . . and brought a certain part and laid it at the apostles'feet. Acts v. 2. Our ideas of extension and number -- do they not contain a secret relation of the parts Locke. I am a part of all that I have met. Tennyson. 2. Hence, specifically: (a) An equal constituent portion; one of several or many like quantities, numbers, etc., into which anything is divided, or of which it is composed; proportional division or ingredient. An homer is the tenth part of an ephah. Ex. xvi. 36. A thought which, quartered, hath but one part wisdom, And ever three parts coward. Shak. (b) A constituent portion of a living or spiritual whole; a member; an organ; an essential element. All the parts were formed . . . into one harmonious body. Locke. The pulse, the glow of every part. Keble. (c) A constituent of character or capacity; quality; faculty; talent; -- usually in the plural with a collective sense. "Men of considerable parts." Burke. "Great quickness of parts." Macaulay. Which maintained so politic a state of evil, that they will not admit any good part to intermingle with them. Shak. (d) Quarter; region; district; -- usually in the plural. "The uttermost part of the heaven." Neh. i. 9. All parts resound with tumults, plaints, and fears. Dryden. (e) (Math.)  Such portion of any quantity, as when taken a certain number of times, will exactly make that quantity; as, 3 is a part of 12; -- the opposite of multiple. Also, a line or other element of a geometrical figure. 3. That which belongs to one, or which is assumed by one, or which falls to one, in a division or apportionment; share; portion; lot; interest; concern; duty; office. We have no part in David. 2 Sam. xx. 1. Accuse not Nature! she hath done her part; Do thou but thine. Milton. Let me bear My part of danger with an equal share. Dryden. 4. Hence, specifically: (a) One of the opposing parties or sides in a conflict or a controversy; a faction. For he that is not against us is on our part. Mark ix. 40. Make whole kingdoms take her brother's part. Waller. (b) A particular character in a drama or a play; an assumed personification; also, the language, actions, and influence of a character or an actor in a play; or, figuratively, in real life. See To act a part, under Act. That part Was aptly fitted and naturally performed. Shak. It was a brute part of him to kill so capital a calf. Shak. Honor and shame from no condition rise; Act well your part, there all the honor lies. Pope. (c) (Mus.)  One of the different melodies of a concerted composition, which heard in union compose its harmony; also, the music for each voice or instrument; as, the treble, tenor, or bass part; the violin part, etc. For my part, so far as concerns me; for my share. -- For the most part. See under Most, a. -- In good part, as well done; favorably; acceptably; in a friendly manner. Hooker. In ill part, unfavorably; with displeasure. -- In part, in some degree; partly. -- Part and parcel, an essential or constituent portion; -- a reduplicative phrase. Cf. might and main, kith and kin, etc. "She was . . . part and parcel of the race and place." Howitt. -- Part of speech (Gram.), a sort or class of words of a particular character; thus, the noun is a part of speech denoting the name of a thing; the verb is a part of speech which asserts something of the subject of a sentence. -- Part owner (Law), one of several owners or tenants in common. See Joint tenant, under Joint. -- Part singing, singing in which two or more of the harmonic parts are taken. -- Part song, a song in two or more (commonly four) distinct vocal parts. "A part song differs from a madrigal in its exclusion of contrapuntual devices; from a glee, in its being sung by many voices, instead of by one only, to each part." Stainer & Barrett. Syn. -- Portion; section; division; fraction; fragment; piece; share; constituent. See Portion, and Section.  1. To divide; to separate into distinct parts; to break into two or more parts or pieces; to sever. "Thou shalt part it in pieces." Lev. ii. 6. There, [celestial love] parted into rainbow hues. Keble. 2. To divide into shares; to divide and distribute; to allot; to apportion; to share. To part his throne, and share his heaven with thee. Pope. They parted my raiment among them. John xix. 24. 3. To separate or disunite; to cause to go apart; to remove from contact or contiguity; to sunder. The Lord do so to me, and more also, if aught but death part thee and me. Ruth i. 17. While he blessed them, he was parted from them, and carried up into heaven. Luke xxiv. 51. The narrow seas that part The French and English. Shak. 4. Hence: To hold apart; to stand between; to intervene betwixt, as combatants. The stumbling night did part our weary powers. Shak. 5. To separate by a process of extraction, elimination, or secretion; as, to part gold from silver. The liver minds his own affair, . . . And parts and strains the vital juices. Prior. 6. To leave; to quit. [Obs.] Since presently your souls must part your bodies. Shak. To part a cable (Naut.), to break it. -- To part company, to separate, as travelers or companions.  1. To be broken or divided into parts or pieces; to break; to become separated; to go asunder; as, rope parts; his hair parts in the middle. 2. To go away; to depart; to take leave; to quit each other; hence, to die; -- often with from. He wrung Bassanio's hand, and so they parted. Shak. He owned that he had parted from the duke only a few hours before. Macaulay. His precious bag, which he would by no means part from. G. Eliot. 3. To perform an act of parting; to relinquish a connection of any kind; -- followed by with or from. Celia, for thy sake, I part With all that grew so near my heart. Waller. Powerful hands . . . will not part Easily from possession won with arms. Milton. It was strange to him that a father should feel no tenderness at parting with an only son. A. Trollope. 4. To have a part or share; to partake. [Obs.] "They shall part alike." 1 Sam. xxx. 24.  Partly; in a measure. [R.] Shak.
iron: 1. (Chem.)  The most common and most useful metallic element, being of almost universal occurrence, usually in the form of an oxide (as hematite, magnetite, etc.), or a hydrous oxide (as limonite, turgite, etc.). It is reduced on an enormous scale in three principal forms; viz., cast iron, steel, and wrought iron. Iron usually appears dark brown, from oxidation or impurity, but when pure, or an fresh surface, is a gray or white metal. It is easily oxidized (rusted) by moisture, and is attacked by many corrosive agents. Symbol Fe (Latin Ferrum). Atomic weight 55.9. Specific gravity, pure iron, 7.86; cast iron, 7.1. In magnetic properties, it is superior to all other substances. Note: The value of iron is largely due to the facility with which it can be worked. Thus, when heated it is malleable and ductile, and can be easily welded and forged at a high temperature. As cast iron, it is easily fusible; as steel, is very tough, and (when tempered) very hard and elastic. Chemically, iron is grouped with cobalt and nickel. Steel is a variety of iron containing more carbon than wrought iron, but less that cast iron. It is made either from wrought iron, by roasting in a packing of carbon (cementation) or from cast iron, by burning off the impurities in a Bessemer converter (then called Bessemer steel), or directly from the iron ore (as in the Siemens rotatory and generating furnace). 2. An instrument or utensil made of iron; -- chiefly in composition; as, a flatiron, a smoothing iron, etc. My young soldier, put up your iron. Shak. 3. pl.  Fetters; chains; handcuffs; manacles. Four of the sufferers were left to rot in irons. Macaulay. 4. Strength; power; firmness; inflexibility; as, to rule with a rod of iron. Bar iron. See Wrought iron (below). -- Bog iron, bog ore; limonite. See Bog ore, under Bog. -- Cast iron (Metal.), an impure variety of iron, containing from three to six percent of carbon, part of which is united with a part of the iron, as a carbide, and the rest is uncombined, as graphite. It there is little free carbon, the product is white iron; if much of the carbon has separated as graphite, it is called gray iron. See also Cast iron, in the Vocabulary. -- Fire irons. See under Fire, n. -- Gray irons. See under Fire, n. -- Gray iron. See Cast iron (above). -- It irons (Naut.), said of a sailing vessel, when, in tacking, she comes up head to the wind and will not fill away on either tack. -- Magnetic iron. See Magnetite. -- Malleable iron (Metal.), iron sufficiently pure or soft to be capable of extension under the hammer; also, specif., a kind of iron produced by removing a portion of the carbon or other impurities from cast iron, rendering it less brittle, and to some extent malleable. -- Meteoric iron (Chem.), iron forming a large, and often the chief, ingredient of meteorites. It invariably contains a small amount of nickel and cobalt. Cf. Meteorite. -- Pig iron, the form in which cast iron is made at the blast furnace, being run into molds, called pigs. -- Reduced iron. See under Reduced. -- Specular iron. See Hematite. -- Too many irons in the fire, too many objects requiring the attention at once. -- White iron. See Cast iron (above). -- Wrought iron (Metal.), the purest form of iron commonly known in the arts, containing only about half of one per cent of carbon. It is made either directly from the ore, as in the Catalan forge or bloomery, or by purifying (puddling) cast iron in a reverberatory furnace or refinery. It is tough, malleable, and ductile. When formed into bars, it is called bar iron.  1. Of, or made of iron; consisting of iron; as, an iron bar, dust. 2. Resembling iron in color; as, iron blackness. 3. Like iron in hardness, strength, impenetrability, power of endurance, insensibility, etc.; as: (a) Rude; hard; harsh; severe. Iron years of wars and dangers. Rowe. Jove crushed the nations with an iron rod. Pope. (b) Firm; robust; enduring; as, an iron constitution. (c) Inflexible; unrelenting; as, an iron will. (d) Not to be broken; holding or binding fast; tenacious. "Him death's iron sleep oppressed." Philips. Note: Iron is often used in composition, denoting made of iron, relating to iron, of or with iron; producing iron, etc.; resembling iron, literally or figuratively, in some of its properties or characteristics; as, iron-shod, iron-sheathed, iron-fisted, iron- framed, iron-handed, iron-hearted, iron foundry or iron-foundry. Iron age. (a) (Myth.) The age following the golden, silver, and bronze ages, and characterized by a general degeneration of talent and virtue, and of literary excellence. In Roman literature the Iron Age is commonly regarded as beginning after the taking of Rome by the Goths, A. D. 410. (b) (Archæol.) That stage in the development of any people characterized by the use of iron implements in the place of the more cumbrous stone and bronze. -- Iron cement, a cement for joints, composed of cast-iron borings or filings, sal ammoniac, etc. -- Iron clay (Min.), a yellowish clay containing a large proportion of an ore of iron. -- Iron cross, a Prussian order of military merit; also, the decoration of the order. -- Iron crown, a golden crown set with jewels, belonging originally to the Lombard kings, and indicating the dominion of Italy. It was so called from containing a circle said to have been forged from one of the nails in the cross of Christ. -- Iron flint (Min.), an opaque, flintlike, ferruginous variety of quartz. -- Iron founder, a maker of iron castings. -- Iron foundry, the place where iron castings are made. -- Iron furnace, a furnace for reducing iron from the ore, or for melting iron for castings, etc.; a forge; a reverberatory; a bloomery. -- Iron glance (Min.), hematite. -- Iron hat, a headpiece of iron or steel, shaped like a hat with a broad brim, and used as armor during the Middle Ages. -- Iron horse, a locomotive engine. [Colloq.] -- Iron liquor, a solution of an iron salt, used as a mordant by dyers. -- Iron man (Cotton Manuf.), a name for the self-acting spinning mule. -- Iron mold or mould, a yellow spot on cloth stained by rusty iron. -- Iron ore (Min.), any native compound of iron from which the metal may be profitably extracted. The principal ores are magnetite, hematite, siderite, limonite, Göthite, turgite, and the bog and clay iron ores. -- Iron pyrites (Min.), common pyrites, or pyrite. See Pyrites. -- Iron sand, an iron ore in grains, usually the magnetic iron ore, formerly used to sand paper after writing. -- Iron scale, the thin film which on the surface of wrought iron in the process of forging. It consists essentially of the magnetic oxide of iron, Fe3O4. -- Iron works, a furnace where iron is smelted, or a forge, rolling mill, or foundry, where it is made into heavy work, such as shafting, rails, cannon, merchant bar, etc.  1. To smooth with an instrument of iron; especially, to smooth, as cloth, with a heated flatiron; -- sometimes used with out. 2. To shackle with irons; to fetter or handcuff. "Ironed like a malefactor." Sir W. Scott. 3. To furnish or arm with iron; as, to iron a wagon.
wonder: 1. That emotion which is excited by novelty, or the presentation to the sight or mind of something new, unusual, strange, great, extraordinary, or not well understood; surprise; astonishment; admiration; amazement. They were filled with wonder and amazement at that which had happened unto him. Acts iii. 10. Wonder is the effect of novelty upon ignorance. Johnson. Note: Wonder expresses less than astonishment, and much less than amazement. It differs from admiration, as now used, in not being necessarily accompanied with love, esteem, or approbation. 2. A cause of wonder; that which excites surprise; a strange thing; a prodigy; a miracle. " Babylon, the wonder of all tongues." Milton. To try things oft, and never to give over, doth wonders. Bacon. I am as a wonder unto many. Ps. lxxi. 7. Seven wonders of the world. See in the Dictionary of Noted Names in Fiction.  1. To be affected with surprise or admiration; to be struck with astonishment; to be amazed; to marvel. I could not sufficiently wonder at the intrepidity of these diminutive mortals. Swift. We cease to wonder at what we understand. Johnson. 2. To feel doubt and curiosity; to wait with uncertain expectation; to query in the mind; as, he wondered why they came. I wonder, in my soul, What you would ask me, that I should deny. Shak.  Wonderful. [Obs.] Gower. After that he said a wonder thing. Chaucer.  Wonderfully. [Obs.] Chaucer.
divide: 1. To part asunder (a whole); to sever into two or more parts or pieces; to sunder; to separate into parts. Divide the living child in two. 1 Kings iii. 25. 2. To cause to be separate; to keep apart by a partition, or by an imaginary line or limit; as, a wall divides two houses; a stream divides the towns. Let it divide the waters from the waters. Gen. i. 6. 3. To make partition of among a number; to apportion, as profits of stock among proprietors; to give in shares; to distribute; to mete out; to share. True justice unto people to divide. Spenser. Ye shall divide the land by lot. Num. xxxiii. 54. 4. To disunite in opinion or interest; to make discordant or hostile; to set at variance. If a kingdom be divided against itself, that kingdom can not stand. Mark iii. 24. Every family became now divided within itself. Prescott. 5. To separate into two parts, in order to ascertain the votes for and against a measure; as, to divide a legislative house upon a question. 6. (Math.)  To subject to arithmetical division. 7. (Logic)  To separate into species; -- said of a genus or generic term. 8. (Mech.)  To mark divisions on; to graduate; as, to divide a sextant. 9. (Music)  To play or sing in a florid style, or with variations. [Obs.] Spenser. Syn. -- To sever; dissever; sunder; cleave; disjoin; disunite; detach; disconnect; part; distribute; share.  1. To be separated; to part; to open; to go asunder. Milton. The Indo-Germanic family divides into three groups. J. Peile. 2. To cause separation; to disunite. A gulf, a strait, the sea intervening between islands, divide less than the matted forest. Bancroft. 3. To break friendship; to fall out. Shak. 4. To have a share; to partake. Shak. 5. To vote, as in the British Parliament, by the members separating themselves into two parties (as on opposite sides of the hall or in opposite lobbies), that is, the ayes dividing from the noes. The emperors sat, voted, and divided with their equals. Gibbon.  A dividing ridge of land between the tributaries of two streams; a watershed.
original: 1. Pertaining to the origin or beginning; preceding all others; first in order; primitive; primary; pristine; as, the original state of man; the original laws of a country; the original inventor of a process. His form had yet not lost All her original brightness. Milton. 2. Not copied, imitated, or translated; new; fresh; genuine; as, an original thought; an original process; the original text of Scripture. 3. Having the power to suggest new thoughts or combinations of thought; inventive; as, an original genius. 4. Before unused or unknown; new; as, a book full of original matter. Original sin (Theol.), the first sin of Adam, as related to its consequences to his descendants of the human race; -- called also total depravity. See Calvinism.  1. Origin; commencement; source. It hath it original from much grief. Shak. And spangled heavens, a shining frame, Their great Original proclaim. Addison. 2. That which precedes all others of its class; archetype; first copy; hence, an original work of art, manuscript, text, and the like, as distinguished from a copy, translation, etc. The Scriptures may be now read in their own original. Milton. 3. An original thinker or writer; an originator. [R.] Men who are bad at copying, yet are good originals. C. G. Leland. 4. A person of marked eccentricity. [Colloq.] 5. (Zoöl. & Bot.)  The natural or wild species from which a domesticated or cultivated variety has been derived; as, the wolf is thought by some to be the original of the dog, the blackthorn the original of the plum.
gas: 1. An aëriform fluid; -- a term used at first by chemists as synonymous with air, but since restricted to fluids supposed to be permanently elastic, as oxygen, hydrogen, etc., in distinction from vapors, as steam, which become liquid on a reduction of temperature. In present usage, since all of the supposed permanent gases have been liquified by cold and pressure, the term has resumed nearly its original signification, and is applied to any substance in the elastic or aëriform state. 2. (Popular Usage) (a) A complex mixture of gases, of which the most important constituents are marsh gas, olefiant gas, and hydrogen, artificially produced by the destructive distillation of gas coal, or sometimes of peat, wood, oil, resin, etc. It gives a brilliant light when burned, and is the common gas used for illuminating purposes. (b) Laughing gas. (c) Any irrespirable aëriform fluid. Note: Gas is often used adjectively or in combination; as, gas fitter or gasfitter; gas meter or gas-meter, etc. Air gas (Chem.), a kind of gas made by forcing air through some volatile hydrocarbon, as the lighter petroleums. The air is so saturated with combustible vapor as to be a convenient illuminating and heating agent. -- Gas battery (Elec.), a form of voltaic battery, in which gases, especially hydrogen and oxygen, are the active agents. -- Gas carbon, Gas coke, etc. See under Carbon, Coke, etc. -- Gas coal, a bituminous or hydrogenous coal yielding a high percentage of volatile matters, and therefore available for the manufacture of illuminating gas. R. W. Raymond. -- Gas engine, an engine in which the motion of the piston is produced by the combustion or sudden production or expansion of gas; -- especially, an engine in which an explosive mixture of gas and air is forced into the working cylinder and ignited there by a gas flame or an electric spark. -- Gas fitter, one who lays pipes and puts up fixtures for gas. -- Gas fitting. (a) The occupation of a gas fitter. (b) pl. The appliances needed for the introduction of gas into a building, as meters, pipes, burners, etc. -- Gas fixture, a device for conveying illuminating or combustible gas from the pipe to the gas-burner, consisting of an appendage of cast, wrought, or drawn metal, with tubes upon which the burners, keys, etc., are adjusted. -- Gas generator, an apparatus in which gas is evolved; as: (a) a retort in which volatile hydrocarbons are evolved by heat; (b) a machine in which air is saturated with the vapor of liquid hydrocarbon; a carburetor; (c) a machine for the production of carbonic acid gas, for aërating water, bread, etc. Knight. -- Gas jet, a flame of illuminating gas. -- Gas machine, an apparatus for carbureting air for use as illuminating gas. -- Gas meter, an instrument for recording the quantity of gas consumed in a given time, at a particular place. -- Gas retort, a retort which contains the coal and other materials, and in which the gas is generated, in the manufacture of gas. -- Gas stove, a stove for cooking or other purposes, heated by gas. -- Gas tar, coal tar. -- Gas trap, a drain trap; a sewer trap. See 4th Trap, 5. -- Gas washer (Gas Works), an apparatus within which gas from the condenser is brought in contact with a falling stream of water, to precipitate the tar remaining in it. Knight. -- Gas water, water through which gas has been passed for purification; -- called also gas liquor and ammoniacal water, and used for the manufacture of sal ammoniac, carbonate of ammonia, and Prussian blue. Tomlinson. -- Gas well, a deep boring, from which natural gas is discharged. Raymond. -- Gas works, a manufactory of gas, with all the machinery and appurtenances; a place where gas is generated for lighting cities. -- Laughing gas. See under Laughing. -- Marsh gas (Chem.), a light, combustible, gaseous hydrocarbon, CH4, produced artificially by the dry distillation of many organic substances, and occurring as a natural product of decomposition in stagnant pools, whence its name. It is an abundant ingredient of ordinary illuminating gas, and is the first member of the paraffin series. Called also methane, and in coal mines, fire damp. -- Natural gas, gas obtained from wells, etc., in Pennsylvania, Ohio, and elsewhere, and largely used for fuel and illuminating purposes. It is chiefly derived from the Coal Measures. -- Olefiant gas (Chem.). See Ethylene. -- Water gas (Chem.), a kind of gas made by forcing steam over glowing coals, whereby there results a mixture of hydrogen and carbon monoxide. This gives a gas of intense heating power, but destitute of light-giving properties, and which is charged by passing through some volatile hydrocarbon, as gasoline.synthesis gas
season: 1. One of the divisions of the year, marked by alternations in the length of day and night, or by distinct conditions of temperature, moisture, etc., caused mainly by the relative position of the earth with respect to the sun. In the north temperate zone, four seasons, namely, spring, summer, autumn, and winter, are generally recognized. Some parts of the world have three seasons, -- the dry, the rainy, and the cold; other parts have but two, -- the dry and the rainy. The several seasons of the year in their beauty. Addison. 2. Hence, a period of time, especially as regards its fitness for anything contemplated or done; a suitable or convenient time; proper conjuncture; as, the season for planting; the season for rest. The season, prime for sweetest scents and airs. Milton. 3. A period of time not very long; a while; a time. Thou shalt be blind, not seeing the sun for a season. Acts xiii. 11. 4. That which gives relish; seasoning. [Obs.] You lack the season of all natures, sleep. Shak. In season, in good time, or sufficiently early for the purpose. -- Out of season, beyond or out of the proper time of the usual or appointed time.  1. To render suitable or appropriate; to prepare; to fit. He is fit and seasoned for his passage. Shak. 2. To fit for any use by time or habit; to habituate; to accustom; to inure; to ripen; to mature; as, to season one to a climate. 3. Hence, to prepare by drying or hardening, or removal of natural juices; as, to season timber. 4. To fit for taste; to render palatable; to give zest or relish to; to spice; as, to season food. 5. Hence, to fit for enjoyment; to render agrecable. You season still with sports your serious hours. Dryden. The proper use of wit is to season conversation. Tillotson. 6. To qualify by admixture; to moderate; to temper. "When mercy seasons justice." Shak. 7. To imbue; to tinge or taint. "Who by his tutor being seasoned with the love of the truth." Fuller. Season their younger years with prudent and pious principles. Jer. Taylor. 8. To copulate with; to impregnate. [R.] Holland.  1. To become mature; to grow fit for use; to become adapted to a climate. 2. To become dry and hard, by the escape of the natural juices, or by being penetrated with other substance; as, timber seasons in the sun. 3. To give token; to savor. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl.
edge: 1. The thin cutting side of the blade of an instrument; as, the edge of an ax, knife, sword, or scythe. Hence, figuratively, that which cuts as an edge does, or wounds deeply, etc. He which hath the sharp sword with two edges. Rev. ii. 12. Slander, Whose edge is sharper than the sword. Shak. 2. Any sharp terminating border; a margin; a brink; extreme verge; as, the edge of a table, a precipice. Upon the edge of yonder coppice. Shak. In worst extremes, and on the perilous edge Of battle. Milton. Pursue even to the very edge of destruction. Sir W. Scott. 3. Sharpness; readiness of fitness to cut; keenness; intenseness of desire. The full edge of our indignation. Sir W. Scott. Death and persecution lose all the ill that they can have, if we do not set an edge upon them by our fears and by our vices. Jer. Taylor. 4. The border or part adjacent to the line of division; the beginning or early part; as, in the edge of evening. "On the edge of winter." Milton. Edge joint (Carp.), a joint formed by two edges making a corner. -- Edge mill, a crushing or grinding mill in which stones roll around on their edges, on a level circular bed; -- used for ore, and as an oil mill. Called also Chilian mill. -- Edge molding (Arch.), a molding whose section is made up of two curves meeting in an angle. -- Edge plane. (a) (Carp.) A plane for edging boards. (b) (Shoemaking) A plane for edging soles. -- Edge play, a kind of swordplay in which backswords or cutlasses are used, and the edge, rather than the point, is employed. -- Edge rail. (Railroad) (a) A rail set on edge; -- applied to a rail of more depth than width. (b) A guard rail by the side of the main rail at a switch. Knight. -- Edge railway, a railway having the rails set on edge. -- Edge stone, a curbstone. -- Edge tool. (a) Any tool instrument having a sharp edge intended for cutting. (b) A tool for forming or dressing an edge; an edging tool. -- To be on edge, to be eager, impatient, or anxious. -- To set the teeth on edge, to cause a disagreeable tingling sensation in the teeth, as by bringing acids into contact with them. Bacon.  1. To furnish with an edge as a tool or weapon; to sharpen. To edge her champion's sword. Dryden. 2. To shape or dress the edge of, as with a tool. 3. To furnish with a fringe or border; as, to edge a dress; to edge a garden with box. Hills whose tops were edged with groves. Pope. 4. To make sharp or keen, figuratively; to incite; to exasperate; to goad; to urge or egg on. [Obs.] By such reasonings, the simple were blinded, and the malicious edged. Hayward. 5. To move by little and little or cautiously, as by pressing forward edgewise; as, edging their chairs forwards. Locke.  1. To move sideways; to move gradually; as, edge along this way. 2. To sail close to the wind. I must edge up on a point of wind. Dryden. To edge away or off (Naut.), to increase the distance gradually from the shore, vessel, or other object. -- To edge down (Naut.), to approach by slow degrees, as when a sailing vessel approaches an object in an oblique direction from the windward. -- To edge in, to get in edgewise; to get in by degrees. -- To edge in with, as with a coast or vessel (Naut.), to advance gradually, but not directly, toward it.
then: 1. At that time (referring to a time specified, either past or future). And the Canaanite was then in the land. Gen. xii. 6. Now I know in part; but then shall I know even as also I am known. 1 Cor. xiii. 12. 2. Soon afterward, or immediately; next; afterward. First be reconciled to thy brother, and then come and offer thy gift. Matt. v. 24. 3. At another time; later; again. One while the master is not aware of what is done, and then in other cases it may fall out to be own act. L'Estrange. By then. (a) By that time. (b) By the time that. [Obs.] But that opinion, I trust, by then this following argument hath been well read, will be left for one of the mysteries of an indulgent Antichrist. Milton. Now and then. See under Now, adv. -- Till then, until that time; until the time mentioned. Milton. Note: Then is often used elliptically, like an adjective, for then existing; as, the then administration.  1. Than. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. In that case; in consequence; as a consequence; therefore; for this reason. If all this be so, then man has a natural freedom. Locke. Now, then, be all thy weighty cares away. Dryden. Syn. -- Therefore. Then, Therefore. Both these words are used in reasoning; but therefore takes the lead, while then is rather subordinate or incidental. Therefore states reasons and draws inferences in form; then, to a great extent, takes the point as proved, and passes on to the general conclusion. "Therefore being justified by faith, we have peace with God." Rom. v. 1. "So then faith cometh by hearing, and hearing by the word of God." Rom. x. 17.
hole: Whole. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. A hollow place or cavity; an excavation; a pit; an opening in or through a solid body, a fabric, etc.; a perforation; a rent; a fissure. The holes where eyes should be. Shak. The blind walls Were full of chinks and holes. Tennyson. The priest took a chest, and bored a hole in the lid. 2 Kings xii. 9. 2. An excavation in the ground, made by an animal to live in, or a natural cavity inhabited by an animal; hence, a low, narrow, or dark lodging or place; a mean habitation. Dryden. The foxes have holes, . . . but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. Luke ix. 58. Syn. -- Hollow; concavity; aperture; rent; fissure; crevice; orifice; interstice; perforation; excavation; pit; cave; den; cell. Hole and corner, clandestine, underhand. [Colloq.] "The wretched trickery of hole and corner buffery. " Dickens. -- Hole board (Fancy Weaving), a board having holes through which cords pass which lift certain warp threads; -- called also compass board.  1. To cut, dig, or bore a hole or holes in; as, to hole a post for the insertion of rails or bars. Chapman. 2. To drive into a hole, as an animal, or a billiard ball.  To go or get into a hole. B. Jonson.
joy: 1. The passion or emotion excited by the acquisition or expectation of good; pleasurable feelings or emotions caused by success, good fortune, and the like, or by a rational prospect of possessing what we love or desire; gladness; exhilaration of spirits; delight. Her heavenly form beheld, all wished her joy. Dryden. Glides the smooth current of domestic joy. Johnson. Who, for the joy that was set before him, endured the cross, despising the shame. Heb. xii. 2. Tears of true joy for his return. Shak. Joy is a delight of the mind, from the consideration of the present or assured approaching possession of a good. Locke. 2. That which causes joy or happiness. For ye are our glory and joy. 1 Thess. ii. 20. A thing of beauty is a joy forever. Keats. 3. The sign or exhibition of joy; gayety; mirth; merriment; festivity. Such joy made Una, when her knight she found. Spenser. The roofs with joy resound. Dryden. Note: Joy is used in composition, esp. with participles, to from many self-explaining compounds; as, joy-hells, joy-ringing, joy-inspiring, joy-resounding, etc. Syn. -- Gladness; pleasure; delight; happiness; exultation; transport; felicity; ecstasy; rapture; bliss; gayety; mirth; merriment; festivity; hilarity.  To rejoice; to be glad; to delight; to exult. I will joy in the God of my salvation. Hab. iii. 18. In whose sight all things joy. Milton.  1. To give joy to; to congratulate. [Obs.] "Joy us of our conquest." Dryden. To joy the friend, or grapple with the foe. Prior. 2. To gladden; to make joyful; to exhilarate. [Obs.] Neither pleasure's art can joy my spirits. Shak. 3. To enjoy. [Obs.] See Enjoy. Who might have lived and joyed immortal bliss. Milton.
burn: 1. To consume with fire; to reduce to ashes by the action of heat or fire; -- frequently intensified by up: as, to burn up wood. "We'll burn his body in the holy place." Shak. 2. To injure by fire or heat; to change destructively some property or properties of, by undue exposure to fire or heat; to scorch; to scald; to blister; to singe; to char; to sear; as, to burn steel in forging; to burn one's face in the sun; the sun burns the grass. 3. To perfect or improve by fire or heat; to submit to the action of fire or heat for some economic purpose; to destroy or change some property or properties of, by exposure to fire or heat in due degree for obtaining a desired residuum, product, or effect; to bake; as, to burn clay in making bricks or pottery; to burn wood so as to produce charcoal; to burn limestone for the lime. 4. To make or produce, as an effect or result, by the application of fire or heat; as, to burn a hole; to burn charcoal; to burn letters into a block. 5. To consume, injure, or change the condition of, as if by action of fire or heat; to affect as fire or heat does; as, to burn the mouth with pepper. This tyrant fever burns me up. Shak. This dry sorrow burns up all my tears. Dryden. When the cold north wind bloweth, . . . it devoureth the mountains, and burneth the wilderness, and consumeth the Ecclus. xliii. 20, 21. 6. (Surg.)  To apply a cautery to; to cauterize. 7. (Chem.)  To cause to combine with oxygen or other active agent, with evolution of heat; to consume; to oxidize; as, a man burns a certain amount of carbon at each respiration; to burn iron in oxygen. To burn, To burn together, as two surfaces of metal (Engin.), to fuse and unite them by pouring over them a quantity of the same metal in a liquid state. -- To burn a bowl (Game of Bowls), to displace it accidentally, the bowl so displaced being said to be burned. -- To burn daylight, to light candles before it is dark; to waste time; to perform superfluous actions. Shak. -- To burn one's fingers, to get one's self into unexpected trouble, as by interfering the concerns of others, speculation, etc. -- To burn out, to destroy or obliterate by burning. "Must you with hot irons burn out mine eyes" Shak. -- To be burned out, to suffer loss by fire, as the burning of one's house, store, or shop, with the contents. -- To burn up, To burn down, to burn entirely.  1. To be of fire; to flame. "The mount burned with fire." Deut. ix. 15. 2. To suffer from, or be scorched by, an excess of heat. Your meat doth burn, quoth I. Shak. 3. To have a condition, quality, appearance, sensation, or emotion, as if on fire or excessively heated; to act or rage with destructive violence; to be in a state of lively emotion or strong desire; as, the face burns; to burn with fever. Did not our heart burn within us, while he talked with us by the way Luke xxiv. 32. The barge she sat in, like a burnished throne, Burned on the water. Shak. Burning with high hope. Byron. The groan still deepens, and the combat burns. Pope. The parching air Burns frore, and cold performs the effect of fire. Milton. 4. (Chem.)  To combine energetically, with evolution of heat; as, copper burns in chlorine. 5. In certain games, to approach near to a concealed object which is sought. [Colloq.] To burn out, to burn till the fuel is exhausted. -- To burn up, To burn down, to be entirely consumed.  1. A hurt, injury, or effect caused by fire or excessive or intense heat. 2. The operation or result of burning or baking, as in brickmaking; as, they have a good burn. 3. A disease in vegetables. See Brand, n., 6.  A small stream. [Scot.]
women: pl. of Woman.
especially: In an especial manner; chiefly; particularly; peculiarly; in an uncommon degree.
large: 1. Exceeding most other things of like in bulk, capacity, quantity, superficial dimensions, or number of constituent units; big; great; capacious; extensive; -- opposed to small; as, a nlarge horse; a large house or room; a large lake or pool; a large jug or spoon; a large vineyard; a large army; a large city. Note: For linear dimensions, and mere extent, great, and not large, is used as a qualifying word; as, great length, breadth, depth; a great distance; a great height. 2. Abundant; ample; as, a large supply of provisions. We hare yet large day. Milton. 3. Full in statement; diffuse; full; profuse. I might be very large upon the importance and advantages of education. Felton. 4. Having more than usual power or capacity; having broad sympathies and generous impulses; comprehensive; -- said of the mind and heart. 5. Free; unembarrassed. [Obs.] Of burdens all he set the Paynims large. Fairfax. 6. Unrestrained by decorum; -- said of language. [Obs.] "Some large jests he will make." Shak. 7. Prodigal in expending; lavish. [Obs.] Chaucer. 8. (Naut.)  Crossing the line of a ship's course in a favorable direction; -- said of the wind when it is abeam, or between the beam and the quarter. At large. (a) Without restraint or confinement; as, to go at large; to be left at large. (b) Diffusely; fully; in the full extent; as, to discourse on a subject at large. -- Common at large. See under Common, n. -- Electors at large, Representative at large, electors, or a representative, as in Congress, chosen to represent the whole of a State, in distinction from those chosen to represent particular districts in a State. [U. S.] -- To give, go, run, or sail large (Naut.), to have the wind crossing the direction of a vessel's course in such a way that the sails feel its full force, and the vessel gains its highest speed. See Large, a., 8. Syn. -- Big; bulky; huge; capacious; comprehensive; ample; abundant; plentiful; populous; copious; diffusive; liberal.  Freely; licentiously. [Obs.] Chaucer.  A musical note, formerly in use, equal to two longs, four breves, or eight semibreves.
does: The 3d pers. sing. pres. of Do.
between: 1. In the space which separates; betwixt; as, New York is between Boston and Philadelphia. 2. Used in expressing motion from one body or place to another; from one to another of two. If things should go so between them. Bacon. 3. Belonging in common to two; shared by both. Castor and Pollux with only one soul between them. Locke. 4. Belonging to, or participated in by, two, and involving reciprocal action or affecting their mutual relation; as, opposition between science and religion. An intestine struggle, open or secret, between authority and liberty. Hume. 5. With relation to two, as involved in an act or attribute of which another is the agent or subject; as, to judge between or to choose between courses; to distinguish between you and me; to mediate between nations. 6. In intermediate relation to, in respect to time, quantity, or degree; as, between nine and ten o'clock. Between decks, the space, or in the space, between the decks of a vessel. -- Between ourselves, Between you and me, Between themselves, in confidence; with the understanding that the matter is not to be communicated to others. Syn. -- Between, Among. Between etymologically indicates only two; as, a quarrel between two men or two nations; to be between two fires, etc. It is however extended to more than two in expressing a certain relation. I . . . hope that between public business, improving studies, and domestic pleasures, neither melancholy nor caprice will find any place for entrance. Johnson. Among implies a mass or collection of things or persons, and always supposes more than two; as, the prize money was equally divided among the ship's crew.  Intermediate time or space; interval. [Poetic & R.] Shak.
lead: 1. (Chem.)  One of the elements, a heavy, pliable, inelastic metal, having a bright, bluish color, but easily tarnished. It is both malleable and ductile, though with little tenacity, and is used for tubes, sheets, bullets, etc. Its specific gravity is 11.37. It is easily fusible, forms alloys with other metals, and is an ingredient of solder and type metal. Atomic weight, 206.4. Symbol Pb (L. Plumbum). It is chiefly obtained from the mineral galena, lead sulphide. 2. An article made of lead or an alloy of lead; as: (a) A plummet or mass of lead, used in sounding at sea. (b) (Print.) A thin strip of type metal, used to separate lines of type in printing. (c) Sheets or plates of lead used as a covering for roofs; hence, pl., a roof covered with lead sheets or terne plates. I would have the tower two stories, and goodly leads upon the top. Bacon 3. A small cylinder of black lead or plumbago, used in pencils. Black lead, graphite or plumbago, ; -- so called from its leadlike appearance and streak. [Colloq.] -- Coasting lead, a sounding lead intermediate in weight between a hand lead and deep-sea lead. -- Deep-sea lead, the heaviest of sounding leads, used in water exceeding a hundred fathoms in depth. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- Hand lead, a small lead use for sounding in shallow water. -- Krems lead, Kremnitz lead Etym: [so called from Krems or Kremnitz, in Austria], a pure variety of white lead, formed into tablets, and called also Krems, or Kremnitz, white, and Vienna white. -- Lead arming, tallow put in the hollow of a sounding lead. See To arm the lead (below). -- Lead colic. See under Colic. -- Lead color, a deep bluish gray color, like tarnished lead. -- Lead glance. (Min.) Same as Galena. -- Lead line (a) (Med.) A dark line along the gums produced by a deposit of metallic lead, due to lead poisoning. (b) (Naut.) A sounding line. -- Lead mill, a leaden polishing wheel, used by lapidaries. -- Lead ocher (Min.), a massive sulphur-yellow oxide of lead. Same as Massicot. -- Lead pencil, a pencil of which the marking material is graphite (black lead). -- Lead plant (Bot.), a low leguminous plant, genus Amorpha (A. canescens), found in the Northwestern United States, where its presence is supposed to indicate lead ore. Gray. -- Lead tree. (a) (Bot.) A West Indian name for the tropical, leguminous tree, Leucæna glauca; -- probably so called from the glaucous color of the foliage. (b) (Chem.) Lead crystallized in arborescent forms from a solution of some lead salt, as by suspending a strip of zinc in lead acetate. -- Mock lead, a miner's term for blende. -- Red lead, a scarlet, crystalline, granular powder, consisting of minium when pure, but commonly containing several of the oxides of lead. It is used as a paint or cement and also as an ingredient of flint glass. -- Red lead ore (Min.), crocoite. -- Sugar of lead, acetate of lead. -- To arm the lead, to fill the hollow in the bottom of a sounding lead with tallow in order to discover the nature of the bottom by the substances adhering. Ham. Nav. Encyc. -- To cast, or heave, the lead, to cast the sounding lead for ascertaining the depth of water. -- White lead, hydrated carbonate of lead, obtained as a white, amorphous powder, and much used as an ingredient of white paint.  1. To cover, fill, or affect with lead; as, continuous firing leads the grooves of a rifle. 2. (Print.)  To place leads between the lines of; as, to lead a page; leaded matter.  1. To guide or conduct with the hand, or by means of some physical contact connection; as, a father leads a child; a jockey leads a horse with a halter; a dog leads a blind man. If a blind man lead a blind man, both fall down in the ditch. Wyclif (Matt. xv. 14.) They thrust him out of the city, and led him unto the brow of the hill. Luke iv. 29. In thy right hand lead with thee The mountain nymph, sweet Liberty. Milton. 2. To guide or conduct in a certain course, or to a certain place or end, by making the way known; to show the way, esp. by going with or going in advance of. Hence, figuratively: To direct; to counsel; to instruct; as, to lead a traveler; to lead a pupil. The Lord went before them by day in a pillar of a cloud, to lead them the way. Ex. xiii. 21. He leadeth me beside the still waters. Ps. xxiii. 2. This thought might lead me through the world's vain mask. Content, though blind, had I no better guide. Milton. 3. To conduct or direct with authority; to have direction or charge of; as, to lead an army, an exploring party, or a search; to lead a political party. Christ took not upon him flesh and blood that he might conquer and rule nations, lead armies, or possess places. South. 4. To go or to be in advance of; to precede; hence, to be foremost or chief among; as, the big sloop led the fleet of yachts; the Guards led the attack; Demosthenes leads the orators of all ages. As Hesperus, that leads the sun his way. Fairfax. And lo ! Ben Adhem's name led all the rest. Leigh Hunt. 5. To draw or direct by influence, whether good or bad; to prevail on; to induce; to entice; to allure; as, to lead one to espouse a righteous cause. He was driven by the necessities of the times, more than led by his own disposition, to any rigor of actions. Eikon Basilike. Silly women, laden with sins,led away by divers lusts. 2 Tim. iii. 6 (Rev. Ver.). 6. To guide or conduct one's self in, through, or along (a certain course); hence, to proceed in the way of; to follow the path or course of; to pass; to spend. Also, to cause (one) to proceed or follow in (a certain course). That we may lead a quiet and peaceable life. 1 Tim. ii. 2. Nor thou with shadowed hint confuse A life that leads melodious days. Tennyson. You remember . . . the life he used to lead his wife and daughter. Dickens. 7. (Cards & Dominoes)  To begin a game, round, or trick, with; as, to lead trumps; the double five was led. To lead astray, to guide in a wrong way, or into error; to seduce from truth or rectitude. -- To lead captive, to carry or bring into captivity. -- To lead the way, to show the way by going in front; to act as guide. Goldsmith.  1. To guide or conduct, as by accompanying, going before, showing, influencing, directing with authority, etc.; to have precedence or preëminence; to be first or chief; -- used in most of the senses of lead, v. t. 2. To tend or reach in a certain direction, or to a certain place; as, the path leads to the mill; gambling leads to other vices. The mountain foot that leads towards Mantua. Shak. To lead off or out, to go first; to begin.  1. The act of leading or conducting; guidance; direction; as, to take the lead; to be under the lead of another. At the time I speak of, and having a momentary lead, . . . I am sure I did my country important service. Burke. 2. precedence; advance position; also, the measure of precedence; as, the white horse had the lead; a lead of a boat's length, or of half a second. 3. (Cards & Dominoes)  The act or right of playing first in a game or round; the card suit, or piece, so played; as, your partner has the lead. 4. An open way in an ice field. Kane. 5. (Mining)  A lode. 6. (Naut.)  The course of a rope from end to end. 7. (Steam Engine)  The width of port opening which is uncovered by the valve, for the admission or release of steam, at the instant when the piston is at end of its stroke. Note: When used alone it means outside lead, or lead for the admission of steam. Inside lead refers to the release or exhaust. 8. (Civil Engineering)  the distance of haul, as from a cutting to an embankment. 9. (Horology)  The action of a tooth, as a tooth of a wheel, in impelling another tooth or a pallet. Saunier. Lead angle (Steam Engine), the angle which the crank maker with the line of centers, in approaching it, at the instant when the valve opens to admit steam. -- Lead screw (Mach.), the main longitudinal screw of a lathe, which gives the feed motion to the carriage.
trouble: 1. To put into confused motion; to disturb; to agitate. An angel went down at a certain season into the pool, and troubled the water. John v. 4. God looking forth will trouble all his host. Milton. 2. To disturb; to perplex; to afflict; to distress; to grieve; to fret; to annoy; to vex. Now is my soul troubled. John xii. 27. Take the boy to you; he so troubles me 'T is past enduring. Shak. Never trouble yourself about those faults which age will cure. Locke. 3. To give occasion for labor to; -- used in polite phraseology; as, I will not trouble you to deliver the letter. Syn. -- To disturb; perplex; afflict; distress; grieve; harass; annoy; tease; vex; molest.  Troubled; dark; gloomy. [Obs.] "With full trouble cheer." Chaucer.  1. The state of being troubled; disturbance; agitation; uneasiness; vexation; calamity. Lest the fiend . . . some new trouble raise. Milton. Foul whisperings are abroad; unnatural deeds Do breed unnatural troubles. Shak. 2. That which gives disturbance, annoyance, or vexation; that which afflicts. 3. (Mining)  A fault or interruption in a stratum. To get into trouble, to get into difficulty or danger. [Colloq.] -- To take the trouble, to be at the pains; to exert one's self; to give one's self inconvenience. She never took the trouble to close them. Bryant. Syn. -- Affliction; disturbance; perplexity; annoyance; molestation; vexation; inconvenience; calamity; misfortune; adversity; embarrassment; anxiety; sorrow; misery.
soil: To feed, as cattle or horses, in the barn or an inclosure, with fresh grass or green food cut for them, instead of sending them out to pasture; hence (such food having the effect of purging them), to purge by feeding on green food; as, to soil a horse.  1. The upper stratum of the earth; the mold, or that compound substance which furnishes nutriment to plants, or which is particularly adapted to support and nourish them. 2. Land; country. Must I thus leave thee, Paradise thus leave Thee, native soil Milton. 3. Dung; fæces; compost; manure; as, night soil. Improve land by dung and other sort of soils. Mortimer. Soil pipe, a pipe or drain for carrying off night soil.  To enrich with soil or muck; to manure. Men . . . soil their ground, not that they love the dirt, but that they expect a crop. South.  A marshy or miry place to which a hunted boar resorts for refuge; hence, a wet place, stream, or tract of water, sought for by other game, as deer. As deer, being stuck, fly through many soils, Yet still the shaft sticks fast. Marston. To take soil, to run into the mire or water; hence, to take refuge or shelter. O, sir, have you taken soil here It is well a man may reach you after three hours' running. B. Jonson.  1. To make dirty or unclean on the surface; to foul; to dirty; to defile; as, to soil a garment with dust. Our wonted ornaments now soiled and stained. Milton. 2. To stain or mar, as with infamy or disgrace; to tarnish; to sully. Shak. Syn. -- To foul; dirt; dirty; begrime; bemire; bespatter; besmear; daub; bedaub; stain; tarnish; sully; defile; pollute.  To become soiled; as, light colors soil sooner than dark ones.  That which soils or pollutes; a soiled place; spot; stain. A lady's honor . . . will not bear a soil. Dryden.
quotient: 1. (Arith.)  The number resulting from the division of one number by another, and showing how often a less number is contained in a greater; thus, the quotient of twelve divided by four is three. 2. (Higher Alg.)  The result of any process inverse to multiplication. See the Note under Multiplication.
oh: An exclamation expressing various emotions, according to the tone and manner, especially surprise, pain, sorrow, anxiety, or a wish. See the Note under O.
subject: 1. Placed or situated under; lying below, or in a lower situation. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. Placed under the power of another; specifically (International Law), owing allegiance to a particular sovereign or state; as, Jamaica is subject to Great Britain. Esau was never subject to Jacob. Locke. 3. Exposed; liable; prone; disposed; as, a country subject to extreme heat; men subject to temptation. All human things are subject to decay. Dryden. 4. Obedient; submissive. Put them in mind to be subject to principalities. Titus iii. 1. Syn. -- Liable; subordinate; inferior; obnoxious; exposed. See Liable.  1. That which is placed under the authority, dominion, control, or influence of something else. 2. Specifically: One who is under the authority of a ruler and is governed by his laws; one who owes allegiance to a sovereign or a sovereign state; as, a subject of Queen Victoria; a British subject; a subject of the United States. Was never subject longed to be a king, As I do long and wish to be a subject. Shak. The subject must obey his prince, because God commands it, human laws require it. Swift. Note: In international law, the term subject is convertible with citizen. 3. That which is subjected, or submitted to, any physical operation or process; specifically (Anat.), a dead body used for the purpose of dissection. 4. That which is brought under thought or examination; that which is taken up for discussion, or concerning which anything is said or done. "This subject for heroic song." Milton. Make choice of a subject, beautiful and noble, which . . . shall afford an ample field of matter wherein to expatiate. Dryden. The unhappy subject of these quarrels. Shak. 5. The person who is treated of; the hero of a piece; the chief character. Writers of particular lives . . . are apt to be prejudiced in favor of their subject. C. Middleton. 6. (Logic & Gram.)  That of which anything is affirmed or predicated; the theme of a proposition or discourse; that which is spoken of; as, the nominative case is the subject of the verb. The subject of a proposition is that concerning which anything is affirmed or denied. I. Watts. 7. That in which any quality, attribute, or relation, whether spiritual or material, inheres, or to which any of these appertain; substance; substratum. That which manifests its qualities -- in other words, that in which the appearing causes inhere, that to which they belong -- is called their subject or substance, or substratum. Sir W. Hamilton. 8. Hence, that substance or being which is conscious of its own operations; the mind; the thinking agent or principal; the ego. Cf. Object, n., 2. The philosophers of mind have, in a manner, usurped and appropriated this expression to themselves. Accordingly, in their hands, the phrases conscious or thinking subject, and subject, mean precisely the same thing. Sir W. Hamilton. 9. (Mus.)  The principal theme, or leading thought or phrase, on which a composition or a movement is based. The earliest known form of subject is the ecclesiastical cantus firmus, or plain song. Rockstro. 10. (Fine Arts)  The incident, scene, figure, group, etc., which it is the aim of the artist to represent.  1. To bring under control, power, or dominion; to make subject; to subordinate; to subdue. Firmness of mind that subjects every gratification of sense to the rule of right reason. C. Middleton. In one short view subjected to our eye, Gods, emperors, heroes, sages, beauties, lie. Pope. He is the most subjected, the most Locke. 2. To expose; to make obnoxious or liable; as, credulity subjects a person to impositions. 3. To submit; to make accountable. God is not bound to subject his ways of operation to the scrutiny of our thoughts. Locke. 4. To make subservient. Subjected to his service angel wings. Milton. 5. To cause to undergo; as, to subject a substance to a white heat; to subject a person to a rigid test.
ground: 1. The surface of the earth; the outer crust of the globe, or some indefinite portion of it. There was not a man to till the ground. Gen. ii. 5. The fire ran along upon the ground. Ex. ix. 23. Hence:  A floor or pavement supposed to rest upon the earth. 2. Any definite portion of the earth's surface; region; territory; country. Hence: A territory appropriated to, or resorted to, for a particular purpose; the field or place of action; as, a hunting or fishing ground; a play ground. From . . . old Euphrates, to the brook that parts Egypt from Syrian ground. Milton. 3. Land; estate; possession; field; esp. (pl.), the gardens, lawns, fields, etc., belonging to a homestead; as, the grounds of the estate are well kept. Thy next design is on thy neighbor's grounds. Dryden. 4. 4. The basis on which anything rests; foundation. Hence: The foundation of knowledge, belief, or conviction; a premise, reason, or datum; ultimate or first principle; cause of existence or occurrence; originating force or agency; as, the ground of my hope. 5. (Paint. & Decorative Art) (a) That surface upon which the figures of a composition are set, and which relieves them by its plainness, being either of one tint or of tints but slightly contrasted with one another; as, crimson Bowers on a white ground. See Background, Foreground, and Middle-ground. (b) In sculpture, a flat surface upon which figures are raised in relief. (c) In point lace, the net of small meshes upon which the embroidered pattern is applied; as, Brussels ground. See Brussels lace, under Brussels. 6. (Etching)  A gummy composition spread over the surface of a metal to be etched, to prevent the acid from eating except where an opening is made by the needle. 7. (Arch.)  One of the pieces of wood, flush with the plastering, to which moldings, etc., are attached; -- usually in the plural. Note: Grounds are usually put up first and the plastering floated flush with them. 8. (Mus.) (a) A composition in which the bass, consisting of a few bars of independent notes, is continually repeated to a varying melody. (b) The tune on which descants are raised; the plain song. Moore (Encyc.). On that ground I'll build a holy descant. Shak. 9. (Elec.)  A conducting connection with the earth, whereby the earth is made part of an electrical circuit. 10. pl.  Sediment at the bottom of liquors or liquids; dregs; lees; feces; as, coffee grounds. 11. The pit of a theater. [Obs.] B. Jonson. Ground angling, angling with a weighted line without a float. -- Ground annual (Scots Law), an estate created in land by a vassal who instead of selling his land outright reserves an annual ground rent, which becomes a perpetual charge upon the land. -- Ground ash. (Bot.) See Groutweed. -- Ground bailiff (Mining), a superintendent of mines. Simmonds. -- Ground bait, bits of bread, boiled barley or worms, etc., thrown into the water to collect the fish, Wallon. -- Ground bass or base (Mus.), fundamental base; a fundamental base continually repeated to a varied melody. -- Ground beetle (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of carnivorous beetles of the family Carabidæ, living mostly in burrows or under stones, etc. -- Ground chamber, a room on the ground floor. -- Ground cherry. (Bot.) (a) A genus (Physalis) of herbaceous plants having an inflated calyx for a seed pod: esp., the strawberry tomato (P. Alkekengi). See Alkekengl. (b) A European shrub (Prunus Chamæcerasus), with small, very acid fruit. -- Ground cuckoo. (Zoöl.) See Chaparral cock. -- Ground cypress. (Bot.) See Lavender cotton. -- Ground dove (Zoöl.), one of several small American pigeons of the genus Columbigallina, esp. C. passerina of the Southern United States, Mexico, etc. They live chiefly on the ground. -- Ground fish (Zoöl.), any fish which constantly lives on the botton of the sea, as the sole, turbot, halibut. -- Ground floor, the floor of a house most nearly on a level with the ground; -- called also in America, but not in England, the first floor. -- Ground form (Gram.), the stem or basis of a word, to which the other parts are added in declension or conjugation. It is sometimes, but not always, the same as the root. -- Ground furze (Bot.), a low slightly thorny, leguminous shrub (Ononis arvensis) of Europe and Central Asia,; -- called also rest- harrow. -- Ground game, hares, rabbits, etc., as distinguished from winged game. -- Ground hele (Bot.), a perennial herb (Veronica officinalis) with small blue flowers, common in Europe and America, formerly thought to have curative properties. -- Ground of the heavens (Astron.), the surface of any part of the celestial sphere upon which the stars may be regarded as projected. -- Ground hemlock (Bot.), the yew (Taxus baccata var. Canadensisi) of eastern North America, distinguished from that of Europe by its low, straggling stems. -- Ground hog. (Zoöl.) (a) The woodchuck or American marmot (Arctomys monax). See Woodchuck. (b) The aardvark. -- Ground hold (Naut.), ground tackle. [Obs.] Spenser. -- Ground ice, ice formed at the bottom of a body of water before it forms on the surface. -- Ground ivy. (Bot.) A trailing plant; alehoof. See Gill. -- Ground joist, a joist for a basement or ground floor; a. sleeper. -- Ground lark (Zoöl.), the European pipit. See Pipit. -- Ground laurel (Bot.). See Trailing arbutus, under Arbutus. -- Ground line (Descriptive Geom.), the line of intersection of the horizontal and vertical planes of projection. -- Ground liverwort (Bot.), a flowerless plant with a broad flat forking thallus and the fruit raised on peduncled and radiated receptacles (Marchantia polymorpha). -- Ground mail, in Scotland, the fee paid for interment in a churchyard. -- Ground mass (Geol.), the fine-grained or glassy base of a rock, in which distinct crystals of its constituents are embedded. -- Ground parrakeet (Zoöl.), one of several Australian parrakeets, of the genera Callipsittacus and Geopsittacus, which live mainly upon the ground. -- Ground pearl (Zoöl.), an insect of the family Coccidæ (Margarodes formicarum), found in ants' nests in the Bahamas, and having a shelly covering. They are strung like beads, and made into necklaces by the natives. -- Ground pig (Zoöl.), a large, burrowing, African rodent (Aulacodus Swinderianus) about two feet long, allied to the porcupines but with harsh, bristly hair, and no spines; -- called also ground rat. -- Ground pigeon (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of pigeons which live largely upon the ground, as the tooth-billed pigeon (Didunculus strigirostris), of the Samoan Islands, and the crowned pigeon, or goura. See Goura, and Ground dove (above). -- Ground pine. (Bot.) (a) A blue-flowered herb of the genus Ajuga (A. Chamæpitys), formerly included in the genus Teucrium or germander, and named from its resinous smell. Sir L. Hill. (b) A long, creeping, evergreen plant of the genus Lycopodium (L. clavatum); -- called also club moss. (c) A tree-shaped evergreen plant about eight inches in height, of the same genus (L. dendroideum) found in moist, dark woods in the northern part of the United States. Gray. -- Ground plan (Arch.), a plan of the ground floor of any building, or of any floor, as distinguished from an elevation or perpendicular section. -- Ground plane, the horizontal plane of projection in perspective drawing. -- Ground plate. (a) (Arch.) One of the chief pieces of framing of a building; a timber laid horizontally on or near the ground to support the uprights; a ground sill or groundsel. (b) (Railroads) A bed plate for sleepers or ties; a mudsill. (c) (Teleg.) A metallic plate buried in the earth to conduct the electric current thereto. Connection to the pipes of a gas or water main is usual in cities. Knight. -- Ground plot, the ground upon which any structure is erected; hence, any basis or foundation; also, a ground plan. -- Ground plum (Bot.), a leguminous plant (Astragalus caryocarpus) occurring from the Saskatchewan to Texas, and having a succulent plum-shaped pod. -- Ground rat. (Zoöl.) See Ground pig (above). -- Ground rent, rent paid for the privilege of building on another man's land. -- Ground robin. (Zoöl.) See Chewink. -- Ground room, a room on the ground floor; a lower room. Tatler. -- Ground sea, the West Indian name for a swell of the ocean, which occurs in calm weather and without obvious cause, breaking on the shore in heavy roaring billows; -- called also rollers, and in Jamaica, the North sea. -- Ground sill. See Ground plate (a) (above). -- Ground snake (Zoöl.), a small burrowing American snake (Celuta amoena). It is salmon colored, and has a blunt tail. -- Ground squirrel. (Zoöl.) (a) One of numerous species of burrowing rodents of the genera Tamias and Spermophilus, having cheek pouches. The former genus includes the Eastern striped squirrel or chipmunk and some allied Western species; the latter includes the prairie squirrel or striped gopher, the gray gopher, and many allied Western species. See Chipmunk, and Gopher. (b) Any species of the African genus Xerus, allied to Tamias. -- Ground story. Same as Ground floor (above). -- Ground substance (Anat.), the intercellular substance, or matrix, of tissues. -- Ground swell. (a) (Bot.) The plant groundsel. [Obs.] Holland. (b) A broad, deep swell or undulation of the ocean, caused by a long continued gale, and felt even at a remote distance after the gale has ceased. -- Ground table. (Arch.) See Earth table, under Earth. -- Ground tackle (Naut.), the tackle necessary to secure a vessel at anchor. Totten. -- Ground thrush (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of bright-colored Oriental birds of the family Pittidæ. See Pitta. -- Ground tier. (a) The lowest tier of water casks in a vessel's hold. Totten. (b) The lowest line of articles of any kind stowed in a vessel's hold. (c) The lowest range of boxes in a theater. -- Ground timbers (Shipbuilding) the timbers which lie on the keel and are bolted to the keelson; floor timbers. Knight. -- Ground tit. (Zoöl.) See Ground wren (below). -- Ground wheel, that wheel of a harvester, mowing machine, etc., which, rolling on the ground, drives the mechanism. -- Ground wren (Zoöl.), a small California bird (Chamæa fasciata) allied to the wrens and titmice. It inhibits the arid plains. Called also gronnd tit, and wren lit. -- To bite the ground, To break ground. See under Bite, Break. -- To come to the ground, To fall to the ground, to come to nothing; to fail; to miscarry. -- To gain ground. (a) To advance; to proceed forward in confict; as, an army in battle gains ground. (b) To obtain an advantage; to have some success; as, the army gains ground on the enemy. (c) To gain credit; to become more prosperous or influential. -- To get, or To gather, ground, to gain ground. [R.] "Evening mist . . . gathers ground fast." Milton. There is no way for duty to prevail, and get ground of them, but by bidding higher. South. -- To give ground, to recede; to yield advantage. These nine . . . began to give me ground. Shak. --To lose ground, to retire; to retreat; to withdraw from the position taken; hence, to lose advantage; to lose credit or reputation; to decline. -- To stand one's ground, to stand firm; to resist attack or encroachment. Atterbury. -- To take the ground to touch bottom or become stranded; -- said of a ship.  1. To lay, set, or run, on the ground. 2. To found; to fix or set, as on a foundation, reason, or principle; to furnish a ground for; to fix firmly. Being rooted and grounded in love. Eph. iii. 17. So far from warranting any inference to the existence of a God, would, on the contrary, ground even an argument to his negation. Sir W. Hamilton 3. To instruct in elements or first principles. 4. (Elec.)  To connect with the ground so as to make the earth a part of an electrical circuit. 5. (Fine Arts)  To cover with a ground, as a copper plate for etching (see Ground, n., 5); or as paper or other materials with a uniform tint as a preparation for ornament.  To run aground; to strike the bottom and remain fixed; as, the ship grounded on the bar.  imp. & p. p. of Grind. Ground cock, a cock, the plug of which is ground into its seat, as distinguished from a compression cock. Knight. -- Ground glass, glass the transparency of which has been destroyed by having its surface roughened by grinding. -- Ground joint, a close joint made by grinding together two pieces, as of metal with emery and oil, or of glass with fine sand and water.
chick: To sprout, as seed in the ground; to vegetate. Chalmers.  1. A chicken. 2. A child or young person; -- a term of endearment. Shak.
believe: To exercise belief in; to credit upon the authority or testimony of another; to be persuaded of the truth of, upon evidence furnished by reasons, arguments, and deductions of the mind, or by circumstances other than personal knowledge; to regard or accept as true; to place confidence in; to think; to consider; as, to believe a person, a statement, or a doctrine. Our conqueror (whom I now Of force believe almighty). Milton. King Agrippa, believest thou the prophets Acts xxvi. Often followed by a dependent clause. I believe that Jesus Christ is the Son of God. Acts viii. 37. Syn. -- See Expect.  1. To have a firm persuasion, esp. of the truths of religion; to have a persuasion approaching to certainty; to exercise belief or faith. Lord, I believe; help thou mine unbelief. Mark ix. 24. With the heart man believeth unto righteousness. Rom. x. 10. 2. To think; to suppose. I will not believe so meanly of you. Fielding. To believe in. (a) To believe that the subject of the thought (if a person or thing) exists, or (if an event) that it has occurred, or will occur; -- as, to believe in the resurrection of the dead. "She does not believe in Jupiter." J. H. Newman. (b) To believe that the character, abilities, and purposes of a person are worthy of entire confidence; -- especially that his promises are wholly trustworthy. "Let not your heart be troubled: ye believe in God, believe also in me." John xiv. 1. (c) To believe that the qualities or effects of an action or state are beneficial: as, to believe in sea bathing, or in abstinence from alcoholic beverages. -- To believe on, to accept implicitly as an object of religious trust or obedience; to have faith in.
log: A Hebrew measure of liquids, containing 2.37 gills. W. H. Ward.  1. A bulky piece of wood which has not been shaped by hewing or sawing. 2. Etym: [Prob. the same word as in sense 1; cf. LG. log, lock, Dan. log, Sw. logg.] (Naut.)  An apparatus for measuring the rate of a ship's motion through the water. Note: The common log consists of the log-chip, or logship, often exclusively called the log, and the log line, the former being commonly a thin wooden quadrant of five or six inches radius, loaded with lead on the arc to make it float with the point up. It is attached to the log line by cords from each corner. This line is divided into equal spaces, called knots, each bearing the same proportion to a mile that half a minute does to an hour. The line is wound on a reel which is so held as to let it run off freely. When the log is thrown, the log-chip is kept by the water from being drawn forward, and the speed of the ship is shown by the number of knots run out in half a minute. There are improved logs, consisting of a piece of mechanism which, being towed astern, shows the distance actually gone through by the ship, by means of the revolutions of a fly, which are registered on a dial plate. 3. Hence: The record of the rate of ship's speed or of her daily progress; also, the full nautical record of a ship's cruise or voyage; a log slate; a log book. 4. A record and tabulated statement of the work done by an engine, as of a steamship, of the coal consumed, and of other items relating to the performance of machinery during a given time. 5. (Mining)  A weight or block near the free end of a hoisting rope to prevent it from being drawn through the sheave. Log board (Naut.), a board consisting of two parts shutting together like a book, with columns in which are entered the direction of the wind, course of the ship, etc., during each hour of the day and night. These entries are transferred to the log book. A folding slate is now used instead. -- Log book, or Logbook (Naut.), a book in which is entered the daily progress of a ship at sea, as indicated by the log, with notes on the weather and incidents of the voyage; the contents of the log board. Log cabin, Log house, a cabin or house made of logs. -- Log canoe, a canoe made by shaping and hollowing out a single log. -- Log glass (Naut.), a small sandglass used to time the running out of the log line. -- Log line (Naut.), a line or cord about a hundred and fifty fathoms long, fastened to the log-chip. See Note under 2d Log, n., 2. -- Log perch (Zoöl.), an ethiostomoid fish, or darter (Percina caprodes); -- called also hogfish and rockfish. -- Log reel (Naut.), the reel on which the log line is wound. -- Log slate. (Naut.) See Log board (above). -- Rough log (Naut.), a first draught of a record of the cruise or voyage. -- Smooth log (Naut.), a clean copy of the rough log. In the case of naval vessels this copy is forwarded to the proper officer of the government. -- To heave the log (Naut.), to cast the log-chip into the water; also, the whole process of ascertaining a vessel's speed by the log.  , To enter in a ship's log book; as, to log the miles run. J. F. Cooper.  1. To engage in the business of cutting or transporting logs for timber; to get out logs. [U.S.] 2. To move to and fro; to rock. [Obs.]
salt: 1. The chloride of sodium, a substance used for seasoning food, for the preservation of meat, etc. It is found native in the earth, and is also produced, by evaporation and crystallization, from sea water and other water impregnated with saline particles. 2. Hence, flavor; taste; savor; smack; seasoning. Though we are justices and doctors and churchmen . . . we have some salt of our youth in us. Shak. 3. Hence, also, piquancy; wit; sense; as, Attic salt. 4. A dish for salt at table; a saltcellar. I out and bought some things; among others, a dozen of silver salts. Pepys. 5. A sailor; -- usually qualified by old. [Colloq.] Around the door are generally to be seen, laughing and gossiping, clusters of old salts. Hawthorne. 6. (Chem.)  The neutral compound formed by the union of an acid base; thus, sulphuric acid and iron form the salt sulphate of iron or green vitriol. Note: Except in case of ammonium salts, accurately speaking, it is the acid radical which unites with the base or basic radical, with the elimination of hydrogen, of water, or of analogous compounds as side products. In the case of diacid and triacid bases, and of dibasic and tribasic acids, the mutual neutralization may vary in degree, producing respectively basic, neutral, or acid salts See Phrases below. 7. Fig.: That which preserves from corruption or error; that which purifies; a corrective; an antiseptic; also, an allowance or deduction; as, his statements must be taken with a grain of salt. Ye are the salt of the earth. Matt. v. 13. 8. pl.  Any mineral salt used as an aperient or cathartic, especially Epsom salts, Rochelle salt, or Glauber's salt. 9. pl.  Marches flooded by the tide. [Prov. Eng.] Above the salt, Below the salt, phrases which have survived the old custom, in the houses of people of rank, of placing a large saltcellar near the middle of a long table, the places above which were assigned to the guests of distinction, and those below to dependents, inferiors, and poor relations. See Saltfoot. His fashion is not to take knowledge of him that is beneath him in clothes. He never drinks below the salt. B. Jonson. -- Acid salt (Chem.) (a) A salt derived from an acid which has several replaceable hydrogen atoms which are only partially exchanged for metallic atoms or basic radicals; as, acid potassium sulphate is an acid salt. (b) A salt, whatever its constitution, which merely gives an acid reaction; thus, copper sulphate, which is composed of a strong acid united with a weak base, is an acid salt in this sense, though theoretically it is a neutral salt. -- Alkaline salt (Chem.), a salt which gives an alkaline reaction, as sodium carbonate. -- Amphid salt (Old Chem.), a salt of the oxy type, formerly regarded as composed of two oxides, an acid and a basic oxide. [Obsolescent] -- Basic salt (Chem.) (a) A salt which contains more of the basic constituent than is required to neutralize the acid. (b) An alkaline salt. -- Binary salt (Chem.), a salt of the oxy type conveniently regarded as composed of two ingredients (analogously to a haloid salt), viz., a metal and an acid radical. -- Double salt (Chem.), a salt regarded as formed by the union of two distinct salts, as common alum, potassium aluminium sulphate. See under Double. -- Epsom salts. See in the Vocabulary. -- Essential salt (Old Chem.), a salt obtained by crystalizing plant juices. -- Ethereal salt. (Chem.) See under Ethereal. -- Glauber's salt or salts. See in Vocabulary. -- Haloid salt (Chem.), a simple salt of a halogen acid, as sodium chloride. -- Microcosmic salt. (Chem.). See under Microcosmic. -- Neutral salt. (Chem.) (a A salt in which the acid and base (in theory) neutralize each other. (b) A salt which gives a neutral reaction. -- Oxy salt (Chem.), a salt derived from an oxygen acid. -- Per salt (Old Chem.), a salt supposed to be derived from a peroxide base or analogous compound. [Obs.] -- Permanent salt, a salt which undergoes no change on exposure to the air. -- Proto salt (Chem.), a salt derived from a protoxide base or analogous compound. -- Rochelle salt. See under Rochelle. -- Salt of amber (Old Chem.), succinic acid. -- Salt of colcothar (Old Chem.), green vitriol, or sulphate of iron. -- Salt of hartshorn. (Old Chem.) (a) Sal ammoniac, or ammonium chloride. (b) Ammonium carbonate. Cf. Spirit of hartshorn, under Hartshorn. -- Salt of lemons. (Chem.) See Salt of sorrel, below. -- Salt of Saturn (Old Chem.), sugar of lead; lead acetate; -- the alchemical of lead being Saturn. -- Salt of Seignette. Same as Rochelle salt. -- Salt of soda (Old Chem.), sodium carbonate. -- Salt of sorrel (Old Chem.), acid potassium oxalate, or potassium quadroxalate, used as a solvent for ink stains; -- so called because found in the sorrel, or Oxalis. Also sometimes inaccurately called salt of lemon. -- Salt of tartar (Old Chem.), potassium carbonate; -- so called because formerly made by heating cream of tartar, or potassium tartrate. [Obs.] -- Salt of Venus (Old Chem.), blue vitriol; copper sulphate; -- the alchemical name of copper being Venus. -- Salt of wisdom. See Alembroth. -- Sedative salt (Old Med. Chem.), boric acid. -- Sesqui salt (Chem.), a salt derived from a sesquioxide base or analogous compound. -- Spirit of salt. (Chem.) See under Spirit. -- Sulpho salt (Chem.), a salt analogous to an oxy salt, but containing sulphur in place of oxygen.  1. Of or relating to salt; abounding in, or containing, salt; prepared or preserved with, or tasting of, salt; salted; as, salt beef; salt water. "Salt tears." Chaucer. 2. Overflowed with, or growing in, salt water; as, a salt marsh; salt grass. 3. Fig.: Bitter; sharp; pungent. I have a salt and sorry rheum offends me. Shak. 4. Fig.: Salacious; lecherous; lustful. Shak. Salt acid (Chem.), hydrochloric acid. -- Salt block, an apparatus for evaporating brine; a salt factory. Knight. -- Salt bottom, a flat piece of ground covered with saline efforescences. [Western U.S.] bartlett. -- Salt cake (Chem.), the white caked mass, consisting of sodium sulphate, which is obtained as the product of the first stage in the manufacture of soda, according to Leblanc's process. -- Salt fish. (a) Salted fish, especially cod, haddock, and similar fishes that have been salted and dried for food. (b) A marine fish. -- Salt garden, an arrangement for the natural evaporation of sea water for the production of salt, employing large shallow basins excavated near the seashore. -- Salt gauge, an instrument used to test the strength of brine; a salimeter. -- Salt horse, salted beef. [Slang] -- Salt junk, hard salt beef for use at sea. [Slang] -- Salt lick. See Lick, n. -- Salt marsh, grass land subject to the overflow of salt water. -- Salt-marsh caterpillar (Zoöl.), an American bombycid moth (Spilosoma acreæ which is very destructive to the salt-marsh grasses and to other crops. Called also wooly bear. See Illust. under Moth, Pupa, and Woolly bear, under Woolly. -- Salt-marsh fleabane (Bot.), a strong-scented composite herb (Pluchea camphorata) with rayless purplish heads, growing in salt marshes. -- Salt-marsh hen (Zoöl.), the clapper rail. See under Rail. -- Salt-marsh terrapin (Zoöl.), the diamond-back. -- Salt mine, a mine where rock salt is obtained. -- Salt pan. (a) A large pan used for making salt by evaporation; also, a shallow basin in the ground where salt water is evaporated by the heat of the sun. (b) pl. Salt works. -- Salt pit, a pit where salt is obtained or made. -- Salt rising, a kind of yeast in which common salt is a principal ingredient. [U.S.] -- Salt raker, one who collects salt in natural salt ponds, or inclosures from the sea. -- Salt sedative (Chem.), boracic acid. [Obs.] -- Salt spring, a spring of salt water. -- Salt tree (Bot.), a small leguminous tree (Halimodendron argenteum) growing in the salt plains of the Caspian region and in Siberia. -- Salt water, water impregnated with salt, as that of the ocean and of certain seas and lakes; sometimes, also tears. Mine eyes are full of tears, I can not see; And yet salt water blinds them not so much But they can see a sort of traitors here. Shak. -- Salt-water sailor, an ocean mariner. -- Salt-water tailor. (Zoöl.) See Bluefish.  1. To sprinkle, impregnate, or season with salt; to preserve with salt or in brine; to supply with salt; as, to salt fish, beef, or pork; to salt cattle. 2. To fill with salt between the timbers and planks, as a ship, for the preservation of the timber. To salt a mine, to artfully deposit minerals in a mine in order to deceive purchasers regarding its value. [Cant] -- To salt away, To salt down, to prepare with, or pack in, salt for preserving, as meat, eggs, etc.; hence, colloquially, to save, lay up, or invest sagely, as money.  To deposit salt as a saline solution; as, the brine begins to salt.  The act of leaping or jumping; a leap. [Obs.] B. Jonson.
less: Unless. [Obs.] B. Jonson.  Smaller; not so large or great; not so much; shorter; inferior; as, a less quantity or number; a horse of less size or value; in less time than before. Note: The substantive which less qualifies is often omitted; as, the purse contained less (money) than ten dollars. See Less, n. Thus in less [time] than a hundred years from the coming of Augustine, all England became Christian. E. A. Freeman.  Not so much; in a smaller or lower degree; as, less bright or loud; less beautiful.  1. A smaller portion or quantity. The children of Israel did so, and gathered, some more, some less. Ex. xvi. 17. 2. The inferior, younger, or smaller. The less is blessed of the better. Heb. vii. 7.  To make less; to lessen. [Obs.] Gower.
table: 1. To form into a table or catalogue; to tabulate; as, to table fines. 2. To delineate, as on a table; to represent, as in a picture. [Obs.] Tabled and pictured in the chambers of meditation. Bacon. 3. To supply with food; to feed. [Obs.] Milton. 4. (Carp.)  To insert, as one piece of timber into another, by alternate scores or projections from the middle, to prevent slipping; to scarf. 5. To lay or place on a table, as money. Carlyle. 6. In parliamentary usage, to lay on the table; to postpone, by a formal vote, the consideration of (a bill, motion, or the like) till called for, or indefinitely. 7. To enter upon the docket; as, to table charges against some one. 8. (Naut.)  To make board hems in the skirts and bottoms of (sails) in order to strengthen them in the part attached to the boltrope.  To live at the table of another; to board; to eat. [Obs.] "He . . . was driven from the society of men to table with the beasts." South.
visit: 1. To go or come to see, as for the purpose of friendship, business, curiosity, etc.; to attend; to call upon; as, the physician visits his patient. 2. Specifically: To go or come to see for inspection, examination, correction of abuses, etc.; to examine, to inspect; as, a bishop visits his diocese; a superintendent visits persons or works under his charge. 3. (Script.)  To come to for the purpose of chastising, rewarding, comforting; to come upon with reward or retribution; to appear before or judge; as, to visit in mercy; to visit one in wrath. [God] hath visited and redeemed his people. Like i. 68.  To make a visit or visits; to maintain visiting relations; to practice calling on others.  1. The act of visiting, or going to see a person or thing; a brief stay of business, friendship, ceremony, curiosity, or the like, usually longer than a call; as, a visit of civility or respect; a visit to Saratoga; the visit of a physician. 2. The act of going to view or inspect; an official or formal inspection; examination; visitation; as, the visit of a trustee or inspector. Right of visit (Internat. Law), the right of visitation. See Visitation, 4.
receive: 1. To take, as something that is offered, given, committed, sent, paid, or the like; to accept; as, to receive money offered in payment of a debt; to receive a gift, a message, or a letter. Receyven all in gree that God us sent. Chaucer. 2. Hence: To gain the knowledge of; to take into the mind by assent to; to give admission to; to accept, as an opinion, notion, etc.; to embrace. Our hearts receive your warnings. Shak. The idea of solidity we receives by our touch. Locke. 3. To allow, as a custom, tradition, or the like; to give credence or acceptance to. Many other things there be which they have received to hold, as the washing of cups, and pots. Mark vii. 4. 4. To give admittance to; to permit to enter, as into one's house, presence, company, and the like; as, to receive a lodger, visitor, ambassador, messenger, etc. They kindled a fire, and received us every one. Acts xxviii. 2. 5. To admit; to take in; to hold; to contain; to have capacity fro; to be able to take in. The brazen altar that was before the Lord was too little to receive the burnt offerings. 1 Kings viii. 64. 6. To be affected by something; to suffer; to be subjected to; as, to receive pleasure or pain; to receive a wound or a blow; to receive damage. Against his will he can receive no harm. Milton. 7. To take from a thief, as goods known to be stolen. 8. (Lawn Tennis)  To bat back (the ball) when served. Receiving ship, one on board of which newly recruited sailors are received, and kept till drafted for service. Syn. -- To accept; take; allow; hold; retain; admit. -- Receive, Accept. To receive describes simply the act of taking. To accept denotes the taking with approval, or for the purposes for which a thing is offered. Thus, we receive a letter when it comes to hand; we receive news when it reaches us; we accept a present when it is offered; we accept an invitation to dine with a friend. Who, if we knew What we receive, would either not accept Life offered, or soon beg to lay it down. Milton.  1. To receive visitors; to be at home to receive calls; as, she receives on Tuesdays. 2. (Lawn Tennis)  To return, or bat back, the ball when served; as, it is your turn to receive.
fire: 1. The evolution of light and heat in the combustion of bodies; combustion; state of ignition. Note: The form of fire exhibited in the combustion of gases in an ascending stream or current is called flame. Anciently, fire, air, earth, and water were regarded as the four elements of which all things are composed. 2. Fuel in a state of combustion, as on a hearth, or in 3. The burning of a house or town; a conflagration. 4. Anything which destroys or affects like fire. 5. Ardor of passion, whether love or hate; excessive warmth; consumingviolence of temper. he had fire in his temper.Atterbury. 6. Liveliness of imagination or fancy; intellectual and moral enthusiasm; capacity for ardor and zeal. And bless their critic with a poet's fire.Pope. 7. Splendor; brilliancy; luster; hence, a star. Stars, hide your fires.Shak. As in a zodiac representing the heavenly fires.Milton. 8. Torture by burning; severe trial or affliction. 9. The discharge of firearms; firing; as, the troops were exposed to a heavy fire. Blue fire, Red fire, Green fire (Pyrotech.), compositions of various combustible substances, as sulphur, niter, lampblack, etc., the flames of which are colored by various metallic salts, as those of antimony, strontium, barium, etc. -- Fire alarm (a) A signal given on the breaking out of a fire. (b) An apparatus for giving such an alarm. -- Fire annihilator, a machine, device, or preparation to be kept at hand for extinguishing fire by smothering it with some incombustible vapor or gas, as carbonic acid. -- Fire balloon. (a) A balloon raised in the air by the buoyancy of air heated by a fire placed in the lower part. (b) A balloon sent up at night with fireworks which ignite at a regulated height. Simmonds. -- Fire bar, a grate bar. -- Fire basket, a portable grate; a cresset. Knight. -- Fire beetle. (Zoöl.) See in the Vocabulary. -- Fire blast, a disease of plants which causes them to appear as if burnt by fire. -- Fire box, the chamber of a furnace, steam boiler, etc., for the fire. -- Fire brick, a refractory brick, capable of sustaining intense heat without fusion, usually made of fire clay or of siliceous material, with some cementing substance, and used for lining fire boxes, etc. -- Fire brigade, an organized body of men for extinguished fires. -- Fire bucket. See under Bucket. -- Fire bug, an incendiary; one who, from malice or through mania, persistently sets fire to property; a pyromaniac. [U.S.] -- Fire clay. See under Clay. -- Fire company, a company of men managing an engine in extinguishing fires. -- Fire cross. See Fiery cross. [Obs.] Milton. -- Fire damp. See under Damp. -- Fire dog. See Firedog, in the Vocabulary. -- Fire drill. (a) A series of evolutions performed by fireman for practice. (b) An apparatus for producing fire by friction, by rapidly twirling a wooden pin in a wooden socket; -- used by the Hindoos during all historic time, and by many savage peoples. -- Fire eater. (a) A juggler who pretends to eat fire. (b) A quarrelsome person who seeks affrays; a hotspur. [Colloq.] -- Fire engine, a portable forcing pump, usually on wheels, for throwing water to extinguish fire. -- Fire escape, a contrivance for facilitating escape from burning buildings. -- Fire gilding (Fine Arts), a mode of gilding with an amalgam of gold and quicksilver, the latter metal being driven off afterward by heat. -- Fire gilt (Fine Arts), gold laid on by the process of fire gilding. -- Fire insurance, the act or system of insuring against fire; also, a contract by which an insurance company undertakes, in consideration of the payment of a premium or small percentage -- usually made periodically -- to indemnify an owner of property from loss by fire during a specified period. -- Fire irons, utensils for a fireplace or grate, as tongs, poker, and shovel. -- Fire main, a pipe for water, to be used in putting out fire. -- Fire master (Mil), an artillery officer who formerly supervised the composition of fireworks. -- Fire office, an office at which to effect insurance against fire. -- Fire opal, a variety of opal giving firelike reflections. -- Fire ordeal, an ancient mode of trial, in which the test was the ability of the accused to handle or tread upon red-hot irons. Abbot. -- Fire pan, a pan for holding or conveying fire, especially the receptacle for the priming of a gun. -- Fire plug, a plug or hydrant for drawing water from the main pipes in a street, building, etc., for extinguishing fires. -- Fire policy, the writing or instrument expressing the contract of insurance against loss by fire. -- Fire pot. (a) (Mil.) A small earthen pot filled with combustibles, formerly used as a missile in war. (b) The cast iron vessel which holds the fuel or fire in a furnace. (c) A crucible. (d) A solderer's furnace. -- Fire raft, a raft laden with combustibles, used for setting fire to an enemy's ships. -- Fire roll, a peculiar beat of the drum to summon men to their quarters in case of fire. -- Fire setting (Mining), the process of softening or cracking the working face of a lode, to facilitate excavation, by exposing it to the action of fire; -- now generally superseded by the use of explosives. Raymond. -- Fire ship, a vessel filled with combustibles, for setting fire to an enemy's ships. -- Fire shovel, a shovel for taking up coals of fire. -- Fire stink, the stench from decomposing iron pyrites, caused by the formation of sulphureted hydrogen. Raymond. -- Fire surface, the surfaces of a steam boiler which are exposed to the direct heat of the fuel and the products of combustion; heating surface. -- Fire swab, a swab saturated with water, for cooling a gun in action and clearing away particles of powder, etc. Farrow. -- Fire teaser, in England, the fireman of a steam emgine. -- Fire water, ardent spirits; -- so called by the American Indians. -- Fire worship, the worship of fire, which prevails chiefly in Persia, among the followers of Zoroaster, called Chebers, or Guebers, and among the Parsees of India. -- Greek fire. See under Greek. -- On fire, burning; hence, ardent; passionate; eager; zealous. -- Running fire, the rapid discharge of firearms in succession by a line of troops. -- St. Anthony's fire, erysipelas; -- an eruptive fever which St. Anthony was supposed to cure miraculously. Hoblyn. -- St. Elmo's fire. See under Saint Elmo. -- To set on fire, to inflame; to kindle. -- To take fire, to begin to burn; to fly into a passion.  1. To set on fire; to kindle; as, to fire a house or chimney; to fire a pile. 2. To subject to intense heat; to bake; to burn in a kiln; as, to fire pottery. 3. To inflame; to irritate, as the passions; as, to fire the soul with anger, pride, or revenge. Love had fired my mind. Dryden. 4. To animate; to give life or spirit to; as, to fire the genius of a young man. 5. To feed or serve the fire of; as, to fire a boiler. 6. To light up as if by fire; to illuminate. [The sun] fires the proud tops of the eastern pines. Shak. 7. To cause to explode; as, to fire a torpedo; to disharge; as, to fire a musket or cannon; to fire cannon balls, rockets, etc. 8. To drive by fire. [Obs.] Till my bad angel fire my good one out. Shak. 9. (Far.)  To cauterize. To fire up, to light up the fires of, as of an engine.  1. To take fire; to be kindled; to kindle. 2. To be irritated or inflamed with passion. 3. To discharge artillery or firearms; as, they fired on the town. To fire up, to grow irritated or angry. "He . . . fired up, and stood vigorously on his defense." Macaulay.
position: 1. The state of being posited, or placed; the manner in which anything is placed; attitude; condition; as, a firm, an inclined, or an upright position. We have different prospects of the same thing, according to our different positions to it. Locke. 2. The spot where a person or thing is placed or takes a place; site; place; station; situation; as, the position of man in creation; the fleet changed its position. 3. Hence: The ground which any one takes in an argument or controversy; the point of view from which any one proceeds to a discussion; also, a principle laid down as the basis of reasoning; a proposition; a thesis; as, to define one's position; to appear in a false position. Let not the proof of any position depend on the positions that follow, but always on those which go before. I. Watts. 4. Relative place or standing; social or official rank; as, a person of position; hence, office; post; as, to lose one's position. 5. (Arith.)  A method of solving a problem by one or two suppositions; -- called also the rule of trial and error. Angle of position (Astron.), the angle which any line (as that joining two stars) makes with another fixed line, specifically with a circle of declination. -- Double position (Arith.), the method of solving problems by proceeding with each of two assumed numbers, according to the conditions of the problem, and by comparing the difference of the results with those of the numbers, deducing the correction to be applied to one of them to obtain the true result. -- Guns of position (Mil.), heavy fieldpieces, not designed for quick movements. -- Position finder (Mil.), a range finder. See under Range. -- Position micrometer, a micrometer applied to the tube of an astronomical telescope for measuring angles of position in the field of view. -- Single position (Arith.), the method of solving problems, in which the result obtained by operating with an assumed number is to the true result as the number assumed is to the number required. -- Strategic position (Mil.), a position taken up by an army or a large detachment of troops for the purpose of checking or observing an opposing force. Syn. -- Situation; station; place; condition; attitude; posture; proposition; assertion; thesis.  To indicate the position of; to place. [R.] Encyc. Brit.
crowd: 1. To push, to press, to shove. Chaucer. 2. To press or drive together; to mass together. "Crowd us and crush us." Shak. 3. To fill by pressing or thronging together; hence, to encumber by excess of numbers or quantity. The balconies and verandas were crowded with spectators, anxious to behold their future sovereign. Prescott. 4. To press by solicitation; to urge; to dun; hence, to treat discourteously or unreasonably. [Colloq.] To crowd out, to press out; specifically, to prevent the publication of; as, the press of other matter crowded out the article. -- To crowd sail (Naut.), to carry an extraordinary amount of sail, with a view to accelerate the speed of a vessel; to carry a press of sail.  1. To press together or collect in numbers; to swarm; to throng. The whole company crowded about the fire. Addison. Images came crowding on his mind faster than he could put them into words. Macaulay. 2. To urge or press forward; to force one's self; as, a man crowds into a room.  1. A number of things collected or closely pressed together; also, a number of things adjacent to each other. A crowd of islands. Pope. 2. A number of persons congregated or collected into a close body without order; a throng. The crowd of Vanity Fair. Macualay. Crowds that stream from yawning doors. {\*\bkmkstart here}Tennyson. 3. The lower orders of people; the populace; the vulgar; the rabble; the mob. To fool the crowd with glorious lies. Tennyson. He went not with the crowd to see a shrine. Dryden. Syn. -- Throng; multitude. See Throng.  An ancient instrument of music with six strings; a kind of violin, being the oldest known stringed instrument played with a bow. [Written also croud, crowth, cruth, and crwth.] A lackey that . . . can warble upon a crowd a little. B. Jonson.  To play on a crowd; to fiddle. [Obs.] "Fiddlers, crowd on." Massinger.
picture: 1. The art of painting; representation by painting. [Obs.] Any well-expressed image . . . either in picture or sculpture. Sir H. Wotton. 2. A representation of anything (as a person, a landscape, a building) upon canvas, paper, or other surface, produced by means of painting, drawing, engraving, photography, etc.; a representation in colors. By extension, a figure; a model. Pictures and shapes are but secondary objects. Bacon. The young king's picture . . . in virgin wax. Howell. 3. An image or resemblance; a representation, either to the eye or to the mind; that which, by its likeness, brings vividly to mind some other thing; as, a child is the picture of his father; the man is the picture of grief. My eyes make pictures when they are shut. Coleridge. Note: Picture is often used adjectively, or in forming self- explaining compounds; as, picture book or picture-book, picture frame or picture-frame, picture seller or picture-seller, etc. Picture gallery, a gallery, or large apartment, devoted to the exhibition of pictures. -- Picture red, a rod of metal tube fixed to the walls of a room, from which pictures are hung. -- Picture writing. (a) The art of recording events, or of expressing messages, by means of pictures representing the actions or circumstances in question. Tylor. (b) The record or message so represented; as, the picture writing of the American Indians. Syn. -- Picture, Painting. Every kind of representation by drawing or painting is a picture, whether made with oil colors, water colors, pencil, crayons, or India ink; strictly, a painting is a picture made by means of colored paints, usually applied moist with a brush.  To draw or paint a resemblance of; to delineate; to represent; to form or present an ideal likeness of; to bring before the mind. "I . . . do picture it in my mind." Spenser. I have not seen him so pictured. Shak.
straight: A variant of Strait, a. [Obs. or R.] Egypt is a long country, but it is straight, that is to say, narrow. Sir J. Mandeville.  1. Right, in a mathematical sense; passing from one point to another by the nearest course; direct; not deviating or crooked; as, a straight line or course; a straight piece of timber. And the crooked shall be made straight. Isa. xl. 4. There are many several sorts of crooked lines, but there is only one which is straight. Dryden. 2. (Bot.)  Approximately straight; not much curved; as, straight ribs are such as pass from the base of a leaf to the apex, with a small curve. 3. (Card Playing)  Composed of cards which constitute a regular sequence, as the ace, king, queen, jack, and ten-spot; as, a straight hand; a straight flush. 4. Conforming to justice and rectitude; not deviating from truth or fairness; upright; as, straight dealing. 5. Unmixed; undiluted; as, to take liquor straight. [Slang] 6. Making no exceptions or deviations in one's support of the organization and candidates of a political party; as, a straight Republican; a straight Democrat; also, containing the names of all the regularly nominated candidates of a party and no others; as, a straight ballot. [Political Cant, U.S.] Straight arch (Arch.), a form of arch in which the intrados is straight, but with its joints drawn radially, as in a common arch. -- A straight face, one giving no evidence of merriment or other emotion. -- A straight line. "That which lies evenly between its extreme points." Euclid. "The shortest line between two points." Chauvenet. "A line which has the same direction through its whole length." Newcomb. -- Straight-way valve, a valve which, when opened widely, affords a straight passageway, as for water. walk the straight and narrow.  In a straight manner; directly; rightly; forthwith; immediately; as, the arrow went straight to the mark. "Floating straight." Shak. I know thy generous temper well; Fling but the appearance of dishonor on it, It straight takes fire, and mounts into a blaze. Addison. Everything was going on straight. W. Black.  A hand of five cards in consecutive order as to value; a sequence. When they are of one suit, it is calles straight flush.  To straighten. [R.] A Smith.
fell: imp. of Fall.  1. Cruel; barbarous; inhuman; fierce; savage; ravenous. While we devise fell tortures for thy faults. Shak. 2. Eager; earnest; intent. [Obs.] I am so fell to my business. Pepys.  Gall; anger; melancholy. [Obs.] Untroubled of vile fear or bitter fell. Spenser.  A skin or hide of a beast with the wool or hair on; a pelt; -- used chiefly in composition, as woolfell. We are still handling our ewes, and their fells, you know, are greasy. Shak.  1. A barren or rocky hill. T. Gray. 2. A wild field; a moor. Dryton.  To cause to fall; to prostrate; to bring down or to the ground; to cut down. Stand, or I'll fell thee down. Shak.  The finer portions of ore which go through the meshes, when the ore is sorted by sifting.  To sew or hem; -- said of seams.  1. (Sewing)  A form of seam joining two pieces of cloth, the edges being folded together and the stitches taken through both thicknesses. 2. (Weaving)  The end of a web, formed by the last thread of the weft.
rich: 1. Having an abundance of material possessions; possessed of a large amount of property; well supplied with land, goods, or money; wealthy; opulent; affluent; -- opposed to Ant: poor. "Rich merchants." Chaucer. The rich [person] hath many friends. Prov. xiv. 20. As a thief, bent to unhoard the cash Of some rich burgher. Milton. 2. Hence, in general, well supplied; abounding; abundant; copious; bountiful; as, a rich treasury; a rich entertainment; a rich crop. If life be short, it shall be glorious; Each minute shall be rich in some great action. Rowe. The gorgeous East with richest hand Showers on her kings barbaric pearl and gold. Milton. 3. Yielding large returns; productive or fertile; fruitful; as, rich soil or land; a rich mine. 4. Composed of valuable or costly materials or ingredients; procured at great outlay; highly valued; precious; sumptuous; costly; as, a rich dress; rich silk or fur; rich presents. Like to rich and various gems. Milton. 5. Abounding in agreeable or nutritive qualities; -- especially applied to articles of food or drink which are high-seasoned or abound in oleaginous ingredients, or are sweet, luscious, and high- flavored; as, a rich dish; rich cream or soup; rich pastry; rich wine or fruit. Sauces and rich spices are fetched from India. Baker. 6. Not faint or delicate; vivid; as, a rich color. 7. Full of sweet and harmonius sounds; as, a rich voice; rich music. 8. Abounding in beauty; gorgeous; as, a rich landscape; rich scenery. 9. Abounding in humor; exciting amusement; entertaining; as, the scene was a rich one; a rich incident or character. [Colloq.] Thackeray. Note: Rich is sometimes used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, rich-fleeced, rich-jeweled, rich-laden, rich-stained. Syn. -- Wealthy; affluent; opulent; ample; copious; abundant; plentiful; fruitful; costly; sumptuous; precious; generous; luscious.  To enrich. [Obs.] Gower.
either: 1. One of two; the one or the other; -- properly used of two things, but sometimes of a larger number, for any one. Lepidus flatters both, Of both is flattered; but he neither loves, Nor either cares for him. Shak. Scarce a palm of ground could be gotten by either of the three. Bacon. There have been three talkers in Great British, either of whom would illustrate what I say about dogmatists. Holmes. 2. Each of two; the one and the other; both; -- formerly, also, each of any number. His flowing hair In curls on either cheek played. Milton. On either side . . . was there the tree of life. Rev. xxii. 2. The extreme right and left of either army never engaged. Jowett (Thucyd).  precedes two, or more, coördinate words or phrases, and is introductory to an alternative. It is correlative to or. Either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth. 1 Kings xviii. 27. Few writers hesitate to use either in what is called a triple alternative; such as, We must either stay where we are, proceed, or recede. Latham. Note: Either was formerly sometimes used without any correlation, and where we should now use or. Can the fig tree, my brethren, bear olive berries either a vine, figs James iii. 12.
wing: 1. One of the two anterior limbs of a bird, pterodactyl, or bat. They correspond to the arms of man, and are usually modified for flight, but in the case of a few species of birds, as the ostrich, auk, etc., the wings are used only as an assistance in running or swimming. As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young, spreadeth abroad her wings, taketh them, beareth them on her wings. Deut. xxxii. 11. Note: In the wing of a bird the long quill feathers are in series. The primaries are those attached to the ulnar side of the hand; the secondaries, or wing coverts, those of the forearm: the scapulars, those that lie over the humerus; and the bastard feathers, those of the short outer digit. See Illust. of Bird, and Plumage. 2. Any similar member or instrument used for the purpose of flying. Specifically: (Zoöl.) (a) One of the two pairs of upper thoracic appendages of most hexapod insects. They are broad, fanlike organs formed of a double membrane and strengthened by chitinous veins or nervures. (b) One of the large pectoral fins of the flying fishes. 3. Passage by flying; flight; as, to take wing. Light thickens; and the crow Makes wing to the rooky wood. Shak. 4. Motive or instrument of flight; means of flight or of rapid motion. Fiery expedition be my wing. Shak. 5. Anything which agitates the air as a wing does, or which is put in winglike motion by the action of the air, as a fan or vane for winnowing grain, the vane or sail of a windmill, etc. 6. An ornament worn on the shoulder; a small epaulet or shoulder knot. 7. Any appendage resembling the wing of a bird or insect in shape or appearance. Specifically: (a) (Zoöl.)  One of the broad, thin, anterior lobes of the foot of a pteropod, used as an organ in swimming. (b) (Bot.) Any membranaceous expansion, as that along the sides of certain stems, or of a fruit of the kind called samara. (c) (Bot.) Either of the two side petals of a papilionaceous flower. 8. One of two corresponding appendages attached; a sidepiece. Hence: (a) (Arch.) A side building, less than the main edifice; as, one of the wings of a palace. (b) (Fort.) The longer side of crownworks, etc., connecting them with the main work. (c) (Hort.) A side shoot of a tree or plant; a branch growing up by the side of another. [Obs.] (d) (Mil.)  The right or left division of an army, regiment, etc. (e) (Naut.) That part of the hold or orlop of a vessel which is nearest the sides. In a fleet, one of the extremities when the ships are drawn up in line, or when forming the two sides of a triangle. Totten. (f) One of the sides of the stags in a theater. On the wing. (a) Supported by, or flying with, the wings another. -- On the wings of the wind, with the utmost velocity. -- Under the wing, or wings, of, under the care or protection of. -- Wing and wing (Naut.), with sails hauled out on either side; -- said of a schooner, or her sails, when going before the wind with the foresail on one side and the mainsail on the other; also said of a square-rigged vessel which has her studding sails set. Cf. Goosewinged. -- Wing case (Zoöl.), one of the anterior wings of beetles, and of some other insects, when thickened and used to protect the hind wings; an elytron; -- called also wing cover. -- Wing covert (Zoöl.), one of the small feathers covering the bases of the wing quills. See Covert, n., 2. -- Wing gudgeon (Mach.), an iron gudgeon for the end of a wooden axle, having thin, broad projections to prevent it from turning in the wood. See Illust. of Gudgeon. -- Wing shell (Zoöl.), wing case of an insect. -- Wing stroke, the stroke or sweep of a wing. -- Wing transom (Naut.), the uppermost transom of the stern; -- called also main transom. J. Knowles.  1. To furnish with wings; to enable to fly, or to move with celerity. Who heaves old ocean, and whowings the storms. Pope. Living, to wing with mirth the weary hours. Longfellow. 2. To supply with wings or sidepieces. The main battle, whose puissance on either side Shall be well winged with our chiefest horse. Shak. 3. To transport by flight; to cause to fly. I, an old turtle, Will wing me to some withered bough. Shak. 4. To move through in flight; to fly through. There's not an arrow wings the sky But fancy turns its point to him. Moore. 5. To cut off the wings of; to wound in the wing; to disable a wing of; as, to wing a bird. To wing a flight, to exert the power of flying; to fly.
speak: 1. To utter words or articulate sounds, as human beings; to express thoughts by words; as, the organs may be so obstructed that a man may not be able to speak. Till at the last spake in this manner. Chaucer. Speak, Lord; for thy servant heareth. 1 Sam. iii. 9. 2. To express opinions; to say; to talk; to converse. That fluid substance in a few minutes begins to set, as the tradesmen speak. Boyle. An honest man, is able to speak for himself, when a knave is not. Shak. During the century and a half which followed the Conquest, there is, to speak strictly, no English history. Macaulay. 3. To utter a speech, discourse, or harangue; to adress a public assembly formally. Many of the nobility made themselves popular by speaking in Parliament against those things which were most grateful to his majesty. Clarendon. 4. To discourse; to make mention; to tell. Lycan speaks of a part of Cæsar's army that came to him from the Leman Lake. Addison. 5. To give sound; to sound. Make all our trumpets speak. Shak. 6. To convey sentiments, ideas, or intelligence as if by utterance; as, features that speak of self-will. Thine eye begins to speak. Shak. To speak of, to take account of, to make mention of. Robynson (More's Utopia). -- To speak out, to speak loudly and distinctly; also, to speak unreservedly. -- To speak well for, to commend; to be favorable to. -- To speak with, to converse with. "Would you speak with me" Shak. Syn. -- To say; tell; talk; converse; discourse; articulate; pronounce; utter.  1. To utter with the mouth; to pronounce; to utter articulately, as human beings. They sat down with him upn ground seven days and seven nights, and none spake a word unto him. Job. ii. 13. 2. To utter in a word or words; to say; to tell; to declare orally; as, to speak the truth; to speak sense. 3. To declare; to proclaim; to publish; to make known; to exhibit; to express in any way. It is my father;s muste To speak your deeds. Shak. Speaking a still good morrow with her eyes. Tennyson. And for the heaven's wide circuit, let it speak The maker's high magnificence. Milton. Report speaks you a bonny monk. Sir W. Scott. 4. To talk or converse in; to utter or pronounce, as in conversation; as, to speak Latin. And French she spake full fair and fetisely. Chaucer. 5. To address; to accost; to speak to. [He will] thee in hope; he will speak thee fair. Ecclus. xiii. 6. each village senior paused to scan And speak the lovely caravan. Emerson. To speak a ship (Naut.), to hail and speak to her captain or commander.
particular: 1. Relating to a part or portion of anything; concerning a part separated from the whole or from others of the class; separate; sole; single; individual; specific; as, the particular stars of a constellation. Shak. [/Make] each particular hair to stand an end, Like quills upon the fretful porpentine. Shak. Seken in every halk and every herne Particular sciences for to lerne. Chaucer. 2. Of or pertaining to a single person, class, or thing; belonging to one only; not general; not common; hence, personal; peculiar; singular. "Thine own particular wrongs." Shak. Wheresoever one plant draweth such a particular juice out of the earth. Bacon. 3. Separate or distinct by reason of superiority; distinguished; important; noteworthy; unusual; special; as, he brought no particular news; she was the particular belle of the party. 4. Concerned with, or attentive to, details; minute; circumstantial; precise; as, a full and particular account of an accident; hence, nice; fastidious; as, a man particular in his dress. 5. (Law) (a) Containing a part only; limited; as, a particular estate, or one precedent to an estate in remainder. (b) Holding a particular estate; as, a particular tenant. Blackstone. 6. (Logic)  Forming a part of a genus; relatively limited in extension; affirmed or denied of a part of a subject; as, a particular proposition; -- opposed to universal: e. g. (particular affirmative) Some men are wise; (particular negative) Some men are not wise. Particular average. See under Average. -- Particular Baptist, one of a branch of the Baptist denomination the members of which hold the doctrine of a particular or individual election and reprobation. -- Particular lien (Law), a lien, or a right to retain a thing, for some charge or claim growing out of, or connected with, that particular thing. -- Particular redemption, the doctrine that the purpose, act, and provisions of redemption are restricted to a limited number of the human race. See Calvinism. Syn. -- Minute; individual; respective; appropriate; peculiar; especial; exact; specific; precise; critical; circumstantial. See Minute.  1. A separate or distinct member of a class, or part of a whole; an individual fact, point, circumstance, detail, or item, which may be considered separately; as, the particulars of a story. Particulars which it is not lawful for me to reveal. Bacon. It is the greatest interest of particulars to advance the good of the community. L'Estrange. 2. Special or personal peculiarity, trait, or character; individuality; interest, etc. [Obs.] For his particular I'll receive him gladly. Shak. If the particulars of each person be considered. Milton. Temporal blessings, whether such as concern the public . . . or such as concern our particular. Whole Duty of Man. 3. (Law)  One of the details or items of grounds of claim; -- usually in the pl.; also, a bill of particulars; a minute account; as, a particular of premises. The reader has a particular of the books wherein this law was written. Ayliffe. Bill of particulars. See under Bill. -- In particular, specially; peculiarly. "This, in particular, happens to the lungs." Blackmore. -- To go into particulars, to relate or describe in detail or minutely.
fine: 1. Finished; brought to perfection; refined; hence, free from impurity; excellent; superior; elegant; worthy of admiration; accomplished; beautiful. The gain thereof [is better] than fine gold. Prov. iii. 14. A cup of wine that's brisk and fine. Shak. Not only the finest gentleman of his time, but one of the finest scholars. Felton. To soothe the sick bed of so fine a being [Keats]. Leigh Hunt. 2. Aiming at show or effect; loaded with ornament; overdressed or overdecorated; showy. He gratified them with occasional . . . fine writing. M. Arnold. 3. Nice; delicate; subtle; exquisite; artful; skillful; dexterous. The spider's touch, how exquisitely fine! Pope. The nicest and most delicate touches of satire consist in fine raillery. Dryden. He has as fine a hand at picking a pocket as a woman. T. Gray. 4. Not coarse, gross, or heavy; as: (a) Not gross; subtile; thin; tenous. The eye standeth in the finer medium and the object in the grosser. Bacon. (b) Not coarse; comminuted; in small particles; as, fine sand or flour. (c) Not thick or heavy; slender; filmy; as, a fine thread. (d) Thin; attenuate; keen; as, a fine edge. (e) Made of fine materials; light; delicate; as, fine linen or silk. 5. Having (such) a proportion of pure metal in its composition; as, coins nine tenths fine. 6. (Used ironically.) Ye have made a fine hand, fellows. Shak. Note: Fine is often compounded with participles and adjectives, modifying them adverbially; a, fine-drawn, fine-featured, fine- grained, fine-spoken, fine-spun, etc. Fine arch (Glass Making), the smaller fritting furnace of a glasshouse. Knight. -- Fine arts. See the Note under Art. -- Fine cut, fine cut tobacco; a kind of chewing tobacco cut up into shreds. -- Fine goods, woven fabrics of fine texture and quality. McElrath. -- Fine stuff, lime, or a mixture of lime, plaster, etc., used as material for the finishing coat in plastering. -- To sail fine (Naut.), to sail as close to the wind as possible. Syn. -- Fine, Beautiful. When used as a word of praise, fine (being opposed to coarse) denotes no "ordinary thing of its kind." It is not as strong as beautiful, in reference to the single attribute implied in the latter term; but when we speak of a fine woman, we include a greater variety of particulars, viz., all the qualities which become a woman, -- breeding, sentiment, tact, etc. The term is equally comprehensive when we speak of a fine garden, landscape, horse, poem, etc.; and, though applied to a great variety of objects, the word has still a very definite sense, denoting a high degree of characteristic excellence.  1. To make fine; to refine; to purify, to clarify; as, to fine gold. It hath been fined and refined by . . . learned men. Hobbes. 2. To make finer, or less coarse, as in bulk, texture, etc.; as. to fine the soil. L. H. Bailey. 3. To change by fine gradations; as (Naut.), to fine down a ship's lines, to diminish her lines gradually. I often sate at home On evenings, watching how they fined themselves With gradual conscience to a perfect night. Browning.  1. End; conclusion; termination; extinction. [Obs.] "To see their fatal fine." Spenser. Is this the fine of his fines Shak. 2. A sum of money paid as the settlement of a claim, or by way of terminating a matter in dispute; especially, a payment of money imposed upon a party as a punishment for an offense; a mulct. 3. (Law) (a) (Feudal Law) A final agreement concerning lands or rents between persons, as the lord and his vassal. Spelman. (b) (Eng. Law) A sum of money or price paid for obtaining a benefit, favor, or privilege, as for admission to a copyhold, or for obtaining or renewing a lease. Fine for alienation (Feudal Law), a sum of money paid to the lord by a tenant whenever he had occasion to make over his land to another. Burrill. -- Fine of lands, a species of conveyance in the form of a fictitious suit compromised or terminated by the acknowledgment of the previous owner that such land was the right of the other party. Burrill. See Concord, n., 4. -- In fine, in conclusion; by way of termination or summing up.  To impose a pecuniary penalty upon for an offense or breach of law; to set a fine on by judgment of a court; to punish by fine; to mulct; as, the trespassers were fined ten dollars.  To pay a fine. See Fine, n., 3 (b). [R.] Men fined for the king's good will; or that he would remit his anger; women fined for leave to marry. Hallam.  To finish; to cease; or to cause to cease. [Obs.]
out: In its original and strict sense, out means from the interior of something; beyond the limits or boundary of somethings; in a position or relation which is exterior to something; -- opposed to in or into. The something may be expressed after of, from, etc. (see Out of, below); or, if not expressed, it is implied; as, he is out; or, he is out of the house, office, business, etc.; he came out; or, he came out from the ship, meeting, sect, party, etc. Out is used in a variety of applications, as: -- 1. Away; abroad; off; from home, or from a certain, or a usual, place; not in; not in a particular, or a usual, place; as, the proprietor is out, his team was taken out. "My shoulder blade is out." Shak. He hath been out (of the country) nine years. Shak. 2. Beyond the limits of concealment, confinement, privacy, constraint, etc., actual of figurative; hence, not in concealment, constraint, etc., in, or into, a state of freedom, openness, disclosure, publicity, etc.; as, the sun shines out; he laughed out, to be out at the elbows; the secret has leaked out, or is out; the disease broke out on his face; the book is out. Leaves are out and perfect in a month. Bacon. She has not been out [in general society] very long. H. James. 3. Beyond the limit of existence, continuance, or supply; to the end; completely; hence, in, or into, a condition of extinction, exhaustion, completion; as, the fuel, or the fire, has burned out. "Hear me out." Dryden. Deceitiful men shall not live out half their days. Ps. iv. 23. When the butt is out, we will drink water. Shak. 4. Beyond possession, control, or occupation; hence, in, or into, a state of want, loss, or deprivation; -- used of office, business, property, knowledge, etc.; as, the Democrats went out and the Whigs came in; he put his money out at interest. "Land that is out at rack rent." Locke. "He was out fifty pounds." Bp. Fell. I have forgot my part, and I am out. Shak. 5. Beyond the bounds of what is true, reasonable, correct, proper, common, etc.; in error or mistake; in a wrong or incorrect position or opinion; in a state of disagreement, opposition, etc.; in an inharmonious relation. "Lancelot and I are out." Shak. Wicked men are strangely out in the calculating of their own interest. South. Very seldom out, in these his guesses. Addison. 6. Not in the position to score in playing a game; not in the state or turn of the play for counting or gaining scores. Note: Out is largely used in composition as a prefix, with the same significations that it has as a separate word; as outbound, outbreak, outbuilding, outcome, outdo, outdoor, outfield. See also the first Note under Over, adv. Day in, day out, from the beginning to the limit of each of several days; day by day; every day. -- Out and out. (a) adv. Completely; wholly; openly. (b) adj. Without any reservation or disguise; absolute; as, an out and out villain. [As an adj. written also out-and-out.] -- Out at, Out in, Out on, etc., elliptical phrases, that to which out refers as a source, origin, etc., being omitted; as, out (of the house and) at the barn; out (of the house, road, fields, etc., and) in the woods. Three fishers went sailing out into the west, Out into the west, as the sun went down. C. Kingsley. Note: In these lines after out may be understood, "of the harbor," "from the shore," "of sight," or some similar phrase. The complete construction is seen in the saying: "Out of the frying pan into the fire." -- Out from, a construction similar to out of (below). See Of and From. Out of, a phrase which may be considered either as composed of an adverb and a preposition, each having its appropriate office in the sentence, or as a compound preposition. Considered as a preposition, it denotes, with verbs of movement or action, from the interior of; beyond the limit: from; hence, origin, source, motive, departure, separation, loss, etc.; -- opposed to in or into; also with verbs of being, the state of being derived, removed, or separated from. Examples may be found in the phrases below, and also under Vocabulary words; as, out of breath; out of countenance. Out of cess, beyond measure, excessively. Shak. -- Out of character, unbecoming; improper. -- Out of conceit with, not pleased with. See under Conceit. -- Out of date, not timely; unfashionable; antiquated. -- Out of door, Out of doors, beyond the doors; from the house; in, or into, the open air; hence, figuratively, shut out; dismissed. See under Door, also, Out-of-door, Outdoor, Outdoors, in the Vocabulary. "He 's quality, and the question's out of door," Dryden. -- Out of favor, disliked; under displeasure. -- Out of frame, not in correct order or condition; irregular; disarranged. Latimer. -- Out of hand, immediately; without delay or preparation. "Ananias . . . fell down and died out of hand." Latimer. -- Out of harm's way, beyond the danger limit; in a safe place. -- Out of joint, not in proper connection or adjustment; unhinged; disordered. "The time is out of joint." Shak. -- Out of mind, not in mind; forgotten; also, beyond the limit of memory; as, time out of mind. -- Out of one's head, beyond commanding one's mental powers; in a wandering state mentally; delirious. [Colloq.] -- Out of one's time, beyond one's period of minority or apprenticeship. -- Out of order, not in proper order; disarranged; in confusion. -- Out of place, not in the usual or proper place; hence, not proper or becoming. -- Out of pocket, in a condition of having expended or lost more money than one has received. -- Out of print, not in market, the edition printed being exhausted; -- said of books, pamphlets, etc. -- Out of the question, beyond the limits or range of consideration; impossible to be favorably considered. -- Out of reach, beyond one's reach; inaccessible. -- Out of season, not in a proper season or time; untimely; inopportune. -- Out of sorts, wanting certain things; unsatisfied; unwell; unhappy; cross. See under Sort, n. -- Out of temper, not in good temper; irritated; angry. -- Out of time, not in proper time; too soon, or too late. -- Out of time, not in harmony; discordant; hence, not in an agreeing temper; fretful. -- Out of twist, winding, or wind, not in warped condition; perfectly plain and smooth; -- said of surfaces. -- Out of use, not in use; unfashionable; obsolete. -- Out of the way. (a) On one side; hard to reach or find; secluded. (b) Improper; unusual; wrong. -- Out of the woods, not in a place, or state, of obscurity or doubt; free from difficulty or perils; safe. [Colloq.] -- Out to out, from one extreme limit to another, including the whole length, breadth, or thickness; -- applied to measurements. -- Out West, in or towards, the West; specifically, in some Western State or Territory. [U. S.] -- To come out, To cut out, To fall out, etc. See under Come, Cut, Fall, etc. -- To put out of the way, to kill; to destroy. -- Week in, week out. See Day in, day out (above).  1. One who, or that which, is out; especially, one who is out of office; -- generally in the plural. 2. A place or space outside of something; a nook or corner; an angle projecting outward; an open space; -- chiefly used in the phrase ins and outs; as, the ins and outs of a question. See under In. 3. (Print.)  A word or words omitted by the compositor in setting up copy; an omission. To make an out (Print.), to omit something, in setting or correcting type, which was in the copy.  1. To cause to be out; to eject; to expel. A king outed from his country. Selden. The French have been outed of their holds. Heylin. 2. To come out with; to make known. [Obs.] Chaucer. 3. To give out; to dispose of; to sell. [Obs.] Chaucer.  To come or go out; to get out or away; to become public. "Truth will out." Shak.  Expressing impatience, anger, a desire to be rid of; -- with the force of command; go out; begone; away; off. Out, idle words, servants to shallow fools ! Shak. Out upon or on! equivalent to "shame upon!" "away with!" as, out upon you!
cent: 1. A hundred; as, ten per cent, the proportion of ten parts in a hundred. 2. A United States coin, the hundredth part of a dollar, formerly made of copper, now of copper, tin, and zinc. 3. An old game at cards, supposed to be like piquet; -- so called because 100 points won the game. Nares.
term: 1. That which limits the extent of anything; limit; extremity; bound; boundary. Corruption is a reciprocal to generation, and they two are as nature's two terms, or boundaries. Bacon. 2. The time for which anything lasts; any limited time; as, a term of five years; the term of life. 3. In universities, schools, etc., a definite continuous period during which instruction is regularly given to students; as, the school year is divided into three terms. 4. (Geom.)  A point, line, or superficies, that limits; as, a line is the term of a superficies, and a superficies is the term of a solid. 5. (Law)  A fixed period of time; a prescribed duration; as: (a) The limitation of an estate; or rather, the whole time for which an estate is granted, as for the term of a life or lives, or for a term of years. (b) A space of time granted to a debtor for discharging his obligation. (c) The time in which a court is held or is open for the trial of causes. Bouvier. Note: In England, there were formerly four terms in the year, during which the superior courts were open: Hilary term, beginning on the 11th and ending on the 31st of January; Easter term, beginning on the 15th of April, and ending on the 8th of May; Trinity term, beginning on the 22d day of May, and ending on the 12th of June; Michaelmas term, beginning on the 2d and ending on the 25th day of November. The rest of the year was called vacation. But this division has been practically abolished by the Judicature Acts of 1873, 1875, which provide for the more convenient arrangement of the terms and vacations. In the United States, the terms to be observed by the tribunals of justice are prescribed by the statutes of Congress and of the several States. 6. (Logic)  The subject or the predicate of a proposition; one of the three component parts of a syllogism, each one of which is used twice. The subject and predicate of a proposition are, after Aristotle, together called its terms or extremes. Sir W. Hamilton. Note: The predicate of the conclusion is called the major term, because it is the most general, and the subject of the conclusion is called the minor term, because it is less general. These are called the extermes; and the third term, introduced as a common measure between them, is called the mean or middle term. Thus in the following syllogism, --Every vegetable is combustible; Every tree is a vegetable; Therefore every tree is combustible, -combustible, the predicate of the conclusion, is the major term; tree is the minor term; vegetable is the middle term. 7. A word or expression; specifically, one that has a precisely limited meaning in certain relations and uses, or is peculiar to a science, art, profession, or the like; as, a technical term. "Terms quaint of law." Chaucer. In painting, the greatest beauties can not always be expressed for want of terms. Dryden. 8. (Arch.)  A quadrangular pillar, adorned on the top with the figure of a head, as of a man, woman, or satyr; -- called also terminal figure. See Terminus, n., 2 and 3. Note: The pillar part frequently tapers downward, or is narrowest at the base. Terms rudely carved were formerly used for landmarks or boundaries. Gwilt. 9. (Alg.)  A member of a compound quantity; as, a or b in a + b; ab or cd in ab - cd. 10. pl. (Med.)  The menses. 11. pl. (Law)  Propositions or promises, as in contracts, which, when assented to or accepted by another, settle the contract and bind the parties; conditions. 12. (Law)  In Scotland, the time fixed for the payment of rents. Note: Terms legal and conventional in Scotland correspond to quarter days in England and Ireland. There are two legal terms -- Whitsunday, May 15, and Martinmas, Nov. 11; and two conventional terms -- Candlemas, Feb. 2, and Lammas day, Aug. 1. Mozley & W. 13. (Naut.)  A piece of carved work placed under each end of the taffrail. J. Knowels. In term, in set terms; in formal phrase. [Obs.] I can not speak in term. Chaucer. -- Term fee (Law) (a), a fee by the term, chargeable to a suitor, or by law fixed and taxable in the costs of a cause for each or any term it is in court. -- Terms of a proportion (Math.), the four members of which it is composed. -- To bring to terms, to compel (one) to agree, assent, or submit; to force (one) to come to terms. -- To make terms, to come to terms; to make an agreement: to agree. Syn. -- Limit; bound; boundary; condition; stipulation; word; expression. -- Term, Word. These are more frequently interchanged than almost any other vocables that occur of the language. There is, however, a difference between them which is worthy of being kept in mind. Word is generic; it denotes an utterance which represents or expresses our thoughts and feelings. Term originally denoted one of the two essential members of a proposition in logic, and hence signifies a word of specific meaning, and applicable to a definite class of objects. Thus, we may speak of a scientific or a technical term, and of stating things in distinct terms. Thus we say, "the term minister literally denotes servant;" "an exact definition of terms is essential to clearness of thought;" "no term of reproach can sufficiently express my indignation;" "every art has its peculiar and distinctive terms," etc. So also we say, "purity of style depends on the choice of words, and precision of style on a clear understanding of the terms used." Term is chiefly applied to verbs, nouns, and adjectives, these being capable of standing as terms in a logical proposition; while prepositions and conjunctions, which can never be so employed, are rarely spoken of as terms, but simply as words.  To apply a term to; to name; to call; to denominate. Men term what is beyond the limits of the universe "imaginary space." Locke.
substance: 1. That which underlies all outward manifestations; substratum; the permanent subject or cause of phenomena, whether material or spiritual; that in which properties inhere; that which is real, in distinction from that which is apparent; the abiding part of any existence, in distinction from any accident; that which constitutes anything what it is; real or existing essence. These cooks, how they stamp, and strain, and grind, And turn substance into accident! Chaucer. Heroic virtue did his actions guide, And he the substance, not the appearance, chose. Dryden. 2. The most important element in any existence; the characteristic and essential components of anything; the main part; essential import; purport. This edition is the same in substance with the Latin. Bp. Burnet. It is insolent in words, in manner; but in substance it is not only insulting, but alarming. Burke. 3. Body; matter; material of which a thing is made; hence, substantiality; solidity; firmness; as, the substance of which a garment is made; some textile fabrics have little substance. 4. Material possessions; estate; property; resources. And there wasted his substance with riotous living. Luke xv. 13. Thy substance, valued at the highest rate, Can not amount unto a hundred marks. Shak. We are destroying many thousand lives, and exhausting our substance, but not for our own interest. Swift. 5. (Theol.)  Same as Hypostasis, 2.  To furnish or endow with substance; to supply property to; to make rich. [Obs.]
wife: 1. A woman; an adult female; -- now used in literature only in certain compounds and phrases, as alewife, fishwife, goodwife, and the like. " Both men and wives." Piers Plowman. On the green he saw sitting a wife. Chaucer. 2. The lawful consort of a man; a woman who is united to a man in wedlock; a woman who has a husband; a married woman; -- correlative of husband. " The husband of one wife." 1 Tin. iii. 2. Let every one you . . . so love his wife even as himself, and the wife see that she reverence her husband. Eph. v. 33. To give to wife, To take to wife, to give or take (a woman) in marriage. -- Wife's equity (Law), the equitable right or claim of a married woman to a reasonable and adequate provision, by way of settlement or otherwise, out of her choses in action, or out of any property of hers which is under the jurisdiction of the Court of Chancery, for the support of herself and her children. Burrill.
anger: 1. Trouble; vexation; also, physical pain or smart of a sore, etc. [Obs.] I made the experiment, setting the moxa where . . . the greatest anger and soreness still continued. Temple. 2. A strong passion or emotion of displeasure or antagonism, excited by a real or supposed injury or insult to one's self or others, or by the intent to do such injury. Anger is like A full hot horse, who being allowed his way, Self- mettle tires him. Shak. Syn. -- Resentment; wrath; rage; fury; passion; ire gall; choler; indignation; displeasure; vexation; grudge; spleen. -- Anger, Indignation, Resentment, Wrath, Ire, Rage, Fury. Anger is a feeling of keen displeasure (usually with a desire to punish) for what we regard as wrong toward ourselves or others. It may be excessive or misplaced, but is not necessarily criminal. Indignation is a generous outburst of anger in view of things which are indigna, or unworthy to be done, involving what is mean, cruel, flagitious, etc., in character or conduct. Resentment is often a moody feeling, leading one to brood over his supposed personal wrongs with a deep and lasting anger. See Resentment. Wrath and ire (the last poetical) express the feelings of one who is bitterly provoked. Rage is a vehement ebullition of anger; and fury is an excess of rage, amounting almost to madness. Warmth of constitution often gives rise to anger; a high sense of honor creates indignation at crime; a man of quick sensibilities is apt to cherish resentment; the wrath and ire of men are often connected with a haughty and vindictive spirit; rage and fury are distempers of the soul to be regarded only with abhorrence.  1. To make painful; to cause to smart; to inflame. [Obs.] He . . . angereth malign ulcers. Bacon. 2. To excite to anger; to enrage; to provoke. Taxes and impositions . . . which rather angered than grieved the people. Clarendon.
left: of Leave.  Of or pertaining to that side of the body in man on which the muscular action of the limbs is usually weaker than on the other side; -- opposed to right, when used in reference to a part of the body; as, the left ear. Also said of the corresponding side of the lower animals. Left bank of a river, that which is on the left hand of a person whose face is turned downstream. -- Left bower. See under 2d Bower. -- Left center, the members whose sympathies are, in the main, with the members of the Left, but who do not favor extreme courses, and on occasions vote with the government. They sit between the Center and the extreme Left. -- Over the left shoulder, or Over the left, an old but still current colloquialism, or slang expression, used as an aside to indicate insincerity, negation, or disbelief; as, he said it, and it is true, -- over the left.  1. that part of surrounding space toward which the left side of one's body is turned; as, the house is on the left when you face North. Put that rose a little more to the left. Ld. Lytton. 2. those members of a legislative assembly (as in France) who are in the opposition; the advanced republicans and extreme radicals. They have their seats at the left-hand side of the presiding officer. See Center, and Right.
dress: 1. To direct; to put right or straight; to regulate; to order. [Obs.] At all times thou shalt bless God and pray Him to dress thy ways. Chaucer. Note: Dress is used reflexively in Old English, in sense of "to direct one's step; to addresss one's self." To Grisild again will I me dresse. Chaucer. 2. (Mil.)  To arrange in exact continuity of line, as soldiers; commonly to adjust to a straight line and at proper distance; to align; as, to dress the ranks. 3. (Med.)  To treat methodically with remedies, bandages, or curative appliances, as a sore, an ulcer, a wound, or a wounded or diseased part. 4. To adjust; to put in good order; to arrange; specifically: (a) To prepare for use; to fit for any use; to render suitable for an intended purpose; to get ready; as, to dress a slain animal; to dress meat; to dress leather or cloth; to dress or trim a lamp; to dress a garden; to dress a horse, by currying and rubbing; to dress grain, by cleansing it; in mining and metallurgy, to dress ores, by sorting and separating them. And the Lord God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden to dress it. Gen. ii. 15. When he dresseth the lamps he shall burn incense. Ex. xxx. 7. Three hundred horses . . . smoothly dressed. Dryden. Dressing their hair with the white sea flower. Tennyson . If he felt obliged to expostulate, he might have dressed his censures in a kinder form. Carlyle. (b) To cut to proper dimensions, or give proper shape to, as to a tool by hammering; also, to smooth or finish. (c) To put in proper condition by appareling, as the body; to put clothes upon; to apparel; to invest with garments or rich decorations; to clothe; to deck. Dressed myself in such humility. Shak. Prove that ever Idress myself handsome till thy return. Shak. (d) To break and train for use, as a horse or other animal. To dress up or out, to dress elaborately, artificially, or pompously. "You see very often a king of England or France dressed up like a Julius Cæsar." Addison. -- To dress a ship (Naut.), to ornament her by hoisting the national colors at the peak and mastheads, and setting the jack forward; when dressed full, the signal flags and pennants are added. Ham. Nav. Encyc. Syn. -- To attire; apparel; clothe; accouter; array; robe; rig; trim; deck; adorn; embellish.  1. (Mil.)  To arrange one's self in due position in a line of soldiers; -- the word of command to form alignment in ranks; as, Right, dress! 2. To clothe or apparel one's self; to put on one's garments; to pay particular regard to dress; as, to dress quickly. "To dress for a ball." Latham. To flaunt, to dress, to dance, to thrum. Tennyson . To dress to the right, To dress to the left, To dress on the center (Mil.), to form alignment with reference to the soldier on the extreme right, or in the center, of the rank, who serves as a guide.  1. That which is used as the covering or ornament of the body; clothes; garments; habit; apparel. "In your soldier's dress." Shak. 2. A lady's gown; as, silk or a velvet dress. 3. Attention to apparel, or skill in adjusting it. Men of pleasure, dress, and gallantry. Pope. 4. (Milling)  The system of furrows on the face of a millstone. Knight. Dress circle. See under Circle. -- Dress parade (Mil.), a parade in full uniform for review.
plant: 1. A vegetable; an organized living being, generally without feeling and voluntary motion, and having, when complete, a root, stem, and leaves, though consisting sometimes only of a single leafy expansion, or a series of cellules, or even a single cellule. Note: Plants are divided by their structure and methods of reproduction into two series, phænogamous or flowering plants, which have true flowers and seeds, and cryptogamous or flowerless plants, which have no flowers, and reproduce by minute one-celled spores. In both series are minute and simple forms and others of great size and complexity. As to their mode of nutrition, plants may be considered as self-supporting and dependent. Self-supporting plants always contain chlorophyll, and subsist on air and moisture and the matter dissolved in moisture, and as a general rule they excrete oxygen, and use the carbonic acid to combine with water and form the material for their tissues. Dependent plants comprise all fungi and many flowering plants of a parasitic or saprophytic nature. As a rule, they have no chlorophyll, and subsist mainly or wholly on matter already organized, thus utilizing carbon compounds already existing, and not excreting oxygen. But there are plants which are partly dependent and partly self-supporting. The movements of climbing plants, of some insectivorous plants, of leaves, stamens, or pistils in certain plants, and the ciliary motion of zoöspores, etc., may be considered a kind of voluntary motion. 2. A bush, or young tree; a sapling; hence, a stick or staff. "A plant of stubborn oak." Dryden. 3. The sole of the foot. [R.] "Knotty legs and plants of clay." B. Jonson. 4. (Com.)  The whole machinery and apparatus employed in carrying on a trade or mechanical business; also, sometimes including real estate, and whatever represents investment of capital in the means of carrying on a business, but not including material worked upon or finished products; as, the plant of a foundry, a mill, or a railroad. 5. A plan; an artifice; a swindle; a trick. [Slang] It was n't a bad plant, that of mine, on Fikey. Dickens. 6. (Zoöl.) (a) An oyster which has been bedded, in distinction from one of natural growth. (b) A young oyster suitable for transplanting. [Local, U.S.] Plant bug (Zoöl.), any one of numerous hemipterous insects which injure the foliage of plants, as Lygus lineolaris, which damages wheat and trees. -- Plant cutter (Zoöl.), a South American passerine bird of the genus Phytotoma, family Phytotomidæ. It has a serrated bill with which it cuts off the young shoots and buds of plants, often doing much injury. -- Plant louse (Zoöl.), any small hemipterous insect which infests plants, especially those of the families Aphidæ and Psyllidæ; an aphid.  1. To put in the ground and cover, as seed for growth; as, to plant maize. 2. To set in the ground for growth, as a young tree, or a vegetable with roots. Thou shalt not plant thee a grove of any trees. Deut. xvi. 21. 3. To furnish, or fit out, with plants; as, to plant a garden, an orchard, or a forest. 4. To engender; to generate; to set the germ of. It engenders choler, planteth anger. Shak. 5. To furnish with a fixed and organized population; to settle; to establish; as, to plant a colony. Planting of countries like planting of woods. Bacon. 6. To introduce and establish the principles or seeds of; as, to plant Christianity among the heathen. 7. To set firmly; to fix; to set and direct, or point; as, to plant cannon against a fort; to plant a standard in any place; to plant one's feet on solid ground; to plant one's fist in another's face. 8. To set up; to install; to instate. We will plant some other in the throne. Shak.  To perform the act of planting. I have planted; Apollos watered. 1 Cor. iii. 6.
repeat: 1. To go over again; to attempt, do, make, or utter again; to iterate; to recite; as, to repeat an effort, an order, or a poem. "I will repeat our former communication." Robynson (More's Utopia). Not well conceived of God; who, though his power Creation could repeat, yet would be loth Us to abolish. Milton. 2. To make trial of again; to undergo or encounter again. [Obs.] Waller. 3. (Scots Law)  To repay or refund (an excess received). To repeat one's self, to do or say what one has already done or said. -- To repeat signals, to make the same signals again; specifically, to communicate, by repeating them, the signals shown at headquarters. Syn. -- To reiterate; iterate; renew; recite; relate; rehearse; recapitulate. See Reiterate.  1. The act of repeating; repetition. 2. That which is repeated; as, the repeat of a pattern; that is, the repetition of the engraved figure on a roller by which an impression is produced (as in calico printing, etc.). 3. (Mus.)  A mark, or series of dots, placed before and after, or often only at the end of, a passage to be repeated in performance.
do: A syllable attached to the first tone of the major diatonic scale for the purpose of solmization, or solfeggio. It is the first of the seven syllables used by the Italians as manes of musical tones, and replaced, for the sake of euphony, the syllable Ut, applied to the note C. In England and America the same syllables are used by mane as a scale pattern, while the tones in respect to absolute pitch are named from the first seven letters of the alphabet.  1. To place; to put. [Obs.] Tale of a Usurer (about 1330). 2. To cause; to make; -- with an infinitive. [Obs.] My lord Abbot of Westminster did do shewe to me late certain evidences. W. Caxton. I shall . . . your cloister do make. Piers Plowman. A fatal plague which many did to die. Spenser. We do you to wit [i. e., We make you to know] of the grace of God bestowed on the churches of Macedonia. 2 Cor. viii. 1. Note: We have lost the idiom shown by the citations (do used like the French faire or laisser), in which the verb in the infinitive apparently, but not really, has a passive signification, i. e., cause . . . to be made. 3. To bring about; to produce, as an effect or result; to effect; to achieve. The neglecting it may do much danger. Shak. He waved indifferently' twixt doing them neither good not harm. Shak. 4. To perform, as an action; to execute; to transact to carry out in action; as, to do a good or a bad act; do our duty; to do what I can. Six days shalt thou labor and do all thy work. Ex. xx. 9. We did not do these things. Ld. Lytton. You can not do wrong without suffering wrong. Emerson. Hence: To do homage, honor, favor, justice, etc., to render homage, honor, etc. 5. To bring to an end by action; to perform completely; to finish; to accomplish; -- a sense conveyed by the construction, which is that of the past participle done. "Ere summer half be done." "I have done weeping." Shak. 6. To make ready for an object, purpose, or use, as food by cooking; to cook completely or sufficiently; as, the meat is done on one side only. 7. To put or bring into a form, state, or condition, especially in the phrases, to do death, to put to death; to slay; to do away (often do away with), to put away; to remove; to do on, to put on; to don; to do off, to take off, as dress; to doff; to do into, to put into the form of; to translate or transform into, as a text. Done to death by slanderous tongues. Shak. The ground of the difficulty is done away. Paley. Suspicions regarding his loyalty were entirely done away. Thackeray. To do on our own harness, that we may not; but we must do on the armor of God. Latimer. Then Jason rose and did on him a fair Blue woolen tunic. W. Morris (Jason). Though the former legal pollution be now done off, yet there is a spiritual contagion in idolatry as much to be shunned. Milton. It ["Pilgrim's Progress"] has been done into verse: it has been done into modern English. Macaulay. 8. To cheat; to gull; to overreach. [Colloq.] He was not be done, at his time of life, by frivolous offers of a compromise that might have secured him seventy-five per cent. De Quincey. 9. To see or inspect; to explore; as, to do all the points of interest. [Colloq.] 10. (Stock Exchange)  To cash or to advance money for, as a bill or note. Note: (a) Do and did are much employed as auxiliaries, the verb to which they are joined being an infinitive. As an auxiliary the verb do has no participle. "I do set my bow in the cloud." Gen. ix. 13. [Now archaic or rare except for emphatic assertion.] Rarely . . . did the wrongs of individuals to the knowledge of the public. Macaulay. (b) They are often used in emphatic construction. "You don't say so, Mr. Jobson. -- but I do say so." Sir W. Scott. "I did love him, but scorn him now." Latham. (c) In negative and interrogative constructions, do and did are in common use. I do not wish to see them; what do you think Did Cæsar cross the Tiber He did not. "Do you love me" Shak. (d) Do, as an auxiliary, is supposed to have been first used before imperatives. It expresses entreaty or earnest request; as, do help me. In the imperative mood, but not in the indicative, it may be used with the verb to be; as, do be quiet. Do, did, and done often stand as a general substitute or representative verb, and thus save the repetition of the principal verb. "To live and die is all we have to do." Denham. In the case of do and did as auxiliaries, the sense may be completed by the infinitive (without to) of the verb represented. "When beauty lived and died as flowers do now." Shak. "I . . . chose my wife as she did her wedding gown." Goldsmith. My brightest hopes giving dark fears a being. As the light does the shadow. Longfellow. In unemphatic affirmative sentences do is, for the most part, archaic or poetical; as, "This just reproach their virtue does excite." Dryden. To do one's best, To do one's diligence (and the like), to exert one's self; to put forth one's best or most or most diligent efforts. "We will . . . do our best to gain their assent." Jowett (Thucyd.). -- To do one's business, to ruin one. [Colloq.] Wycherley. -- To do one shame, to cause one shame. [Obs.] -- To do over. (a) To make over; to perform a second time. (b) To cover; to spread; to smear. "Boats . . . sewed together and done over with a kind of slimy stuff like rosin." De Foe. -- To do to death, to put to death. (See 7.) [Obs.] -- To do up. (a) To put up; to raise. [Obs.] Chaucer. (b) To pack together and envelop; to pack up. (c) To accomplish thoroughly. [Colloq.] (d) To starch and iron. "A rich gown of velvet, and a ruff done up with the famous yellow starch." Hawthorne. -- To do way, to put away; to lay aside. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To do with, to dispose of; to make use of; to employ; -- usually preceded by what. "Men are many times brought to that extremity, that were it not for God they would not know what to do with themselves." Tillotson. -- To have to do with, to have concern, business or intercourse with; to deal with. When preceded by what, the notion is usually implied that the affair does not concern the person denoted by the subject of have. "Philology has to do with language in its fullest sense." Earle. "What have I to do with you, ye sons of Zeruiah 2 Sam. xvi. 10.  1. To act or behave in any manner; to conduct one's self. They fear not the Lord, neither do they after . . . the law and commandment. 2 Kings xvii. 34. 2. To fare; to be, as regards health; as, they asked him how he did; how do you do to-day 3. Etym: [Perh. a different word. OE. dugen, dowen, to avail, be of use, AS. dugan. See Doughty.]  To succeed; to avail; to answer the purpose; to serve; as, if no better plan can be found, he will make this do. You would do well to prefer a bill against all kings and parliaments since the Conquest; and if that won't do; challenge the crown. Collier. To do by. See under By. -- To do for. (a) To answer for; to serve as; to suit. (b) To put an end to; to ruin; to baffle completely; as, a goblet is done for when it is broken. [Colloq.] Some folks are happy and easy in mind when their victim is stabbed and done for. Thackeray. -- To do withal, to help or prevent it. [Obs.] "I could not do withal." Shak. -- To do without, to get along without; to dispense with. -- To have done, to have made an end or conclusion; to have finished; to be quit; to desist. -- To have done with, to have completed; to be through with; to have no further concern with. -- Well to do, in easy circumstances.  1. Deed; act; fear. [Obs.] Sir W. Scott. 2. Ado; bustle; stir; to do. [R.] A great deal of do, and a great deal of trouble. Selden. 3. A cheat; a swindle. [Slang, Eng.]
reply: 1. To make a return in words or writing; to respond; to answer. O man, who art thou that repliest against God Rom. ix. 20. 2. (Law)  To answer a defendant's plea. 3. Figuratively, to do something in return for something done; as, to reply to a signal; to reply to the fire of a battery. Syn. -- To answer; respond; rejoin.  To return for an answer. Milton. Lords, vouchsafe To give me hearing what I shall reply. Shak.  That which is said, written, or done in answer to what is said, written, or done by another; an answer; a response. Syn. -- Answer; rejoinder; response. -- Reply, Rejoinder, Answer. A reply is a distinct response to a formal question or attack in speech or writing. A rejoinder is a second reply (a reply to a reply) in a protracted discussion or controversy. The word answer is used in two senses, namely (1), in the most general sense of a mere response; as, the answer to a question; or (2), in the sense of a decisive and satisfactory confutation of an adversary's argument, as when we speak of a triumphant answer to the speech or accusations of an opponent. Here the noun corresponds to a frequent use of the verb, as when we say. "This will answer (i.e., fully meet) the end in view;" "It answers the purpose."
require: 1. To demand; to insist upon having; to claim as by right and authority; to exact; as, to require the surrender of property. Shall I say to Cæsar What you require of him Shak. By nature did what was by law required. Dryden. 2. To demand or exact as indispensable; to need. just gave what life required, and gave no more. Goldsmith. The two last [biographies] require to be particularly noticed. J. A. Symonds. 3. To ask as a favor; to request. I was ashamed to require of the king a band of soldiers and horsemen to help us against the enemy in the way. Ezra viii. 22. Syn. -- To claim; exact; enjoin; prescribe; direct; order; demand; need.
food: 1. What is fed upon; that which goes to support life by being received within, and assimilated by, the organism of an animal or a plant; nutriment; aliment; especially, what is eaten by animals for nourishment. Note: In a physiological sense, true aliment is to be distinguished as that portion of the food which is capable of being digested and absorbed into the blood, thus furnishing nourishment, in distinction from the indigestible matter which passes out through the alimentary canal as fæces. Note: Foods are divided into two main groups: nitrogenous, or proteid, foods, i.e., those which contain nitrogen, and nonnitrogenous, i.e., those which do not contain nitrogen. The latter group embraces the fats and carbohydrates, which collectively are sometimes termed heat producers or respiratory foods, since by oxidation in the body they especially subserve the production of heat. The proteids, on the other hand, are known as plastic foods or tissue formers, since no tissue can be formed without them. These latter terms, however, are misleading, since proteid foods may also give rise to heat both directly and indirectly, and the fats and carbohydrates are useful in other ways than in producing heat. 2. Anything that instructs the intellect, excites the feelings, or molds habits of character; that which nourishes. This may prove food to my displeasure. Shak. In this moment there is life and food For future years. Wordsworth. Note: Food is often used adjectively or in self-explaining compounds, as in food fish or food-fish, food supply. Food vacuole (Zoöl.), one of the spaces in the interior of a protozoan in which food is contained, during digestion. -- Food yolk. (Biol.) See under Yolk. Syn. -- Aliment; sustenance; nutriment; feed; fare; victuals; provisions; meat.  To supply with food. [Obs.] Baret.
change: 1. To alter; to make different; to cause to pass from one state to another; as, to change the position, character, or appearance of a thing; to change the countenance. Therefore will I change their glory into shame. Hosea. iv. 7. 2. To alter by substituting something else for, or by giving up for something else; as, to change the clothes; to change one's occupation; to change one's intention. They that do change old love for new, Pray gods, they change for worse! Peele. 3. To give and take reciprocally; to exchange; -- followed by with; as, to change place, or hats, or money, with another. Look upon those thousands with whom thou wouldst not, for any interest, change thy fortune and condition. Jer. Taylor. 4. Specifically: To give, or receive, smaller denominations of money (technically called change) for; as, to change a gold coin or a bank bill. He pulled out a thirty-pound note and bid me change it. Goldsmith. To change a horse, or To change hand (Man.), to turn or bear the horse's head from one hand to the other, from the left to right, or from the right to the left. -- To change hands, to change owners. -- To change one's tune, to become less confident or boastful. [Colloq.] -- To change step, to take a break in the regular succession of steps, in marching or walking, as by bringing the hollow of one foot against the heel of the other, and then stepping off with the foot which is in advance. Syn. -- To alter; vary; deviate; substitute; innovate; diversify; shift; veer; turn. See Alter.  1. To be altered; to undergo variation; as, men sometimes change for the better. For I am Lord, I change not. Mal. iii. 6. 2. To pass from one phase to another; as, the moon changes to-morrow night.  1. Any variation or alteration; a passing from one state or form to another; as, a change of countenance; a change of habits or principles. Apprehensions of a change of dynasty. Hallam. All the days of my appointed time will I wait, till my change come. Job xiv. 14. 2. A succesion or substitution of one thing in the place of another; a difference; novelty; variety; as, a change of seasons. Our fathers did for change to France repair. Dryden. The ringing grooves of change. Tennyson. 3. A passing from one phase to another; as, a change of the moon. 4. Alteration in the order of a series; permutation. 5. That which makes a variety, or may be substituted for another. Thirty change (R.V. changes) of garments. Judg. xiv. 12. 6. Small money; the money by means of which the larger coins and bank bills are made available in small dealings; hence, the balance returned when payment is tendered by a coin or note exceeding the sum due. 7. Etym: [See Exchange.]  A place where merchants and others meet to transact business; a building appropriated for mercantile transactions. [Colloq. for Exchange.] 8. A public house; an alehouse. [Scot.] They call an alehouse a change. Burt. 9. (Mus.)  Any order in which a number of bells are struck, other than that of the diatonic scale. Four bells admit twenty-four changes in ringing. Holder. Change of life, the period in the life of a woman when menstruation and the capacity for conception cease, usually occurring between forty-five and fifty years of age. -- Change ringing, the continual production, without repetition, of changes on bells, See def. 9. above. -- Change wheel (Mech.), one of a set of wheels of different sizes and number of teeth, that may be changed or substituted one for another in machinery, to produce a different but definite rate of angular velocity in an axis, as in cutting screws, gear, etc. -- To ring the changes on, to present the same facts or arguments in variety of ways. Syn. -- Variety; variation; alteration; mutation; transition; vicissitude; innovation; novelty; transmutation; revolution; reverse.
should: Used as an auxiliary verb, to express a conditional or contingent act or state, or as a supposition of an actual fact; also, to express moral obligation (see Shall); e. g.: they should have come last week; if I should go; I should think you could go. "You have done that you should be sorry for." Shak. Syn. -- See Ought.
rail: An outer cloak or covering; a neckerchief for women. Fairholt.  To flow forth; to roll out; to course. [Obs.] Streams of tears from her fair eyes forth railing. Spenser.  1. A bar of timber or metal, usually horizontal or nearly so, extending from one post or support to another, as in fences, balustrades, staircases, etc. 2. (Arch.)  A horizontal piece in a frame or paneling. See Illust. of Style. 3. (Railroad)  A bar of steel or iron, forming part of the track on which the wheels roll. It is usually shaped with reference to vertical strength, and is held in place by chairs, splices, etc. 4. (Naut.) (a) The stout, narrow plank that forms the top of the bulwarks. (b) The light, fencelike structures of wood or metal at the break of the deck, and elsewhere where such protection is needed. Rail fence. See under Fence. -- Rail guard. (a) A device attached to the front of a locomotive on each side for clearing the rail obstructions. (b) A guard rail. See under Guard. -- Rail joint (Railroad), a splice connecting the adjacent ends of rails, in distinction from a chair, which is merely a seat. The two devices are sometimes united. Among several hundred varieties, the fish joint is standard. See Fish joint, under Fish. -- Rail train (Iron & Steel Manuf.), a train of rolls in a rolling mill, for making rails for railroads from blooms or billets.  1. To inclose with rails or a railing. It ought to be fenced in and railed. Ayliffe. 2. To range in a line. [Obs.] They were brought to London all railed in ropes, like a team of horses in a cart. Bacon.  Any one of numerous species of limicoline birds of the family Rallidæ, especially those of the genus Rallus, and of closely allied genera. They are prized as game birds. Note: The common European water rail (Rallus aquaticus) is called also bilcock, skitty coot, and brook runner. The best known American species are the clapper rail, or salt-marsh hen (Rallus lonqirostris, var. crepitans); the king, or red-breasted, rail (R. elegans) (called also fresh-water marshhen); the lesser clapper, or Virginia, rail (R. Virginianus); and the Carolina, or sora, rail (Porzana Carolina). See Sora. Land rail (Zoöl.), the corncrake.  To use insolent and reproachful language; to utter reproaches; to scoff; followed by at or against, formerly by on. Shak. And rail at arts he did not understand. Dryden. Lesbia forever on me rails. Swift.  1. To rail at. [Obs.] Feltham. 2. To move or influence by railing. [R.] Rail the seal from off my bond. Shak.
produce: 1. To bring forward; to lead forth; to offer to view or notice; to exhibit; to show; as, to produce a witness or evidence in court. Produce your cause, saith the Lord. Isa. xli. 21. Your parents did not produce you much into the world. Swift. 2. To bring forth, as young, or as a natural product or growth; to give birth to; to bear; to generate; to propagate; to yield; to furnish; as, the earth produces grass; trees produce fruit; the clouds produce rain. This soil produces all sorts of palm trees. Sandys. [They] produce prodigious births of body or mind. Milton. The greatest jurist his country had produced. Macaulay. 3. To cause to be or to happen; to originate, as an effect or result; to bring about; as, disease produces pain; vice produces misery. 4. To give being or form to; to manufacture; to make; as, a manufacturer produces excellent wares. 5. To yield or furnish; to gain; as, money at interest produces an income; capital produces profit. 6. To draw out; to extend; to lengthen; to prolong; as, to produce a man's life to threescore. Sir T. Browne. 7. (Geom.)  To extend; -- applied to a line, surface, or solid; as, to produce a side of a triangle.  To yield or furnish appropriate offspring, crops, effects, consequences, or results.  That which is produced, brought forth, or yielded; product; yield; proceeds; result of labor, especially of agricultural labors; hence, specifically, agricultural products.
game: Crooked; lame; as, a game leg. [Colloq.]  1. Sport of any kind; jest, frolic. We have had pastimes here, and pleasant game. Shak. 2. A contest, physical or mental, according to certain rules, for amusement, recreation, or for winning a stake; as, a game of chance; games of skill; field games, etc. But war's a game, which, were their subject wise, Kings would not play at. Cowper. Note: Among the ancients, especially the Greeks and Romans, there were regularly recurring public exhibitions of strength, agility, and skill under the patronage of the government, usually accompanied with religious ceremonies. Such were the Olympic, the Pythian, the Nemean, and the Isthmian games. 3. The use or practice of such a game; a single match at play; a single contest; as, a game at cards. Talk the game o'er between the deal. Lloyd. 4. That which is gained, as the stake in a game; also, the number of points necessary to be scored in order to win a game; as, in short whist five points are game. 5. (Card Playing)  In some games, a point credited on the score to the player whose cards counts up the highest. 6. A scheme or art employed in the pursuit of an object or purpose; method of procedure; projected line of operations; plan; project. Your murderous game is nearly up. Blackw. Mag. It was obviously Lord Macaulay's game to blacken the greatest literary champion of the cause he had set himself to attack. Saintsbury. 7. Animals pursued and taken by sportsmen; wild meats designed for, or served at, table. Those species of animals . . . distinguished from the rest by the well-known appellation of game. Blackstone. Confidence game. See under Confidence. -- To make game of, to make sport of; to mock. Milton.  1. Having a resolute, unyielding spirit, like the gamecock; ready to fight to the last; plucky. I was game . . . .I felt that I could have fought even to the death. W. Irving. 2. Of or pertaining to such animals as are hunted for game, or to the act or practice of hunting. Game bag, a sportsman's bag for carrying small game captured; also, the whole quantity of game taken. -- Game bird, any bird commonly shot for food, esp. grouse, partridges, quails, pheasants, wild turkeys, and the shore or wading birds, such as plovers, snipe, woodcock, curlew, and sandpipers. The term is sometimes arbitrarily restricted to birds hunted by sportsmen, with dogs and guns. -- Game egg, an egg producing a gamecock. -- Game laws, laws regulating the seasons and manner of taking game for food or for sport. -- Game preserver, a land owner who regulates the killing of game on his estate with a view to its increase. [Eng.] -- To be game. (a) To show a brave, unyielding spirit. (b) To be victor in a game. [Colloq.] -- To die game, to maintain a bold, unyielding spirit to the last; to die fighting.  1. To rejoice; to be pleased; -- often used, in Old English, impersonally with dative. [Obs.] God loved he best with all his whole hearte At alle times, though him gamed or smarte. Chaucer. 2. To play at any sport or diversion. 3. To play for a stake or prize; to use cards, dice, billiards, or other instruments, according to certain rules, with a view to win money or other thing waged upon the issue of the contest; to gamble.
back: 1. A large shallow vat; a cistern, tub, or trough, used by brewers, distillers, dyers, picklers, gluemakers, and others, for mixing or cooling wort, holding water, hot glue, etc. Hop back, Jack back, the cistern which receives the infusion of malt and hops from the copper. -- Wash back, a vat in which distillers ferment the wort to form wash. -- Water back, a cistern to hold a supply of water; esp. a small cistern at the back of a stove, or a group of pipes set in the fire box of a stove or furnace, through which water circulates and is heated. 2. A ferryboat. See Bac, 1  1. In human beings, the hinder part of the body, extending from the neck to the end of the spine; in other animals, that part of the body which corresponds most nearly to such part of a human being; as, the back of a horse, fish, or lobster. 2. An extended upper part, as of a mountain or ridge. [The mountains] their broad bare backs upheave Into the clouds. Milton. 3. The outward or upper part of a thing, as opposed to the inner or lower part; as, the back of the hand, the back of the foot, the back of a hand rail. Methought Love pitying me, when he saw this, Gave me your hands, the backs and palms to kiss. Donne. 4. The part opposed to the front; the hinder or rear part of a thing; as, the back of a book; the back of an army; the back of a chimney. 5. The part opposite to, or most remote from, that which fronts the speaker or actor; or the part out of sight, or not generally seen; as, the back of an island, of a hill, or of a village. 6. The part of a cutting tool on the opposite side from its edge; as, the back of a knife, or of a saw. 7. A support or resource in reserve. This project Should have a back or second, that might hold, If this should blast in proof. Shak. 8. (Naut.)  The keel and keelson of a ship. 9. (Mining)  The upper part of a lode, or the roof of a horizontal underground passage. 10. A garment for the back; hence, clothing. A bak to walken inne by daylight. Chaucer. Behind one's back, when one is absent; without one's knowledge; as, to ridicule a person behind his back. -- Full back, Half back, Quarter back (Football), players stationed behind those in the front line. -- To be or lie on one's back, to be helpless. -- To put, or get, one's back up, to assume an attitude of obstinate resistance (from the action of a cat when attacked.). [Colloq.] -- To see the back of, to get rid of. -- To turn the back, to go away; to flee. -- To turn the back on one, to forsake or neglect him.  1. Being at the back or in the rear; distant; remote; as, the back door; back settlements. 2. Being in arrear; overdue; as, back rent. 3. Moving or operating backward; as, back action. Back charges, charges brought forward after an account has been made up. -- Back filling (Arch.), the mass of materials used in filling up the space between two walls, or between the inner and outer faces of a wall, or upon the haunches of an arch or vault. -- Back pressure. (Steam Engine) See under Pressure. -- Back rest, a guide attached to the slide rest of a lathe, and placed in contact with the work, to steady it in turning. -- Back slang, a kind of slang in which every word is written or pronounced backwards; as, nam for man. -- Back stairs, stairs in the back part of a house; private stairs. Also used adjectively. See Back stairs, Backstairs, and Backstair, in the Vocabulary. -- Back step (Mil.), the retrograde movement of a man or body of men, without changing front. -- Back stream, a current running against the main current of a stream; an eddy. -- To take the back track, to retrace one's steps; to retreat. [Colloq.]  1. To get upon the back of; to mount. I will back him [a horse] straight. Shak. 2. To place or seat upon the back. [R.] Great Jupiter, upon his eagle backed, Appeared to me. Shak. 3. To drive or force backward; to cause to retreat or recede; as, to back oxen. 4. To make a back for; to furnish with a back; as, to back books. 5. To adjoin behind; to be at the back of. A garden . . . with a vineyard backed. Shak. The chalk cliffs which back the beach. Huxley. 6. To write upon the back of; as, to back a letter; to indorse; as, to back a note or legal document. 7. To support; to maintain; to second or strengthen by aid or influence; as, to back a friend. "Parliament would be backed by the people." Macaulay. Have still found it necessary to back and fortify their laws with rewards and punishments. South. The mate backed the captain manfully. Blackw. Mag. 8. To bet on the success of; -- as, to back a race horse. To back an anchor (Naut.), to lay down a small anchor ahead of a large one, the cable of the small one being fastened to the crown of the large one. -- To back the field, in horse racing, to bet against a particular horse or horses, that some one of all the other horses, collectively designated "the field", will win. -- To back the oars, to row backward with the oars. -- To back a rope, to put on a preventer. -- To back the sails, to arrange them so as to cause the ship to move astern. -- To back up, to support; to sustain; as, to back up one's friends. -- To back a warrant (Law), is for a justice of the peace, in the county where the warrant is to be executed, to sign or indorse a warrant, issued in another county, to apprehend an offender. -- To back water (Naut.), to reverse the action of the oars, paddles, or propeller, so as to force the boat or ship backward.  1. To move or go backward; as, the horse refuses to back. 2. (Naut.)  To change from one quarter to another by a course opposite to that of the sun; -- used of the wind. 3. (Sporting)  To stand still behind another dog which has poined; -- said of a dog. [Eng.] To back and fill, to manage the sails of a ship so that the wind strikes them alternately in front and behind, in order to keep the ship in the middle of a river or channel while the current or tide carries the vessel against the wind. Hence: (Fig.) To take opposite positions alternately; to assert and deny. [Colloq.] -- To back out, To back down, to retreat or withdraw from a promise, engagement, or contest; to recede. [Colloq.] Cleon at first . . . was willing to go; but, finding that he [Nicias] was in earnest, he tried to back out. Jowett (Thucyd. )  1. In, to, or toward, the rear; as, to stand back; to step back. 2. To the place from which one came; to the place or person from which something is taken or derived; as, to go back for something left behind; to go back to one's native place; to put a book back after reading it. 3. To a former state, condition, or station; as, to go back to private life; to go back to barbarism. 4. ( Of time) In times past; ago. "Sixty or seventy years back." Gladstone. 5. Away from contact; by reverse movement. The angel of the Lord . . . came, and rolled back the stone from the door. Matt. xxvii. 2. 6. In concealment or reserve; in one's own possession; as, to keep back the truth; to keep back part of the money due to another. 7. In a state of restraint or hindrance. The Lord hath kept thee back from honor. Numb. xxiv. 11. 8. In return, repayment, or requital. What have I to give you back! Shak. 9. In withdrawal from a statement, promise, or undertaking; as, he took back0 the offensive words. 10. In arrear; as, to be back in one's rent. [Colloq.] Back and forth, backwards and forwards; to and fro. -- To go back on, to turn back from; to abandon; to betray; as, to go back on a friend; to go back on one's professions. [Colloq.]
ice: 1. Water or other fluid frozen or reduced to the solid state by cold; frozen water. It is a white or transparent colorless substance, crystalline, brittle, and viscoidal. Its specific gravity (0.92, that of water at 4° C. being 1.0) being less than that of water, ice floats. Note: Water freezes at 32° F. or 0° Cent., and ice melts at the same temperature. Ice owes its cooling properties to the large amount of heat required to melt it. 2. Concreted sugar. Johnson. 3. Water, cream, custard, etc., sweetened, flavored, and artificially frozen. 4. Any substance having the appearance of ice; as, camphor ice. Anchor ice, ice which sometimes forms about stones and other objects at the bottom of running or other water, and is thus attached or anchored to the ground. -- Bay ice, ice formed in bays, fiords, etc., often in extensive fields which drift out to sea. -- Ground ice, anchor ice. -- Ice age (Geol.), the glacial epoch or period. See under Glacial. -- Ice anchor (Naut.), a grapnel for mooring a vessel to a field of ice. Kane. -- Ice blink Etym: [Dan. iisblink], a streak of whiteness of the horizon, caused by the reflection of light from ice not yet in sight. -- Ice boat. (a) A boat fitted with skates or runners, and propelled on ice by sails; an ice yacht. (b) A strong steamboat for breaking a channel through ice. -- Ice box or chest, a box for holding ice; a box in which things are kept cool by means of ice; a refrigerator. -- Ice brook, a brook or stream as cold as ice. [Poetic] Shak. -- Ice cream Etym: [for iced cream], cream, milk, or custard, sweetened, flavored, and frozen. -- Ice field, an extensive sheet of ice. -- Ice float, Ice floe, a sheet of floating ice similar to an ice field, but smaller. -- Ice foot, shore ice in Arctic regions; an ice belt. Kane. -- Ice house, a close-covered pit or building for storing ice. -- Ice machine (Physics), a machine for making ice artificially, as by the production of a low temperature through the sudden expansion of a gas or vapor, or the rapid evaporation of a volatile liquid. -- Ice master. See Ice pilot (below). -- Ice pack, an irregular mass of broken and drifting ice. -- Ice paper, a transparent film of gelatin for copying or reproducing; papier glacé. -- Ice petrel (Zoöl.), a shearwater (Puffinus gelidus) of the Antarctic seas, abundant among floating ice. -- Ice pick, a sharp instrument for breaking ice into small pieces. -- Ice pilot, a pilot who has charge of a vessel where the course is obstructed by ice, as in polar seas; -- called also ice master. -- Ice pitcher, a pitcher adapted for ice water. -- Ice plow, a large tool for grooving and cutting ice. ice sculpture = a sculpture carved from a block of ice, often used for decorating restaurants. ice show an entertainment consisting of ice skaters performing figure-skating on a sheet of ice, usually in an arena, often accompanied by music. -- Ice sludge, bay ice broken small by the wind or waves; sludge. -- Ice spar (Min.), a variety of feldspar, the crystals of which are very clear like ice; rhyacolite. -- Ice tongs, large iron nippers for handling ice. -- Ice water. (a) Water cooled by ice. (b) Water formed by the melting of ice. -- Ice yacht. See Ice boat (above). -- To break the ice. See under Break. -- Water ice, a confection consisting of water sweetened, flavored, and frozen.  1. To cover with ice; to convert into ice, or into something resembling ice. 2. To cover with icing, or frosting made of sugar and milk or white of egg; to frost, as cakes, tarts, etc. 3. To chill or cool, as with ice; to freeze.
steam: 1. The elastic, aëriform fluid into which water is converted when heated to the boiling points; water in the state of vapor. 2. The mist formed by condensed vapor; visible vapor; -- so called in popular usage. 3. Any exhalation. "A steam og rich, distilled perfumes." Milton. Dry steam, steam which does not contain water held in suspension mechanically; -- sometimes applied to superheated steam. -- Exhaust steam. See under Exhaust. -- High steam, or High-pressure steam, steam of which the pressure greatly exceeds that of the atmosphere. -- Low steam, or Low-pressure steam, steam of which the pressure is less than, equal to, or not greatly above, that of the atmosphere. -- Saturated steam, steam at the temperature of the boiling point which corresponds to its pressure; -- sometimes also applied to wet steam. -- Superheated steam, steam heated to a temperature higher than the boiling point corresponding to its pressure. It can not exist in contact with water, nor contain water, and resembles a perfect gas; - - called also surcharged steam, anhydrous steam, and steam gas. -- Wet steam, steam which contains water held in suspension mechanically; -- called also misty steam. Note: Steam is often used adjectively, and in combination, to denote, produced by heat, or operated by power, derived from steam, in distinction from other sources of power; as in steam boiler or steam- boiler, steam dredger or steam-dredger, steam engine or steam-engine, steam heat, steam plow or steam-plow, etc. Steam blower. (a) A blower for producing a draught consisting of a jet or jets of steam in a chimney or under a fire. (b) A fan blower driven directly by a steam engine. -- Steam boiler, a boiler for producing steam. See Boiler, 3, and Note. In the illustration, the shell a of the boiler is partly in section, showing the tubes, or flues, which the hot gases, from the fire beneath the boiler, enter, after traversing the outside of the shell, and through which the gases are led to the smoke pipe d, which delivers them to the chimney; b is the manhole; c the dome; e the steam pipe; f the feed and blow-off pipe; g the safety value; hthe water gauge. -- Steam car, a car driven by steam power, or drawn by a locomotive. -- Steam carriage, a carriage upon wheels moved on common roads by steam. -- Steam casing. See Steam jacket, under Jacket. -- Steam chest, the box or chamber from which steam is distributed to the cylinder of a steam engine, steam pump, etc., and which usually contains one or more values; -- called also valve chest, and valve box. See Illust. of Slide valve, under Slide. -- Steam chimney, an annular chamber around the chimney of a boiler furnace, for drying steam. -- Steam coil, a coil of pipe, or collection of connected pipes, for containing steam; -- used for heating, drying, etc. -- Steam colors (Calico Printing), colors in which the chemical reaction fixed the coloring matter in the fiber is produced by steam. -- Steam cylinder, the cylinder of a steam engine, which contains the piston. See Illust. of Slide valve, under Slide. -- Steam dome (Steam Boilers), a chamber upon the top of the boiler, from which steam is conduced to the engine. See Illust. of Steam boiler, above. -- Steam fire engine, a fire engine consisting of a steam boiler and engine, and pump which is driven by the engine, combined and mounted on wheels. It is usually drawn by horses, but is sometimes made self- propelling. -- Steam fitter, a fitter of steam pipes. -- Steam fitting, the act or the occupation of a steam fitter; also, a pipe fitting for steam pipes. -- Steam gas. See Superheated steam, above. -- Steam gauge, an instrument for indicating the pressure of the steam in a boiler. The mercurial steam gauge is a bent tube partially filled with mercury, one end of which is connected with the boiler while the other is open to the air, so that the steam by its pressure raises the mercury in the long limb of the tume to a height proportioned to that pressure. A more common form, especially for high pressures, consists of a spring pressed upon by the steam, and connected with the pointer of a dial. The spring may be a flattened, bent tube, closed at one end, which the entering steam tends to straighten, or it may be a diaphragm of elastic metal, or a mass of confined air, etc. -- Steam gun, a machine or contrivance from which projectiles may be thrown by the elastic force of steam. -- Steam hammer, a hammer for forging, which is worked directly by steam; especially, a hammer which is guided vertically and operated by a vertical steam cylinder located directly over an anvil. In the variety known as Nasmyth's, the cylinder is fixed, and the hammer is attached to the piston rod. In that known as Condie's, the piston is fixed, and the hammer attached to the lower end of the cylinder. -- Steam heater. (a) A radiator heated by steam. (b) An apparatus consisting of a steam boiler, radiator, piping, and fixures for warming a house by steam. -- Steam jacket. See under Jacket. -- Steam packet, a packet or vessel propelled by steam, and running periodically between certain ports. -- Steam pipe, any pipe for conveying steam; specifically, a pipe through which steam is supplied to an engine. -- Steam plow or plough, a plow, or gang of plows, moved by a steam engine. -- Steam port, an opening for steam to pass through, as from the steam chest into the cylinder. -- Steam power, the force or energy of steam applied to produce results; power derived from a steam engine. -- Steam propeller. See Propeller. -- Steam pump, a small pumping engine operated by steam. It is usually direct-acting. -- Steam room (Steam Boilers), the space in the boiler above the water level, and in the dome, which contains steam. -- Steam table, a table on which are dishes heated by steam for keeping food warm in the carving room of a hotel, restaurant, etc. -- Steam trap, a self-acting device by means of which water that accumulates in a pipe or vessel containing steam will be discharged without permitting steam to escape. -- Steam tug, a steam vessel used in towing or propelling ships. -- Steam vessel, a vessel propelled by steam; a steamboat or steamship; -- a steamer. -- Steam whistle, an apparatus attached to a steam boiler, as of a locomotive, through which steam is rapidly discharged, producing a loud whistle which serves as a warning signal. The steam issues from a narrow annular orifice around the upper edge of the lower cup or hemisphere, striking the thin edge of the bell above it, and producing sound in the manner of an organ pipe or a common whistle.  1. To emit steam or vapor. My brother's ghost hangs hovering there, O'er his warm blood, that steams into the air. Dryden. Let the crude humors dance In heated brass, steaming with fire intence. J. Philips. 2. To rise in vapor; to issue, or pass off, as vapor. The dissolved amber . . . steamed away into the air. Boyle. 3. To move or travel by the agency of steam. The vessel steamed out of port. N. P. Willis. 4. To generate steam; as, the boiler steams well.  1. To exhale. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. To expose to the action of steam; to apply steam to for softening, dressing, or preparing; as, to steam wood; to steamcloth; to steam food, etc.
together: 1. In company or association with respect to place or time; as, to live together in one house; to live together in the same age; they walked together to the town. Soldiers can never stand idle long together. Landor. 2. In or into union; into junction; as, to sew, knit, or fasten two things together; to mix things together. The king joined humanity and policy together. Bacon. 3. In concert; with mutual coöperation; as, the allies made war upon France together. Together with, in union with; in company or mixture with; along with. Take the bad together with the good. Dryden.
well: 1. An issue of water from the earth; a spring; a fountain. Begin, then, sisters of the sacred well. Milton. 2. A pit or hole sunk into the earth to such a depth as to reach a supply of water, generally of a cylindrical form, and often walled with stone or bricks to prevent the earth from caving in. The woman said unto him, Sir, thou hast nothing to draw with, and the well is deep. John iv. 11. 3. A shaft made in the earth to obtain oil or brine. 4. Fig.: A source of supply; fountain; wellspring. "This well of mercy." Chaucer. Dan Chaucer, well of English undefiled. Spenser. A well of serious thought and pure. Keble. 5. (Naut.) (a) An inclosure in the middle of a vessel's hold, around the pumps, from the bottom to the lower deck, to preserve the pumps from damage and facilitate their inspection. (b) A compartment in the middle of the hold of a fishing vessel, made tight at the sides, but having holes perforated in the bottom to let in water for the preservation of fish alive while they are transported to market. (c) A vertical passage in the stern into which an auxiliary screw propeller may be drawn up out of water. (d) A depressed space in the after part of the deck; -- often called the cockpit. 6. (Mil.)  A hole or excavation in the earth, in mining, from which run branches or galleries. 7. (Arch.)  An opening through the floors of a building, as for a staircase or an elevator; a wellhole. 8. (Metal.)  The lower part of a furnace, into which the metal falls. Artesian well, Driven well. See under Artesian, and Driven. -- Pump well. (Naut.) See Well, 5 (a), above. -- Well boring, the art or process of boring an artesian well. -- Well drain. (a) A drain or vent for water, somewhat like a well or pit, serving to discharge the water of wet land. (b) A drain conducting to a well or pit. -- Well room. (a) A room where a well or spring is situated; especially, one built over a mineral spring. (b) (Naut.) A depression in the bottom of a boat, into which water may run, and whence it is thrown out with a scoop. -- Well sinker, one who sinks or digs wells. -- Well sinking, the art or process of sinking or digging wells. -- Well staircase (Arch.), a staircase having a wellhole (see Wellhole (b)), as distinguished from one which occupies the whole of the space left for it in the floor. -- Well sweep. Same as Sweep, n., 12. -- Well water, the water that flows into a well from subterraneous springs; the water drawn from a well.  To issue forth, as water from the earth; to flow; to spring. "[Blood] welled from out the wound." Dryden. "[Yon spring] wells softly forth." Bryant. From his two springs in Gojam's sunny realm, Pure welling out, he through the lucid lake Of fair Dambea rolls his infant streams. Thomson.  To pour forth, as from a well. Spenser.  1. In a good or proper manner; justly; rightly; not ill or wickedly. If thou doest not well, sin lieth at the door. Gen. iv. 7. 2. Suitably to one's condition, to the occasion, or to a proposed end or use; suitably; abundantly; fully; adequately; thoroughly. Lot . . . beheld all the plain of Jordan, that it was well watered everywhere. Gen. xiii. 10. WE are wellable to overcome it. Num. xiii. 30. She looketh well to the ways of her household. Prov. xxxi. 27. Servant of God, well done! well hast thou fought The better fight. Milton. 3. Fully or about; -- used with numbers. [Obs.] "Well a ten or twelve." Chaucer. Well nine and twenty in a company. Chaucer. 4. In such manner as is desirable; so as one could wish; satisfactorily; favorably; advantageously; conveniently. "It boded well to you." Dryden. Know In measure what the mind may well contain. Milton. All the world speaks well of you. Pope. 5. Considerably; not a little; far. Abraham and Sarah were old and well stricken in age. Gen. xviii. 11. Note: Well is sometimes used elliptically for it is well, as an expression of satisfaction with what has been said or done, and sometimes it expresses concession, or is merely expletive; as, well, the work is done; well, let us go; well, well, be it so. Note: Well, like above, ill, and so, is used before many participial adjectives in its usual adverbial senses, and subject to the same custom with regard to the use of the hyphen (see the Note under Ill, adv.); as, a well-affected supporter; he was well affected toward the project; a well-trained speaker; he was well trained in speaking; well-educated, or well educated; well-dressed, or well dressed; well- appearing; well-behaved; well-controlled; well-designed; well- directed; well-formed; well-meant; well-minded; well-ordered; well- performed; well-pleased; well-pleasing; well-seasoned; well-steered; well-tasted; well-told, etc. Such compound epithets usually have an obvious meaning, and since they may be formed at will, only a few of this class are given in the Vocabulary. As well. See under As. -- As well as, and also; together with; not less than; one as much as the other; as, a sickness long, as well as severe; London is the largest city in England, as well as the capital. -- Well enough, well or good in a moderate degree; so as to give satisfaction, or so as to require no alteration. -- Well off, in good condition; especially, in good condition as to property or any advantages; thriving; prosperous. -- Well to do, well off; prosperous; -- used also adjectively. "The class well to do in the world." J. H. Newman. -- Well to live, in easy circumstances; well off; well to do. Shak.  1. Good in condition or circumstances; desirable, either in a natural or moral sense; fortunate; convenient; advantageous; happy; as, it is well for the country that the crops did not fail; it is well that the mistake was discovered. It was well with us in Egypt. Num. xi. 18. 2. Being in health; sound in body; not ailing, diseased, or sick; healthy; as, a well man; the patient is perfectly well. "Your friends are well." Shak. Is your father well, the old man of whom ye spake Gen. xliii. 27. 3. Being in favor; favored; fortunate. He followed the fortunes of that family, and was well with Henry the Fourth. Dryden. 4. (Marine Insurance)  Safe; as, a chip warranted well at a certain day and place. Burrill. WE'LL We'll.  Contraction for we will or we shall. "We'll follow them." Shak.
not: Wot not; know not; knows not. [Obs.] Chaucer.  Shorn; shaven. [Obs.] See Nott.  A word used to express negation, prohibition, denial, or refusal. Not one word spake he more than was need. Chaucer. Thou shalt not steal. Ex. xx. 15. Thine eyes are upon me, and I am not. Job vii. 8. The question is, may I do it, or may I not do it Bp. Sanderson. Not . . . but, or Not but, only. [Obs. or Colloq.] Chaucer.
live: 1. To be alive; to have life; to have, as an animal or a plant, the capacity of assimilating matter as food, and to be dependent on such assimilation for a continuance of existence; as, animals and plants that live to a great age are long in reaching maturity. Thus saith the Lord God unto these bones; Behold, I will . . . lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye shall live. Ezek. xxxvii. 5, 6. 2. To pass one's time; to pass life or time in a certain manner, as to habits, conduct, or circumstances; as, to live in ease or affluence; to live happily or usefully. O death, how bitter is the remembrance of thee to a man that liveth at rest in his possessions! Ecclus. xli. 1. 3. To make one's abiding place or home; to abide; to dwell; to reside. Jacob lived in the land of Egypt seventeen years. Gen. xlvii. 28. 4. To be or continue in existence; to exist; to remain; to be permanent; to last; -- said of inanimate objects, ideas, etc. Men's evil manners live in brass; their virtues We write in water. Shak. 5. To enjoy or make the most of life; to be in a state of happiness. What greater curse could envious fortune give Than just to die when I began to live Dryden. 6. To feed; to subsist; to be nourished or supported; -- with on; as, horses live on grass and grain. 7. To have a spiritual existence; to be quickened, nourished, and actuated by divine influence or faith. The just shall live by faith. Gal. iii. ll. 8. To be maintained in life; to acquire a livelihood; to subsist; -- with on or by; as, to live on spoils. Those who live by labor. Sir W. Temple. 9. To outlast danger; to float; -- said of a ship, boat, etc.; as, no ship could live in such a storm. A strong mast that lived upon the sea. Shak. To live out, to be at service; to live away from home as a servant. [U. S.] -- To live with. (a) To dwell or to be a lodger with. (b) To cohabit with; to have intercourse with, as male with female.  1. To spend, as one's life; to pass; to maintain; to continue in, constantly or habitually; as, to live an idle or a useful life. 2. To act habitually in conformity with; to practice. To live the Gospel. Foxe. To live down, to live so as to subdue or refute; as, to live down slander.  1. Having life; alive; living; not dead. If one man's ox hurt another's, that he die; then they shall sell the live ox, and divide the money of it. Ex. xxi. 35. 2. Being in a state of ignition; burning; having active properties; as, a live coal; live embers. " The live ether." Thomson. 3. Full of earnestness; active; wide awake; glowing; as, a live man, or orator. 4. Vivid; bright. " The live carnation." Thomson. 5. (Engin.)  Imparting power; having motion; as, the live spindle of a lathe. Live birth, the condition of being born in such a state that acts of life are manifested after the extrusion of the whole body. Dunglison. -- Live box, a cell for holding living objects under microscopical examination. P. H. Gosse. -- Live feathers, feathers which have been plucked from the living bird, and are therefore stronger and more elastic. -- Live gang. (Sawing) See under Gang. -- Live grass (Bot.), a grass of the genus Eragrostis. -- Live load (Engin.), a suddenly applied load; a varying load; a moving load; as a moving train of cars on a bridge, or wind pressure on a roof. Live oak (Bot.), a species of oak (Quercus virens), growing in the Southern States, of great durability, and highly esteemed for ship timber. In California the Q. chrysolepis and some other species are also called live oaks. -- Live ring (Engin.), a circular train of rollers upon which a swing bridge, or turntable, rests, and which travels around a circular track when the bridge or table turns. -- Live steam , steam direct from the boiler, used for any purpose, in distinction from exhaust steam. -- Live stock, horses, cattle, and other domestic animals kept on a farm. whole body.  Life. [Obs.] Chaucer. On live, in life; alive. [Obs.] See Alive. Chaucer.
agree: In good part; kindly. [Obs.] Rom. of R.  1. To harmonize in opinion, statement, or action; to be in unison or concord; to be or become united or consistent; to concur; as, all parties agree in the expediency of the law. If music and sweet poetry agree. Shak. Their witness agreed not together. Mark xiv. 56. The more you agree together, the less hurt can your enemies do you. Sir T. Browne. 2. To yield assent; to accede; -- followed by to; as, to agree to an offer, or to opinion. 3. To make a stipulation by way of settling differences or determining a price; to exchange promises; to come to terms or to a common resolve; to promise. Agree with thine adversary quickly. Matt. v. 25. Didst not thou agree with me for a penny Matt. xx. 13. 4. To be conformable; to resemble; to coincide; to correspond; as, the picture does not agree with the original; the two scales agree exactly. 5. To suit or be adapted in its effects; to do well; as, the same food does not agree with every constitution. 6. (Gram.)  To correspond in gender, number, case, or person. Note: The auxiliary forms of to be are often employed with the participle agreed. "The jury were agreed." Macaulay. "Can two walk together, except they be agreed " Amos iii. 3. The principal intransitive uses were probably derived from the transitive verb used reflexively. "I agree me well to your desire." Ld. Berners. Syn. -- To assent; concur; consent; acquiesce; accede; engage; promise; stipulate; contract; bargain; correspond; harmonize; fit; tally; coincide; comport.  1. To make harmonious; to reconcile or make friends. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. To admit, or come to one mind concerning; to settle; to arrange; as, to agree the fact; to agree differences. [Obs.]
market: 1. A meeting together of people, at a stated time and place, for the purpose of traffic (as in cattle, provisions, wares, etc.) by private purchase and sale, and not by auction; as, a market is held in the town every week. He is wit's peddler; and retails his wares At wakes, and wassails, meetings, markets, fairs. Shak. Three women and a goose make a market. Old Saying. 2. A public place (as an open space in a town) or a large building, where a market is held; a market place or market house; esp., a place where provisions are sold. There is at Jerusalem by the sheep market a pool. John v. 2. 3. An opportunity for selling anything; demand, as shown by price offered or obtainable; a town, region, or country, where the demand exists; as, to find a market for one's wares; there is no market for woolen cloths in that region; India is a market for English goods. There is a third thing to be considered: how a market can be created for produce, or how production can be limited to the capacities of the market. J. S. Mill. 4. Exchange, or purchase and sale; traffic; as, a dull market; a slow market. 5. The price for which a thing is sold in a market; market price. Hence: Value; worth. What is a man If his chief good and market of his time Be but to sleep and feed Shak. 6. (Eng. Law)  The privelege granted to a town of having a public market. Note: Market is often used adjectively, or in forming compounds of obvious meaning; as, market basket, market day, market folk, market house, marketman, market place, market price, market rate, market wagon, market woman, and the like. Market beater, a swaggering bully; a noisy braggart. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Market bell, a bell rung to give notice that buying and selling in a market may begin. [Eng.] Shak. -- Market cross, a cross set up where a market is held. Shak. -- Market garden, a garden in which vegetables are raised for market. -- Market gardening, the raising of vegetables for market. -- Market place, an open square or place in a town where markets or public sales are held. -- Market town, a town that has the privilege of a stated public market.  To deal in a market; to buy or sell; to make bargains for provisions or goods.  To expose for sale in a market; to traffic in; to sell in a market, and in an extended sense, to sell in any manner; as, most of the farmes have marketed their crops. Industrious merchants meet, and market there The world's collected wealth. Southey.
open: 1. Free of access; not shut up; not closed; affording unobstructed ingress or egress; not impeding or preventing passage; not locked up or covered over; -- applied to passageways; as, an open door, window, road, etc.; also, to inclosed structures or objects; as, open houses, boxes, baskets, bottles, etc.; also, to means of communication or approach by water or land; as, an open harbor or roadstead. Through the gate, Wide open and unquarded, Satan passed. Milton Note: Also, figuratively, used of the ways of communication of the mind, as by the senses; ready to hear, see, etc.; as, to keep one's eyes and ears open. His ears are open unto their cry. Ps. xxxiv. 15. 2. Free to be used, enjoyed, visited, or the like; not private; public; unrestricted in use; as, an open library, museum, court, or other assembly; liable to the approach, trespass, or attack of any one; unprotected; exposed. If Demetrius . . . have a matter against any man, the law is open and there are deputies. Acts xix. 33. The service that I truly did his life, Hath left me open to all injuries. Shak. 3. Free or cleared of obstruction to progress or to view; accessible; as, an open tract; the open sea. 4. Not drawn together, closed, or contracted; extended; expanded; as, an open hand; open arms; an open flower; an open prospect. Each, with open arms, embraced her chosen knight. Dryden. 5. Hence: (a) Without reserve or false pretense; sincere; characterized by sincerity; unfeigned; frank; also, generous; liberal; bounteous; -- applied to personal appearance, or character, and to the expression of thought and feeling, etc. With aspect open, shall erect his head. Pope. The Moor is of a free and open nature. Shak. The French are always open, familiar, and talkative. Addison. (b) Not concealed or secret; not hidden or disguised; exposed to view or to knowledge; revealed; apparent; as, open schemes or plans; open shame or guilt. His thefts are too open. Shak. That I may find him, and with secret gaze Or open admiration him behold. Milton. 6. Not of a quality to prevent communication, as by closing water ways, blocking roads, etc.; hence, not frosty or inclement; mild; -- used of the weather or the climate; as, an open season; an open winter. Bacon. 7. Not settled or adjusted; not decided or determined; not closed or withdrawn from consideration; as, an open account; an open question; to keep an offer or opportunity open. 8. Free; disengaged; unappropriated; as, to keep a day open for any purpose; to be open for an engagement. 9. (Phon.) (a) Uttered with a relatively wide opening of the articulating organs; -- said of vowels; as, the än fär is open as compared with the a in say. (b) Uttered, as a consonant, with the oral passage simply narrowed without closure, as in uttering s. 10. (Mus.) (a) Not closed or stopped with the finger; -- said of the string of an instrument, as of a violin, when it is allowed to vibrate throughout its whole length. (b) Produced by an open string; as, an open tone. The open air, the air out of doors. -- Open chain. (Chem.) See Closed chain, under Chain. -- Open circuit (Elec.), a conducting circuit which is incomplete, or interrupted at some point; -- opposed to an uninterrupted, or Ant: closed circuit. -- Open communion, communion in the Lord's supper not restricted to persons who have been baptized by immersion. Cf. Close communion, under Close, a. -- Open diapason (Mus.), a certain stop in an organ, in which the pipes or tubes are formed like the mouthpiece of a flageolet at the end where the wind enters, and are open at the other end. -- Open flank (Fort.), the part of the flank covered by the orillon. -- Open-front furnace (Metal.), a blast furnace having a forehearth. -- Open harmony (Mus.), harmony the tones of which are widely dispersed, or separated by wide intervals. -- Open hawse (Naut.), a hawse in which the cables are parallel or slightly divergent. Cf. Foul hawse, under Hawse. -- Open hearth (Metal.), the shallow hearth of a reverberatory furnace. -- Open-hearth furnace, a reverberatory furnace; esp., a kind of reverberatory furnace in which the fuel is gas, used in manufacturing steel. -- Open-hearth process (Steel Manuf.), a process by which melted cast iron is converted into steel by the addition of wrought iron, or iron ore and manganese, and by exposure to heat in an open-hearth furnace; -- also called the Siemens-Martin process, from the inventors. -- Open-hearth steel, steel made by an open-hearth process; -- also called Siemens-Martin steel. -- Open newel. (Arch.) See Hollow newel, under Hollow. -- Open pipe (Mus.), a pipe open at the top. It has a pitch about an octave higher than a closed pipe of the same length. -- Open-timber roof (Arch.), a roof of which the constructional parts, together with the under side of the covering, or its lining, are treated ornamentally, and left to form the ceiling of an apartment below, as in a church, a public hall, and the like. -- Open vowel or consonant. See Open, a., 9. Note: Open is used in many compounds, most of which are self- explaining; as, open-breasted, open-minded. Syn. -- Unclosed; uncovered; unprotected; exposed; plain; apparent; obvious; evident; public; unreserved; frank; sincere; undissembling; artless. See Candid, and Ingenuous.  Open or unobstructed space; clear land, without trees or obstructions; open ocean; open water. "To sail into the open." Jowett (Thucyd. ). Then we got into the open. W. Black. In open, in full view; without concealment; openly. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl.  1. To make or set open; to render free of access; to unclose; to unbar; to unlock; to remove any fastening or covering from; as, to open a door; to open a box; to open a room; to open a letter. And all the windows of my heart I open to the day. Whittier. 2. To spread; to expand; as, to open the hand. 3. To disclose; to reveal; to interpret; to explain. The king opened himself to some of his council, that he was sorry for the earl's death. Bacon. Unto thee have I opened my cause. Jer. xx. 12. While he opened to us the Scriptures. Luke xxiv. 32. 4. To make known; to discover; also, to render available or accessible for settlements, trade, etc. The English did adventure far for to open the North parts of America. Abp. Abbot. 5. To enter upon; to begin; as, to open a discussion; to open fire upon an enemy; to open trade, or correspondence; to open a case in court, or a meeting. 6. To loosen or make less compact; as, to open matted cotton by separating the fibers. To open one's mouth, to speak. -- To open up, to lay open; to discover; to disclose. Poetry that had opened up so many delightful views into the character and condition of our "bold peasantry, their country's pride." Prof. Wilson.  1. To unclose; to form a hole, breach, or gap; to be unclosed; to be parted. The earth opened and swallowed up Dathan, and covered the company of Abiram. Ps. cvi. 17. 2. To expand; to spread out; to be disclosed; as, the harbor opened to our view. 3. To begin; to commence; as, the stock opened at par; the battery opened upon the enemy. 4. (Sporting)  To bark on scent or view of the game.
record: 1. To recall to mind; to recollect; to remember; to meditate. [Obs.] "I it you record." Chaucer. 2. To repeat; to recite; to sing or play. [Obs.] They longed to see the day, to hear the lark Record her hymns, and chant her carols blest. Fairfax. 3. To preserve the memory of, by committing to writing, to printing, to inscription, or the like; to make note of; to write or enter in a book or on parchment, for the purpose of preserving authentic evidence of; to register; to enroll; as, to record the proceedings of a court; to record historical events. Those things that are recorded of him . . . are written in the chronicles of the kings. 1 Esd. i. 42. To record a deed, mortgage, lease, etc., to have a copy of the same entered in the records of the office designated by law, for the information of the public.  1. To reflect; to ponder. [Obs.] Praying all the way, and recording upon the words which he before had read. Fuller. 2. To sing or repeat a tune. [Obs.] Shak. Whether the birds or she recorded best. W. Browne.  1. A writing by which same act or event, or a number of acts or events, is recorded; a register; as, a record of the acts of the Hebrew kings; a record of the variations of temperature during a certain time; a family record. 2. Especially: (a) An official contemporaneous writing by which the acts of some public body, or public officer, are recorded; as, a record of city ordinances; the records of the receiver of taxes. (b) An authentic official copy of a document which has been entered in a book, or deposited in the keeping of some officer designated by law. (c) An official contemporaneous memorandum stating the proceedings of a court of justice; a judicial record. (d) The various legal papers used in a case, together with memoranda of the proceedings of the court; as, it is not permissible to allege facts not in the record. 3. Testimony; witness; attestation. John bare record, saying. John i. 32 . 4. That which serves to perpetuate a knowledge of acts or events; a monument; a memorial. 5. That which has been, or might be, recorded; the known facts in the course, progress, or duration of anything, as in the life of a public man; as, a politician with a good or a bad record. 6. That which has been publicly achieved in any kind of competitive sport as recorded in some authoritative manner, as the time made by a winning horse in a race. Court of record (pron. rin Eng.), a court whose acts and judicial proceedings are written on parchment or in books for a perpetual memorial. -- Debt of record, a debt which appears to be due by the evidence of a court of record, as upon a judgment or a cognizance. -- Trial by record, a trial which is had when a matter of record is pleaded, and the opposite party pleads that there is no such record. In this case the trial is by inspection of the record itself, no other evidence being admissible. Blackstone. -- To beat, or break, the record (Sporting), to surpass any performance of like kind as authoritatively recorded; as, to break the record in a walking match.
sister: 1. A female who has the same parents with another person, or who has one of them only. In the latter case, she is more definitely called a half sister. The correlative of brother. I am the sister of one Claudio. Shak. 2. A woman who is closely allied to, or assocciated with, another person, as in the sdame faith, society, order, or community. James ii. 15. 3. One of the same kind, or of the same condition; -- generally used adjectively; as, sister fruits. Pope. Sister Block (Naut.), a tackle block having two sheaves, one above the other. -- Sister hooks, a pair of hooks fitted together, the shank of one forming a mousing for the other; -- called also match hook. -- Sister of charity, Sister of mercy. (R. C. Ch.) See under Charity, and Mercy.  To be sister to; to resemble closely. [Obs.] Shak.
wheel: 1. A circular frame turning about an axis; a rotating disk, whether solid, or a frame composed of an outer rim, spokes or radii, and a central hub or nave, in which is inserted the axle, -- used for supporting and conveying vehicles, in machinery, and for various purposes; as, the wheel of a wagon, of a locomotive, of a mill, of a watch, etc. The gasping charioteer beneath the wheel Of his own car. Dryden. 2. Any instrument having the form of, or chiefly consisting of, a wheel. Specifically: -- (a) A spinning wheel. See under Spinning. (b) An instrument of torture formerly used. His examination is like that which is made by the rack and wheel. Addison. Note: This mode of torture is said to have been first employed in Germany, in the fourteenth century. The criminal was laid on a cart wheel with his legs and arms extended, and his limbs in that posture were fractured with an iron bar. In France, where its use was restricted to the most atrocious crimes, the criminal was first laid on a frame of wood in the form of a St. Andrew's cross, with grooves cut transversely in it above and below the knees and elbows, and the executioner struck eight blows with an iron bar, so as to break the limbs in those places, sometimes finishing by two or three blows on the chest or stomach, which usually put an end to the life of the criminal, and were hence called coups-de-grace -- blows of mercy. The criminal was then unbound, and laid on a small wheel, with his face upward, and his arms and legs doubled under him, there to expire, if he had survived the previous treatment. Brande. (c) (Naut.) A circular frame having handles on the periphery, and an axle which is so connected with the tiller as to form a means of controlling the rudder for the purpose of steering. (d) (Pottery) A potter's wheel. See under Potter. Then I went down to the potter's house, and, behold, he wrought a work on the wheels. Jer. xviii. 3. Turn, turn, my wheel! This earthen jar A touch can make, a touch can mar. Longfellow. (e) (Pyrotechny)  A firework which, while burning, is caused to revolve on an axis by the reaction of the escaping gases. (f) (Poetry) The burden or refrain of a song. Note: "This meaning has a low degree of authority, but is supposed from the context in the few cases where the word is found." Nares. You must sing a-down a-down, An you call him a-down-a. O, how the wheel becomes it! Shak. 3. A bicycle or a tricycle; a velocipede. 4. A rolling or revolving body; anything of a circular form; a disk; an orb. Milton. 5. A turn revolution; rotation; compass. According to the common vicissitude and wheel of things, the proud and the insolent, after long trampling upon others, come at length to be trampled upon themselves. South. [He] throws his steep flight in many an aëry wheel. Milton. A wheel within a wheel, or Wheels within wheels, a complication of circumstances, motives, etc. -- Balance wheel. See in the Vocab. -- Bevel wheel, Brake wheel, Cam wheel, Fifth wheel, Overshot wheel, Spinning wheel, etc. See under Bevel, Brake, etc. -- Core wheel. (Mach.) (a) A mortise gear. (b) A wheel having a rim perforated to receive wooden cogs; the skeleton of a mortise gear. -- Measuring wheel, an odometer, or perambulator. -- Wheel and axle (Mech.), one of the elementary machines or mechanical powers, consisting of a wheel fixed to an axle, and used for raising great weights, by applying the power to the circumference of the wheel, and attaching the weight, by a rope or chain, to that of the axle. Called also axis in peritrochio, and perpetual lever, -- the principle of equilibrium involved being the same as in the lever, while its action is continuous. See Mechanical powers, under Mechanical. -- Wheel animal, or Wheel animalcule (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of rotifers having a ciliated disk at the anterior end. -- Wheel barometer. (Physics) See under Barometer. -- Wheel boat, a boat with wheels, to be used either on water or upon inclined planes or railways. -- Wheel bug (Zoöl.), a large North American hemipterous insect (Prionidus cristatus) which sucks the blood of other insects. So named from the curious shape of the prothorax. -- Wheel carriage, a carriage moving on wheels. -- Wheel chains, or Wheel ropes (Naut.), the chains or ropes connecting the wheel and rudder. -- Wheel cutter, a machine for shaping the cogs of gear wheels; a gear cutter. -- Wheel horse, one of the horses nearest to the wheels, as opposed to a leader, or forward horse; -- called also wheeler. -- Wheel lathe, a lathe for turning railway-car wheels. -- Wheel lock. (a) A letter lock. See under Letter. (b) A kind of gunlock in which sparks were struck from a flint, or piece of iron pyrites, by a revolving wheel. (c) A kind of brake a carriage. -- Wheel ore (Min.), a variety of bournonite so named from the shape of its twin crystals. See Bournonite. -- Wheel pit (Steam Engine), a pit in the ground, in which the lower part of the fly wheel runs. -- Wheel plow, or Wheel plough, a plow having one or two wheels attached, to render it more steady, and to regulate the depth of the furrow. -- Wheel press, a press by which railway-car wheels are forced on, or off, their axles. -- Wheel race, the place in which a water wheel is set. -- Wheel rope (Naut.), a tiller rope. See under Tiller. -- Wheel stitch (Needlework), a stitch resembling a spider's web, worked into the material, and not over an open space. Caulfeild & S. (Dict. of Needlework). -- Wheel tree (Bot.), a tree (Aspidosperma excelsum) of Guiana, which has a trunk so curiously fluted that a transverse section resembles the hub and spokes of a coarsely made wheel. See Paddlewood. -- Wheel urchin (Zoöl.), any sea urchin of the genus Rotula having a round, flat shell. -- Wheel window (Arch.), a circular window having radiating mullions arranged like the spokes of a wheel. Cf. Rose window, under Rose.  1. To convey on wheels, or in a wheeled vehicle; as, to wheel a load of hay or wood. 2. To put into a rotatory motion; to cause to turn or revolve; to cause to gyrate; to make or perform in a circle. "The beetle wheels her droning flight." Gray. Now heaven, in all her glory, shone, and rolled Her motions, as the great first mover's hand First wheeled their course. Milton.  1. To turn on an axis, or as on an axis; to revolve; to more about; to rotate; to gyrate. The moon carried about the earth always shows the same face to us, not once wheeling upon her own center. Bentley. 2. To change direction, as if revolving upon an axis or pivot; to turn; as, the troops wheeled to the right. Being able to advance no further, they are in a fair way to wheel about to the other extreme. South. 3. To go round in a circuit; to fetch a compass. Then wheeling down the steep of heaven he flies. Pope. 4. To roll forward. Thunder mixed with hail, Hail mixed with fire, must rend the Egyptian sky, And wheel on the earth, devouring where it rolls. Milton.
occur: 1. To meet; to clash. [Obs.] The resistance of the bodies they occur with. Bentley. 2. To go in order to meet; to make reply. [Obs.] I must occur to one specious objection. Bentley. 3. To meet one's eye; to be found or met with; to present itself; to offer; to appear; to happen; to take place; as, I will write if opportunity occurs. In Scripture, though the word heir occur, yet there is no such thing as "heir" in our author's sense. Locke. 4. To meet or come to the mind; to suggest itself; to be presented to the imagination or memory. There doth not occur to me any use of this experiment for profit. Bacon.
port: A dark red or purple astringent wine made in Portugal. It contains a large percentage of alcohol.  1. A place where ships may ride secure from storms; a sheltered inlet, bay, or cove; a harbor; a haven. Used also figuratively. Peering in maps for ports and piers and roads. Shak. We are in port if we have Thee. Keble. 2. In law and commercial usage, a harbor where vessels are admitted to discharge and receive cargoes, from whence they depart and where they finish their voyages. Free port. See under Free. -- Port bar. (Naut,) (a) A boom. See Boom, 4, also Bar, 3. (b) A bar, as of sand, at the mouth of, or in, a port. -- Port charges (Com.), charges, as wharfage, etc., to which a ship or its cargo is subjected in a harbor. -- Port of entry, a harbor where a customhouse is established for the legal entry of merchandise. -- Port toll (Law), a payment made for the privilege of bringing goods into port. -- Port warden, the officer in charge of a port; a harbor master.  1. A passageway; an opening or entrance to an inclosed place; a gate; a door; a portal. [Archaic] Him I accuse The city ports by this hath entered. Shak. Form their ivory port the cherubim Forth issuing. Milton. 2. (Naut.)  An opening in the side of a vessel; an embrasure through which cannon may be discharged; a porthole; also, the shutters which close such an opening. Her ports being within sixteen inches of the water. Sir W. Raleigh. 3. (Mach.)  A passageway in a machine, through which a fluid, as steam, water, etc., may pass, as from a valve to the interior of the cylinder of a steam engine; an opening in a valve seat, or valve face. Air port, Bridle port, etc. See under Air, Bridle, etc. -- Port bar (Naut.), a bar to secure the ports of a ship in a gale. -- Port lid (Naut.), a lid or hanging for closing the portholes of a vessel. -- Steam port, and Exhaust port (Steam Engine), the ports of the cylinder communicating with the valve or valves, for the entrance or exit of the steam, respectively.  1. To carry; to bear; to transport. [Obs.] They are easily ported by boat into other shires. Fuller. 2. (Mil.)  To throw, as a musket, diagonally across the body, with the lock in front, the right hand grasping the small of the stock, and the barrel sloping upward and crossing the point of the left shoulder; as, to port arms. Began to hem him round with ported spears. Milton. Port arms, a position in the manual of arms, executed as above.  The manner in which a person bears himself; deportment; carriage; bearing; demeanor; hence, manner or style of living; as, a proud port. Spenser. And of his port as meek as is a maid. Chaucer. The necessities of pomp, grandeur, and a suitable port in the world. South.  The larboard or left side of a ship (looking from the stern toward the bow); as, a vessel heels to port. See Note under Larboard. Also used adjectively.  To turn or put to the left or larboard side of a ship; -- said of the helm, and used chiefly in the imperative, as a command; as, port your helm.
love: 1. A feeling of strong attachment induced by that which delights or commands admiration; preëminent kindness or devotion to another; affection; tenderness; as, the love of brothers and sisters. Of all the dearest bonds we prove Thou countest sons' and mothers' love Most sacred, most Thine own. Keble. 2. Especially, devoted attachment to, or tender or passionate affection for, one of the opposite sex. He on his side Leaning half-raised, with looks of cordial love Hung over her enamored. Milton. 3. Courtship; -- chiefly in the phrase to make love, i. e., to court, to woo, to solicit union in marriage. Demetrius . . . Made love to Nedar's daughter, Helena, And won her soul. Shak. 4. Affection; kind feeling; friendship; strong liking or desire; fondness; good will; -- opposed to hate; often with of and an object. Love, and health to all. Shak. Smit with the love of sacred song. Milton. The love of science faintly warmed his breast. Fenton. 5. Due gratitude and reverence to God. Keep yourselves in the love of God. Jude 21. 6. The object of affection; -- often employed in endearing address. "Trust me, love." Dryden. Open the temple gates unto my love. Spenser. 7. Cupid, the god of love; sometimes, Venus. Such was his form as painters, when they show Their utmost art, on naked Lores bestow. Dryden. Therefore do nimble-pinioned doves draw Love. Shak. 8. A thin silk stuff. [Obs.] Boyle. 9. (Bot.)  A climbing species of Clematis (C. Vitalba). 10. Nothing; no points scored on one side; -- used in counting score at tennis, etc. He won the match by three sets to love. The Field. Note: Love is often used in the formation of compounds, in most of which the meaning is very obvious; as, love-cracked, love-darting, love-killing, love-linked, love-taught, etc. A labor of love, a labor undertaken on account of regard for some person, or through pleasure in the work itself, without expectation of reward. -- Free love, the doctrine or practice of consorting with one of the opposite sex, at pleasure, without marriage. See Free love. -- Free lover, one who avows or practices free love. -- In love, in the act of loving; -- said esp. of the love of the sexes; as, to be in love; to fall in love. -- Love apple (Bot.), the tomato. -- Love bird (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small, short- tailed parrots, or parrakeets, of the genus Agapornis, and allied genera. They are mostly from Africa. Some species are often kept as cage birds, and are celebrated for the affection which they show for their mates. -- Love broker, a person who for pay acts as agent between lovers, or as a go-between in a sexual intrigue. Shak. -- Love charm, a charm for exciting love. Ld. Lytton. -- Love child. an illegitimate child. Jane Austen. -- Love day, a day formerly appointed for an amicable adjustment of differences. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. Chaucer. -- Love drink, a love potion; a philter. Chaucer. -- Love favor, something given to be worn in token of love. -- Love feast, a religious festival, held quarterly by some religious denominations, as the Moravians and Methodists, in imitation of the agapæ of the early Christians. -- Love feat, the gallant act of a lover. Shak. -- Love game, a game, as in tennis, in which the vanquished person or party does not score a point. -- Love grass. Etym: [G. liebesgras.] (Bot.) Any grass of the genus Eragrostis. -- Love-in-a-mist. (Bot.) (a) An herb of the Buttercup family (Nigella Damascena) having the flowers hidden in a maze of finely cut bracts. (b) The West Indian Passiflora foetida, which has similar bracts. -- Love-in-idleness (Bot.), a kind of violet; the small pansy. A little western flower, Before milk-white, now purple with love's wound; And maidens call it love-in-idleness. Shak. -- Love juice, juice of a plant supposed to produce love. Shak. -- Love knot, a knot or bow, as of ribbon; -- so called from being used as a token of love, or as a pledge of mutual affection. Milman. -- Love lass, a sweetheart. -- Love letter, a letter of courtship. Shak. -- Love-lies-bleeding (Bot.), a species of amaranth (Amarantus melancholicus). -- Love match, a marriage brought about by love alone. -- Love potion, a compounded draught intended to excite love, or venereal desire. -- Love rites, sexual intercourse. Pope -- Love scene, an exhibition of love, as between lovers on the stage. -- Love suit, courtship. Shak. -- Of all loves, for the sake of all love; by all means. [Obs.] "Mrs. Arden desired him of all loves to come back again." Holinshed. -- The god of love, or Love god, Cupid. -- To make love to, to express affection for; to woo. "If you will marry, make your loves to me." Shak. -- To play for love, to play a game, as at cards, without stakes. "A game at piquet for love." Lamb. Syn. -- Affection; friendship; kindness; tenderness; fondness; delight.  1. To have a feeling of love for; to regard with affection or good will; as, to love one's children and friends; to love one's country; to love one's God. Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind. Matt. xxii. 37. Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thy self. Matt. xxii. 39. 2. To regard with passionate and devoted affection, as that of one sex for the other. 3. To take delight or pleasure in; to have a strong liking or desire for, or interest in; to be pleased with; to like; as, to love books; to love adventures. Wit, eloquence, and poetry. Arts which I loved. Cowley.  To have the feeling of love; to be in love.
root: 1. To turn up the earth with the snout, as swine. 2. Hence, to seek for favor or advancement by low arts or groveling servility; to fawn servilely.  To turn up or to dig out with the snout; as, the swine roots the earth.  1. (Bot.) (a) The underground portion of a plant, whether a true root or a tuber, a bulb or rootstock, as in the potato, the onion, or the sweet flag. (b) The descending, and commonly branching, axis of a plant, increasing in length by growth at its extremity only, not divided into joints, leafless and without buds, and having for its offices to fix the plant in the earth, to supply it with moisture and soluble matters, and sometimes to serve as a reservoir of nutriment for future growth. A true root, however, may never reach the ground, but may be attached to a wall, etc., as in the ivy, or may hang loosely in the air, as in some epiphytic orchids. 2. An edible or esculent root, especially of such plants as produce a single root, as the beet, carrot, etc.; as, the root crop. 3. That which resembles a root in position or function, esp. as a source of nourishment or support; that from which anything proceeds as if by growth or development; as, the root of a tooth, a nail, a cancer, and the like. Specifically: (a) An ancestor or progenitor; and hence, an early race; a stem. They were the roots out of which sprang two distinct people. Locke. (b) A primitive form of speech; one of the earliest terms employed in language; a word from which other words are formed; a radix, or radical. (c) The cause or occasion by which anything is brought about; the source. "She herself . . . is root of bounty." Chaucer. The love of money is a root of all kinds of evil. 1 Tim. vi. 10 (rev. Ver. ) (d) (Math.)  That factor of a quantity which when multiplied into itself will produce that quantity; thus, 3 is a root of 9, because 3 multiplied into itself produces 9; 3 is the cube root of 27. (e) (Mus.) The fundamental tone of any chord; the tone from whose harmonics, or overtones, a chord is composed. Busby. (f) The lowest place, position, or part. "Deep to the roots of hell." Milton. "The roots of the mountains." Southey. 4. (Astrol.)  The time which to reckon in making calculations. When a root is of a birth yknowe [known]. Chaucer. Aërial roots. (Bot.) (a) Small roots emitted from the stem of a plant in the open air, which, attaching themselves to the bark of trees, etc., serve to support the plant. (b) Large roots growing from the stem, etc., which descend and establish themselves in the soil. See Illust. of Mangrove. -- Multiple primary root (Bot.), a name given to the numerous roots emitted from the radicle in many plants, as the squash. -- Primary root (Bot.), the central, first-formed, main root, from which the rootlets are given off. -- Root and branch, every part; wholly; completely; as, to destroy an error root and branch. -- Root-and-branch men, radical reformers; -- a designation applied to the English Independents (1641). See Citation under Radical, n., 2. -- Root barnacle (Zoöl.), one of the Rhizocephala. -- Root hair (Bot.), one of the slender, hairlike fibers found on the surface of fresh roots. They are prolongations of the superficial cells of the root into minute tubes. Gray. -- Root leaf (Bot.), a radical leaf. See Radical, a., 3 (b). -- Root louse (Zoöl.), any plant louse, or aphid, which lives on the roots of plants, as the Phylloxera of the grapevine. See Phylloxera. -- Root of an equation (Alg.), that value which, substituted for the unknown quantity in an equation, satisfies the equation. -- Root of a nail (Anat.), the part of a nail which is covered by the skin. -- Root of a tooth (Anat.), the part of a tooth contained in the socket and consisting of one or more fangs. -- Secondary roots (Bot.), roots emitted from any part of the plant above the radicle. -- To strike root, To take root, to send forth roots; to become fixed in the earth, etc., by a root; hence, in general, to become planted, fixed, or established; to increase and spread; as, an opinion takes root. "The bended twigs take root." Milton.  1. To fix the root; to enter the earth, as roots; to take root and begin to grow. In deep grounds the weeds root deeper. Mortimer. 2. To be firmly fixed; to be established. If any irregularity chanced to intervene and to cause misappehensions, he gave them not leave to root and fasten by concealment. Bp. Fell.  1. To plant and fix deeply in the earth, or as in the earth; to implant firmly; hence, to make deep or radical; to establish; -- used chiefly in the participle; as, rooted trees or forests; rooted dislike. 2. To tear up by the root; to eradicate; to extirpate; -- with up, out, or away. "I will go root away the noisome weeds." Shak. The Lord rooted them out of their land . . . and cast them into another land. Deut. xxix. 28.
corner: 1. The point where two converging lines meet; an angle, either external or internal. 2. The space in the angle between converging lines or walls which meet in a point; as, the chimney corner. 3. An edge or extremity; the part farthest from the center; hence, any quarter or part. From the four corners of the earth they come. Shak. 4. A secret or secluded place; a remote or out of the way place; a nook. This thing was not done in a corner. Acts xxvi. 26. 5. Direction; quarter. Sits the wind in that corner! Shak. 6. The state of things produced by a combination of persons, who buy up the whole or the available part of any stock or species of property, which compels those who need such stock or property to buy of them at their own price; as, a corner in a railway stock. [Broker's Cant] Corner stone, the stone which lies at the corner of two walls, and unites them; the principal stone; especially, the stone which forms the corner of the foundation of an edifice; hence, that which is fundamental importance or indispensable. "A prince who regarded uniformity of faith as the corner stone of his government." Prescott. -- Corner tooth, one of the four teeth which come in a horse's mouth at the age of four years and a half, one on each side of the upper and of the lower jaw, between the middle teeth and the tushes.  1. To drive into a corner. 2. To drive into a position of great difficaulty or hopeless embarrassment; as, to corner a person in argument. 3. To get command of (a stock, commodity, etc.), so as to be able to put one's own price on it; as, to corner the shares of a railroad stock; to corner petroleum.
own: To grant; to acknowledge; to admit to be true; to confess; to recognize in a particular character; as, we own that we have forfeited your love. The wakeful bloodhound rose, and shook his hide owns. Keats.  Belonging to; belonging exclusively or especially to; peculiar; -- most frequently following a possessive pronoun, as my, our, thy, your, his, her, its, their, in order to emphasize or intensify the idea of property, peculiar interest, or exclusive ownership; as, my own father; my own composition; my own idea; at my own price. "No man was his own [i. e., no man was master of himself, or in possession of his senses]." Shak. To hold one's own, to keep or maintain one's possessions; to yield nothing; esp., to suffer no loss or disadvantage in a contest. Shak.  To hold as property; to have a legal or rightful title to; to be the proprietor or possessor of; to possess; as, to own a house.
whether: Which (of two); which one (of two); -- used interrogatively and relatively. [Archaic] Now choose yourself whether that you liketh. Chaucer. One day in doubt I cast for to compare Whether in beauties' glory did exceed. Spenser. Whether of them twain did the will of his father Matt. xxi. 31.  In case; if; -- used to introduce the first or two or more alternative clauses, the other or others being connected by or, or by or whether. When the second of two alternatives is the simple negative of the first it is sometimes only indicated by the particle not or no after the correlative, and sometimes it is omitted entirely as being distinctly implied in the whether of the first. And now who knows But you, Lorenzo, whether I am yours Shak. You have said; but whether wisely or no, let the forest judge. Shak. For whether we live, we live unto the Lord; and whether we die, we die unto the Lord; whether we live therefore, or die, we are the Lord's. Rom. xiv. 8. But whether thus these things, or whether not; Whether the sun, predominant in heaven, Rise on the earth, or earth rise on the sun, . . . Solicit not thy thoughts with matters hid. Milton. Whether or no, in either case; in any case; as, I will go whether or no. -- Whether that, whether. Shak.
wood: Mad; insane; possessed; rabid; furious; frantic. [Obs.] [Written also wode.] Our hoste gan to swear as [if] he were wood. Chaucer.  To grow mad; to act like a madman; to mad. Chaucer.  1. A large and thick collection of trees; a forest or grove; -- frequently used in the plural. Light thickens, and the crow Makes wing to the rooky wood. Shak. 2. The substance of trees and the like; the hard fibrous substance which composes the body of a tree and its branches, and which is covered by the bark; timber. "To worship their own work in wood and stone for gods." Milton. 3. (Bot.)  The fibrous material which makes up the greater part of the stems and branches of trees and shrubby plants, and is found to a less extent in herbaceous stems. It consists of elongated tubular or needle-shaped cells of various kinds, usually interwoven with the shinning bands called silver grain. Note: Wood consists chiefly of the carbohydrates cellulose and lignin, which are isomeric with starch. 4. Trees cut or sawed for the fire or other uses. Wood acid, Wood vinegar (Chem.), a complex acid liquid obtained in the dry distillation of wood, and containing large quantities of acetic acid; hence, specifically, acetic acid. Formerly called pyroligneous acid. -- Wood anemone (Bot.), a delicate flower (Anemone nemorosa) of early spring; -- also called windflower. See Illust. of Anemone. -- Wood ant (Zoöl.), a large ant (Formica rufa) which lives in woods and forests, and constructs large nests. -- Wood apple (Bot.). See Elephant apple, under Elephant. -- Wood baboon (Zoöl.), the drill. -- Wood betony. (Bot.) (a) Same as Betony. (b) The common American lousewort (Pedicularis Canadensis), a low perennial herb with yellowish or purplish flowers. -- Wood borer. (Zoöl.) (a) The larva of any one of numerous species of boring beetles, esp. elaters, longicorn beetles, buprestidans, and certain weevils. See Apple borer, under Apple, and Pine weevil, under Pine. (b) The larva of any one of various species of lepidopterous insects, especially of the clearwing moths, as the peach-tree borer (see under Peach), and of the goat moths. (c) The larva of various species of hymenopterous of the tribe Urocerata. See Tremex. (d) Any one of several bivalve shells which bore in wood, as the teredos, and species of Xylophaga. (e) Any one of several species of small Crustacea, as the Limnoria, and the boring amphipod (Chelura terebrans). -- Wood carpet, a kind of floor covering made of thin pieces of wood secured to a flexible backing, as of cloth. Knight. -- Wood cell (Bot.), a slender cylindrical or prismatic cell usually tapering to a point at both ends. It is the principal constituent of woody fiber. -- Wood choir, the choir, or chorus, of birds in the woods. [Poetic] Coleridge. -- Wood coal, charcoal; also, lignite, or brown coal. -- Wood cricket (Zoöl.), a small European cricket (Nemobius sylvestris). -- Wood culver (Zoöl.), the wood pigeon. -- Wood cut, an engraving on wood; also, a print from such an engraving. -- Wood dove (Zoöl.), the stockdove. -- Wood drink, a decoction or infusion of medicinal woods. -- Wood duck (Zoöl.) (a) A very beautiful American duck (Aix sponsa). The male has a large crest, and its plumage is varied with green, purple, black, white, and red. It builds its nest in trees, whence the name. Called also bridal duck, summer duck, and wood widgeon. (b) The hooded merganser. (c) The Australian maned goose (Chlamydochen jubata). -- Wood echo, an echo from the wood. -- Wood engraver. (a) An engraver on wood. (b) (Zoöl.) Any of several species of small beetles whose larvæ bore beneath the bark of trees, and excavate furrows in the wood often more or less resembling coarse engravings; especially, Xyleborus xylographus. -- Wood engraving. (a) The act or art engraving on wood; xylography. (b) An engraving on wood; a wood cut; also, a print from such an engraving. -- Wood fern. (Bot.) See Shield fern, under Shield. -- Wood fiber. (a) (Bot.) Fibrovascular tissue. (b) Wood comminuted, and reduced to a powdery or dusty mass. -- Wood fretter (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of beetles whose larvæ bore in the wood, or beneath the bark, of trees. -- Wood frog (Zoöl.), a common North American frog (Rana sylvatica) which lives chiefly in the woods, except during the breeding season. It is drab or yellowish brown, with a black stripe on each side of the head. -- Wood germander. (Bot.) See under Germander. -- Wood god, a fabled sylvan deity. -- Wood grass. (Bot.) See under Grass. -- Wood grouse. (Zoöl.) (a) The capercailzie. (b) The spruce partridge. See under Spruce. -- Wood guest (Zoöl.), the ringdove. [Prov. Eng.] -- Wood hen. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of several species of Old World short-winged rails of the genus Ocydromus, including the weka and allied species. (b) The American woodcock. -- Wood hoopoe (Zoöl.), any one of several species of Old World arboreal birds belonging to Irrisor and allied genera. They are closely allied to the common hoopoe, but have a curved beak, and a longer tail. -- Wood ibis (Zoöl.), any one of several species of large, long- legged, wading birds belonging to the genus Tantalus. The head and neck are naked or scantily covered with feathers. The American wood ibis (Tantalus loculator) is common in Florida. -- Wood lark (Zoöl.), a small European lark (Alauda arborea), which, like, the skylark, utters its notes while on the wing. So called from its habit of perching on trees. -- Wood laurel (Bot.), a European evergreen shrub (Daphne Laureola). -- Wood leopard (Zoöl.), a European spotted moth (Zeuzera æsculi) allied to the goat moth. Its large fleshy larva bores in the wood of the apple, pear, and other fruit trees. -- Wood lily (Bot.), the lily of the valley. -- Wood lock (Naut.), a piece of wood close fitted and sheathed with copper, in the throating or score of the pintle, to keep the rudder from rising. -- Wood louse (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of numerous species of terrestrial isopod Crustacea belonging to Oniscus, Armadillo, and related genera. See Sow bug, under Sow, and Pill bug, under Pill. (b) Any one of several species of small, wingless, pseudoneuropterous insects of the family Psocidæ, which live in the crevices of walls and among old books and papers. Some of the species are called also book lice, and deathticks, or deathwatches. -- Wood mite (Zoöl.), any one of numerous small mites of the family Oribatidæ. They are found chiefly in woods, on tree trunks and stones. -- Wood mote. (Eng. Law) (a) Formerly, the forest court. (b) The court of attachment. -- Wood nettle. (Bot.) See under Nettle. -- Wood nightshade (Bot.), woody nightshade. -- Wood nut (Bot.), the filbert. -- Wood nymph. (a) A nymph inhabiting the woods; a fabled goddess of the woods; a dryad. "The wood nymphs, decked with daisies trim." Milton. (b) (Zoöl.) Any one of several species of handsomely colored moths belonging to the genus Eudryas. The larvæ are bright-colored, and some of the species, as Eudryas grata, and E. unio, feed on the leaves of the grapevine. (c) (Zoöl.) Any one of several species of handsomely colored South American humming birds belonging to the genus Thalurania. The males are bright blue, or green and blue. -- Wood offering, wood burnt on the altar. We cast the lots . . . for the wood offering. Neh. x. 34. -- Wood oil (Bot.), a resinous oil obtained from several East Indian trees of the genus Dipterocarpus, having properties similar to those of copaiba, and sometimes substituted for it. It is also used for mixing paint. See Gurjun. -- Wood opal (Min.), a striped variety of coarse opal, having some resemblance to wood. -- Wood paper, paper made of wood pulp. See Wood pulp, below. -- Wood pewee (Zoöl.), a North American tyrant flycatcher (Contopus virens). It closely resembles the pewee, but is smaller. -- Wood pie (Zoöl.), any black and white woodpecker, especially the European great spotted woodpecker. -- Wood pigeon. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of numerous species of Old World pigeons belonging to Palumbus and allied genera of the family Columbidæ. (b) The ringdove. -- Wood puceron (Zoöl.), a plant louse. -- Wood pulp (Technol.), vegetable fiber obtained from the poplar and other white woods, and so softened by digestion with a hot solution of alkali that it can be formed into sheet paper, etc. It is now produced on an immense scale. -- Wood quail (Zoöl.), any one of several species of East Indian crested quails belonging to Rollulus and allied genera, as the red- crested wood quail (R. roulroul), the male of which is bright green, with a long crest of red hairlike feathers. -- Wood rabbit (Zoöl.), the cottontail. -- Wood rat (Zoöl.), any one of several species of American wild rats of the genus Neotoma found in the Southern United States; -- called also bush rat. The Florida wood rat (Neotoma Floridana) is the best-known species. -- Wood reed grass (Bot.), a tall grass (Cinna arundinacea) growing in moist woods. -- Wood reeve, the steward or overseer of a wood. [Eng.] -- Wood rush (Bot.), any plant of the genus Luzula, differing from the true rushes of the genus Juncus chiefly in having very few seeds in each capsule. -- Wood sage (Bot.), a name given to several labiate plants of the genus Teucrium. See Germander. -- Wood screw, a metal screw formed with a sharp thread, and usually with a slotted head, for insertion in wood. -- Wood sheldrake (Zoöl.), the hooded merganser. -- Wood shock (Zoöl.), the fisher. See Fisher, 2. -- Wood shrike (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of Old World singing birds belonging to Grallina, Collyricincla, Prionops, and allied genera, common in India and Australia. They are allied to the true shrikes, but feed upon both insects and berries. -- Wood snipe. (Zoöl.) (a) The American woodcock. (b) An Asiatic snipe (Gallinago nemoricola). -- Wood soot, soot from burnt wood. -- Wood sore. (Zoöl.) See Cuckoo spit, under Cuckoo. -- Wood sorrel (Bot.), a plant of the genus Oxalis (Oxalis Acetosella), having an acid taste. See Illust. (a) of Shamrock. -- Wood spirit. (Chem.) See Methyl alcohol, under Methyl. -- Wood stamp, a carved or engraved block or stamp of wood, for impressing figures or colors on fabrics. -- Wood star (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small South American humming birds belonging to the genus Calothorax. The male has a brilliant gorget of blue, purple, and other colors. -- Wood sucker (Zoöl.), the yaffle. -- Wood swallow (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of Old World passerine birds belonging to the genus Artamus and allied genera of the family Artamidæ. They are common in the East Indies, Asia, and Australia. In form and habits they resemble swallows, but in structure they resemble shrikes. They are usually black above and white beneath. -- Wood tapper (Zoöl.), any woodpecker. -- Wood tar. See under Tar. -- Wood thrush, (Zoöl.) (a) An American thrush (Turdus mustelinus) noted for the sweetness of its song. See under Thrush. (b) The missel thrush. -- Wood tick. See in Vocabulary. -- Wood tin. (Min.). See Cassiterite. -- Wood titmouse (Zoöl.), the goldcgest. -- Wood tortoise (Zoöl.), the sculptured tortoise. See under Sculptured. -- Wood vine (Bot.), the white bryony. -- Wood vinegar. See Wood acid, above. -- Wood warbler. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of numerous species of American warblers of the genus Dendroica. See Warbler. (b) A European warbler (Phylloscopus sibilatrix); -- called also green wren, wood wren, and yellow wren. -- Wood worm (Zoöl.), a larva that bores in wood; a wood borer. -- Wood wren. (Zoöl.) (a) The wood warbler. (b) The willow warbler.  To supply with wood, or get supplies of wood for; as, to wood a steamboat or a locomotive.  To take or get a supply of wood.
guess: 1. To form an opinion concerning, without knowledge or means of knowledge; to judge of at random; to conjecture. First, if thou canst, the harder reason guess. Pope. 2. To judge or form an opinion of, from reasons that seem preponderating, but are not decisive. We may then guess how far it was from his design. Milton. Of ambushed men, whom, by their arms and dress, To be Taxallan enemies I guess. Dryden. 3. To solve by a correct conjecture; to conjecture rightly; as, he who guesses the riddle shall have the ring; he has guessed my designs. 4. To hit upon or reproduce by memory. [Obs.] Tell me their words, as near as thou canst guess them. Shak. 5. To think; to suppose; to believe; to imagine; -- followed by an objective clause. Not all together; better far, I guess, That we do make our entrance several ways. Shak. But in known images of life I guess The labor greater. Pope. Syn. -- To conjecture; suppose; surmise; suspect; divine; think; imagine; fancy. -- To Guess, Think, Reckon. Guess denotes, to attempt to hit upon at random; as, to guess at a thing when blindfolded; to conjecture or form an opinion on hidden or very slight grounds: as, to guess a riddle; to guess out the meaning of an obscure passage. The use of the word guess for think or believe, although abundantly sanctioned by good English authors, is now regarded as antiquated and objectionable by discriminating writers. It may properly be branded as a colloguialism and vulgarism when used respecting a purpose or a thing about which there is no uncertainty; as, I guess I 'll go to bed.  To make a guess or random judgment; to conjecture; -- with at, about, etc This is the place, as well as I may guess. Milton.  An opinion as to anything, formed without sufficient or decisive evidence or grounds; an attempt to hit upon the truth by a random judgment; a conjecture; a surmise. A poet must confess His art 's like physic -- but a happy guess. Dryden.
excite: 1. To call to activity in any way; to rouse to feeling; to kindle to passionate emotion; to stir up to combined or general activity; as, to excite a person, the spirits, the passions; to excite a mutiny or insurrection; to excite heat by friction. 2. (Physiol.)  To call forth or increase the vital activity of an organism, or any of its parts. Syn. -- To incite; awaken; animate; rouse or arouse; stimulate; inflame; irritate; provoke. -- To Excite, Incite. When we excite we rouse into action feelings which were less strong; when we incite we spur on or urge forward to a specific act or end. Demosthenes excited the passions of the Athenians against Philip, and thus incited the whole nation to unite in the war against him. Antony, by his speech over the body of Cæsar, so excited the feelings of the populace, that Brutus and his companions were compelled to flee from Rome; many however, were incited to join their standard, not only by love of liberty, but hopes of plunder.
describe: 1. To represent by drawing; to draw a plan of; to delineate; to trace or mark out; as, to describe a circle by the compasses; a torch waved about the head in such a way as to describe a circle. 2. To represent by words written or spoken; to give an account of; to make known to others by words or signs; as, the geographer describes countries and cities. 3. To distribute into parts, groups, or classes; to mark off; to class. [Obs.] Passed through the land, and described it by cities into seven parts in a book. Josh. xviii. 9. Syn. -- To set forth; represent; delineate; relate; recount; narrate; express; explain; depict; portray; chracterize.  To use the faculty of describing; to give a description; as, Milton describes with uncommon force and beauty.
history: 1. A learning or knowing by inquiry; the knowledge of facts and events, so obtained; hence, a formal statement of such information; a narrative; a description; a written record; as, the history of a patient's case; the history of a legislative bill. 2. A systematic, written account of events, particularly of those affecting a nation, institution, science, or art, and usually connected with a philosophical explanation of their causes; a true story, as distinguished from a romance; -- distinguished also from annals, which relate simply the facts and events of each year, in strict chronological order; from biography, which is the record of an individual's life; and from memoir, which is history composed from personal experience, observation, and memory. Histories are as perfect as the historian is wise, and is gifted with an eye and a soul. Carlyle. For aught that I could ever read, Could ever hear by tale or history. Shak. What histories of toil could I declare! Pope. History piece, a representation in painting, drawing, etc., of any real event, including the actors and the action. -- Natural history, a description and classification of objects in nature, as minerals, plants, animals, etc., and the phenomena which they exhibit to the senses. Syn. -- Chronicle; annals; relation; narration. -- History, Chronicle, Annals. History is a methodical record of important events which concern a community of men, usually so arranged as to show the connection of causes and effects, to give an analysis of motive and action etc. A chronicle is a record of such events, conforming to the order of time as its distinctive feature. Annals are a chronicle divided up into separate years. By poetic license annals is sometimes used for history. Justly Cæsar scorns the poet's lays; It is to history he trusts for praise. Pope. No more yet of this; For 't is a chronicle of day by day, Not a relation for a breakfast. Shak. Many glorious examples in the annals of our religion. Rogers.  To narrate or record. [Obs.] Shak.
end: 1. The extreme or last point or part of any material thing considered lengthwise (the extremity of breadth being side); hence, extremity, in general; the concluding part; termination; close; limit; as, the end of a field, line, pole, road; the end of a year, of a discourse; put an end to pain; -- opposed to Ant: beginning, when used of anything having a first part. Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof. Eccl. vii. 8. 2. Point beyond which no procession can be made; conclusion; issue; result, whether successful or otherwise; conclusive event; consequence. My guilt be on my head, and there an end. Shak. O that a man might know The end of this day's business ere it come! Shak. 3. Termination of being; death; destruction; extermination; also, cause of death or destruction. Unblamed through life, lamented in thy end. Pope. Confound your hidden falsehood, and award Either of you to be the other's end. Shak. I shall see an end of him. Shak. 4. The object aimed at in any effort considered as the close and effect of exertion; ppurpose; intention; aim; as, to labor for private or public ends. Losing her, the end of living lose. Dryden. When every man is his own end, all things will come to a bad end. Coleridge. 5. That which is left; a remnant; a fragment; a scrap; as, odds and ends. I clothe my naked villainy With old odd ends stolen out of holy writ, And seem a saint, when most I play the devil. Shak. 6. (Carpet Manuf.)  One of the yarns of the worsted warp in a Brussels carpet. An end. (a) On end; upright; erect; endways. Spenser (b) To the end; continuously. [Obs.] Richardson. -- End bulb (Anat.), one of the bulblike bodies in which some sensory nerve fibers end in certain parts of the skin and mucous membranes; -- also called end corpuscles. -- End fly, a bobfly. -- End for end, one end for the other; in reversed order. -- End man, the last man in a row; one of the two men at the extremities of a line of minstrels. -- End on (Naut.), bow foremost. -- End organ (Anat.), the structure in which a nerve fiber ends, either peripherally or centrally. -- End plate (Anat.), one of the flat expansions in which motor nerve fibers terminate on muscular fibers. -- End play (Mach.), movement endwise, or room for such movement. -- End stone (Horol.), one of the two plates of a jewel in a timepiece; the part that limits the pivot's end play. -- Ends of the earth, the remotest regions of the earth. -- In the end, finally. Shak. -- On end, upright; erect. -- To the end, in order. Bacon. -- To make both ends meet, to live within one's income. Fuller. -- To put an end to, to destroy.  1. To bring to an end or conclusion; to finish; to close; to terminate; as, to end a speech. "I shall end this strife." Shak. On the seventh day God ended his work. Gen. ii. 2. 2. To form or be at the end of; as, the letter k ends the word back. 3. To destroy; to put to death. "This sword hath ended him." Shak. To end up, to lift or tilt, so as to set on end; as, to end up a hogshead.  To come to the ultimate point; to be finished; to come to a close; to cease; to terminate; as, a voyage ends; life ends; winter ends.
show: 1. To exhibit or present to view; to place in sight; to display; -- the thing exhibited being the object, and often with an indirect object denoting the person or thing seeing or beholding; as, to show a house; show your colors; shopkeepers show customers goods (show goods to customers). Go thy way, shew thyself to the priest. Matt. viii. 4. Nor want we skill or art from whence to raise Magnificence; and what can heaven show more Milton. 2. To exhibit to the mental view; to tell; to disclose; to reveal; to make known; as, to show one's designs. Shew them the way wherein they must walk. Ex. xviii. 20. If it please my father to do thee evil, then I will shew it thee, and send thee away. 1 Sam. xx. 13. 3. Specifically, to make known the way to (a person); hence, to direct; to guide; to asher; to conduct; as, to show a person into a parlor; to show one to the door. 4. To make apparent or clear, as by evidence, testimony, or reasoning; to prove; to explain; also, to manifest; to evince; as, to show the truth of a statement; to show the causes of an event. I 'll show my duty by my timely care. Dryden. 5. To bestow; to confer; to afford; as, to show favor. Shewing mercy unto thousands of them that love me. Ex. xx. 6. To show forth, to manifest; to publish; to proclaim. -- To show his paces, to exhibit the gait, speed, or the like; -- said especially of a horse. -- To show off, to exhibit ostentatiously. -- To show up, to expose. [Colloq.]  1. To exhibit or manifest one's self or itself; to appear; to look; to be in appearance; to seem. Just such she shows before a rising storm. Dryden. All round a hedge upshoots, and shows At distance like a little wood. Tennyson. 2. To have a certain appearance, as well or ill, fit or unfit; to become or suit; to appear. My lord of York, it better showed with you. Shak. To show off, to make a show; to display one's self.  1. The act of showing, or bringing to view; exposure to sight; exhibition. 2. That which os shown, or brought to view; that which is arranged to be seen; a spectacle; an exhibition; as, a traveling show; a cattle show. As for triumphs, masks, feasts, and such shows. Bacon. 3. Proud or ostentatious display; parade; pomp. I envy none their pageantry and show. Young. 4. Semblance; likeness; appearance. He through the midst unmarked, In show plebeian angel militant Of lowest order, passed. Milton. 5. False semblance; deceitful appearance; pretense. Beware of the scribes, . . . which devour widows' houses, and for a shew make long prayers. Luke xx. 46. 47. 6. (Med.)  A discharge, from the vagina, of mucus streaked with blood, occuring a short time before labor. 7. (Mining)  A pale blue flame, at the top of a candle flame, indicating the presence of fire damp. Raymond. Show bill, a broad sheet containing an advertisement in large letters. -- Show box, a box xontaining some object of curiosity carried round as a show. -- Show card, an advertising placard; also, a card for displaying samples. -- Show case, a gla -- Show glass, a glass which displays objects; a mirror. -- Show of hands, a raising of hands to indicate judgment; as, the vote was taken by a show of hands. -- Show stone, a piece of glass or crystal supposed to have the property of exhibiting images of persons or things not present, indicating in that way future events.
sea: 1. One of the larger bodies of salt water, less than an ocean, found on the earth's surface; a body of salt water of second rank, generally forming part of, or connecting with, an ocean or a larger sea; as, the Mediterranean Sea; the Sea of Marmora; the North Sea; the Carribean Sea. 2. An inland body of water, esp. if large or if salt or brackish; as, the Caspian Sea; the Sea of Aral; sometimes, a small fresh-water lake; as, the Sea of Galilee. 3. The ocean; the whole body of the salt water which covers a large part of the globe. I marvel how the fishes live in the sea. Shak. Ambiguous between sea and land The river horse and scaly crocodile. Milton. 4. The swell of the ocean or other body of water in a high wind; motion of the water's surface; also, a single wave; a billow; as, there was a high sea after the storm; the vessel shipped a sea. 5. (Jewish Antiq.)  A great brazen laver in the temple at Jerusalem; -- so called from its size. He made a molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round in compass, and five cubits the height thereof. 2 Chron. iv. 2. 6. Fig.: Anything resembling the sea in vastness; as, a sea of glory. Shak. All the space . . . was one sea of heads. Macaulay. Note: Sea is often used in the composition of words of obvious signification; as, sea-bathed, sea-beaten, sea-bound, sea-bred, sea- circled, sealike, sea-nursed, sea-tossed, sea-walled, sea-worn, and the like. It is also used either adjectively or in combination with substantives; as, sea bird, sea-bird, or seabird, sea acorn, or sea- acorn. At sea, upon the ocean; away from land; figuratively, without landmarks for guidance; lost; at the mercy of circumstances. "To say the old man was at sea would be too feeble an expression." G. W. Cable -- At full sea at the height of flood tide; hence, at the height. "But now God's mercy was at full sea." Jer. Taylor. -- Beyond seas, or Beyond the sea or the seas (Law), out of the state, territory, realm, or country. Wharton. -- Half seas over, half drunk. [Colloq.] Spectator. -- Heavy sea, a sea in which the waves run high. -- Long sea, a sea characterized by the uniform and steady motion of long and extensive waves. -- Short sea, a sea in which the waves are short, broken, and irregular, so as to produce a tumbling or jerking motion. -- To go to sea, a adopt the calling or occupation of a sailor.
group: 1. A cluster, crowd, or throng; an assemblage, either of persons or things, collected without any regular form or arrangement; as, a group of men or of trees; a group of isles. 2. An assemblage of objects in a certain order or relation, or having some resemblance or common characteristic; as, groups of strata. 3. (Biol.)  A variously limited assemblage of animals or planta, having some resemblance, or common characteristics in form or structure. The term has different uses, and may be made to include certain species of a genus, or a whole genus, or certain genera, or even several orders. 4. (Mus.)  A number of eighth, sixteenth, etc., notes joined at the stems; -- sometimes rather indefinitely applied to any ornament made up of a few short notes.  To form a group of; to arrange or combine in a group or in groups, often with reference to mutual relation and the best effect; to form an assemblage of. The difficulty lies in drawing and disposing, or, as the painters term it, in grouping such a multitude of different objects. Prior. Grouped columns (Arch.), three or moro columns placed upon the same pedestal.
water: 1. The fluid which descends from the clouds in rain, and which forms rivers, lakes, seas, etc. "We will drink water." Shak."Powers of fire, air, water, and earth." Milton. Note: Pure water consists of hydrogen and oxygen, H2O, and is a colorless, odorless, tasteless, transparent liquid, which is very slightly compressible. At its maximum density, 39º Fahr. or 4º C., it is the standard for specific gravities, one cubic centimeter weighing one gram. It freezes at 32º Fahr. or 0º C. and boils at 212º Fahr. or 100º C. (see Ice, Steam). It is the most important natural solvent, and is frequently impregnated with foreign matter which is mostly removed by distillation; hence, rain water is nearly pure. It is an important ingredient in the tissue of animals and plants, the human body containing about two thirds its weight of water. 2. A body of water, standing or flowing; a lake, river, or other collection of water. Remembering he had passed over a small water a poor scholar when first coming to the university, he kneeled. Fuller. 3. Any liquid secretion, humor, or the like, resembling water; esp., the urine. 4. (Pharm.)  A solution in water of a gaseous or readily volatile substance; as, ammonia water. U. S. Pharm. 5. The limpidity and luster of a precious stone, especially a diamond; as, a diamond of the first water, that is, perfectly pure and transparent. Hence, of the first water, that is, of the first excellence. 6. A wavy, lustrous pattern or decoration such as is imparted to linen, silk, metals, etc. See Water, v. t., 3, Damask, v. t., and Damaskeen. 7. An addition to the shares representing the capital of a stock company so that the aggregate par value of the shares is increased while their value for investment is diminished, or "diluted." [Brokers' Cant] Note: Water is often used adjectively and in the formation of many self-explaining compounds; as, water drainage; water gauge, or water- gauge; waterfowl, water-fowl, or water fowl; water-beaten; water- borne, water-circled, water-girdled, water-rocked, etc. Hard water. See under Hard. -- Inch of water, a unit of measure of quantity of water, being the quantity which will flow through an orifice one inch square, or a circular orifice one inch in diameter, in a vertical surface, under a stated constant head; also called miner's inch, and water inch. The shape of the orifice and the head vary in different localities. In the Western United States, for hydraulic mining, the standard aperture is square and the head from 4 to 9 inches above its center. In Europe, for experimental hydraulics, the orifice is usually round and the head from -- Mineral water, waters which are so impregnated with foreign ingredients, such as gaseous, sulphureous, and saline substances, as to give them medicinal properties, or a particular flavor or temperature. -- Soft water, water not impregnated with lime or mineral salts. -- To hold water. See under Hold, v. t. -- To keep one's head above water, to keep afloat; fig., to avoid failure or sinking in the struggles of life. [Colloq.] -- To make water. (a) To pass urine. Swift. (b) (Naut.) To admit water; to leak. -- Water of crystallization (Chem.), the water combined with many salts in their crystalline form. This water is loosely, but, nevertheless, chemically, combined, for it is held in fixed and definite amount for each substance containing it. Thus, while pure copper sulphate, CuSO4, is a white amorphous substance, blue vitriol, the crystallized form, CuSO4.5H2O, contains five molecules of water of crystallization. -- Water on the brain (Med.), hydrocephalus. -- Water on the chest (Med.), hydrothorax. Note: Other phrases, in which water occurs as the first element, will be found in alphabetical order in the Vocabulary.  1. To wet or supply with water; to moisten; to overflow with water; to irrigate; as, to water land; to water flowers. With tears watering the ground. Milton. Men whose lives gilded on like rivers that water the woodlands. Longfellow. 2. To supply with water for drink; to cause or allow to drink; as, to water cattle and horses. 3. To wet and calender, as cloth, so as to impart to it a lustrous appearance in wavy lines; to diversify with wavelike lines; as, to water silk. Cf. Water, n., 6. 4. To add water to (anything), thereby extending the quantity or bulk while reducing the strength or quality; to extend; to dilute; to weaken. To water stock, to increase the capital stock of a company by issuing new stock, thus diminishing the value of the individual shares. Cf. Water, n., 7. [Brokers' Cant]  1. To shed, secrete, or fill with, water or liquid matter; as, his eyes began to water. If thine eyes can water for his death. Shak. 2. To get or take in water; as, the ship put into port to water. The mouth waters, a phrase denoting that a person or animal has a longing desire for something, since the sight of food often causes one who is hungry to have an increased flow of saliva.
insect: 1. (Zoöl.)  One of the Insecta; esp., one of the Hexapoda. See Insecta. Note: The hexapod insects pass through three stages during their growth, viz., the larva, pupa, and imago or adult, but in some of the orders the larva differs little from the imago, except in lacking wings, and the active pupa is very much like the larva, except in having rudiments of wings. In the higher orders, the larva is usually a grub, maggot, or caterpillar, totally unlike the adult, while the pupa is very different from both larva and imago and is inactive, taking no food. 2. (Zoöl.)  Any air-breathing arthropod, as a spider or scorpion. 3. (Zoöl.)  Any small crustacean. In a wider sense, the word is often loosely applied to various small invertebrates. 4. Fig.: Any small, trivial, or contemptible person or thing. Thomson. Insect powder,a powder used for the extermination of insects; esp., the powdered flowers of certain species of Pyrethrum, a genus now merged in Chrysanthemum. Called also Persian powder.  1. Of or pertaining to an insect or insects. 2. Like an insect; small; mean; ephemeral.
decide: 1. To cut off; to separate. [Obs.] Our seat denies us traffic here; The sea, too near, decides us from the rest. Fuller. 2. To bring to a termination, as a question, controversy, struggle, by giving the victory to one side or party; to render judgment concerning; to determine; to settle. So shall thy judgment be; thyself hast decided it. 1 Kings xx. 40. The quarrel toucheth none but us alone; Betwixt ourselves let us decide it then. Shak.  To determine; to form a definite opinion; to come to a conclusion; to give decision; as, the court decided in favor of the defendant. Who shall decide, when doctors disagree Pope.
hope: 1. A sloping plain between mountain ridges. [Obs.] 2. A small bay; an inlet; a haven. [Scot.] Jamieson.  1. A desire of some good, accompanied with an expectation of obtaining it, or a belief that it is obtainable; an expectation of something which is thought to be desirable; confidence; pleasing expectancy. The hypocrite's hope shall perish. Job vii. 13. He wished, but not with hope. Milton. New thoughts of God, new hopes of Heaven. Keble. 2. One who, or that which, gives hope, furnishes ground of expectation, or promises desired good. The Lord will be the hope of his people. Joel iii. 16. A young gentleman of great hopes, whose love of learning was highly commendable. Macaulay. 3. That which is hoped for; an object of hope. Lavina is thine elder brother's hope. Shak.  1. To entertain or indulge hope; to cherish a desire of good, or of something welcome, with expectation of obtaining it or belief that it is obtainable; to expect; -- usually followed by for. "Hope for good success." Jer. Taylor. But I will hope continually. Ps. lxxi. 14. 2. To place confidence; to trust with confident expectation of good; -- usually followed by in. "I hope in thy word." Ps. cxix. 81. Why art thou cast down, O my soul and why art thou disquieted within me Hope thou in God. Ps. xlii. 11.  1. To desire with expectation or with belief in the possibility or prospect of obtaining; to look forward to as a thing desirable, with the expectation of obtaining it; to cherish hopes of. We hope no other from your majesty. Shak. [Charity] hopeth all things. 1 Cor. xiii. 7. 2. To expect; to fear. [Obs.] "I hope he will be dead." Chaucer. Note: Hope is often used colloquially regarding uncertainties, with no reference to the future. "I hope she takes me to be flesh and blood." Mrs. Centlivre.
summer: One who sums; one who casts up an account.  A large stone or beam placed horizontally on columns, piers, posts, or the like, serving for various uses. Specifically: (a) The lintel of a door or window. (b) The commencement of a cross vault. (c) A central floor timber, as a girder, or a piece reaching from a wall to a girder. Called also summertree.  The season of the year in which the sun shines most directly upon any region; the warmest period of the year. Note: North of the equator summer is popularly taken to include the months of June, July, and August. Astronomically it may be considered, in the northern hemisphere, to begin with the summer solstice, about June 21st, and to end with the autumnal equinox, about September 22d. Indian summer, in North America, a period of warm weather late in autumn, usually characterized by a clear sky, and by a hazy or smoky appearance of the atmosphere, especially near the horizon. The name is derived probably from the custom of the Indians of using this time in preparation for winter by laying in stores of food. -- Saint Martin's summer. See under Saint. -- Summer bird (Zoöl.), the wryneck. [Prov. Eng.] -- Summer colt, the undulating state of the air near the surface of the ground when heated. [Eng.] -- Summer complaint (Med.), a popular term for any diarrheal disorder occurring in summer, especially when produced by heat and indigestion. -- Summer coot (Zoöl.), the American gallinule. [Local, U.S.] -- Summer cypress (Bot.), an annual plant (Kochia Scoparia) of the Goosefoot family. It has narrow, ciliate, crowded leaves, and is sometimes seen in gardens. -- Summer duck. (Zoöl.) (a) The wood duck. (b) The garganey, or summer teal. See Illust. of Wood duck, under Wood. -- Summer fallow, land uncropped and plowed, etc., during the summer, in order to pulverize the soil and kill the weeds. -- Summer rash (Med.), prickly heat. See under Prickly. -- Summer sheldrake (Zoöl.), the hooded merganser. [Local, U.S.] -- Summer snipe. (Zoöl.) (a) The dunlin. (b) The common European sandpiper. (c) The green sandpiper. -- Summer tanager (Zoöl.), a singing bird (Piranga rubra) native of the Middle and Southern United States. The male is deep red, the female is yellowish olive above and yellow beneath. Called also summer redbird. -- Summer teal (Zoöl.), the blue-winged teal. [Local, U.S.] -- Summer wheat, wheat that is sown in the spring, and matures during the summer following. See Spring wheat. -- Summer yellowbird. (Zoöl.) See Yellowbird.  To pass the summer; to spend the warm season; as, to summer in Switzerland. The fowls shall summer upon them. Isa. xviii. 6.  To keep or carry through the summer; to feed during the summer; as, to summer stock.
final: 1. Pertaining to the end or conclusion; last; terminating; ultimate; as, the final day of a school term. Yet despair not of his final pardon. Milton. 2. Conclusive; decisive; as, a final judgment; the battle of Waterloo brought the contest to a final issue. 3. Respecting an end or object to be gained; respecting the purpose or ultimate end in view. Final cause. See under Cause. Syn. -- Final, Conclusive, Ultimate. Final is now appropriated to that which brings with it an end; as, a final adjustment; the final judgment, etc. Conclusive implies the closing of all discussion, negotiation, etc.; as, a conclusive argument or fact; a conclusive arrangement. In using ultimate, we have always reference to something earlier or proceeding; as when we say, a temporary reverse may lead to an ultimate triumph. The statements which a man finally makes at the close of a negotiation are usually conclusive as to his ultimate intentions and designs.
seven: One more than six; six and one added; as, seven days make one week. Seven sciences. See the Note under Science, n., 4. -- Seven stars (Astron.), the Pleiades. -- Seven wonders of the world. See under Wonders. -- Seven-year apple (Bot.), a rubiaceous shrub (Genipa clusiifolia) growing in the West Indies; also, its edible fruit. -- Seven-year vine (Bot.), a tropical climbing plant (Ipomoea tuberosa) related to the morning-glory.  1. The number greater by one than six; seven units or objects. Of every beast, and bird, and insect small, Game sevens and pairs. Milton. 2. A symbol representing seven units, as 7, or vii.
animal: 1. An organized living being endowed with sensation and the power of voluntary motion, and also characterized by taking its food into an internal cavity or stomach for digestion; by giving carbonic acid to the air and taking oxygen in the process of respiration; and by increasing in motive power or active aggressive force with progress to maturity. 2. One of the lower animals; a brute or beast, as distinguished from man; as, men and animals.  1. Of or relating to animals; as, animal functions. 2. Pertaining to the merely sentient part of a creature, as distinguished from the intellectual, rational, or spiritual part; as, the animal passions or appetites. 3. Consisting of the flesh of animals; as, animal food. Animal magnetism. See Magnetism and Mesmerism. -- Animal electricity, the electricity developed in some animals, as the electric eel, torpedo, etc. -- Animal flower (Zoöl.), a name given to certain marine animals resembling a flower, as any species of actinia or sea anemone, and other Anthozoa, hydroids, starfishes, etc. -- Animal heat (Physiol.), the heat generated in the body of a living animal, by means of which the animal is kept at nearly a uniform temperature. -- Animal spirits. See under Spirit. -- Animal kingdom, the whole class of beings endowed with animal life. It embraces several subkingdoms, and under these there are Classes, Orders, Families, Genera, Species, and sometimes intermediate groupings, all in regular subordination, but variously arranged by different writers. Note: The following are the grand divisions, or subkingdoms, and the principal classes under them, generally recognized at the present time: -Vertebrata, including Mammalia or Mammals, Aves or Birds, Reptilia, Amphibia, Pisces or Fishes, Marsipobranchiata (Craniota); and Leptocardia (Acrania). Tunicata, including the Thaliacea, and Ascidioidea or Ascidians. Articulata or Annulosa, including Insecta, Myriapoda, Malacapoda, Arachnida, Pycnogonida, Merostomata, Crustacea (Arthropoda); and Annelida, Gehyrea (Anarthropoda). Helminthes or Vermes, including Rotifera, Chætognatha, Nematoidea, Acanthocephala, Nemertina, Turbellaria, Trematoda, Cestoidea, Mesozea. Molluscoidea, including Brachiopoda and Bryozoa. Mollusca, including Cephalopoda, Gastropoda, Pteropoda, Scaphopoda, Lamellibranchiata or Acephala. Echinodermata, including Holothurioidea, Echinoidea, Asterioidea, Ophiuroidea, and Crinoidea. Coelenterata, including Anthozoa or Polyps, Ctenophora, and Hydrozoa or Acalephs. Spongiozoa or Porifera, including the sponges. Protozoa, including Infusoria and Rhizopoda. For definitions, see these names in the Vocabulary.
kind: 1. Characteristic of the species; belonging to one's nature; natural; native. [Obs.] Chaucer. It becometh sweeter than it should be, and loseth the kind taste. Holland. 2. Having feelings befitting our common nature; congenial; sympathetic; as, a kind man; a kind heart. Yet was he kind, or if severe in aught, The love he bore to learning was his fault. Goldsmith. 3. Showing tenderness or goodness; disposed to do good and confer happiness; averse to hurting or paining; benevolent; benignant; gracious. He is kind unto the unthankful and to evil. Luke vi 35. O cruel Death, to those you take more kind Than to the wretched mortals left behind. Waller. A fellow feeling makes one wondrous kind. Garrick. 4. Proceeding from, or characterized by, goodness, gentleness, or benevolence; as, a kind act. "Manners so kind, yet stately." Tennyson. 5. Gentle; tractable; easily governed; as, a horse kind in harness. Syn. -- Benevolent; benign; beneficent; bounteous; gracious; propitious; generous; forbearing; indulgent; tender; humane; compassionate; good; lenient; clement; mild; gentle; bland; obliging; friendly; amicable. See Obliging.  1. Nature; natural instinct or disposition. [Obs.] He knew by kind and by no other lore. Chaucer. Some of you, on pure instinct of nature, Are led by kind t'admire your fellow-creature. Dryden. 2. Race; genus; species; generic class; as, in mankind or humankind. "Come of so low a kind." Chaucer. Every kind of beasts, and of birds. James iii.7. She follows the law of her kind. Wordsworth. Here to sow the seed of bread, That man and all the kinds be fed. Emerson. 3. Nature; style; character; sort; fashion; manner; variety; description; class; as, there are several kinds of eloquence, of style, and of music; many kinds of government; various kinds of soil, etc. How diversely Love doth his pageants play, And snows his power in variable kinds ! Spenser. There is one kind of flesh of men, another flesh of beasts, another of fishes, and another of birds. I Cor. xv. 39. Diogenes was asked in a kind of scorn: What was the matter that philosophers haunted rich men, and not rich men philosophers Bacon. A kind of, something belonging to the class of; something like to; -- said loosely or slightingly. In kind, in the produce or designated commodity itself, as distinguished from its value in money. Tax on tillage was often levied in kind upon corn. Arbuthnot. Syn. -- Sort; species; class; genus; nature; style; character; breed; set.  To beget. [Obs.] Spenser.
save: The herb sage, or salvia. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. To make safe; to procure the safety of; to preserve from injury, destruction, or evil of any kind; to rescue from impending danger; as, to save a house from the flames. God save all this fair company. Chaucer. He cried, saying, Lord, save me. Matt. xiv. 30. Thou hast . . . quitted all to save A world from utter loss. Milton. 2. (Theol.)  Specifically, to deliver from and its penalty; to rescue from a state of condemnation and spiritual death, and bring into a state of spiritual life. Christ Jesus came into the world to save sinners. 1 Tim. i. 15. 3. To keep from being spent or lost; to secure from waste or expenditure; to lay up; to reserve. Now save a nation, and now save a groat. Pope. 4. To rescue from something undesirable or hurtful; to prevent from doing something; to spare. I'll save you That labor, sir. All's now done. Shak. 5. To hinder from doing, suffering, or happening; to obviate the necessity of; to prevent; to spare. Will you not speak to save a lady's blush Dryden. 6. To hold possession or use of; to escape loss of. Just saving the tide, and putting in a stock of merit. Swift. To save appearance, to preserve a decent outside; to avoid exposure of a discreditable state of things. Syn. -- To preserve; rescue; deliver; protect; spare; reserve; prevent.  To avoid unnecessary expense or expenditure; to prevent waste; to be economical. Brass ordnance saveth in the quantity of the material. Bacon.  Except; excepting; not including; leaving out; deducting; reserving; saving. Five times received I forty stripes save one. 2 Cor. xi. 24. Syn. -- See Except.  Except; unless.
hold: The whole interior portion of a vessel below the lower deck, in which the cargo is stowed.  1. To cause to remain in a given situation, position, or relation, within certain limits, or the like; to prevent from falling or escaping; to sustain; to restrain; to keep in the grasp; to retain. The loops held one curtain to another. Ex. xxxvi. 12. Thy right hand shall hold me. Ps. cxxxix. 10. They all hold swords, being expert in war. Cant. iii. In vain he seeks, that having can not hold. Spenser. France, thou mayst hold a serpent by the tongue, . . . A fasting tiger safer by the tooth, Than keep in peace that hand which thou dost hold. Shak. 2. To retain in one's keeping; to maintain possession of, or authority over; not to give up or relinquish; to keep; to defend. We mean to hold what anciently we claim Of deity or empire. Milton. 3. To have; to possess; to be in possession of; to occupy; to derive title to; as, to hold office. This noble merchant held a noble house. Chaucer. Of him to hold his seigniory for a yearly tribute. Knolles. And now the strand, and now the plain, they held. Dryden. 4. To impose restraint upon; to limit in motion or action; to bind legally or morally; to confine; to restrain. We can not hold mortality's strong hand. Shak. Death! what do'st O,hold thy blow. Grashaw. He hat not sufficient judgment and self-command to hold his tongue. Macaulay. 5. To maintain in being or action; to carry on; to prosecute, as a course of conduct or an argument; to continue; to sustain. Hold not thy peace, and be not still. Ps. lxxxiii. 1. Seedtime and harvest, heat and hoary frost, Shall hold their course. Milton. 6. To prosecute, have, take, or join in, as something which is the result of united action; as to, hold a meeting, a festival, a session, etc.; hence, to direct and bring about officially; to conduct or preside at; as, the general held a council of war; a judge holds a court; a clergyman holds a service. I would hold more talk with thee. Shak. 7. To receive and retain; to contain as a vessel; as, this pail holds milk; hence, to be able to receive and retain; to have capacity or containing power for. Broken cisterns that can hold no water. Jer. ii. 13. One sees more devils than vast hell can hold. Shak. 8. To accept, as an opinion; to be the adherent of, openly or privately; to persist in, as a purpose; to maintain; to sustain. Stand fast and hold the traditions which ye have been taught. 2 Thes. ii.15. But still he held his purpose to depart. Dryden. 9. To consider; to regard; to esteem; to account; to think; to judge. I hold him but a fool. Shak. I shall never hold that man my friend. Shak. The Lord will not hold him guiltless that taketh his name in vain. Ex. xx. 7. 10. To bear, carry, or manage; as he holds himself erect; he holds his head high. Let him hold his fingers thus. Shak. To hold a wager, to lay or hazard a wager. Swift. -- To hold forth, to offer; to exhibit; to propose; to put forward. "The propositions which books hold forth and pretend to teach." Locke. -- To held in, to restrain; to curd. -- To hold in hand, to toy with; to keep in expectation; to have in one's power. [Obs.] O, fie! to receive favors, return falsehoods, And hold a lady in hand. Beaw. & Fl. --To hold in play, to keep under control; to dally with. Macaulay. -- To hold off, to keep at a distance. -- To hold on, to hold in being, continuance or position; as, to hold a rider on. -- To hold one's day, to keep one's appointment. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- To hold one's own. (a) To keep good one's present condition absolutely or relatively; not to fall off, or to lose ground; as, a ship holds her own when she does not lose ground in a race or chase; a man holds his own when he does not lose strength or weight. -- To hold one's peace, to keep silence.- To hold out. (a) To extend; to offer. "Fortune holds out these to you as rewards." B. Jonson. (b) To continue to do or to suffer; to endure. "He can not long hold out these pangs." Shak. -- To hold up. (a) To raise; to lift; as, hold up your head. (b) To support; to sustain. "He holds himself up in virtue."Sir P. Sidney. (c) To exhibit; to display; as, he was held up as an example. (d) To rein in; to check; to halt; as, hold up your horses. -- To hold water. (a) Literally, to retain water without leaking; hence (Fig.), to be whole, sound, consistent, without gaps or holes; -- commonly used in a negative sense; as, his statements will not hold water. [Collog.] (b) (Naut.) To hold the oars steady in the water, thus checking the headway of a boat.  In general, to keep one's self in a given position or condition; to remain fixed. Hence: 1. Not to more; to halt; to stop;-mostly in the imperative. And damned be him that first cries, "Hold, enough!" Shak. 2. Not to give way; not to part or become separated; to remain unbroken or unsubdued. Our force by land hath nobly held. Shak. 3. Not to fail or be found wanting; to continue; to last; to endure a test or trial; to abide; to persist. While our obedience holds. Milton. The rule holds in land as all other commodities. Locke. 4. Not to fall away, desert, or prove recreant; to remain attached; to cleave;-often with with, to, or for. He will hold to the one and despise the other. Matt. vi. 24 5. To restrain one's self; to refrain. His dauntless heart would fain have held From weeping, but his eyes rebelled. Dryden. 6. To derive right or title; -- generally with of. My crown is absolute, and holds of none. Dryden. His imagination holds immediately from nature. Hazlitt. Hold on! Hold up! wait; stop; forbear. [Collog] -- To hold forth, to speak in public; to harangue; to preach. L'Estrange. -- To hold in, to restrain one's self; as, he wanted to laugh and could hardly hold in. -- To hold off, to keep at a distance. -- To hold on, to keep fast hold; to continue; to go on. "The trade held on for many years," Swift. -- To hold out, to last; to endure; to continue; to maintain one's self; not to yield or give way. -- To hold over, to remain in office, possession, etc., beyond a certain date. -- To hold to or with, to take sides with, as a person or opinion. -- To hold together, to be joined; not to separate; to remain in union. Dryden. Locke. -- To hold up. (a) To support one's self; to remain unbent or unbroken; as, to hold up under misfortunes. (b) To cease raining; to cease to stop; as, it holds up. Hudibras. (c) To keep up; not to fall behind; not to lose ground. Collier.  1. The act of holding, as in or with the hands or arms; the manner of holding, whether firm or loose; seizure; grasp; clasp; gripe; possession; -- often used with the verbs take and lay. Ne have I not twelve pence within mine hold. Chaucer. Thou should'st lay hold upon him. B. Jonson. My soul took hold on thee. Addison. Take fast hold of instruction. Pror. iv. 13. 2. The authority or ground to take or keep; claim. The law hath yet another hold on you. Shak. 3. Binding power and influence. Fear . . . by which God and his laws take the surest hold of. Tillotson. 4. Something that may be grasped; means of support. If a man be upon an high place without rails or good hold, he is ready to fall. Bacon. 5. A place of confinement; a prison; confinement; custody; guard. They . . . put them in hold unto the next day. Acts. iv. 3. King Richard, he is in the mighty hold Of Bolingbroke. Shak. 6. A place of security; a fortified place; a fort; a castle; -- often called a stronghold. Chaucer. New comers in an ancient hold Tennyson. 7. (Mus.)  A character [thus pause, and corona.
teach: 1. To impart the knowledge of; to give intelligence concerning; to impart, as knowledge before unknown, or rules for practice; to inculcate as true or important; to exhibit impressively; as, to teach arithmetic, dancing, music, or the like; to teach morals. If some men teach wicked things, it must be that others should practice them. South. 2. To direct, as an instructor; to manage, as a preceptor; to guide the studies of; to instruct; to inform; to conduct through a course of studies; as, to teach a child or a class. "He taught his disciples." Mark ix. 31. The village master taught his little school. Goldsmith. 3. To accustom; to guide; to show; to admonish. I shall myself to herbs teach you. Chaucer. They have taught their tongue to speak lies. Jer. ix. 5. Note: This verb is often used with two objects, one of the person, the other of the thing; as, he taught me Latin grammar. In the passive construction, either of these objects may be retained in the objective case, while the other becomes the subject; as, I was taught Latin grammar by him; Latin grammar was taught me by him. Syn. -- To instruct; inform; inculcate; tell; guide; counsel; admonish. See the Note under Learn.  To give instruction; to follow the business, or to perform the duties, of a preceptor. And gladly would he learn, and gladly teach. Chaucer. The priests thereof teach for hire. Micah iii. 11.
contain: 1. To hold within fixed limits; to comprise; to include; to inclose; to hold. Behold, heaven and the heaven of heavens can not contain thee; how much less this house! 2 Chron. vi. 18. When that this body did contain a spirit. Shak. What thy stores contain bring forth. Milton. 2. To have capacity for; to be able to hold; to hold; to be equivalent to; as, a bushel contains four pecks. 3. To put constraint upon; to restrain; to confine; to keep within bounds. [Obs., exept as used reflexively.] The king's person contains the unruly people from evil occasions. Spenser. Fear not, my lord: we can contain ourselves. Shak.  To restrain desire; to live in continence or chastity. But if they can not contain, let them marry. 1 Cor. vii. 9.
quite: See Quit. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. Completely; wholly; entirely; totally; perfectly; as, the work is not quite done; the object is quite accomplished; to be quite mistaken. Man shall not quite be lost, but saved who will. Milton. The same actions may be aimed at different ends, and arise from quite contrary principles. Spectator. 2. To a great extent or degree; very; very much; considerably. "Quite amusing." Macaulay. He really looks quite concerned. Landor. The island stretches along the land and is quite close to it. Jowett (Thucyd. ).
develop: 1. To free from that which infolds or envelops; to unfold; to lay open by degrees or in detail; to make visible or known; to disclose; to produce or give forth; as, to develop theories; a motor that develops 100 horse power. These serve to develop its tenets. Milner. The 20th was spent in strengthening our position and developing the line of the enemy. The Century. 2. To unfold gradually, as a flower from a bud; hence, to bring through a succession of states or stages, each of which is preparatory to the next; to form or expand by a process of growth; to cause to change gradually from an embryo, or a lower state, to a higher state or form of being; as, sunshine and rain develop the bud into a flower; to develop the mind. The sound developed itself into a real compound. J. Peile. All insects . . . acquire the jointed legs before the wings are fully developed. Owen. 3. To advance; to further; to prefect; to make to increase; to promote the growth of. We must develop our own resources to the utmost. Jowett (Thucyd). 4. (Math.)  To change the form of, as of an algebraic expression, by executing certain indicated operations without changing the value. 5. (Photog.)  To cause to become visible, as an invisible or latent image upon plate, by submitting it to chemical agents; to bring to view. To develop a curved surface on a place (Geom.), to produce on the plane an equivalent surface, as if by rolling the curved surface so that all parts shall successively touch the plane. Syn. -- To uncover; unfold; evolve; promote; project; lay open; disclose; exhibit; unravel; disentangle.  1. To go through a process of natural evolution or growth, by successive changes from a less perfect to a more perfect or more highly organized state; to advance from a simpler form of existence to one more complex either in structure or function; as, a blossom develops from a bud; the seed develops into a plant; the embryo develops into a well-formed animal; the mind develops year by year. Nor poets enough to understand That life develops from within. Mrs. Browning. 2. To become apparent gradually; as, a picture on sensitive paper develops on the application of heat; the plans of the conspirators develop.
element: 1. One of the simplest or essential parts or principles of which anything consists, or upon which the constitution or fundamental powers of anything are based. 2. One of the ultimate, undecomposable constituents of any kind of matter. Specifically: (Chem.) A substance which cannot be decomposed into different kinds of matter by any means at present employed; as, the elements of water are oxygen and hydrogen. Note: The elements are naturally classified in several families or groups, as the group of the alkaline elements, the halogen group, and the like. They are roughly divided into two great classes, the metals, as sodium, calcium, etc., which form basic compounds, and the nonmetals or metalloids, as oxygen, sulphur, chlorine, which form acid compounds; but the distinction is only relative, and some, as arsenic, tin, aluminium, etc., form both acid and basic compounds. The essential fact regarding every element is its relative atomic weight or equivalent. When the elements are tabulated in the order of their ascending atomic weights, the arrangement constitutes the series of the Periodic law of Mendelejeff. See Periodic law, under Periodic. This Periodic law enables us to predict the qualities of unknown elements. The number of elements known is about seventy-five, but the gaps in the Periodic law indicate the possibility of many more. Many of the elements with which we are familiar, as hydrogen, carbon, iron, gold, etc., have been recognized, by means of spectrum analysis, in the sun and the fixed stars. From certain evidence (as that afforded by the Periodic law, spectrum analysis, etc.) it appears that the chemical elements probably may not be simple bodies, but only very stable compounds of some simpler body or bodies. In formulas, the elements are designated by abbreviations of their names in Latin or New Latin. The Elements -------------------------------------------------------- ----Name |Sym-|Atomic Weight| |bol | O=16 | H=1 | ------------------- -----------------------------------------Aluminum | Al | 27.1 | 26.9| Antimony(Stibium) Argon Arsenic Barium Beryllium (see Glucinum) Bismuth Boron Bromine Cadmium Caesium Calcium Carbon Cerium Chlorine Chromium Cobalt Columbium Copper (Cuprum) Erbium Fluorine Gadolinium Gallium Germanium Glucinum Gold Helium Hydrogen Indium Iodine Iridium Iron (Ferrum) Krypton Lanthanum Lead (Plumbum) Lithium Magnesium Manganese Mercury (Hydrargyrum) Molybdenum Neodymium Neon Nickel Niobium (see Columbium) Nirogen Osmium Oxygen Palladium Phosphorus Platinum Potassium (Kalium) Praseodymium Rhodium Rubidium Ruthenium -----------------------------------------------------------The Elements -- continued ----------------------------------------------- -------------Name Samarium Scandium Selenium Silicon Silver (Argentum) Sodium (Natrium) Strontium Sulphur Tantalum Tellurium Thallium Thorium Thulium Tin (Stannum) Titanium Tungsten (Wolframium) Uranium Vanadium Wolfranium (see Tungsten) Xenon Ytterbium Yttrium Zinc Zirconium ------------------------------------------------------  1. To compound of elements or first principles. [Obs.] "[Love] being elemented too." Donne. 2. To constitute; to make up with elements. His very soul was elemented of nothing but sadness. Walton.
wrote: To root with the snout. See 1st Root. [Obs.] Chaucer.  imp. & archaic p. p. of Write.
people: 1. The body of persons who compose a community, tribe, nation, or race; an aggregate of individuals forming a whole; a community; a nation. Unto him shall the gathering of the people be. Gen. xlix. 10. The ants are a people not strong. Prov. xxx. 25. Before many peoples, and nations, and tongues. Rev. x. 11. Earth's monarchs are her peoples. Whitter . A government of all the people, by all the people, for all the people. T. Parker. Note: Peopleis a collective noun, generally construed with a plural verb, and only occasionally used in the plural form (peoples), in the sense of nations or races. 2. Persons, generally; an indefinite number of men and women; folks; population, or part of population; as, country people; -- sometimes used as an indefinite subject or verb, like on in French, and man in German; as, people in adversity. People were tempted to lend by great premiums. Swift . People have lived twenty-four days upon nothing but water. Arbuthnot . 3. The mass of comunity as distinguished from a special class; the commonalty; the populace; the vulgar; the common crowd; as, nobles and people. And strive to gain his pardon from the people. Addison . 4. With a possessive pronoun: (a) One's ancestors or family; kindred; relations; as, my people were English. (b) One's subjects; fellow citizens; companions; followers. "You slew great number of his people." Shak. Syn. -- People, Nation. When speaking of a state, we use people for the mass of the community, as distinguished from their rulers, and nation for the entire political body, including the rulers. In another sense of the term, nation describes those who are descended from the same stock; and in this sense the Germans regard themselves as one nation, though politically subject to different forms of government.  To stock with people or inhabitants; to fill as with people; to populate. "Peopled heaven with angels." Dryden. As the gay motes that people the sunbeams. Milton .
body: 1. The material organized substance of an animal, whether living or dead, as distinguished from the spirit, or vital principle; the physical person. Absent in body, but present in spirit. 1 Cor. v. 3 For of the soul the body form doth take. For soul is form, and doth the body make. Spenser. 2. The trunk, or main part, of a person or animal, as distinguished from the limbs and head; the main, central, or principal part, as of a tree, army, country, etc. Who set the body and the limbs Of this great sport together Shak. The van of the king's army was led by the general; . . . in the body was the king and the prince. Clarendon. Rivers that run up into the body of Italy. Addison. 3. The real, as opposed to the symbolical; the substance, as opposed to the shadow. Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ. Col. ii. 17. 4. A person; a human being; -- frequently in composition; as, anybody, nobody. A dry, shrewd kind of a body. W. Irving. 5. A number of individuals spoken of collectively, usually as united by some common tie, or as organized for some purpose; a collective whole or totality; a corporation; as, a legislative body; a clerical body. A numerous body led unresistingly to the slaughter. Prescott. 6. A number of things or particulars embodied in a system; a general collection; as, a great body of facts; a body of laws or of divinity. 7. Any mass or portion of matter; any substance distinct from others; as, a metallic body; a moving body; an aëriform body. "A body of cold air." Huxley. By collision of two bodies, grind The air attrite to fire. Milton. 8. Amount; quantity; extent. 9. That part of a garment covering the body, as distinguished from the parts covering the limbs. 10. The bed or box of a vehicle, on or in which the load is placed; as, a wagon body; a cart body. 11. (Print.)  The shank of a type, or the depth of the shank (by which the size is indicated); as, a nonpareil face on an agate body. 12. (Geom.)  A figure that has length, breadth, and thickness; any solid figure. 13. Consistency; thickness; substance; strength; as, this color has body; wine of a good body. Note: Colors bear a body when they are capable of being ground so fine, and of being mixed so entirely with oil, as to seem only a very thick oil of the same color. After body (Naut.), the part of a ship abaft the dead flat. -- Body cavity (Anat.), the space between the walls of the body and the inclosed viscera; the cælum; -- in mammals, divided by the diaphragm into thoracic and abdominal cavities. -- Body of a church, the nave. -- Body cloth; pl. Body cloths, a cloth or blanket for covering horses. -- Body clothes. (pl.) 1. Clothing for the body; esp. underclothing. 2. Body cloths for horses. [Obs.] Addison. -- Body coat, a gentleman's dress coat. -- Body color (Paint.), a pigment that has consistency, thickness, or body, in distinction from a tint or wash. -- Body of a law (Law), the main and operative part. -- Body louse (Zoöl.), a species of louse (Pediculus vestimenti), which sometimes infests the human body and clothes. See Grayback. -- Body plan (Shipbuilding), an end elevation, showing the conbour of the sides of a ship at certain points of her length. -- Body politic, the collective body of a nation or state as politically organized, or as exercising political functions; also, a corporation. Wharton. As to the persons who compose the body politic or associate themselves, they take collectively the name of "people", or "nation". Bouvier. -- Body servant, a valet. -- The bodies seven (Alchemy), the metals corresponding to the planets. [Obs.] Sol gold is, and Luna silver we threpe (=call), Mars yren (=iron), Mercurie quicksilver we clepe, Saturnus lead, and Jupiter is tin, and Venus coper. Chaucer. -- Body snatcher, one who secretly removes without right or authority a dead body from a grave, vault, etc.; a resurrectionist. -- Body snatching (Law), the unauthorized removal of a dead body from the grave; usually for the purpose of dissection.  To furnish with, or as with, a body; to produce in definite shape; to embody. To body forth, to give from or shape to mentally. Imagination bodies forth The forms of things unknown. Shak.
stone: 1. Concreted earthy or mineral matter; also, any particular mass of such matter; as, a house built of stone; the boy threw a stone; pebbles are rounded stones. "Dumb as a stone." Chaucer. They had brick for stone, and slime . . . for mortar. Gen. xi. 3. Note: In popular language, very large masses of stone are called rocks; small masses are called stones; and the finer kinds, gravel, or sand, or grains of sand. Stone is much and widely used in the construction of buildings of all kinds, for walls, fences, piers, abutments, arches, monuments, sculpture, and the like. 2. A precious stone; a gem. "Many a rich stone." Chaucer. "Inestimable stones, unvalued jewels." Shak. 3. Something made of stone. Specifically: - (a) The glass of a mirror; a mirror. [Obs.] Lend me a looking-glass; If that her breath will mist or stain the stone, Why, then she lives. Shak. (b) A monument to the dead; a gravestone. Gray. Should some relenting eye Glance on the where our cold relics lie. Pope. 4. (Med.)  A calculous concretion, especially one in the kidneys or bladder; the disease arising from a calculus. 5. One of the testes; a testicle. Shak. 6. (Bot.)  The hard endocarp of drupes; as, the stone of a cherry or peach. See Illust. of Endocarp. 7. A weight which legally is fourteen pounds, but in practice varies with the article weighed. [Eng.] Note: The stone of butchers' meat or fish is reckoned at 8 lbs.; of cheese, 16 lbs.; of hemp, 32 lbs.; of glass, 5 lbs. 8. Fig.: Symbol of hardness and insensibility; torpidness; insensibility; as, a heart of stone. I have not yet forgot myself to stone. Pope. 9. (Print.)  A stand or table with a smooth, flat top of stone, commonly marble, on which to arrange the pages of a book, newspaper, etc., before printing; -- called also imposing stone. Note: Stone is used adjectively or in composition with other words to denote made of stone, containing a stone or stones, employed on stone, or, more generally, of or pertaining to stone or stones; as, stone fruit, or stone-fruit; stone-hammer, or stone hammer; stone falcon, or stone-falcon. Compounded with some adjectives it denotes a degree of the quality expressed by the adjective equal to that possessed by a stone; as, stone-dead, stone-blind, stone-cold, stone- still, etc. Atlantic stone, ivory. [Obs.] "Citron tables, or Atlantic stone." Milton. -- Bowing stone. Same as Cromlech. Encyc. Brit. -- Meteoric stones, stones which fall from the atmosphere, as after the explosion of a meteor. -- Philosopher's stone. See under Philosopher. -- Rocking stone. See Rocking-stone. -- Stone age, a supposed prehistoric age of the world when stone and bone were habitually used as the materials for weapons and tools; -- called also flint age. The bronze age succeeded to this. -- Stone bass (Zoöl.), any one of several species of marine food fishes of the genus Serranus and allied genera, as Serranus Couchii, and Polyprion cernium of Europe; -- called also sea perch. -- Stone biter (Zoöl.), the wolf fish. -- Stone boiling, a method of boiling water or milk by dropping hot stones into it, -- in use among savages. Tylor. -- Stone borer (Zoöl.), any animal that bores stones; especially, one of certain bivalve mollusks which burrow in limestone. See Lithodomus, and Saxicava. -- Stone bramble (Bot.), a European trailing species of bramble (Rubus saxatilis). -- Stone-break. Etym: [Cf. G. steinbrech.] (Bot.) Any plant of the genus Saxifraga; saxifrage. -- Stone bruise, a sore spot on the bottom of the foot, from a bruise by a stone. -- Stone canal. (Zoöl.) Same as Sand canal, under Sand. -- Stone cat (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small fresh- water North American catfishes of the genus Noturus. They have sharp pectoral spines with which they inflict painful wounds. -- Stone coal, hard coal; mineral coal; anthracite coal. -- Stone coral (Zoöl.), any hard calcareous coral. -- Stone crab. (Zoöl.) (a) A large crab (Menippe mercenaria) found on the southern coast of the United States and much used as food. (b) A European spider crab (Lithodes maia). Stone crawfish (Zoöl.), a European crawfish (Astacus torrentium), by many writers considered only a variety of the common species (A. fluviatilis). -- Stone curlew. (Zoöl.) (a) A large plover found in Europe (Edicnemus crepitans). It frequents stony places. Called also thick- kneed plover or bustard, and thick-knee. (b) The whimbrel. [Prov. Eng.] (c) The willet. [Local, U.S.] -- Stone crush. Same as Stone bruise, above. -- Stone eater. (Zoöl.) Same as Stone borer, above. -- Stone falcon (Zoöl.), the merlin. -- Stone fern (Bot.), a European fern (Asplenium Ceterach) which grows on rocks and walls. -- Stone fly (Zoöl.), any one of many species of pseudoneuropterous insects of the genus Perla and allied genera; a perlid. They are often used by anglers for bait. The larvæ are aquatic. -- Stone fruit (Bot.), any fruit with a stony endocarp; a drupe, as a peach, plum, or cherry. -- Stone grig (Zoöl.), the mud lamprey, or pride. -- Stone hammer, a hammer formed with a face at one end, and a thick, blunt edge, parallel with the handle, at the other, -- used for breaking stone. -- Stone hawk (Zoöl.), the merlin; -- so called from its habit of sitting on bare stones. -- Stone jar, a jar made of stoneware. -- Stone lily (Paleon.), a fossil crinoid. -- Stone lugger. (Zoöl.) See Stone roller, below. -- Stone marten (Zoöl.), a European marten (Mustela foina) allied to the pine marten, but having a white throat; -- called also beech marten. -- Stone mason, a mason who works or builds in stone. -- Stone-mortar (Mil.), a kind of large mortar formerly used in sieges for throwing a mass of small stones short distances. -- Stone oil, rock oil, petroleum. -- Stone parsley (Bot.), an umbelliferous plant (Seseli Labanotis). See under Parsley. -- Stone pine. (Bot.) A nut pine. See the Note under Pine, and Piñon. -- Stone pit, a quarry where stones are dug. -- Stone pitch, hard, inspissated pitch. -- Stone plover. (Zoöl.) (a) The European stone curlew. (b) Any one of several species of Asiatic plovers of the genus Esacus; as, the large stone plover (E. recurvirostris). (c) The gray or black-bellied plover. [Prov. Eng.] (d) The ringed plover. (e) The bar-tailed godwit. [Prov. Eng.] Also applied to other species of limicoline birds. -- Stone roller. (Zoöl.) (a) An American fresh-water fish (Catostomus nigricans) of the Sucker family. Its color is yellowish olive, often with dark blotches. Called also stone lugger, stone toter, hog sucker, hog mullet. (b) A common American cyprinoid fish (Campostoma anomalum); -- called also stone lugger. -- Stone's cast, or Stone's throw, the distance to which a stone may be thrown by the hand. -- Stone snipe (Zoöl.), the greater yellowlegs, or tattler. [Local, U.S.] -- Stone toter. (Zoöl.) (a) See Stone roller (a), above. (b) A cyprinoid fish (Exoglossum maxillingua) found in the rivers from Virginia to New York. It has a three-lobed lower lip; -- called also cutlips. -- To leave no stone unturned, to do everything that can be done; to use all practicable means to effect an object.  1. To pelt, beat, or kill with stones. And they stoned Stephen, calling upon God, and saying, Lord Jesus, receive my spirit. Acts vii. 59. 2. To make like stone; to harden. O perjured woman! thou dost stone my heart. Shak. 3. To free from stones; also, to remove the seeds of; as, to stone a field; to stone cherries; to stone raisins. 4. To wall or face with stones; to line or fortify with stones; as, to stone a well; to stone a cellar. 5. To rub, scour, or sharpen with a stone.
sit: obs. 3d pers. sing. pres. of Sit, for sitteth.  1. To rest upon the haunches, or the lower extremity of the trunk of the body; -- said of human beings, and sometimes of other animals; as, to sit on a sofa, on a chair, or on the ground. And he came and took the book put of the right hand of him that sate upon the seat. Bible (1551) (Rev. v. 7.) I pray you, jest, sir, as you sit at dinner. Shak. 2. To perch; to rest with the feet drawn up, as birds do on a branch, pole, etc. 3. To remain in a state of repose; to rest; to abide; to rest in any position or condition. And Moses said to . . . the children of Reuben, Shall your brothren go to war, and shall ye sit here Num. xxxii. 6. Like a demigod here sit I in the sky. Shak. 4. To lie, rest, or bear; to press or weigh; -- with on; as, a weight or burden sits lightly upon him. The calamity sits heavy on us. Jer. Taylor. 5. To be adjusted; to fit; as, a coat sts well or ill. This new and gorgeous garment, majesty, Sits not so easy on me as you think. Shak. 6. To suit one well or ill, as an act; to become; to befit; -- used impersonally. [Obs.] Chaucer. 7. To cover and warm eggs for hatching, as a fowl; to brood; to incubate. As the partridge sitteth on eggs, and hatcheth them not. Jer. xvii. 11. 8. To have position, as at the point blown from; to hold a relative position; to have direction. Like a good miller that knows how to grind, which way soever the wind sits. Selden. Sits the wind in that quarter Sir W. Scott. 9. To occupy a place or seat as a member of an official body; as, to sit in Congress. 10. To hold a session; to be in session for official business; -- said of legislative assemblies, courts, etc.; as, the court sits in January; the aldermen sit to-night. 11. To take a position for the purpose of having some artistic representation of one's self made, as a picture or a bust; as, to sit to a painter. To sit at, to rest under; to be subject to. [Obs.] "A farmer can not husband his ground so well if he sit at a great rent". Bacon. -- To sit at meat or at table, to be at table for eating. -- To sit down. (a) To place one's self on a chair or other seat; as, to sit down when tired. (b) To begin a siege; as, the enemy sat down before the town. (c) To settle; to fix a permanent abode. Spenser. (d) To rest; to cease as satisfied. "Here we can not sit down, but still proceed in our search." Rogers. -- To sit for a fellowship, to offer one's self for examination with a view to obtaining a fellowship. [Eng. Univ.] -- To sit out. (a) To be without engagement or employment. [Obs.] Bp. Sanderson. (b) To outstay. -- To sit under, to be under the instruction or ministrations of; as, to sit under a preacher; to sit under good preaching. -- To sit up, to rise from, or refrain from, a recumbent posture or from sleep; to sit with the body upright; as, to sit up late at night; also, to watch; as, to sit up with a sick person. "He that was dead sat up, and began to speak." Luke vii. 15.  1. To sit upon; to keep one's seat upon; as, he sits a horse well. Hardly the muse can sit the headstrong horse. Prior. 2. To cause to be seated or in a sitting posture; to furnish a seat to; -- used reflexively. They sat them down to weep. Milton. Sit you down, father; rest you. Shak. 3. To suit (well or ill); to become. [Obs. or R.]
moment: 1. A minute portion of time; a point of time; an instant; as, at thet very moment. In a moment, in the twinkling of an eye. 1 Cor. xv. 52. 2. Impulsive power; force; momentum. The moments or quantities of motion in bodies. Berkley. Touch, with lightest moment of impulse, His free will. Milton. 3. Importance, as in influence or effect; consequence; weight or value; consideration. Matters of great moment. Shak. It is an abstruse speculation, but also of far less moment and consequence of us than the others. Bentley. 4. An essential element; a deciding point, fact, or consideration; an essential or influential circumstance. 5. (Math.)  An infinitesimal change in a varying quantity; an increment or decrement. [Obs.] 6. (Mech.)  Tendency, or measure of tendency, to produce motion, esp. motion about a fixed point or axis. Moment of a couple (Mech.), the product of either of its forces into the perpendicular distance between them. -- Moment of a force. (Mech.) (a) With respect to a point, the product of the intensity of the force into the perpendicular distance from the point to the line of direction of the force. (b) With respect to a line, the product of that component of the force which is perpendicular to the plane passing through the line and the point of application of the force, into the shortest distance between the line and this point. (c) With respect to a plane that is parallel to the force, the product of the force into the perpendicular distance of its point of application from the plane. -- Moment of inertia, of a rotating body, the sum of the mass of each particle of matter of the body into the square of its distance from the axis of rotation; -- called also moment of rotation and moment of the mass. -- Statical moment, the product of a force into its leverage; the same as moment of a force with respect to a point, line, etc. -- Virtual moment. See under Virtual. Syn. -- Instant; twinkling; consequence; weight; force; value; consideration; signification; avail.
work: 1. Exertion of strength or faculties; physical or intellectual effort directed to an end; industrial activity; toil; employment; sometimes, specifically, physically labor. Man hath his daily work of body or mind Appointed. Milton. 2. The matter on which one is at work; that upon which one spends labor; material for working upon; subject of exertion; the thing occupying one; business; duty; as, to take up one's work; to drop one's work. Come on, Nerissa; I have work in hand That you yet know not of. Shak. In every work that he began . . . he did it with all his heart, and prospered. 2 Chron. xxxi. 21. 3. That which is produced as the result of labor; anything accomplished by exertion or toil; product; performance; fabric; manufacture; in a more general sense, act, deed, service, effect, result, achievement, feat. To leave no rubs or blotches in the work. Shak. The work some praise, And some the architect. Milton. Fancy . . . Wild work produces oft, and most in dreams. Milton. The composition or dissolution of mixed bodies . . . is the chief work of elements. Sir K. Digby. 4. Specifically: (a) That which is produced by mental labor; a composition; a book; as, a work, or the works, of Addison. (b) Flowers, figures, or the like, wrought with the needle; embroidery. I am glad I have found this napkin; . . . I'll have the work ta'en out, And give 't Iago. Shak. (c) pl.  Structures in civil, military, or naval engineering, as docks, bridges, embankments, trenches, fortifications, and the like; also, the structures and grounds of a manufacturing establishment; as, iron works; locomotive works; gas works. (d) pl.  The moving parts of a mechanism; as, the works of a watch. 5. Manner of working; management; treatment; as, unskillful work spoiled the effect. Bp. Stillingfleet. 6. (Mech.)  The causing of motion against a resisting force. The amount of work is proportioned to, and is measured by, the product of the force into the amount of motion along the direction of the force. See Conservation of energy, under Conservation, Unit of work, under Unit, also Foot pound, Horse power, Poundal, and Erg. Energy is the capacity of doing work . . . Work is the transference of energy from one system to another. Clerk Maxwell. 7. (Mining)  Ore before it is dressed. Raymond. 8. pl. (Script.)  Performance of moral duties; righteous conduct. He shall reward every man according to his works. Matt. xvi. 27. Faith, if it hath not works, is dead. James ii. 17. Muscular work (Physiol.), the work done by a muscle through the power of contraction. -- To go to work, to begin laboring; to commence operations; to contrive; to manage. "I 'll go another way to work with him." Shak. -- To set on work, to cause to begin laboring; to set to work. [Obs.] Hooker. -- To set to work, to employ; to cause to engage in any business or labor.  1. To exert one's self for a purpose; to put forth effort for the attainment of an object; to labor; to be engaged in the performance of a task, a duty, or the like. O thou good Kent, how shall I live and work, To match thy goodness Shak. Go therefore now, and work; for there shall no straw be given you. Ex. v. 18. Whether we work or play, or sleep or wake, Our life doth pass. Sir J. Davies. 2. Hence, in a general sense, to operate; to act; to perform; as, a machine works well. We bend to that the working of the heart. Shak. 3. Hence, figuratively, to be effective; to have effect or influence; to conduce. We know that all things work together for good to them that love God. Rom. viii. 28. This so wrought upon the child, that afterwards he desired to be taught. Locke. She marveled how she could ever have been wrought upon to marry him. Hawthorne. 4. To carry on business; to be engaged or employed customarily; to perform the part of a laborer; to labor; to toil. They that work in fine flax . . . shall be confounded. Isa. xix. 9. 5. To be in a state of severe exertion, or as if in such a state; to be tossed or agitated; to move heavily; to strain; to labor; as, a ship works in a heavy sea. Confused with working sands and rolling waves. Addison. 6. To make one's way slowly and with difficulty; to move or penetrate laboriously; to proceed with effort; -- with a following preposition, as down, out, into, up, through, and the like; as, scheme works out by degrees; to work into the earth. Till body up to spirit work, in bounds Proportioned to each kind. Milton. 7. To ferment, as a liquid. The working of beer when the barm is put in. Bacon. 8. To act or operate on the stomach and bowels, as a cathartic. Purges . . . work best, that is, cause the blood so to do, . . . in warm weather or in a warm room. Grew. To work at, to be engaged in or upon; to be employed in. -- To work to windward (Naut.), to sail or ply against the wind; to tack to windward. Mar. Dict.  1. To labor or operate upon; to give exertion and effort to; to prepare for use, or to utilize, by labor. He could have told them of two or three gold mines, and a silver mine, and given the reason why they forbare to work them at that time. Sir W. Raleigh. 2. To produce or form by labor; to bring forth by exertion or toil; to accomplish; to originate; to effect; as, to work wood or iron into a form desired, or into a utensil; to work cotton or wool into cloth. Each herb he knew, that works or good or ill. Harte. 3. To produce by slow degrees, or as if laboriously; to bring gradually into any state by action or motion. "Sidelong he works his way." Milton. So the pure, limpid stream, when foul with stains Of rushing torrents and descending rains, Works itself clear, and as it runs, refines, Till by degrees the floating mirror shines. Addison. 4. To influence by acting upon; to prevail upon; to manage; to lead. "Work your royal father to his ruin." Philips. 5. To form with a needle and thread or yarn; especially, to embroider; as, to work muslin. 6. To set in motion or action; to direct the action of; to keep at work; to govern; to manage; as, to work a machine. Knowledge in building and working ships. Arbuthnot. Now, Marcus, thy virtue's the proof; Put forth thy utmost strength, work every nerve. Addison. The mariners all 'gan work the ropes, Where they were wont to do. Coleridge. 7. To cause to ferment, as liquor. To work a passage (Naut.), to pay for a passage by doing work. -- To work double tides (Naut.), to perform the labor of three days in two; -- a phrase which alludes to a practice of working by the night tide as well as by the day. -- To work in, to insert, introduce, mingle, or interweave by labor or skill. -- To work into, to force, urge, or insinuate into; as, to work one's self into favor or confidence. -- To work off, to remove gradually, as by labor, or a gradual process; as, beer works off impurities in fermenting. -- To work out. (a) To effect by labor and exertion. "Work out your own salvation with fear and trembling." Phil. ii. 12. (b) To erase; to efface. [R.] Tears of joy for your returning spilt, Work out and expiate our former guilt. Dryden. (c) To solve, as a problem. (d) To exhaust, as a mine, by working. -- To work up. (a) To raise; to excite; to stir up; as, to work up the passions to rage. The sun, that rolls his chariot o'er their heads, Works up more fire and color in their cheeks. Addison. (b) To expend in any work, as materials; as, they have worked up all the stock. (c) (Naut.) To make over or into something else, as yarns drawn from old rigging, made into spun yarn, foxes, sennit, and the like; also, to keep constantly at work upon needless matters, as a crew in order to punish them. R. H. Dana, Jr.
tool: 1. An instrument such as a hammer, saw, plane, file, and the like, used in the manual arts, to facilitate mechanical operations; any instrument used by a craftsman or laborer at his work; an implement; as, the tools of a joiner, smith, shoe-maker, etc.; also, a cutter, chisel, or other part of an instrument or machine that dresses work. 2. A machine for cutting or shaping materials; -- also called machine tool. 3. Hence, any instrument of use or service. That angry fool . . . Whipping her house, did with his amarting tool Oft whip her dainty self. Spenser. 4. A weapon. [Obs.] Him that is aghast of every tool. Chaucer. 5. A person used as an instrument by another person; -- a word of reproach; as, men of intrigue have their tools, by whose agency they accomplish their purposes. I was not made for a minion or a tool. Burks.  1. To shape, form, or finish with a tool. "Elaborately tooled." Ld. Lytton. 2. To drive, as a coach. [Slang,Eng.]
grass: 1. Popularly: Herbage; the plants which constitute the food of cattle and other beasts; pasture. 2. (Bot.)  An endogenous plant having simple leaves, a stem generally jointed and tubular, the husks or glumes in pairs, and the seed single. Note: This definition includes wheat, rye, oats, barley, etc., and excludes clover and some other plants which are commonly called by the name of grass. The grasses form a numerous family of plants. 3. The season of fresh grass; spring. [Colloq.] Two years old next grass. Lathsm. 4. Metaphorically used for what is transitory. Surely the people is grass. Is. xl. 7. Note: The following list includes most of the grasses of the United States of special interest, except cereals. Many of these terms will be found with definitions in the Vocabulary. See Illustrations in Appendix. Barnyard grass, for hay. South. Panicum Grus-galli. Bent, pasture and hay. Agrostis, several species. Bermuda grass, pasture. South. Cynodon Dactylon. Black bent. Same as Switch grass (below). Blue bent, hay. North and West. Andropogon provincialis. Blue grass, pasture. Poa compressa. Blue joint, hay. Northwest. Aqropyrum glaucum. Buffalo grass, grazing. Rocky Mts., etc. (a) Buchloë dectyloides. (b) Same as Grama grass (below). Bunch grass, grazing. Far West. Eriocoma, Festuca, Stips, etc. Chess, or Cheat, a weed. Bromus secalinus, etc. Couch grass. Same as Quick grass (below). Crab grass, (a) Hay, in South. A weed, in North. Panicum sanguinale. (b) Pasture and hay. South. Eleusine Indica. Darnel (a) Bearded, a noxious weed. Lolium temulentum. (b) Common. Same as Rye grass (below). Drop seed, fair for forage and hay. Muhlenbergia, several species. English grass. Same as Redtop (below). Fowl meadow grass. (a) Pasture and hay. Poa serotina. (b) Hay, on moist land. Gryceria nervata. Gama grass, cut fodder. South. Tripsacum dactyloides. Grama grass, grazing. West and Pacific slope. Bouteloua oligostachya, etc. Great bunch grass, pasture and hay. Far West. Festuca scabrella. Guinea grass, hay. South. Panicum jumentorum. Herd's grass, in New England Timothy, in Pennsylvania and South Redtop. Indian grass. Same as Wood grass (below). Italian rye grass, forage and hay. Lolium Italicum. Johnson grass, grazing aud hay. South and Southwest. Sorghum Halepense. Kentucky blue grass, pasture. Poa pratensis. Lyme grass, coarse hay. South. Elymus, several species. Manna grass, pasture and hay. Glyceria, several species. Meadow fescue, pasture and hay. Festuca elatior. Meadow foxtail, pasture, hay, lawn. North. Alopecurus pratensis. Meadow grass, pasture, hay, lawn. Poa, several species. Mesquite, or Muskit grass. Same as Grama grass (above). Nimble Will, a kind of drop seed. Muhlenbergia diffsa. Orchard grass, pasture and hay. Dactylis glomerata. Porcupine grass, troublesome to sheep. Northwest. Stipa spartea. Quaking grass, ornamental. Briza media and maxima. Quitch, or Quick, grass, etc., a weed. Agropyrum repens. Ray grass. Same as Rye grass (below). Redtop, pasture and hay. Agrostis vulgaris. Red-topped buffalo grass, forage. Northwest. Poa tenuifolia. Reed canary grass, of slight value. Phalaris arundinacea. Reed meadow grass, hay. North. Glyceria aquatica. Ribbon grass, a striped leaved form of Reed canary grass. Rye grass, pasture, hay. Lolium perenne, var. Seneca grass, fragrant basket work, etc. North. Hierochloa borealis. Sesame grass. Same as Gama grass (above). Sheep's fescue, sheep pasture, native in Northern Europe and Asia. Festuca ovina. Small reed grass, meadow pasture and hay. North. Deyeuxia Canadensis. Spear grass, Same as Meadow grass (above). Squirrel-tail grass, troublesome to animals. Seacoast and Northwest. Hordeum jubatum. Switch grass, hay, cut young. Panicum virgatum. Timothy, cut young, the best of hay. North. Phleum pratense. Velvet grass, hay on poor soil. South. Holcus lanatus. Vernal grass, pasture, hay, lawn. Anthoxanthum odoratum. Wire grass, valuable in pastures. Poa compressa. Wood grass, Indian grass, hay. Chrysopogon nutans. Note: Many plants are popularly called grasses which are not true grasses botanically considered, such as black grass, goose grass, star grass, etc. Black grass, a kind of small rush (Juncus Gerardi), growing in salt marshes, used for making salt hay. -- Grass of the Andes, an oat grass, the Arrhenatherum avenaceum of Europe.-- Grass of Parnassus, a plant of the genus Parnassia growing in wet ground. The European species is P. palustris; in the United States there are several species. -- Grass bass (Zoöl.), the calico bass. -- Grass bird, the dunlin. -- Grass cloth, a cloth woven from the tough fibers of the grass- cloth plant. -- Grass-cloth plant, a perennial herb of the Nettle family (Boehmeria nivea or Urtica nivea), which grows in Sumatra, China, and Assam, whose inner bark has fine and strong fibers suited for textile purposes. -- Grass finch. (Zoöl.) (a) A common American sparrow (Poöcætes gramineus); -- called also vesper sparrow and bay-winged bunting. (b) Any Australian finch, of the genus Poëphila, of which several species are known. -- Grass lamb, a lamb suckled by a dam running on pasture land and giving rich milk.-- Grass land, land kept in grass and not tilled. -- Grass moth (Zoöl.), one of many small moths of the genus Crambus, found in grass. -- Grass oil, a fragrant essential volatile oil, obtained in India from grasses of the genus Andropogon, etc.; -- used in perfumery under the name of citronella, ginger grass oil, lemon grass oil, essence of verbena etc. -- Grass owl (Zoöl.), a South African owl (Strix Capensis). -- Grass parrakeet (Zoöl.), any of several species of Australian parrots, of the genus Euphemia; -- also applied to the zebra parrakeet. -- Grass plover (Zoöl.), the upland or field plover. -- Grass poly (Bot.), a species of willowwort (Lythrum Hyssopifolia). Johnson. -- Crass quit (Zoöl.), one of several tropical American finches of the genus Euetheia. The males have most of the head and chest black and often marked with yellow.-- Grass snake. (Zoöl.) (a) The common English, or ringed, snake (Tropidonotus natrix). (b) The common green snake of the Northern United States. See Green snake, under Green. -- Grass snipe (Zoöl.), the pectoral sandpiper (Tringa maculata) -- called also jacksnipe in America. -- Grass spider (Zoöl.), a common spider (Agelena nævia), which spins flat webs on grass, conspicuous when covered with dew. -- Grass sponge (Zoöl.), an inferior kind of commercial sponge from Florida and the Bahamas. -- Grass table. (Arch.) See Earth table, under Earth. -- Grass vetch (Bot.), a vetch (Lathyrus Nissolia), with narrow grasslike leaves. -- Grass widow. Etym: [Cf. Prov. R. an unmarried mother, G. strohwittwe a mock widow, Sw. gräsenka a grass widow.] (a) An unmarried woman who is a mother. [Obs.] (b) A woman separated from her husband by abandonment or prolonged absence; a woman living apart from her husband. [Slang.] -- Grass wrack (Bot.) eelgrass. -- To bring to grass (Mining.), to raise, as ore, to the surface of the ground. -- To put to grass, To put out to grass, to put out to graze a season, as cattle.  1. To cover with grass or with turf. 2. To expose, as flax, on the grass for bleaching, etc. 3. To bring to the grass or ground; to land; as, to grass a fish. [Colloq.]  To produce grass. [R.] Tusser.
their: The possessive case of the personal pronoun they; as, their houses; their country. Note: The possessive takes the form theirs (theirs is best cultivated. Nothing but the name of zeal appears 'Twixt our best actions and the worst of theirs. Denham.
bought: 1. A flexure; a bend; a twist; a turn; a coil, as in a rope; as the boughts of a serpent. [Obs.] Spenser. The boughts of the fore legs. Sir T. Browne. 2. The part of a sling that contains the stone. [Obs.]  imp. & p. p. of Buy.  Purchased; bribed.
much: 1. Great in quantity; long in duration; as, much rain has fallen; much time. Thou shalt carry much seed out into the field, and shalt gather but little in. Deut. xxviii. 38. 2. Many in number. [Archaic] Edom came out against him with much people. Num. xx. 20. 3. High in rank or position. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. A great quantity; a great deal; also, an indefinite quantity; as, you have as much as I. He that gathered much had nothing over. Ex. xvi. 18. Note: Muchin this sense can be regarded as an adjective qualifying a word unexpressed, and may, therefore, be modified by as, so, too, very. 2. A thing uncommon, wonderful, or noticeable; something considerable. And [he] thought not much to clothe his enemies. Milton. To make much of, to treat as something of especial value or worth.  To a great degree or extent; greatly; abundantly; far; nearly. "Much suffering heroes." Pope. Thou art much mightier than we. Gen. xxvi. 16. Excellent speech becometh not a fool, much less do lying lips a prince. Prov. xvii. 7. Henceforth I fly not death, nor would prolong Life much. Milton. All left the world much as they found it. Sir W. Temple.
afraid: Impressed with fear or apprehension; in fear; apprehensive. [Afraid comes after the noun it limits.] "Back they recoiled, afraid." Milton. Note: This word expresses a less degree of fear than terrified or frightened. It is followed by of before the object of fear, or by the infinitive, or by a dependent clause; as, to be afraid of death. "I am afraid to die." "I am afraid he will chastise me." "Be not afraid that I your hand should take." Shak. I am afraid is sometimes used colloquially to soften a statement; as, I am afraid I can not help you in this matter. Syn. -- Fearful; timid; timorous; alarmed; anxious.
course: 1. The act of moving from one point to another; progress; passage. And when we had finished our course from Tyre, we came to Ptolemais. Acts xxi. 7. 2. THe ground or path traversed; track; way. The same horse also run the round course at Newmarket. Pennant. 3. Motion, considered as to its general or resultant direction or to its goal; line progress or advance. A light by which the Argive squadron steers Their silent course to Ilium's well known shore. Dennham. Westward the course of empire takes its way. Berkeley. 4. Progress from point to point without change of direction; any part of a progress from one place to another, which is in a straight line, or on one direction; as, a ship in a long voyage makes many courses; a course measured by a surveyor between two stations; also, a progress without interruption or rest; a heat; as, one course of a race. 5. Motion considered with reference to manner; or derly progress; procedure in a certain line of thought or action; as, the course of an argument. The course of true love never did run smooth. Shak. 6. Customary or established sequence of evants; re currence of events according to natural laws. By course of nature and of law. Davies. Day and night, Seedtime and harvest, heat and hoary frost, Shall hold their course. Milton. 7. Method of procedure; manner or way of conducting; conduct; behavior. My lord of York commends the plot and the general course of the action. Shak. By perseverance in the course prescribed. Wodsworth. You hold your course without remorse. Tennyson. 8. A series of motions or acts arranged in order; a succession of acts or practices connectedly followed; as, a course of medicine; a course of lectures on chemistry. 9. The succession of one to another in office or duty; order; turn. He appointed . . . the courses of the priests 2 Chron. viii. 14. 10. That part of a meal served at one time, with its accompaniments. He [Goldsmith] wore fine clothes, gave dinners of several courses, paid court to venal beauties. Macualay. 11. (Arch.)  A continuous level range of brick or stones of the same height throughout the face or faces of a building. Gwilt. 12. (Naut.)  The lowest sail on any mast of a square-rigged vessel; as, the fore course, main course, etc. 13. pl. (Physiol.)  The menses. In course, in regular succession. -- Of course, by consequence; as a matter of course; in regular or natural order. -- In the course of, at same time or times during. "In the course of human events." T. Jefferson. Syn. -- Way; road; route; passage; race; series; succession; manner; method; mode; career; progress.  1. To run, hunt, or chase after; to follow hard upon; to pursue. We coursed him at the heels. Shak. 2. To cause to chase after or pursue game; as, to course greyhounds after deer. 3. To run through or over. The bounding steed courses the dusty plain. Pope.  1. To run as in a race, or in hunting; to pursue the sport of coursing; as, the sportsmen coursed over the flats of Lancashire. 2. To move with speed; to race; as, the blood courses through the veins. Shak.
forward: An agreement; a covenant; a promise. [Obs.] Tell us a tale anon, as forward is. Chaucer.  Toward a part or place before or in front; onward; in advance; progressively; -- opposed to backward.  1. Near, or at the fore part; in advance of something else; as, the forward gun in a ship, or the forward ship in a fleet. 2. Ready; prompt; strongly inclined; in an ill sense, overready; to hasty. Only they would that we should remember the poor; the same which I also was forward to do. Gal. ii. 10. Nor do we find him forward to be sounded. Shak. 3. Ardent; eager; earnest; in an ill sense, less reserved or modest than is proper; bold; confident; as, the boy is too forward for his years. I have known men disagreeably forward from their shyness. T. Arnold. 4. Advanced beyond the usual degree; advanced for season; as, the grass is forward, or forward for the season; we have a forward spring. early. The most forward bud Is eaten by the canker ere it blow. Shak.  1. To help onward; to advance; to promote; to accelerate; to quicken; to hasten; as, to forward the growth of a plant; to forward one in improvement. 2. To send forward; to send toward the place of destination; to transmit; as, to forward a letter.
while: 1. Space of time, or continued duration, esp. when short; a time; as, one while we thought him innocent. "All this while." Shak. This mighty queen may no while endure. Chaucer. [Some guest that] hath outside his welcome while, And tells the jest without the smile. Coleridge. I will go forth and breathe the air a while. Longfellow. 2. That which requires time; labor; pains. [Obs.] Satan . . . cast him how he might quite her while. Chaucer. At whiles, at times; at intervals. And so on us at whiles it falls, to claim Powers that we dread. J. H. Newman. -- The while, The whiles, in or during the time that; meantime; while. Tennyson. -- Within a while, in a short time; soon. -- Worth while, worth the time which it requires; worth the time and pains; hence, worth the expense; as, it is not always worth while for a man to prosecute for small debts.  To cause to pass away pleasantly or without irksomeness or disgust; to spend or pass; -- usually followed by away. The lovely lady whiled the hours away. Longfellow.  To loiter. [R.] Spectator.  1. During the time that; as long as; whilst; at the same time that; as, while I write, you sleep. "While I have time and space." Chaucer. Use your memory; you will sensibly experience a gradual improvement, while you take care not to overload it. I. Watts. 2. Hence, under which circumstances; in which case; though; whereas. While as, While that, during or at the time that. [Obs.]  Until; till. [Obs. or Prov. Eng. & Scot.] I may be conveyed into your chamber; I'll lie under your bed while midnight. Beau. & Fl.
road: 1. A journey, or stage of a journey. [Obs.] With easy roads he came to Leicester. Shak. 2. An inroad; an invasion; a raid. [Obs.] Spenser. 3. A place where one may ride; an open way or public passage for vehicles, persons, and animals; a track for travel, forming a means of communication between one city, town, or place, and another. The most villainous house in all the London road. Shak. Note: The word is generally applied to highways, and as a generic term it includes highway, street, and lane. 4. Etym: [Possibly akin to Icel. reithi the rigging of a ship, E. ready.]  A place where ships may ride at anchor at some distance from the shore; a roadstead; -- often in the plural; as, Hampton Roads. Shak. Now strike your saile, ye jolly mariners, For we be come unto a quiet rode [road]. Spenser. On, or Upon, the road, traveling or passing over a road; coming or going; on the way. My hat and wig will soon be here, They are upon the road. Cowper. -- Road agent, a highwayman, especially on the stage routes of the unsettled western parts of the United States; -- a humorous euphemism. [Western U.S.] The highway robber -- road agent he is quaintly called. The century. -- Road book, a quidebook in respect to roads and distances. -- Road metal, the broken, stone used in macadamizing roads. -- Road roller, a heavy roller, or combinations of rollers, for making earth, macadam, or concrete roads smooth and compact. -- often driven by steam. -- Road runner (Zoöl.), the chaparral cock. -- Road steamer, a locomotive engine adapted to running on common roads. -- To go on the road, to engage in the business of a commercial traveler. [Colloq.] -- To take the road, to begin or engage in traveling. -- To take to the road, to engage in robbery upon the highways. Syn. -- Way; highway; street; lane; pathway; route; passage; course. See Way.
moon: 1. The celestial orb which revolves round the earth; the satellite of the earth; a secondary planet, whose light, borrowed from the sun, is reflected to the earth, and serves to dispel the darkness of night. The diameter of the moon is 2,160 miles, its mean distance from the earth is 240,000 miles, and its mass is one eightieth that of the earth. See Lunar month, under Month. The crescent moon, the diadem of night. Cowper. 2. A secondary planet, or satellite, revolving about any member of the solar system; as, the moons of Jupiter or Saturn. 3. The time occupied by the moon in making one revolution in her orbit; a month. Shak. 4. (Fort.)  A crescentlike outwork. See Half-moon. Moon blindness. (a) (Far.) A kind of ophthalmia liable to recur at intervals of three or four weeks. (b) (Med.) Hemeralopia. -- Moon dial, a dial used to indicate time by moonlight. -- Moon face, a round face like a full moon. -- Moon madness, lunacy. [Poetic] -- Moon month, a lunar month. -- Moon trefoil (Bot.), a shrubby species of medic (Medicago arborea). See Medic. -- Moon year, a lunar year, consisting of lunar months, being sometimes twelve and sometimes thirteen.  To expose to the rays of the moon. If they have it to be exceeding white indeed, they seethe it yet once more, after it hath been thus sunned and mooned. Holland.  To act if moonstruck; to wander or gaze about in an abstracted manner. Elsley was mooning down the river by himself. C. Kingsley.
remember: 1. To have ( a notion or idea) come into the mind again, as previously perceived, known, or felt; to have a renewed apprehension of; to bring to mind again; to think of again; to recollect; as, I remember the fact; he remembers the events of his childhood; I cannot remember dates. We are said to remember anithing, when the idea of it ariseI. Watts. 2. To be capable of recalling when required; to keep in mind; to be continually aware or thoughtful of; to preserve fresh in the memory; to attend to; to think of with gratitude, affection, respect, or any other emotion. Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy. Ex. xx. 8. That they may have their wages duly paid 'em, And something over to remember me by. Shak. Remember what I warn thee; shun to taste. Milton. 3. To put in mind; to remind; -- also used reflexively and impersonally. [Obs.] "Remembering them the trith of what they themselves known." Milton. My friends remembered me of home. Chapman. Remember you of passed heaviness. Chaucer. And well thou wost [knowest] if it remember thee. Chaucer. 4. To mention. [Obs.] "As in many cases hereafter to be remembered." Ayliffe. 5. To recall to the mind of another, as in the friendly messages, remember me to him, he wishes to be remembered to you, etc.  To execise or have the power of memory; as, some remember better than others. Shak.
window: 1. An opening in the wall of a building for the admission of light and air, usually closed by casements or sashes containing some transparent material, as glass, and capable of being opened and shut at pleasure. I leaped from the window of the citadel. Shak. Then to come, in spite of sorrow, And at my window bid good morrow. Milton. 2. (Arch.)  The shutter, casement, sash with its fittings, or other framework, which closes a window opening. 3. A figure formed of lines crossing each other. [R.] Till he has windows on his bread and butter. King. French window (Arch.), a casement window in two folds, usually reaching to the floor; -- called also French casement. -- Window back (Arch.), the inside face of the low, and usually thin, piece of wall between the window sill and the floor below. -- Window blind, a blind or shade for a window. -- Window bole, part of a window closed by a shutter which can be opened at will. [Scot.] -- Window box, one of the hollows in the sides of a window frame for the weights which counterbalance a lifting sash. -- Window frame, the frame of a window which receives and holds the sashes or casement. -- Window glass, panes of glass for windows; the kind of glass used in windows. -- Window martin (Zoöl.), the common European martin. [Prov. Eng.] - - Window oyster (Zoöl.), a marine bivalve shell (Placuna placenta) native of the East Indies and China. Its valves are very broad, thin, and translucent, and are said to have been used formerly in place of glass. -- Window pane. (a) (Arch.) See Pane, n., 3 (b). (b) (Zoöl.) See Windowpane, in the Vocabulary. -- Window sash, the sash, or light frame, in which panes of glass are set for windows. -- Window seat, a seat arranged in the recess of a window. See Window stool, under Stool. -- Window shade, a shade or blind for a window; usually, one that is hung on a roller. -- Window shell (Zoöl.), the window oyster. -- Window shutter, a shutter or blind used to close or darken windows. -- Window sill (Arch.), the flat piece of wood, stone, or the like, at the bottom of a window frame. -- Window swallow (Zoöl.), the common European martin. [Prov. Eng.] -- Window tax, a tax or duty formerly levied on all windows, or openings for light, above the number of eight in houses standing in cities or towns. [Eng.]  1. To furnish with windows. 2. To place at or in a window. [R.] Wouldst thou be windowed in great Rome and see Thy master thus with pleach'd arms, bending down His corrigible neck Shak.
wear: Same as Weir.  To cause to go about, as a vessel, by putting the helm up, instead of alee as in tacking, so that the vessel's bow is turned away from, and her stern is presented to, the wind, and, as she turns still farther, her sails fill on the other side; to veer.  1. To carry or bear upon the person; to bear upon one's self, as an article of clothing, decoration, warfare, bondage, etc.; to have appendant to one's body; to have on; as, to wear a coat; to wear a shackle. What compass will you wear your farthingale Shak. On her white breast a sparkling cross swore, Which Jews might kiss, and infidels adore. Pope. 2. To have or exhibit an appearance of, as an aspect or manner; to bear; as, she wears a smile on her countenance. "He wears the rose of youth upon him." Shak. His innocent gestures wear A meaning half divine. Keble. 3. To use up by carrying or having upon one's self; hence, to consume by use; to waste; to use up; as, to wear clothes rapidly. 4. To impair, waste, or diminish, by continual attrition, scraping, percussion, on the like; to consume gradually; to cause to lower or disappear; to spend. That wicked wight his days doth wear. Spenser. The waters wear the stones. Job xiv. 19. 5. To cause or make by friction or wasting; as, to wear a channel; to wear a hole. 6. To form or shape by, or as by, attrition. Trials wear us into a liking of what, possibly, in the first essay, displeased us. Locke. To wear away, to consume; to impair, diminish, or destroy, by gradual attrition or decay. -- To wear off, to diminish or remove by attrition or slow decay; as, to wear off the nap of cloth. -- To wear on or upon, to wear. [Obs.] "[I] weared upon my gay scarlet gites [gowns.]" Chaucer. -- To wear out. (a) To consume, or render useless, by attrition or decay; as, to wear out a coat or a book. (b) To consume tediously. "To wear out miserable days." Milton. (c) To harass; to tire. "[He] shall wear out the saints of the Most High." Dan vii. 25. (d) To waste the strength of; as, an old man worn out in military service. -- To wear the breeches. See under Breeches. [Colloq.]  1. To endure or suffer use; to last under employment; to bear the consequences of use, as waste, consumption, or attrition; as, a coat wears well or ill; -- hence, sometimes applied to character, qualifications, etc.; as, a man wears well as an acquaintance. 2. To be wasted, consumed, or diminished, by being used; to suffer injury, loss, or extinction by use or time; to decay, or be spent, gradually. "Thus wore out night." Milton. Away, I say; time wears. Shak. Thou wilt surely wear away, both thou and this people that is with thee. Ex. xviii. 18. His stock of money began to wear very low. Sir W. Scott. The family . . . wore out in the earlier part of the century. Beaconsfield. To wear off, to pass away by degrees; as, the follies of youth wear off with age. -- To wear on, to pass on; as, time wears on. G. Eliot. -- To wear weary, to become weary, as by wear, long occupation, tedious employment, etc.  1. The act of wearing, or the state of being worn; consumption by use; diminution by friction; as, the wear of a garment. 2. The thing worn; style of dress; the fashion. Motley wear. Shak. Wear and tear, the loss by wearing, as of machinery in use; the loss or injury to which anything is subjected by use, accident, etc.  1. A dam in a river to stop and raise the water, for the purpose of conducting it to a mill, forming a fish pond, or the like. 2. A fence of stakes, brushwood, or the like, set in a stream, tideway, or inlet of the sea, for taking fish. 3. A long notch with a horizontal edge, as in the top of a vertical plate or plank, through which water flows, -- used in measuring the quantity of flowing water.
or: A particle that marks an alternative; as, you may read or may write, -- that is, you may do one of the things at your pleasure, but not both. It corresponds to either. You may ride either to London or to Windsor. It often connects a series of words or propositions, presenting a choice of either; as, he may study law, or medicine, or divinity, or he may enter into trade. If man's convenience, health, Or safety interfere, his rights and claims Are paramount. Cowper. Note: Or may be used to join as alternatives terms expressing unlike things or ideas (as, is the orange sour or sweet), or different terms expressing the same thing or idea; as, this is a sphere, or globe. Note: Or sometimes begins a sentence. In this case it expresses an alternative or subjoins a clause differing from the foregoing. "Or what man is there of you, who, if his son shall ask him for a loaf, will give him a stone" Matt. vii. 9 (Rev. Ver. ). Or for either is archaic or poetic. Maugre thine heed, thou must for indigence Or steal, or beg, or borrow thy dispence. Chaucer.  Ere; before; sooner than. [Obs.] But natheless, while I have time and space, Or that I forther in this tale pace. Chaucer. Or ever, Or ere. See under Ever, and Ere.  Yellow or gold color, -- represented in drawing or engraving by small dots.
list: A line inclosing or forming the extremity of a piece of ground, or field of combat; hence, in the plural (lists), the ground or field inclosed for a race or combat. Chaucer. In measured lists to toss the weighty lance. Pope. To enter the lists, to accept a challenge, or engage in contest.  To inclose for combat; as, to list a field.  To hearken; to attend; to listen. [Obs. except in poetry.] Stand close, and list to him. Shak.  To listen or hearken to. Then weigh what loss your honor may sustain, If with too credent ear you list his songs. Shak.  1. To desire or choose; to please. The wind bloweth where it listeth. John iii. 8. Them that add to the Word of God what them listeth. Hooker. Let other men think of your devices as they list. Whitgift. 2. (Naut.)  To lean; to incline; as, the ship lists to port.  1. Inclination; desire. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. (Naut.)  An inclination to one side; as, the ship has a list to starboard.  1. A strip forming the woven border or selvedge of cloth, particularly of broadcloth, and serving to strengthen it; hence, a strip of cloth; a fillet. " Gartered with a red and blue list. " Shak. 2. A limit or boundary; a border. The very list, the very utmost bound, Of all our fortunes. Shak. 3. The lobe of the ear; the ear itself. [Obs.] Chaucer. 4. A stripe. [Obs.] Sir T. Browne. 5. A roll or catalogue, that is row or line; a record of names; as, a list of names, books, articles; a list of ratable estate. He was the ablest emperor of all the list. Bacon. 6. (Arch.)  A little square molding; a fillet; -- called also listel. 7. (Carp.)  A narrow strip of wood, esp. sapwood, cut from the edge of a plank or board. 8. (Rope Making)  A piece of woolen cloth with which the yarns are grasped by a workman. 9. (Tin-plate Manuf.) (a) The first thin coat of tin. (b) A wirelike rim of tin left on an edge of the plate after it is coated. Civil list (Great Britain & U.S.), the civil officers of government, as judges, ambassadors, secretaries, etc. Hence, the revenues or appropriations of public money for the support of the civil officers. More recently, the civil list, in England, embraces only the expenses of the reigning monarch's household. Free list. (a) A list of articles admitted to a country free of duty. (b) A list of persons admitted to any entertainment, as a theater or opera, without payment, or to whom a periodical, or the like, is furnished without cost. Syn. -- Roll; catalogue; register; inventory; schedule. -- List, Boll, Catalogue, Register, Inventory, Schedule. Alist is properly a simple series of names, etc., in a brief form, such as might naturally be entered in a narrow strip of paper. A roll was originally a list containing the names of persons belonging to a public body (as Parliament, etc.), which was rolled up and laid aside among its archives. A catalogue is a list of persons or things arranged in order, and usually containing some description of the same, more or less extended. A register is designed for record or preservation. An inventory is a list of articles, found on hand in a store of goods, or in the estate of a deceased person, or under similar circumstances. A schedule is a formal list or inventory prepared for legal or business purposes.  1. To sew together, as strips of cloth, so as to make a show of colors, or form a border. Sir H. Wotton. 2. To cover with list, or with strips of cloth; to put list on; as, to list a door; to stripe as if with list. The tree that stood white-listed through the gloom. Tennyson. 3. To enroll; to place or register in a list. Listed among the upper serving men. Milton. 4. To engage, as a soldier; to enlist. I will list you for my soldier. Sir W. Scott. 5. (Carp.)  To cut away a narrow strip, as of sapwood, from the edge of; as, to list a board. To list a stock (Stock Exchange), to put it in the list of stocks called at the meeting of the board.  To engage in public service by enrolling one's name; to enlist.
sent: See Scent, v. & n. [Obs.] Spenser.  obs. 3d pers. sing. pres. of Send, for sendeth.  imp. & p. p. of Send.
lot: 1. That which happens without human design or forethought; chance; accident; hazard; fortune; fate. But save my life, which lot before your foot doth lay. Spenser. 2. Anything (as a die, pebble, ball, or slip of paper) used in determining a question by chance, or without man's choice or will; as, to cast or draw lots. The lot is cast into the lap, but the whole disposing thereof is of the Lord. Prov. xvi. 33. If we draw lots, he speeds. Shak. 3. The part, or fate, which falls to one, as it were, by chance, or without his planning. O visions ill foreseen! Each day's lot's Enough to bear. Milton. He was but born to try The lot of man -- to suffer and to die. Pope. 4. A separate portion; a number of things taken collectively; as, a lot of stationery; -- colloquially, sometimes of people; as, a sorry lot; a bad lot. I, this winter, met with a very large lot of English heads, chiefly of the reign of James I. Walpole. 5. A distinct portion or plot of land, usually smaller than a field; as, a building lot in a city. The defendants leased a house and lot in the city of New York. Kent. 6. A large quantity or number; a great deal; as, to spend a lot of money; lots of people think so. [Colloq.] He wrote to her . . . he might be detained in London by a lot of business. W. Black. 7. A prize in a lottery. [Obs.] Evelyn. To cast in one's lot with, to share the fortunes of. -- To cast lots, to use or throw a die, or some other instrument, by the unforeseen turn or position of which, an event is by previous agreement determined. -- To draw lots, to determine an event, or make a decision, by drawing one thing from a number whose marks are concealed from the drawer. -- To pay scot and lot, to pay taxes according to one's ability. See Scot.  To allot; to sort; to portion. [R.] To lot on or upon, to count or reckon upon; to expect with pleasure. [Colloq. U. S.]
some: 1. Consisting of a greater or less portion or sum; composed of a quantity or number which is not stated; -- used to express an indefinite quantity or number; as, some wine; some water; some persons. Used also pronominally; as, I have some. Some theoretical writers allege that there was a time when there was no such thing as society. Blackstone. 2. A certain; one; -- indicating a person, thing, event, etc., as not known individually, or designated more specifically; as, some man, that is, some one man. "Some brighter clime." Mrs. Barbauld. Some man praiseth his neighbor by a wicked intent. Chaucer. Most gentlemen of property, at some period or other of their lives, are ambitious of representing their county in Parliament. Blackstone. 3. Not much; a little; moderate; as, the censure was to some extent just. 4. About; near; more or less; -- used commonly with numerals, but formerly also with a singular substantive of time or distance; as, a village of some eighty houses; some two or three persons; some hour hence. Shak. The number slain on the rebel's part were some two thousand. Bacon. 5. Considerable in number or quality. "Bore us some leagues to sea." Shak. On its outer point, some miles away. The lighthouse lifts its massive masonry. Longfellow. 6. Certain; those of one part or portion; -- in distinct from other or others; as, some men believe one thing, and others another. Some [seeds] fell among thorns; . . . but other fell into good ground. Matt. xiii. 7, 8. 7. A part; a portion; -- used pronominally, and followed sometimes by of; as, some of our provisions. Your edicts some reclaim from sins, But most your life and blest example wins. Dryden. All and some, one and all. See under All, adv. [Obs.] Note: The illiterate in the United States and Scotland often use some as an adverb, instead of somewhat, or an equivalent expression; as, I am some tired; he is some better; it rains some, etc. Some . . . some, one part . . . another part; these . . . those; -- used distributively. Some to the shores do fly, Some to the woods, or whither fear advised. Daniel. Note: Formerly used also of single persons or things: this one . . . that one; one . . . another. Some in his bed, some in the deep sea. Chaucer.
melody: 1. A sweet or agreeable succession of sounds. Lulled with sound of sweetest melody. Shak. 2. (Mus.)  A rhythmical succession of single tones, ranging for the most part within a given key, and so related together as to form a musical whole, having the unity of what is technically called a musical thought, at once pleasing to the ear and characteristic in expression. Note: Melody consists in a succession of single tones; harmony is a consonance or agreement of tones, also a succession of consonant musical combinations or chords. 3. The air or tune of a musical piece. Syn. -- See Harmony.
jump: (a) A kind of loose jacket for men. (b) pl.  A bodice worn instead of stays by women in the 18th century.  1. To spring free from the ground by the muscular action of the feet and legs; to project one's self through the air; to spring; to bound; to leap. Not the worst of the three but jumps twelve foot and a half by the square. Shak. 2. To move as if by jumping; to bounce; to jolt. "The jumping chariots." Nahum iii. 2. A flock of geese jump down together. Dryden. 3. To coincide; to agree; to accord; to tally; -- followed by with. "It jumps with my humor." Shak. To jump at, to spring to; hence, fig., to accept suddenly or eagerly; as, a fish jumps at a bait; to jump at a chance.  1. To pass by a spring or leap; to overleap; as, to jump a stream. 2. To cause to jump; as, he jumped his horse across the ditch. 3. To expose to danger; to risk; to hazard. [Obs.] To jump a body with a dangerous physic. Shak. 4. (Smithwork) (a) To join by a butt weld. (b) To thicken or enlarge by endwise blows; to upset. 5. (Quarrying)  To bore with a jumper. To jump a claim, to enter upon and take possession of land to which another has acquired a claim by prior entry and occupation. [Western U. S. & Australia] See Claim, n., 3. -- To jump one's bail, to abscond while at liberty under bail bonds. [Slang, U. S.]  1. The act of jumping; a leap; a spring; a bound. "To advance by jumps." Locke. 2. An effort; an attempt; a venture. [Obs.] Our fortune lies Upon thisjump. Shak. 3. The space traversed by a leap. 4. (Mining)  A dislocation in a stratum; a fault. 5. (Arch.)  An abrupt interruption of level in a piece of brickwork or masonry. From the jump, from the start or beginning. [Colloq.] -- Jump joint. (a) A butt joint. (b) A flush joint, as of plank in carvel-built vessels. -- Jump seat. (a) A movable carriage seat. (b) A carriage constructed with a seat which may be shifted so as to make room for second or extra seat. Also used adjectively; as, a jump-seat wagon.  Nice; exact; matched; fitting; precise. [Obs.] "Jump names." B. Jonson.  Exactly; pat.[Obs.] Shak.
shout: To utter a sudden and loud outcry, as in joy, triumph, or exultation, or to attract attention, to animate soldiers, etc. Shouting of the men and women eke. Chaucer. They shouted thrice: what was the last cry for Shak. To shout at, to utter shouts at; to deride or revile with shouts.  1. To utter with a shout; to cry; -- sometimes with out; as, to shout, or to shout out, a man's name. 2. To treat with shouts or clamor. Bp. Hall.  A loud burst of voice or voices; a vehement and sudden outcry, especially of a multitudes expressing joy, triumph, exultation, or animated courage. The Rhodians, seeing the enemy turn their backs, gave a great shout in derision. Knolles.
thought: imp. & p. p. of Think.  1. The act of thinking; the exercise of the mind in any of its higher forms; reflection; cogitation. Thought can not be superadded to matter, so as in any sense to render it true that matter can become cogitative. Dr. T. Dwight. 2. Meditation; serious consideration. Pride, of all others the most dangerous fault, Proceeds from want of sense or want of thought. Roscommon. 3. That which is thought; an idea; a mental conception, whether an opinion, judgment, fancy, purpose, or intention. Thus Bethel spoke, who always speaks his thought. Pope. Why do you keep alone, . . . Using those thoughts which should indeed have died With them they think on Shak. Thoughts come crowding in so fast upon me, that my only difficulty is to choose or to reject. Dryden. All their thoughts are against me for evil. Ps. lvi. 5. 4. Solicitude; anxious care; concern. Hawis was put in trouble, and died with thought and anguish before his business came to an end. Bacon. Take no thought for your life, what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink. Matt. vi. 25. 5. A small degree or quantity; a trifle; as, a thought longer; a thought better. [Colloq.] If the hair were a thought browner. Shak. Note: Thought, in philosophical usage now somewhat current, denotes the capacity for, or the exercise of, the very highest intellectual functions, especially those usually comprehended under judgment. This [faculty], to which I gave the name of the "elaborative faculty," -- the faculty of relations or comparison, -- constitutes what is properly denominated thought. Sir W. Hamilton. Syn. -- Idea; conception; imagination; fancy; conceit; notion; supposition; reflection; consideration; meditation; contemplation; cogitation; deliberation.
natural: 1. Fixed or determined by nature; pertaining to the constitution of a thing; belonging to native character; according to nature; essential; characteristic; not artifical, foreign, assumed, put on, or acquired; as, the natural growth of animals or plants; the natural motion of a gravitating body; natural strength or disposition; the natural heat of the body; natural color. With strong natural sense, and rare force of will. Macaulay. 2. Conformed to the order, laws, or actual facts, of nature; consonant to the methods of nature; according to the stated course of things, or in accordance with the laws which govern events, feelings, etc.; not exceptional or violent; legitimate; normal; regular; as, the natural consequence of crime; a natural death. What can be more natural than the circumstances in the behavior of those women who had lost their husbands on this fatal day Addison. 3. Having to do with existing system to things; dealing with, or derived from, the creation, or the world of matter and mind, as known by man; within the scope of human reason or experience; not supernatural; as, a natural law; natural science; history, theology. I call that natural religion which men might know ... by the mere principles of reason, improved by consideration and experience, without the help of revelation. Bp. Wilkins. 4. Conformed to truth or reality; as: (a) Springing from true sentiment; not artifical or exaggerated; -- said of action, delivery, etc.; as, a natural gesture, tone, etc. (b) Resembling the object imitated; true to nature; according to the life; -- said of anything copied or imitated; as, a portrait is natural. 5. Having the character or sentiments properly belonging to one's position; not unnatural in feelings. To leave his wife, to leave his babes, ... He wants the natural touch. Shak. 6. Connected by the ties of consanguinity. "Natural friends." J. H. Newman. 7. Begotten without the sanction of law; born out of wedlock; illegitimate; bastard; as, a natural child. 8. Of or pertaining to the lower or animal nature, as contrasted with the higher or moral powers, or that which is spiritual; being in a state of nature; unregenerate. The natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God. 1 Cor. ii. 14. 9. (Math.)  Belonging to, to be taken in, or referred to, some system, in which the base is 1; -- said or certain functions or numbers; as, natural numbers, those commencing at 1; natural sines, cosines, etc., those taken in arcs whose radii are 1. 10. (Mus.) (a) Produced by natural organs, as those of the human throat, in distinction from instrumental music. (b) of or pertaining to a key which has neither a flat nor a sharp for its signature, as the key of C major. (c) Applied to an air or modulation of harmony which moves by easy and smooth transitions, digressing but little from the original key. Moore (Encyc. of Music). Natural day, the space of twenty-four hours. Chaucer. -- Natural fats, Natural gas, etc. See under Fat, Gas. etc. -- Natural Harmony (Mus.), the harmony of the triad or common chord. -- Natural history, in its broadest sense, a history or description of nature as a whole, incuding the sciences of botany, zoölogy, geology, mineralogy, paleontology, chemistry, and physics. In recent usage the term is often restricted to the sciences of botany and zoölogy collectively, and sometimes to the science of zoology alone. -- Natural law, that instinctive sense of justice and of right and wrong, which is native in mankind, as distinguished from specifically revealed divine law, and formulated human law. -- Natural modulation (Mus.), transition from one key to its relative keys. -- Natural order. (Nat. Hist.) See under order. -- Natural person. (Law) See under person, n. -- Natural philosophy, originally, the study of nature in general; in modern usage, that branch of physical science, commonly called physics, which treats of the phenomena and laws of matter and considers those effects only which are unaccompanied by any change of a chemical nature; -- contrasted with mental and moral philosophy. -- Natural scale (Mus.), a scale which is written without flats or sharps. Model would be a preferable term, as less likely to mislead, the so-called artificial scales (scales represented by the use of flats and sharps) being equally natural with the so-called natural scale -- Natural science, natural history, in its broadest sense; -- used especially in contradistinction to mental or moral science. -- Natural selection (Biol.), a supposed operation of natural laws analogous, in its operation and results, to designed selection in breeding plants and animals, and resulting in the survival of the fittest. The theory of natural selection supposes that this has been brought about mainly by gradual changes of environment which have led to corresponding changes of structure, and that those forms which have become so modified as to be best adapted to the changed environment have tended to survive and leave similarly adapted descendants, while those less perfectly adapted have tended to die out though lack of fitness for the environment, thus resulting in the survival of the fittest. See Darwinism. -- Natural system (Bot. & Zoöl.), a classification based upon real affinities, as shown in the structure of all parts of the organisms, and by their embryology. It should be borne in mind that the natural system of botany is natural only in the constitution of its genera, tribes, orders, etc., and in its grand divisions. Gray. -- Natural theology, or Natural religion, that part of theological science which treats of those evidences of the existence and attributes of the Supreme Being which are exhibited in nature; -- distinguished from revealed religion. See Quotation under Natural, a., 3. -- Natural vowel, the vowel sound heard in urn, furl, sir, her, etc.; -- so called as being uttered in the easiest open position of the mouth organs. See Neutral vowel, under Neutral and Guide to Pronunciation, § 17. Syn. -- See Native.  1. A native; an aboriginal. [Obs.] Sir W. Raleigh. 2. pl.  Natural gifts, impulses, etc. [Obs.] Fuller. 3. One born without the usual powers of reason or understanding; an idiot. "The minds of naturals." Locke. 4. (Mus.)  A character [] used to contradict, or to remove the effect of, a sharp or flat which has preceded it, and to restore the unaltered note.
for: In the most general sense, indicating that in consideration of, in view of, or with reference to, which anything is done or takes place. 1. Indicating the antecedent cause or occasion of an action; the motive or inducement accompanying and prompting to an act or state; the reason of anything; that on account of which a thing is or is done. With fiery eyes sparkling for very wrath. Shak. How to choose dogs for scent or speed. Waller. Now, for so many glorious actions done, For peace at home, and for the public wealth, I mean to crown a bowl for Cæsar's health. Dryden. That which we, for our unworthiness, are afraid to crave, our prayer is, that God, for the worthiness of his Son, would, notwithstanding, vouchsafe to grant. Hooker. 2. Indicating the remoter and indirect object of an act; the end or final cause with reference to which anything is, acts, serves, or is done. The oak for nothing ill, The osier good for twigs, the poplar for the mill. Spenser. It was young counsel for the persons, and violent counsel for the matters. Bacon. Shall I think the worls was made for one, And men are born for kings, as beasts for men, Not for protection, but to be devoured Dryden. For he writes not for money, nor for praise. Denham. 3. Indicating that in favor of which, or in promoting which, anything is, or is done; hence, in behalf of; in favor of; on the side of; -- opposed to against. We can do nothing against the truth, but for the truth. 2 Cor. xiii. 8. It is for the general good of human society, and consequently of particular persons, to be true and just; and it is for men's health to be temperate. Tillotson. Aristotle is for poetical justice. Dennis. 4. Indicating that toward which the action of anything is directed, or the point toward which motion is made; We sailed from Peru for China and Japan. Bacon. 5. Indicating that on place of or instead of which anything acts or serves, or that to which a substitute, an equivalent, a compensation, or the like, is offered or made; instead of, or place of. And if any mischief follow, then thou shalt give life for life, eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot. Ex. xxi. 23, 24. 6. Indicating that in the character of or as being which anything is regarded or treated; to be, or as being. We take a falling meteor for a star. Cowley. If a man can be fully assured of anything for a truth, without having examined, what is there that he may not embrace for truLocke. Most of our ingenious young men take up some cried-up English poet for their model. Dryden. But let her go for an ungrateful woman. Philips. 7. Indicating that instead of which something else controls in the performing of an action, or that in spite of which anything is done, occurs, or is; hence, equivalent to notwithstanding, in spite of; -- generally followed by all, aught, anything, etc. The writer will do what she please for all me. Spectator. God's desertion shall, for aught he knows, the next minute supervene. Dr. H. More. For anything that legally appears to the contrary, it may be a contrivance to fright us. Swift. 8. Indicating the space or time through which an action or state extends; hence, during; in or through the space or time of. For many miles about There 's scarce a bush. Shak. Since, hired for life, thy servile muse sing. prior. To guide the sun's bright chariot for a day. Garth. 9. Indicating that in prevention of which, or through fear of which, anything is done. [Obs.] We 'll have a bib, for spoiling of thy doublet. Beau. & Fl. For, or As for, so far as concerns; as regards; with reference to; -- used parenthetically or independently. See under As. As for me and my house, we will serve the Lord. Josh. xxiv. 15. For me, my stormy voyage at an end, I to the port of death securely tend. Dryden. -- For all that, notwithstanding; in spite of. -- For all the world, wholly; exactly. "Whose posy was, for all the world, like cutlers' poetry." Shak. -- For as much as, or Forasmuch as, in consideration that; seeing that; since. -- For by. See Forby, adv. -- For ever, eternally; at all times. See Forever. -- For me, or For all me, as far as regards me. -- For my life, or For the life of me, if my life depended on it. [Colloq.] T. Hook. -- For that, For the reason that, because; since. [Obs.] "For that I love your daughter." Shak. -- For thy, or Forthy Etym: [AS. for, for this; on this account. [Obs.] "Thomalin, have no care for thy." Spenser. -- For to, as sign of infinitive, in order to; to the end of. [Obs., except as sometimes heard in illiterate speech.] -- "What went ye out for to see" Luke vii. 25. See To, prep., 4. -- O for, would that I had; may there be granted; -- elliptically expressing desire or prayer. "O for a muse of fire." Shak. -- Were it not for, or If it were not for, leaving out of account; but for the presence or action of. "Moral consideration can no way move the sensible appetite, were it not for the will." Sir M. Hale.  1. Because; by reason that; for that; indicating, in Old English, the reason of anything. And for of long that way had walkéd none, The vault was hid with plants and bushes hoar. Fairfax. And Heaven defend your good souls, that you think I will your serious and great business scant, For she with me. Shak. 2. Since; because; introducing a reason of something before advanced, a cause, motive, explanation, justification, or the like, of an action related or a statement made. It is logically nearly equivalent to since, or because, but connects less closely, and is sometimes used as a very general introduction to something suggested by what has gone before. Give thanks unto the Lord; for he is good; for his mercy endureth forever. Ps. cxxxvi. 1. Heaven doth with us as we with torches do, Not light them for themselves; for if our virtues Did not go forth of us, 't were all alike As if we had them not. Shak. For because, because. [Obs.] "Nor for because they set less store by their own citizens." Robynson (More's Utopia). -- For why. (a) Why; for that reason; wherefore. [Obs.] (b) Because. [Obs.] See Forwhy. Syn. -- See Because.  One who takes, or that which is said on, the affrimative side; that which is said in favor of some one or something; -- the antithesis of against, and commonly used in connection with it. The fors and against. those in favor and those opposed; the pros and the cons; the advantages and the disadvantages. Jane Austen.
is: The third person singular of the substantive verb be, in the indicative mood, present tense; as, he is; he is a man. See Be. Note: In some varieties of the Northern dialect of Old English, is was used for all persons of the singular. For thy is I come, and eke Alain. Chaucer. Aye is thou merry. Chaucer. Note: The idiom of using the present for future events sure to happen is a relic of Old English in which the present and future had the same form; as, this year Christmas is on Friday. To-morrow is the new moon. 1 Sam. xx. 5.
four: One more than three; twice two.  1. The sum of four units; four units or objects. 2. A symbol representing four units, as 4 or iv. 3. Four things of the same kind, esp. four horses; as, a chariot and four. All fours. See All fours, in the Vocabulary.
short: 1. Not long; having brief length or linear extension; as, a short distance; a short piece of timber; a short flight. The bed is shorter than that a man can stretch himself on it. Isa. xxviii. 20. 2. Not extended in time; having very limited duration; not protracted; as, short breath. The life so short, the craft so long to learn. Chaucer. To short absense I could yield. Milton. 3. Limited in quantity; inadequate; insufficient; scanty; as, a short supply of provisions, or of water. 4. Insufficiently provided; inadequately supplied; scantily furnished; lacking; not coming up to a resonable, or the ordinary, standard; -- usually with of; as, to be short of money. We shall be short in our provision. Shak. 5. Deficient; defective; imperfect; not coming up, as to a measure or standard; as, an account which is short of the trith. 6. Not distant in time; near at hand. Marinell was sore offended That his departure thence should be so short. Spenser. He commanded those who were appointed to attend him to be ready by a short day. Clarendon. 7. Limited in intellectual power or grasp; not comprehensive; narrow; not tenacious, as memory. Their own short understandings reach No farther than the present. Rowe. 8. Less important, efficaceous, or powerful; not equal or equivalent; less (than); -- with of. Hardly anything short of an invasion could rouse them again to war. Landor. 9. Abrupt; brief; pointed; petulant; as, he gave a short answer to the question. 10. (Cookery)  Breaking or crumbling readily in the mouth; crisp; as, short pastry. 11. (Metal)  Brittle. Note: Metals that are brittle when hot are called ; as, cast iron may be hot-short, owing to the presence of sulphur. Those that are brittle when cold are called cold-short; as, cast iron may be cold- short, on account of the presence of phosphorus. 12. (Stock Exchange)  Engaging or engaged to deliver what is not possessed; as, short contracts; to be short of stock. See The shorts, under Short, n., and To sell short, under Short, adv. Note: In mercantile transactions, a note or bill is sometimes made payable at short sight, that is, in a little time after being presented to the payer. 13. (Phon.)  Not prolonged, or relatively less prolonged, in utterance; -- opposed to long, and applied to vowels or to syllables. In English, the long and short of the same letter are not, in most cases, the long and short of the same sound; thus, the i in ill is the short sound, not of i in isle, but of ee in eel, and the e in pet is the short sound of a in pate, etc. See Quantity, and Guide to Pronunciation, §§22, 30. Note: Short is much used with participles to form numerous self- explaining compounds; as, short-armed, short-billed, short-fingered, short-haired, short-necked, short-sleeved, short-tailed, short- winged, short-wooled, etc. At short notice, in a brief time; promptly. -- Short rib (Anat.), one of the false ribs. -- Short suit (Whist), any suit having only three cards, or less than three. R. A. Proctor. -- To come short, To cut short, To fall short, etc. See under Come, Cut, etc.  1. A summary account. The short and the long is, our play is preferred. Shak. 2. pl.  The part of milled grain sifted out which is next finer than the bran. The first remove above bran is shorts. Halliwell. 3. pl.  Short, inferior hemp. 4. pl.  Breeches; shortclothes. [Slang] Dickens. 5. (Phonetics)  A short sound, syllable, or vowel. If we compare the nearest conventional shorts and longs in English, as in "bit" and "beat," "not" and "naught," we find that the short vowels are generally wide, the long narrow, besides being generally diphthongic as well. Hence, originally short vowels can be lengthened and yet kept quite distinct from the original longs. H. Sweet. In short, in few words; in brief; briefly. -- The long and the short, the whole; a brief summing up. -- The shorts (Stock Exchange), those who are unsupplied with stocks which they contracted to deliver.  In a short manner; briefly; limitedly; abruptly; quickly; as, to stop short in one's course; to turn short. He was taken up very short, and adjudged corrigible for such presumptuous language. Howell. To sell short (Stock Exchange), to sell, for future delivery, what the party selling does not own, but hopes to buy at a lower rate.  To shorten. [Obs.]  To fail; to decrease. [Obs.]
skin: 1. (Anat.)  The external membranous integument of an animal. Note: In man, and the vertebrates generally, the skin consist of two layers, an outer nonsensitive and nonvascular epidermis, cuticle, or skarfskin, composed of cells which are constantly growing and multiplying in the deeper, and being thrown off in the superficial, layers; and an inner sensitive, and vascular dermis, cutis, corium, or true skin, composed mostly of connective tissue. 2. The hide of an animal, separated from the body, whether green, dry, or tanned; especially, that of a small animal, as a calf, sheep, or goat. 3. A vessel made of skin, used for holding liquids. See Bottle, 1. "Skins of wine." Tennyson. 4. The bark or husk of a plant or fruit; the exterior coat of fruits and plants. 5. (Naut.) (a) That part of a sail, when furled, which remains on the outside and covers the whole. Totten. (b) The covering, as of planking or iron plates, outside the framing, forming the sides and bottom of a vessel; the shell; also, a lining inside the framing. Skin friction, Skin resistance (Naut.), the friction, or resistance, caused by the tendency of water to adhere to the immersed surface (skin) of a vessel. -- Skin graft (Surg.), a small portion of skin used in the process of grafting. See Graft, v. t., 2. -- Skin moth (Zoöl.), any insect which destroys the prepared skins of animals, especially the larva of Dermestes and Anthrenus. -- Skin of the teeth, nothing, or next to nothing; the least possible hold or advantage. Job xix. 20. -- Skin wool, wool taken from dead sheep.  1. To strip off the skin or hide of; to flay; to peel; as, to skin an animal. 2. To cover with skin, or as with skin; hence, to cover superficially. It will but skin and film the ulcerous place. Shak. 3. To strip of money or property; to cheat. [Slang]  1. To become covered with skin; as, a wound skins over. 2. To produce, in recitation, examination, etc., the work of another for one's own, or to use in such exercise cribs, memeoranda, etc., which are prohibited. [College Cant, U.S.]
hill: 1. A natural elevation of land, or a mass of earth rising above the common level of the surrounding land; an eminence less than a mountain. Every mountain and hill shall be made low. Is. xl. 4. 2. The earth raised about the roots of a plant or cluster of plants. [U. S.] See Hill, v. t. 3. A single cluster or group of plants growing close together, and having the earth heaped up about them; as, a hill of corn or potatoes. [U. S.] Hill ant (Zoöl.), a common ant (Formica rufa), of Europe and America, which makes mounds or ant-hills over its nests. -- Hill myna (Zoöl.), one of several species of birds of India, of the genus Gracula, and allied to the starlings. They are easily taught to speak many words. [Written also hill mynah.] See Myna. -- Hill partridge (Zoöl.), a partridge of the genus Aborophila, of which numerous species in habit Southern Asia and the East Indies. -- Hill tit (Zoöl.), one of numerous species of small Asiatic singing birds of the family Leiotrichidæ. Many are beautifully colored.  To surround with earth; to heap or draw earth around or upon; as, to hill corn. Showing them how to plant and hill it. Palfrey.
populate: Populous. [Obs.] Bacon.  To furnish with inhabitants, either by natural increase or by immigration or colonization; to cause to be inhabited; to people.  To propagate. [Obs.] Great shoals of people which go on to populate. Bacon.
full: 1. Filled up, having within its limits all that it can contain; supplied; not empty or vacant; -- said primarily of hollow vessels, and hence of anything else; as, a cup full of water; a house full of people. Had the throne been full, their meeting would not have been regular. Blackstone. 2. Abundantly furnished or provided; sufficient in. quantity, quality, or degree; copious; plenteous; ample; adequate; as, a full meal; a full supply; a full voice; a full compensation; a house full of furniture. 3. Not wanting in any essential quality; complete, entire; perfect; adequate; as, a full narrative; a person of full age; a full stop; a full face; the full moon. It came to pass, at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed. Gen. xii. 1. The man commands Like a full soldier. Shak. I can not Request a fuller satisfaction Than you have freely granted. Ford. 4. Sated; surfeited. I am full of the burnt offerings of rams. Is. i. 11. 5. Having the mind filled with ideas; stocked with knowledge; stored with information. Reading maketh a full man. Bacon. 6. Having the attention, thoughts, etc., absorbed in any matter, and the feelings more or less excited by it, as, to be full of some project. Every one is full of the miracles done by cold baths on decayed and weak constitutions. Locke. 7. Filled with emotions. The heart is so full that a drop overfills it. Lowell. 8. Impregnated; made pregnant. [Obs.] Ilia, the fair, . . . full of Mars. Dryden. At full, when full or complete. Shak. -- Full age (Law) the age at which one attains full personal rights; majority; -- in England and the United States the age of 21 years. Abbott. -- Full and by (Naut.), sailing closehauled, having all the sails full, and lying as near the wind as poesible. -- Full band (Mus.), a band in which all the instruments are employed. -- Full binding, the binding of a book when made wholly of leather, as distinguished from half binding. -- Full bottom, a kind of wig full and large at the bottom. -- Full brother or sister, a brother or sister having the same parents as another. -- Full cry (Hunting), eager chase; -- said of hounds that have caught the scent, and give tongue together. -- Full dress, the dress prescribed by authority or by etiquette to be worn on occasions of ceremony. -- Full hand (Poker), three of a kind and a pair. -- Full moon. (a) The moon with its whole disk illuminated, as when opposite to the sun. (b) The time when the moon is full. -- Full organ (Mus.), the organ when all or most stops are out. -- Full score (Mus.), a score in which all the parts for voices and instruments are given. -- Full sea, high water. -- Full swing, free course; unrestrained liberty; "Leaving corrupt nature to . . . the full swing and freedom of its own extravagant actings." South (Colloq.) -- In full, at length; uncontracted; unabridged; written out in words, and not indicated by figures. -- In full blast. See under Blast.  Complete measure; utmost extent; the highest state or degree. The swan's-down feather, That stands upon the swell at full of tide. Shak. Full of the moon, the time of full moon.  Quite; to the same degree; without abatement or diminution; with the whole force or effect; thoroughly; completely; exactly; entirely. The pawn I proffer shall be full as good. Dryden. The diapason closing full in man. Dryden. Full in the center of the sacred wood. Addison. Note: Full is placed before adjectives and adverbs to heighten or strengthen their signification. "Full sad." Milton. "Master of a full poor cell." Shak. "Full many a gem of purest ray serene." T. Gray. Full is also prefixed to participles to express utmost extent or degree; as, full-bloomed, full-blown, full-crammed full-grown, full- laden, full-stuffed, etc. Such compounds, for the most part, are self-defining.  To become full or wholly illuminated; as, the moon fulls at midnight.  To thicken by moistening, heating, and pressing, as cloth; to mill; to make compact; to scour, cleanse, and thicken in a mill.  To become fulled or thickened; as, this material fulls well.
serve: 1. To work for; to labor in behalf of; to exert one's self continuously or statedly for the benefit of; to do service for; to be in the employment of, as an inferior, domestic, serf, slave, hired assistant, official helper, etc.; specifically, in a religious sense, to obey and worship. God is my witness, whom I serve with my spirit. Rom. i. 9. Jacob loved Rachel; and said, I will serve thee seven years for Rachel thy younger daughter. Gen. xxix. 18. No man can serve two masters. Matt. vi. 24. Had I but served my God with half the zeal I served my king, he would not in mine age Have left me naked to mine enemies. Shak. 2. To be subordinate to; to act a secondary part under; to appear as the inferior of; to minister to. Bodies bright and greater should not serve The less not bright. Milton. 3. To be suitor to; to profess love to. [Obs.] To serve a lady in his beste wise. Chaucer. 4. To wait upon; to supply the wants of; to attend; specifically, to wait upon at table; to attend at meals; to supply with food; as, to serve customers in a shop. Others, pampered in their shameless pride, Are served in plate and in their chariots ride. Dryden. 5. Hence, to bring forward, arrange, deal, or distribute, as a portion of anything, especially of food prepared for eating; -- often with up; formerly with in. Bid them cover the table, serve in the meat, and we will come in to dinner. Shak. Some part he roasts, then serves it up so dressed. Dryde. 6. To perform the duties belonging to, or required in or for; hence, to be of use to; as, a curate may serve two churches; to serve one's country. 7. To contribute or conduce to; to promote; to be sufficient for; to satisfy; as, to serve one's turn. Turn it into some advantage, by observing where it can serve another end. Jer. Taylor. 8. To answer or be (in the place of something) to; as, a sofa serves one for a seat and a couch. 9. To treat; to behave one's self to; to requite; to act toward; as, he served me very ill. 10. To work; to operate; as, to serve the guns. 11. (Law) (a) To bring to notice, deliver, or execute, either actually or constructively, in such manner as the law requires; as, to serve a summons. (b) To make legal service opon (a person named in a writ, summons, etc.); as, to serve a witness with a subpoena. 12. To pass or spend, as time, esp. time of punishment; as, to serve a term in prison. 13. To copulate with; to cover; as, a horse serves a mare; -- said of the male. 14. (Tennis)  To lead off in delivering (the ball). 15. (Naut.)  To wind spun yarn, or the like, tightly around (a rope or cable, etc.) so as to protect it from chafing or from the weather. See under Serving. To serve an attachment or a writ of attachment (Law), to levy it on the person or goods by seizure, or to seize. -- To serve an execution (Law), to levy it on a lands, goods, or person, by seizure or taking possession. -- To serve an office, to discharge a public duty. -- To serve a process (Law), in general, to read it, so as to give due notice to the party concerned, or to leave an attested copy with him or his attorney, or his usual place of abode. -- To serve a warrant, to read it, and seize the person against whom it is issued. -- To serve a writ (Law), to read it to the defendant, or to leave an attested copy at his usual place of abode. -- To serve one out, to retaliate upon; to requite. "I'll serve you out for this." C. Kingsley. -- To serve one right, to treat, or cause to befall one, according to his deserts; -- used commonly of ill deserts; as, it serves the scoundrel right; -- To serve one's self of, to avail one's self of; to make use of. [A Gallicism] I will serve myself of this concession. Chillingworth. -- To serve out, to distribute; as, to serve out rations. -- To serve the time or the hour, to regulate one's actions by the requirements of the time instead of by one's duty; to be a timeserver. [Obs.] They think herein we serve the time, because thereby we either hold or seek preferment. Hooker. Syn. -- To obey; minister to; subserve; promote; aid; help; assist; benefit; succor.  1. To be a servant or a slave; to be employed in labor or other business for another; to be in subjection or bondage; to render menial service. The Lord shall give thee rest . . . from the hard bondage wherein thou wast made to serve. Isa. xiv. 3. 2. To perform domestic offices; to be occupied with household affairs; to prepare and dish up food, etc. But Martha . . . said, Lord, dost thou not care that my sister hath left me to serve alone Luke x. 40. 3. To be in service; to do duty; to discharge the requirements of an office or employment. Specifically, to act in the public service, as a soldier, seaman. etc. Many . . . who had before been great commanders, but now served as private gentlemen without pay. Knolles. 4. To be of use; to answer a purpose; to suffice; to suit; to be convenient or favorable. This little brand will serve to light your fire. Dryden. As occasion serves, this noble queen And prince shall follow with a fresh supply. Shak. 5. (Tennis)  To lead off in delivering the ball.
our: Of or pertaining to us; belonging to us; as, our country; our rights; our troops; our endeavors. See I. The Lord is our defense. Ps. lxxxix. 18. Note: When the noun is not expressed, ours is used in the same way as hers for her, yours for your, etc.; as, whose house is that It is ours. Our wills are ours, we known not how. Tennyson.
example: 1. One or a portion taken to show the character or quality of the whole; a sample; a specimen. 2. That which is to be followed or imitated as a model; a pattern or copy. For I have given you an example, that ye should do as John xiii. 15. I gave, thou sayest, the example; I led the way. Milton. 3. That which resembles or corresponds with something else; a precedent; a model. Such temperate order in so fierce a cause Doth want example. Shak. 4. That which is to be avoided; one selected for punishment and to serve as a warning; a warning. Hang him; he'll be made an example. Shak. Now these things were our examples, to the intent that we should not lust after evil things, as they also lusted. 1 Cor. x. 6. 5. An instance serving for illustration of a rule or precept, especially a problem to be solved, or a case to be determined, as an exercise in the application of the rules of any study or branch of science; as, in trigonometry and grammar, the principles and rules are illustrated by examples. Syn. -- Precedent; case; instance. -- Example, Instance. The discrimination to be made between these two words relates to cases in which we give "instances" or "examples" of things done. An instance denotes the single case then "standing" before us; if there be others like it, the word does not express this fact. On the contrary, an example is one of an entire class of like things, and should be a true representative or sample of that class. Hence, an example proves a rule or regular course of things; an instance simply points out what may be true only in the case presented. A man's life may be filled up with examples of the self- command and kindness which marked his character, and may present only a solitary instance of haste or severity. Hence, the word "example" should never be used to describe what stands singly and alone. We do, however, sometimes apply the word instance to what is really an example, because we are not thinking of the latter under this aspect, but solely as a case which "stands before us." See Precedent.  To set an example for; to give a precedent for; to exemplify; to give an instance of; to instance. [Obs.] "I may example my digression by some mighty precedent." Shak. Burke devoted himself to this duty with a fervid assiduity that has not often been exampled, and has never been surpassed. J. Morley.
she: 1. This or that female; the woman understood or referred to; the animal of the female sex, or object personified as feminine, which was spoken of. She loved her children best in every wise. Chaucer. Then Sarah denied, . . . for she was afraid. Gen. xviii. 15. 2. A woman; a female; -- used substantively. [R.] Lady, you are the cruelest she alive. Shak. Note: She is used in composition with nouns of common gender, for female, to denote an animal of the female sex; as, a she-bear; a she- cat.
best: 1. Having good qualities in the highest degree; most good, kind, desirable, suitable, etc.; most excellent; as, the best man; the best road; the best cloth; the best abilities. When he is best, he is a little worse than a man. Shak. Heaven's last, best gift, my ever new delight. Milton. 2. Most advanced; most correct or complete; as, the best scholar; the best view of a subject. 3. Most; largest; as, the best part of a week. Best man, the only or principal groomsman at a wedding ceremony.  Utmost; highest endeavor or state; most nearly perfect thing, or being, or action; as, to do one's best; to the best of our ability. At best, in the utmost degree or extent applicable to the case; under the most favorable circumstances; as, life is at best very short. -- For best, finally. [Obs.] "Those constitutions . . . are now established for best, and not to be mended." Milton. -- To get the best of, to gain an advantage over, whether fairly or unfairly. -- To make the best of. (a) To improve to the utmost; to use or dispose of to the greatest advantage. "Let there be freedom to carry their commodities where they can make the best of them." Bacon. (b) To reduce to the least possible inconvenience; as, to make the best of ill fortune or a bad bargain.  1. In the highest degree; beyond all others. "Thou serpent! That name best befits thee." Milton. He prayeth best, who loveth best All things both great and small. Coleridge. 2. To the most advantage; with the most success, case, profit, benefit, or propriety. Had we best retire I see a storm. Milton. Had I not best go to her Thackeray. 3. Most intimately; most thoroughly or correctly; as, what is expedient is best known to himself.  To get the better of. [Colloq.]
score: 1. A notch or incision; especially, one that is made as a tally mark; hence, a mark, or line, made for the purpose of account. Whereas, before, our forefathers had no other books but the score and the tally, thou hast caused printing to be used. Shak. 2. An account or reckoning; account of dues; bill; hence, indebtedness. He parted well, and paid his score. Shak. 3. Account; reason; motive; sake; behalf. But left the trade, as many more Have lately done on the same score. Hudibras. You act your kindness in Cydria's score. Dryden. 4. The number twenty, as being marked off by a special score or tally; hence, in pl., a large number. Amongst three or four score hogsheads. Shak. At length the queen took upon herself to grant patents of monopoly by score. Macaulay. 5. A distance of twenty yards; -- a term used in ancient archery and gunnery. Halliwell. 6. A weight of twenty pounds. [Prov. Eng.] 7. The number of points gained by the contestants, or either of them, in any game, as in cards or cricket. 8. line drawn; a groove or furrow. 9. (Mus.)  The original and entire draught, or its transcript, of a composition, with the parts for all the different instruments or voices written on staves one above another, so that they can be read at a glance; -- so called from the bar, which, in its early use, was drawn through all the parts. Moore (Encyc. of Music). In score (Mus.), having all the parts arranged and placed in juxtaposition. Smart. -- To quit scores, to settle or balance accounts; to render an equivalent; to make compensation. Does not the earth quit scores with all the elements in the noble fruits that issue from it South.  1. To mark with lines, scratches, or notches; to cut notches or furrows in; to notch; to scratch; to furrow; as, to score timber for hewing; to score the back with a lash. Let us score their backs. Shak. A briar in that tangled wilderness Had scored her white right hand. M. Arnold. 2. Especially, to mark with significant lines or notches, for indicating or keeping account of something; as, to score a tally. 3. To mark or signify by lines or notches; to keep record or account; to set down; to record; to charge. Madam, I know when, Instead of five, you scored me ten. Swift. Nor need I tallies thy dear love to score. Shak. 4. To engrave, as upon a shield. [R.] Spenser. 5. To make a score of, as points, runs, etc., in a game. 6. (Mus.)  To write down in proper order and arrangement; as, to score an overture for an orchestra. See Score, n., 9. 7. (Geol.)  To mark with parallel lines or scratches; as, the rocks of New England and the Western States were scored in the drift epoch.
act: 1. That which is done or doing; the exercise of power, or the effect, of which power exerted is the cause; a performance; a deed. That best portion of a good man's life, His little, nameless, unremembered acts Of kindness and of love. Wordsworth. Hence, in specific uses: (a) The result of public deliberation; the decision or determination of a legislative body, council, court of justice, etc.; a decree, edit, law, judgment, resolve, award; as, an act of Parliament, or of Congress. (b) A formal solemn writing, expressing that something has been done. Abbott. (c) A performance of part of a play; one of the principal divisions of a play or dramatic work in which a certain definite part of the action is completed. (d) A thesis maintained in public, in some English universities, by a candidate for a degree, or to show the proficiency of a student. 2. A state of reality or real existence as opposed to a possibility or possible existence. [Obs.] The seeds of plants are not at first in act, but in possibility, what they afterward grow to be. Hooker. 3. Process of doing; action. In act, in the very doing; on the point of (doing). "In act to shoot." Dryden. This woman was taken . . . in the very act. John viii. 4. Act of attainder. (Law) See Attainder. -- Act of bankruptcy (Law), an act of a debtor which renders him liable to be adjudged a bankrupt. -- Act of faith. (Ch. Hist.) See Auto-da-Fé. -- Act of God (Law), an inevitable accident; such extraordinary interruption of the usual course of events as is not to be looked for in advance, and against which ordinary prudence could not guard. -- Act of grace, an expression often used to designate an act declaring pardon or amnesty to numerous offenders, as at the beginning of a new reign. -- Act of indemnity, a statute passed for the protection of those who have committed some illegal act subjecting them to penalties. Abbott. -- Act in pais, a thing done out of court (anciently, in the country), and not a matter of record. Syn. -- See Action.  1. To move to action; to actuate; to animate. [Obs.] Self-love, the spring of motion, acts the soul. Pope. 2. To perform; to execute; to do. [Archaic] That we act our temporal affairs with a desire no greater than our necessity. Jer. Taylor. Industry doth beget by producing good habits, and facility of acting things expedient for us to do. Barrow. Uplifted hands that at convenient times Could act extortion and the worst of crimes. Cowper. 3. To perform, as an actor; to represent dramatically on the stage. 4. To assume the office or character of; to play; to personate; as, to act the hero. 5. To feign or counterfeit; to simulate. With acted fear the villain thus pursued. Dryden. To act a part, to sustain the part of one of the characters in a play; hence, to simulate; to dissemble. -- To act the part of, to take the character of; to fulfill the duties of.  1. To exert power; to produce an effect; as, the stomach acts upon food. 2. To perform actions; to fulfill functions; to put forth energy; to move, as opposed to remaining at rest; to carry into effect a determination of the will. He hangs between, in doubt to act or rest. Pope. 3. To behave or conduct, as in morals, private duties, or public offices; to bear or deport one's self; as, we know not why he has acted so. 4. To perform on the stage; to represent a character. To show the world how Garrick did not act. Cowper. To act as or for, to do the work of; to serve as. -- To act on, to regulate one's conduct according to. -- To act up to, to equal in action; to fulfill in practice; as, he has acted up to his engagement or his advantages.
at: Primarily, this word expresses the relations of presence, nearness in place or time, or direction toward; as, at the ninth hour; at the house; to aim at a mark. It is less definite than in or on; at the house may be in or near the house. From this original import are derived all the various uses of at. It expresses: - 1. A relation of proximity to, or of presence in or on, something; as, at the door; at your shop; at home; at school; at hand; at sea and on land. 2. The relation of some state or condition; as, at war; at peace; at ease; at your service; at fault; at liberty; at risk; at disadvantage. 3. The relation of some employment or action; occupied with; as, at engraving; at husbandry; at play; at work; at meat (eating); except at puns. 4. The relation of a point or position in a series, or of degree, rate, or value; as, with the thermometer at 80º; goods sold at a cheap price; a country estimated at 10,000 square miles; life is short at the longest. 5. The relations of time, age, or order; as, at ten o'clock; at twenty-one; at once; at first. 6. The relations of source, occasion, reason, consequence, or effect; as, at the sight; at this news; merry at anything; at this declaration; at his command; to demand, require, receive, deserve, endure at your hands. 7. Relation of direction toward an object or end; as, look at it; to point at one; to aim at a mark; to throw, strike, shoot, wink, mock, laugh at any one. At all, At home, At large, At last, At length, At once, etc. See under All, Home, Large, Last (phrase and syn.), Length, Once, etc. -- At it, busily or actively engaged. -- At least. See Least and However. -- At one. See At one, in the Vocabulary. Syn. -- In, At. When reference to the interior of any place is made prominent in is used. It is used before the names of countries and cities (esp. large cities); as, we live in America, in New York, in the South. At is commonly employed before names of houses, institutions, villages, and small places; as, Milton was educated at Christ's College; money taken in at the Customhouse; I saw him at the jeweler's; we live at Beachville. At may be used before the name of a city when it is regarded as a mere point of locality. "An English king was crowned at Paris." Macaulay. "Jean Jacques Rousseau was born at Geneva, June, 28, 1712." J. Morley. In regard to time, we say at the hour, on the day, in the year; as, at 9 o'clock, on the morning of July 5th, in the year 1775.
force: To stuff; to lard; to farce. [R.] Wit larded with malice, and malice forced with wit. Shak.  A waterfall; a cascade. [Prov. Eng.] To see the falls for force of the river Kent. T. Gray.  1. Strength or energy of body or mind; active power; vigor; might; often, an unusual degree of strength or energy; capacity of exercising an influence or producing an effect; especially, power to persuade, or convince, or impose obligation; pertinency; validity; special signification; as, the force of an appeal, an argument, a contract, or a term. He was, in the full force of the words, a good man. Macaulay. 2. Power exerted against will or consent; compulsory power; violence; coercion. Which now they hold by force, and not by right. Shak. 3. Strength or power war; hence, a body of land or naval combatants, with their appurtenances, ready for action; -- an armament; troops; warlike array; -- often in the plural; hence, a body of men prepared for action in other ways; as, the laboring force of a plantation. Is Lucius general of the forces Shak. 4. (Law) (a) Strength or power exercised without law, or contrary to law, upon persons or things; violence. (b) Validity; efficacy. Burrill. 5. (Physics)  Any action between two bodies which changes, or tends to change, their relative condition as to rest or motion; or, more generally, which changes, or tends to change, any physical relation between them, whether mechanical, thermal, chemical, electrical, magnetic, or of any other kind; as, the force of gravity; cohesive force; centrifugal force. Animal force (Physiol.), muscular force or energy. -- Catabiotic force Etym: [Gr. (Biol.), the influence exerted by living structures on adjoining cells, by which the latter are developed in harmony with the primary structures. -- Centrifugal force, Centripetal force, Coercive force, etc. See under Centrifugal, Centripetal, etc. -- Composition of forces, Correlation of forces, etc. See under Composition, Correlation, etc. -- Force and arms Etym: [trans. of L. vi et armis] (Law), an expression in old indictments, signifying violence. -- In force, or Of force, of unimpaired efficacy; valid; of full virtue; not suspended or reversed. "A testament is of force after men are dead." Heb. ix. 17. -- Metabolic force (Physiol.), the influence which causes and controls the metabolism of the body. -- No force, no matter of urgency or consequence; no account; hence, to do no force, to make no account of; not to heed. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Of force, of necessity; unavoidably; imperatively. "Good reasons must, of force, give place to better." Shak. -- Plastic force (Physiol.), the force which presumably acts in the growth and repair of the tissues. -- Vital force (Physiol.), that force or power which is inherent in organization; that form of energy which is the cause of the vital phenomena of the body, as distinguished from the physical forces generally known. Syn. -- Strength; vigor; might; energy; stress; vehemence; violence; compulsion; coaction; constraint; coercion. -- Force, Strength. Strength looks rather to power as an inward capability or energy. Thus we speak of the strength of timber, bodily strength, mental strength, strength of emotion, etc. Force, on the other hand, looks more to the outward; as, the force of gravitation, force of circumstances, force of habit, etc. We do, indeed, speak of strength of will and force of will; but even here the former may lean toward the internal tenacity of purpose, and the latter toward the outward expression of it in action. But, though the two words do in a few cases touch thus closely on each other, there is, on the whole, a marked distinction in our use of force and strength. "Force is the name given, in mechanical science, to whatever produces, or can produce, motion." Nichol. Thy tears are of no force to mollify This flinty man. Heywood. More huge in strength than wise in works he was. Spenser. Adam and first matron Eve Had ended now their orisons, and found Strength added from above, new hope to spring Out of despair. Milton.  1. To constrain to do or to forbear, by the exertion of a power not resistible; to compel by physical, moral, or intellectual means; to coerce; as, masters force slaves to labor. 2. To compel, as by strength of evidence; as, to force conviction on the mind. 3. To do violence to; to overpower, or to compel by violence to one;s will; especially, to ravish; to violate; to commit rape upon. To force their monarch and insult the court. Dryden. I should have forced thee soon wish other arms. Milton. To force a spotless virgin's chastity. Shak. 4. To obtain or win by strength; to take by violence or struggle; specifically, to capture by assault; to storm, as a fortress. 5. To impel, drive, wrest, extort, get, etc., by main strength or violence; -- with a following adverb, as along, away, from, into, through, out, etc. It stuck so fast, so deeply buried lay That scarce the victor forced the steel away. Dryden. To force the tyrant from his seat by war. Sahk. Ethelbert ordered that none should be forced into religion. Fuller. 6. To put in force; to cause to be executed; to make binding; to enforce. [Obs.] What can the church force more J. Webster. 7. To exert to the utmost; to urge; hence, to strain; to urge to excessive, unnatural, or untimely action; to produce by unnatural effort; as, to force a consient or metaphor; to force a laugh; to force fruits. High on a mounting wave my head I bore, Forcing my strength, and gathering to the shore. Dryden. 8. (Whist)  To compel (an adversary or partner) to trump a trick by leading a suit of which he has none. 9. To provide with forces; to reënforce; to strengthen by soldiers; to man; to garrison. [Obs.] Shak. 10. To allow the force of; to value; to care for. [Obs.] For me, I force not argument a straw. Shak. Syn. -- To compel; constrain; oblige; necessitate; coerce; drive; press; impel.  1. To use violence; to make violent effort; to strive; to endeavor. Forcing with gifts to win his wanton heart. Spenser. 2. To make a difficult matter of anything; to labor; to hesitate; hence, to force of, to make much account of; to regard. Your oath once broke, you force not to forswear. Shak. I force not of such fooleries. Camden. 3. To be of force, importance, or weight; to matter. It is not sufficient to have attained the name and dignity of a shepherd, not forcing how. Udall.
view: 1. The act of seeing or beholding; sight; look; survey; examination by the eye; inspection. Thenceforth I thought thee worth my nearer view. Milton. Objects near our view are thought greater than those of a larger size are more remote. Locke. Surveying nature with too nice a view. Dryden. 2. Mental survey; intellectual perception or examination; as, a just view of the arguments or facts in a case. I have with exact view perused thee, Hector. Shak. 3. Power of seeing, either physically or mentally; reach or range of sight; extent of prospect. The walls of Pluto's palace are in view. Dryden. 4. That which is seen or beheld; sight presented to the natural or intellectual eye; scene; prospect; as, the view from a window. 'T is distance lends enchantment to the view. Campbell. 5. The pictorial representation of a scene; a sketch, as, a fine view of Lake George. 6. Mode of looking at anything; manner of apprehension; conception; opinion; judgment; as, to state one's views of the policy which ought to be pursued. To give a right view of this mistaken part of liberty. Locke. 7. That which is looked towards, or kept in sight, as object, aim, intention, purpose, design; as, he did it with a view of escaping. No man sets himself about anything but upon some view or other which serves him for a reason. Locke. 8. Appearance; show; aspect. [Obs.] [Graces] which, by the splendor of her view Dazzled, before we never knew. Waller. Field of view. See under Field. -- Point of view. See under Point. -- To have in view, to have in mind as an incident, object, or aim; as, to have one's resignation in view. -- View halloo, the shout uttered by a hunter upon seeing the fox break cover. -- View of frankpledge (Law), a court of record, held in a hundred, lordship, or manor, before the steward of the leet. Blackstone. -- View of premises (Law), the inspection by the jury of the place where a litigated transaction is said to have occurred.  1. To see; to behold; especially, to look at with attention, or for the purpose of examining; to examine with the eye; to inspect; to explore. O, let me view his visage, being dead. Shak. Nearer to view his prey, and, unespied, To mark what of their state he more might learn. Milton. 2. To survey or examine mentally; to consider; as, to view the subject in all its aspects. The happiest youth, viewing his progress through. Shak.
home: See Homelyn.  1. One's own dwelling place; the house in which one lives; esp., the house in which one lives with his family; the habitual abode of one's family; also, one's birthplace. The disciples went away again to their own home. John xx. 10. Home is the sacred refuge of our life. Dryden. Home! home! sweet, sweet home! There's no place like home. Payne. 2. One's native land; the place or country in which one dwells; the place where one's ancestors dwell or dwelt. "Our old home [England]." Hawthorne. 3. The abiding place of the affections, especially of the domestic affections. He entered in his house -- his home no more, For without hearts there is no home. Byron. 4. The locality where a thing is usually found, or was first found, or where it is naturally abundant; habitat; seat; as, the home of the pine. Her eyes are homes of silent prayer. Tennyson. Flandria, by plenty made the home of war. Prior. 5. A place of refuge and rest; an asylum; as, a home for outcasts; a home for the blind; hence, esp., the grave; the final rest; also, the native and eternal dwelling place of the soul. Man goeth to his long home, and the mourners go about the streets. Eccl. xii. 5. 6. (Baseball)  The home base; he started for home. At home.(a) At one's own house, or lodgings. (b) In one's own town or country; as, peace abroad and at home. (c) Prepared to receive callers. -- Home department, the department of executive administration, by which the internal affairs of a country are managed. [Eng.] To be at home on any subject, to be conversant or familiar with it. -- To feel at home, to be at one's ease. -- To make one's self at home, to conduct one's self with as much freedom as if at home. Syn. -- Tenement; house; dwelling; abode; domicile.  1. Of or pertaining to one's dwelling or country; domestic; not foreign; as home manufactures; home comforts. 2. Close; personal; pointed; as, a home thrust. Home base (Baseball), the base at which the batsman stands and which is the last goal in making a run. -- Home farm, grounds, etc., the farm, grounds, etc., adjacent to the residence of the owner. -- Home lot, an inclosed plot on which the owner's home stands. [U. S.] -- Home rule, rule or government of an appendent or dependent country, as to all local and internal legislation, by means of a governing power vested in the people within the country itself, in contradistinction to a government established by the dominant country; as, home rule in Ireland. Also used adjectively; as, home- rule members of Parliament. -- Home ruler, one who favors or advocates home rule. -- Home run (Baseball), a complete circuit of the bases made before the batted ball is returned to the home base. -- Home stretch (Sport.), that part of a race course between the last curve and the winning post. -- Home thrust, a well directed or effective thrust; one that wounds in a vital part; hence, in controversy, a personal attack.  1. To one's home or country; as in the phrases, go home, come home, carry home. 2. Close; closely. How home the charge reaches us, has been made out. South. They come home to men's business and bosoms. Bacon. 3. To the place where it belongs; to the end of a course; to the full length; as, to drive a nail home; to ram a cartridge home. Wear thy good rapier bare and put it home. Shak. Note: Home is often used in the formation of compound words, many of which need no special definition; as, home-brewed, home-built, home- grown, etc. To bring home. See under Bring. -- To come home.(a) To touch or affect personally. See under Come. (b) (Naut.) To drag toward the vessel, instead of holding firm, as the cable is shortened; -- said of an anchor. -- To haul home the sheets of a sail (Naut.), to haul the clews close to the sheave hole. Totten.
modern: 1. Of or pertaining to the present time, or time not long past; late; not ancient or remote in past time; of recent period; as, modern days, ages, or time; modern authors; modern fashions; modern taste; modern practice. Bacon. 2. New and common; trite; commonplace. [Obs.] We have our philosophical persons, to make modern and familiar, things supernatural and causeless. Shak. Modern English. See the Note under English.  A person of modern times; -- opposed to ancient. Pope.
sugar: 1. A sweet white (or brownish yellow) crystalline substance, of a sandy or granular consistency, obtained by crystallizing the evaporated juice of certain plants, as the sugar cane, sorghum, beet root, sugar maple, etc. It is used for seasoning and preserving many kinds of food and drink. Ordinary sugar is essentially sucrose. See the Note below. Note: The term sugar includes several commercial grades, as the white or refined, granulated, loaf or lump, and the raw brown or muscovado. In a more general sense, it includes several distinct chemical compounds, as the glucoses, or grape sugars (including glucose proper, dextrose, and levulose), and the sucroses, or true sugars (as cane sugar). All sugars are carbohydrates. See Carbohydrate. The glucoses, or grape sugars, are ketone alcohols of the formula C6H12O6, and they turn the plane of polarization to the right or the left. They are produced from the amyloses and sucroses, as by the action of heat and acids of ferments, and are themselves decomposed by fermentation into alcohol and carbon dioxide. The only sugar (called acrose) as yet produced artificially belongs to this class. The sucroses, or cane sugars, are doubled glucose anhydrides of the formula C12H22O11. They are usually not fermentable as such (cf. Sucrose), and they act on polarized light. 2. By extension, anything resembling sugar in taste or appearance; as, sugar of lead (lead acetate), a poisonous white crystalline substance having a sweet taste. 3. Compliment or flattery used to disguise or render acceptable something obnoxious; honeyed or soothing words. [Colloq.] Acorn sugar. See Quercite. -- Cane sugar, sugar made from the sugar cane; sucrose, or an isomeric sugar. See Sucrose. -- Diabetes, or Diabetic, sugar (Med. Chem.), a variety of sugar (probably grape sugar or dextrose) excreted in the urine in diabetes mellitus. -- Fruit sugar. See under Fruit, and Fructose. -- Grape sugar, a sirupy or white crystalline sugar (dextrose or glucose) found as a characteristic ingredient of ripe grapes, and also produced from many other sources. See Dextrose, and Glucose. -- Invert sugar. See under Invert. -- Malt sugar, a variety of sugar isomeric with sucrose, found in malt. See Maltose. -- Manna sugar, a substance found in manna, resembling, but distinct from, the sugars. See Mannite. -- Milk sugar, a variety of sugar characteristic of fresh milk, and isomeric with sucrose. See Lactose. -- Muscle sugar, a sweet white crystalline substance isomeric with, and formerly regarded to, the glucoses. It is found in the tissue of muscle, the heart, liver, etc. Called also heart sugar. See Inosite. -- Pine sugar. See Pinite. -- Starch sugar (Com. Chem.), a variety of dextrose made by the action of heat and acids on starch from corn, potatoes, etc.; -- called also potato sugar, corn sugar, and, inaccurately, invert sugar. See Dextrose, and Glucose. -- Sugar barek, one who refines sugar. -- Sugar beet (Bot.), a variety of beet (Beta vulgaris) with very large white roots, extensively grown, esp. in Europe, for the sugar obtained from them. -- Sugar berry (Bot.), the hackberry. -- Sugar bird (Zoöl.), any one of several species of small South American singing birds of the genera Coereba, Dacnis, and allied genera belonging to the family Coerebidæ. They are allied to the honey eaters. -- Sugar bush. See Sugar orchard. -- Sugar camp, a place in or near a sugar orchard, where maple sugar is made. -- Sugar candian, sugar candy. [Obs.] -- Sugar candy, sugar clarified and concreted or crystallized; candy made from sugar. -- Sugar cane (Bot.), a tall perennial grass (Saccharum officinarium), with thick short-jointed stems. It has been cultivated for ages as the principal source of sugar. -- Sugar loaf. (a) A loaf or mass of refined sugar, usually in the form of a truncated cone. (b) A hat shaped like a sugar loaf. Why, do not or know you, grannam, and that sugar loaf J. Webster. -- Sugar maple (Bot.), the rock maple (Acer saccharinum). See Maple. -- Sugar mill, a machine for pressing out the juice of the sugar cane, usually consisting of three or more rollers, between which the cane is passed. -- Sugar mite. (Zoöl.) (a) A small mite (Tyroglyphus sacchari), often found in great numbers in unrefined sugar. (b) The lepisma. -- Sugar of lead. See Sugar, 2, above. -- Sugar of milk. See under Milk. -- Sugar orchard, a collection of maple trees selected and preserved for purpose of obtaining sugar from them; -- called also, sometimes, sugar bush. [U.S.] Bartlett. -- Sugar pine (Bot.), an immense coniferous tree (Pinus Lambertiana) of California and Oregon, furnishing a soft and easily worked timber. The resinous exudation from the stumps, etc., has a sweetish taste, and has been used as a substitute for sugar. -- Sugar squirrel (Zoöl.), an Australian flying phalanger (Belideus sciureus), having a long bushy tail and a large parachute. It resembles a flying squirrel. See Illust. under Phlanger. -- Sugar tongs, small tongs, as of silver, used at table for taking lumps of sugar from a sugar bowl. -- Sugar tree. (Bot.) See Sugar maple, above.  In making maple sugar, to complete the process of boiling down the sirup till it is thick enough to crystallize; to approach or reach the state of granulation; -- with the preposition off. [Local, U.S.]  1. To impregnate, season, cover, or sprinkle with sugar; to mix sugar with. "When I sugar my liquor." G. Eliot. 2. To cover with soft words; to disguise by flattery; to compliment; to sweeten; as, to sugar reproof. With devotion's visage And pious action we do sugar o'er The devil himself. Shak.
experiment: 1. Atrial or special observation, made to confirm or disprove something doubtful; esp., one under conditions determined by the experimenter; an act or operation undertaken in order to discover some unknown principle or effect, or to test, establish, or illustrate some suggest or known truth; practical test; poof. A political experiment can not be made in a laboratory, not determinant in a few hours. J. Adams. 2. Experience. [Obs.] Adam, by sad experiment I know How little weight my words with thee can find. Milton.  To make experiment; to operate by test or trial; -- often with on, upon, or in, referring to the subject of an experiment; with, referring to the instrument; and by, referring to the means; as, to experiment upon electricity; he experimented in plowing with ponies, or by steam power.  , To try; to know, perceive, or prove, by trial experience. [Obs.] Sir T. Herbert.
danger: 1. Authority; jurisdiction; control. [Obs.] In dangerhad he . . . the young girls. Chaucer. 2. Power to harm; subjection or liability to penalty. [Obs.] See In one's danger, below. You stand within his danger, do you not Shak. Covetousness of gains hath brought [them] in dangerof this statute. Robynson (More's Utopia). 3. Exposure to injury, loss, pain, or other evil; peril; risk; insecurity. 4. Difficulty; sparingness. [Obs.] Chaucer. 5. Coyness; disdainful behavior. [Obs.] Chaucer. In one's danger, in one's power; liable to a penalty to be inflicted by him. [Obs.] This sense is retained in the proverb, "Out of debt out of danger." Those rich man in whose debt and danger they be not. Robynson (More's Utopia). -- To do danger, to cause danger. [Obs.] Shak. Syn. -- Peril; hazard; risk; jeopardy. -- Danger, Peril, Hazard, Risk, Jeopardy. Danger is the generic term, and implies some contingent evil in prospect. Peril is instant or impending danger; as, in peril of one's life. Hazard arises from something fortuitous or beyond our control; as, the hazard of the seas. Risk is doubtful or uncertain danger, often incurred voluntarily; as, to risk an engagement. Jeopardy is extreme danger. Danger of a contagious disease; the perils of shipwreck; the hazards of speculation; the risk of daring enterprises; a life brought into jeopardy.  To endanger. [Obs.] Shak.
front: 1. The forehead or brow, the part of the face above the eyes; sometimes, also, the whole face. Bless'd with his father's front, his mother's tongue. Pope. Grim-visaged war hath smoothed his wrinkled front. Shak. His front yet threatens, and his frowns command. Prior. 2. The forehead, countenance, or personal presence, as expressive of character or temper, and especially, of boldness of disposition, sometimes of impudence; seeming; as, a bold front; a hardened front. With smiling fronts encountering. Shak. The inhabitants showed a bold front. Macaulay. 3. The part or surface of anything which seems to look out, or to be directed forward; the fore or forward part; the foremost rank; the van; -- the opposite to back or rear; as, the front of a house; the front of an army. Had he his hurts before Ay, on the front. Shak. 4. A position directly before the face of a person, or before the foremost part of a thing; as, in front of un person, of the troops, or of a house. 5. The most conspicuous part. The very head and front of my offending. Shak. 6. That which covers the foremost part of the head: a front piece of false hair worn by women. Like any plain Miss Smith's, who wears s front. Mrs. Browning. 7. The beginning. "Summer's front." Shak. Bastioned front (Mil.), a curtain connerting two half bastions. -- Front door, the door in the front wall of a building, usually the principal entrance. -- Front of fortification, the works constructed upon any one side of a polygon. Farrow. -- Front of operations, all that part of the field of operations in front of the successive positions occupied by the army as it moves forward. Farrow. -- To come to the front, to attain prominence or leadership.  Of or relating to the front or forward part; having a position in front; foremost; as, a front view.  1. To oppose face to face; to oppose directly; to meet in a hostile manner. You four shall front them in the narrow lane. Shak. 2. To appear before; to meet. [Enid] daily fronted him In some fresh splendor. Tennyson. 3. To face toward; to have the front toward; to confront; as, the house fronts the street. And then suddenly front the changed reality. J. Morley. 4. To stand opposed or opposite to, or over against as, his house fronts the church. 5. To adorn in front; to supply a front to; as, to front a house with marble; to front a head with laurel. Yonder walls, that pertly front your town. Shak.  To have or turn the face or front in any direction; as, the house fronts toward the east.
sight: 1. The act of seeing; perception of objects by the eye; view; as, to gain sight of land. A cloud received him out of their sight. Acts. i. 9. 2. The power of seeing; the faculty of vision, or of perceiving objects by the instrumentality of the eyes. Thy sight is young, And thou shalt read when mine begin to dazzle. Shak. O loss of sight, of thee I most complain! Milton. 3. The state of admitting unobstructed vision; visibility; open view; region which the eye at one time surveys; space through which the power of vision extends; as, an object within sight. 4. A spectacle; a view; a show; something worth seeing. Moses said, I will now turn aside and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt. Ex. iii. 3. They never saw a sight so fair. Spenser. 5. The instrument of seeing; the eye. Why cloud they not their sights Shak. 6. Inspection; examination; as, a letter intended for the sight of only one person. 7. Mental view; opinion; judgment; as, in their sight it was harmless. Wake. That which is highly esteemed among men is abomination in the sight of God. Luke xvi. 15. 8. A small aperture through which objects are to be seen, and by which their direction is settled or ascertained; as, the sight of a quadrant. Thier eyes of fire sparking through sights of steel. Shak. 9. A small piece of metal, fixed or movable, on the breech, muzzle, center, or trunnion of a gun, or on the breech and the muzzle of a rifle, pistol, etc., by means of which the eye is guided in aiming. Farrow. 10. In a drawing, picture, etc., that part of the surface, as of paper or canvas, which is within the frame or the border or margin. In a frame or the like, the open space, the opening. 11. A great number, quantity, or sum; as, a sight of money. [Now colloquial] Note: Sight in this last sense was formerly employed in the best usage. "A sight of lawyers." Latimer. A wonder sight of flowers. Gower. At sight, as soon as seen, or presented to sight; as, a draft payable at sight: to read Greek at sight; to shoot a person at sight. -- Front sight (Firearms), the sight nearest the muzzle. -- Open sight. (Firearms) (a) A front sight through which the objects aimed at may be seen, in distinction from one that hides the object. (b) A rear sight having an open notch instead of an aperture. -- Peep sight, Rear sight. See under Peep, and Rear. -- Sight draft, an order, or bill of exchange, directing the payment of money at sight. -- To take sight, to take aim; to look for the purpose of directing a piece of artillery, or the like. Syn. -- Vision; view; show; spectacle; representation; exhibition.  1. To get sight of; to see; as, to sight land; to sight a wreck. Kane. 2. To look at through a sight; to see accurately; as, to sight an object, as a star. 3. To apply sights to; to adjust the sights of; also, to give the proper elevation and direction to by means of a sight; as, to sight a rifle or a cannon.  To take aim by a sight.
clean: 1. Free from dirt or filth; as, clean clothes. 2. Free from that which is useless or injurious; without defects; as, clean land; clean timber. 3. Free from awkwardness; not bungling; adroit; dexterous; as, aclean trick; a clean leap over a fence. 4. Free from errors and vulgarisms; as, a clean style. 5. Free from restraint or neglect; complete; entire. When ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make clean riddance of corners of thy field. Le 6. Free from moral defilement; sinless; pure. Create in me a clean heart, O God. Ps. li. 10 That I am whole, and clean, and meet for Heaven Tennyson. 7. (Script.)  Free from ceremonial defilement. 8. Free from that which is corrupting to the morals; pure in tone; healthy. "Lothair is clean." F. Harrison. 9. Well-proportioned; shapely; as, clean limbs. A clean bill of health, a certificate from the proper authrity that a ship is free from infection. -- Clean breach. See under Breach, n., 4. -- To make a clean breast. See under Breast.  1. Without limitation or remainder; quite; perfectly; wholly; entirely. "Domestic broils clean overblown." Shak. "Clean contrary." Milton. All the people were passed clean over Jordan. Josh. iii. 17. 2. Without miscarriage; not bunglingly; dexterously. [Obs.] "Pope came off clean with Homer." Henley.  To render clean; to free from whatever is foul, offensive, or extraneous; to purify; to cleanse. To clean out, to exhaust; to empty; to get away from (one) all his money. [Colloq.] De Quincey.
always: 1. At all times; ever; perpetually; throughout all time; continually; as, God is always the same. Even in Heaven his [Mammon's] looks and thoughts. Milton. 2. Constancy during a certain period, or regularly at stated intervals; invariably; uniformly; -- opposed to sometimes or occasionally. He always rides a black galloway. Bulwer.
prove: 1. To try or to ascertain by an experiment, or by a test or standard; to test; as, to prove the strength of gunpowder or of ordnance; to prove the contents of a vessel by a standard measure. Thou hast proved mine heart. Ps. xvii. 3. 2. To evince, establish, or ascertain, as truth, reality, or fact, by argument, testimony, or other evidence. They have inferred much from slender premises, and conjectured when they could not prove. J. H. Newman. 3. To ascertain or establish the genuineness or validity of; to verify; as, to prove a will. 4. To gain experience of the good or evil of; to know by trial; to experience; to suffer. Where she, captived long, great woes did prove. Spenser. 5. (Arith.)  To test, evince, ascertain, or verify, as the correctness of any operation or result; thus, in subtraction, if the difference between two numbers, added to the lesser number, makes a sum equal to the greater, the correctness of the subtraction is proved. 6. (Printing)  To take a trial impression of; to take a proof of; as, to prove a page. Syn. -- To try; verify; justify; confirm; establish; evince; manifest; show; demonstrate.  1. To make trial; to essay. 2. To be found by experience, trial, or result; to turn out to be; as, a medicine proves salutary; the report proves false. "The case proves mortal." Arbuthnot. So life a winter's morn may prove. Keble. 3. To succeed; to turn out as expected. [Obs.] "The experiment proved not." Bacon.
try: 1. To divide or separate, as one sort from another; to winnow; to sift; to pick out; -- frequently followed by out; as, to try out the wild corn from the good. [Obs.] Sir T. Elyot. 2. To purify or refine, as metals; to melt out, and procure in a pure state, as oil, tallow, lard, etc. Shak. The words of the Lord are pure words: as silver tried in a furnace of earth, purified seven times. Ps. xii. 6. For thou, O God, hast proved us: thou hast tried us, as silver is tried. Ps. lxvi. 10. 3. To prove by experiment; to apply a test to, for the purpose of determining the quality; to examine; to prove; to test; as, to try weights or measures by a standard; to try a man's opinions. Let the end try the man. Shak. 4. To subject to severe trial; to put to the test; to cause suffering or trouble to. Thus far to try thee, Adam, I was pleased. Milton. Thomas Paine (1776) 5. To experiment with; to test by use; as, to try a remedy for disease; to try a horse. Come, try upon yourselves what you have seen me. Shak. To ease her cares the force of sleep she tries. Swift. 6. To strain; to subject to excessive tests; as, the light tries his eyes; repeated disappointments try one's patience. 7. (Law)  To examine or investigate judicially; to examine by witnesses or other judicial evidence and the principles of law; as, to try a cause, or a criminal. 8. To settle; to decide; to determine; specifically, to decide by an appeal to arms; as, to try rival claims by a duel; to try conclusions. Left I the court, to see this quarrel tried. Shak. 9. To experience; to have or gain knowledge of by experience. Milton. Or try the Libyan heat or Scythian cold. Dryden. 10. To essay; to attempt; to endeavor. Let us try . . . to found a path. Milton. To try on. (a) To put on, as a garment, to ascertain whether it fits the person. (b) To attempt; to undertake. [Slang] Dickens. Syn. -- To attempt; endeavor; strive; aim; examine. -- Try, Attempt. To try is the generic, to attempt is the specific, term. When we try, we are usually uncertain as to success; when we attempt, we have always some definite object in view which we seek to accomplish. We may be indifferent as to the result of a trial, but we rarely attempt anything without a desire to succeed. He first deceased: she for a little tried To live without him; liked it not, and died. Sir H. Wotton. Alack, I am afraid they have a waked, And 't is not done. The attempt, and not the deed, Confounds us. Shak.  1. To exert strength; to endeavor; to make an effort or an attempt; as, you must try hard if you wish to learn. 2. To do; to fare; as, how do you try! [Prov. Eng.]  1. A screen, or sieve, for grain. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.] Holland. 2. Act of trying; attempt; experiment; trial. This breaking of his has been but a try for his friends. Shak. Try cock, a gauge cock. See under Gauge.  Refined; select; excellent; choice. [Obs.] "Sugar that is try." Chaucer.
direct: 1. Straight; not crooked, oblique, or circuitous; leading by the short or shortest way to a point or end; as, a direct line; direct means. What is direct to, what slides by, the question. Locke. 2. Straightforward; not of crooked ways, or swerving from truth and openness; sincere; outspoken. Be even and direct with me. Shak. 3. Immediate; express; plain; unambiguous. He howhere, that I know, says it in direct words. Locke. A direct and avowed interference with elections. Hallam. 4. In the line of descent; not collateral; as, a descendant in the direct line. 5. (Astron.)  In the direction of the general planetary motion, or from west to east; in the order of the signs; not retrograde; -- said of the motion of a celestial body. Direct action. (Mach.) See Direct-acting. -- Direct discourse (Gram.), the language of any one quoted without change in its form; as, he said "I can not come;" -- correlative to indirect discourse, in which there is change of form; as, he said that he could not come. They are often called respectively by their Latin names, oratio directa, and oratio obliqua. -- Direct evidence (Law), evidence which is positive or not inferential; -- opposed to circumstantial, or indirect, evidence. -- This distinction, however, is merely formal, since there is no direct evidence that is not circumstantial, or dependent on circumstances for its credibility. Wharton. -- Direct examination (Law), the first examination of a witness in the orderly course, upon the merits. Abbott. -- Direct fire (Mil.), fire, the direction of which is perpendicular to the line of troops or to the parapet aimed at. -- Direct process (Metal.), one which yields metal in working condition by a single process from the ore. Knight. -- Direct tax, a tax assessed directly on lands, etc., and polls, distinguished from taxes on merchandise, or customs, and from excise.  1. To arrange in a direct or straight line, as against a mark, or towards a goal; to point; to aim; as, to direct an arrow or a piece of ordnance. 2. To point out or show to (any one), as the direct or right course or way; to guide, as by pointing out the way; as, he directed me to the left-hand road. The Lord direct your into the love of God. 2 Thess. iii. 5. The next points to which I will direct your attention. Lubbock. 3. To determine the direction or course of; to cause to go on in a particular manner; to order in the way to a certain end; to regulate; to govern; as, to direct the affairs of a nation or the movements of an army. I will direct their work in truth. Is. lxi. 8. 4. To point out to with authority; to instruct as a superior; to order; as, he directed them to go. I 'll first direct my men what they shall do. Shak. 5. To put a direction or address upon; to mark with the name and residence of the person to whom anything is sent; to superscribe; as, to direct a letter. Syn. -- To guide; lead; conduct; dispose; manage; regulate; order; instruct; command.  To give direction; to point out a course; to act as guide. Wisdom is profitable to direct. Eccl. x. 10.  A character, thus [ Moore (Encyc. of Music).
ever: 1. At any time; at any period or point of time. No man ever yet hated his own flesh. Eph. v. 29. 2. At all times; through all time; always; forever. He shall ever love, and always be The subject of by scorn and cruelty. Dryder. 3. Without cessation; continually. Note: Ever is sometimes used as an intensive or a word of enforcement. "His the old man e'er a son" Shak. To produce as much as ever they can. M. Arnold. Ever and anon, now and then; often. See under Anon. -- Ever is one, continually; constantly. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Ever so, in whatever degree; to whatever extent; -- used to intensify indefinitely the meaning of the associated adjective or adverb. See Never so, under Never. "Let him be ever so rich." Emerson. And all the question (wrangle e'er so long), Is only this, if God has placed him wrong. Pope. You spend ever so much money in entertaining your equals and betters. Thackeray. -- For ever, eternally. See Forever. -- For ever and a day, emphatically forever. Shak. She [Fortune] soon wheeled away, with scornful laughter, out of sight for ever and day. Prof. Wilson. -- Or ever (for or ere), before. See Or, ere. [Archaic] Would I had met my dearest foe in heaven Or ever I had seen that day, Horatio! Shak. Note: Ever is sometimes joined to its adjective by a hyphen, but in most cases the hyphen is needless; as, ever memorable, ever watchful, ever burning.
company: 1. The state of being a companion or companions; the act of accompaying; fellowship; companionship; society; friendly intercourse. Shak. Evil company doth corrupt good manners. 1 Cor. xv. 33. (Rev. Ver. ). Brethren, farewell: your company along I will not wish. Milton. 2. A companion or companions. To thee and thy company I bid A hearty welcome. Shak. 3. An assemblage or association of persons, either permanent or transient. Thou shalt meet a company of prophets. 1 Sam. x. 5. 4. Guests or visitors, in distinction from the members of a family; as, to invite company to dine. 5. Society, in general; people assembled for social intercourse. Nature has left every man a capacity of being agreeable, though not of shining in company. Swift. 6. An association of persons for the purpose of carrying on some enterprise or business; a corporation; a firm; as, the East India Company; an insurance company; a joint-stock company. 7. Partners in a firm whose names are not mentioned in its style or title; -- often abbreviated in writing; as, Hottinguer & Co. 8. (Mil.)  A subdivision of a regiment of troops under the command of a captain, numbering in the United States (full strength) 100 men. 9. (Naut.)  The crew of a ship, including the officers; as, a whole ship's company. 10. The body of actors employed in a theater or in the production of a play. To keep company with. See under Keep, v. t. Syn. -- Assemblage; assembly; society; group; assembly; society; group; circle; crowd; troop; crew; gang; corporation; association; fraternity; guild; partnership; copartnery; union; club; party; gathering.  To accompany or go with; to be companion to. [Obs.]  1. To associate. Men which have companied with us all the time. Acts i. 21. 2. To be a gay companion. [Obs.] Spenser. 3. To have sexual commerce. [Obs.] Bp. Hall.
watch: 1. The act of watching; forbearance of sleep; vigil; wakeful, vigilant, or constantly observant attention; close observation; guard; preservative or preventive vigilance; formerly, a watching or guarding by night. Shepherds keeping watch by night. Milton. All the long night their mournful watch they keep. Addison. Note: Watch was formerly distinguished from ward, the former signifying a watching or guarding by night, and the latter a watching, guarding, or protecting by day Hence, they were not unfrequently used together, especially in the phrase to keep watch and ward, to denote continuous and uninterrupted vigilance or protection, or both watching and guarding. This distinction is now rarely recognized, watch being used to signify a watching or guarding both by night and by day, and ward, which is now rarely used, having simply the meaning of guard, or protection, without reference to time. Still, when she slept, he kept both watch and ward. Spenser. Ward, guard, or custodia, is chiefly applied to the daytime, in order to apprehend rioters, and robbers on the highway . . . Watch, is properly applicable to the night only, . . . and it begins when ward ends, and ends when that begins. Blackstone. 2. One who watches, or those who watch; a watchman, or a body of watchmen; a sentry; a guard. Pilate said unto them, Ye have a watch; go your way, make it as sure as ye can. Matt. xxvii. 65. 3. The post or office of a watchman; also, the place where a watchman is posted, or where a guard is kept. He upbraids Iago, that he made him Brave me upon the watch. Shak. 4. The period of the night during which a person does duty as a sentinel, or guard; the time from the placing of a sentinel till his relief; hence, a division of the night. I did stand my watch upon the hill. Shak. Might we but hear . . . Or whistle from the lodge, or village cock Count the night watches to his feathery dames. Milton. 5. A small timepiece, or chronometer, to be carried about the person, the machinery of which is moved by a spring. Note: Watches are often distinguished by the kind of escapement used, as an anchor watch, a lever watch, a chronometer watch, etc. (see the Note under Escapement, n., 3); also, by the kind of case, as a gold or silver watch, an open-faced watch, a hunting watch, or hunter, etc. 6. (Naut.) (a) An allotted portion of time, usually four hour for standing watch, or being on deck ready for duty. Cf. Dogwatch. (b) That part, usually one half, of the officers and crew, who together attend to the working of a vessel for an allotted time, usually four hours. The watches are designated as the port watch, and the starboard watch. Anchor watch (Naut.), a detail of one or more men who keep watch on deck when a vessel is at anchor. -- To be on the watch, to be looking steadily for some event. -- Watch and ward (Law), the charge or care of certain officers to keep a watch by night and a guard by day in towns, cities, and other districts, for the preservation of the public peace. Wharton. Burrill. -- Watch and watch (Naut.), the regular alternation in being on watch and off watch of the two watches into which a ship's crew is commonly divided. -- Watch barrel, the brass box in a watch, containing the mainspring. -- Watch bell (Naut.), a bell struck when the half-hour glass is run out, or at the end of each half hour. Craig. -- Watch bill (Naut.), a list of the officers and crew of a ship as divided into watches, with their stations. Totten. -- Watch case, the case, or outside covering, of a watch; also, a case for holding a watch, or in which it is kept. -- Watch chain. Same as watch guard, below. -- Watch clock, a watchman's clock; see under Watchman. -- Watch fire, a fire lighted at night, as a signal, or for the use of a watch or guard. -- Watch glass. (a) A concavo-convex glass for covering the face, or dial, of a watch; -- also called watch crystal. (b) (Naut.) A half- hour glass used to measure the time of a watch on deck.(Chem.) A round concavo-convex glass of shallow depth used for certain manipulations of chemicals in a laboratory. -- Watch guard, a chain or cord by which a watch is attached to the person. -- Watch gun (Naut.), a gun sometimes fired on shipboard at 8 p. m., when the night watch begins. -- Watch light, a low-burning lamp used by watchers at night; formerly, a candle having a rush wick. -- Watch night, The last night of the year; -- so called by the Methodists, Moravians, and others, who observe it by holding religious meetings lasting until after midnight. -- Watch paper, an old-fashioned ornament for the inside of a watch case, made of paper cut in some fanciful design, as a vase with flowers, etc. -- Watch tackle (Naut.), a small, handy purchase, consisting of a tailed double block, and a single block with a hook.  1. To be awake; to be or continue without sleep; to wake; to keep vigil. I have two nights watched with you. Shak. Couldest thou not watch one hour Mark xiv. 37. 2. To be attentive or vigilant; to give heed; to be on the lookout; to keep guard; to act as sentinel. Take ye heed, watch and pray. Mark xiii. 33. The Son gave signal high To the bright minister that watched. Milton. 3. To be expectant; to look with expectation; to wait; to seek opportunity. My soul waiteth for the Lord more than they that watch for the morning. Ps. cxxx. 6. 4. To remain awake with any one as nurse or attendant; to attend on the sick during the night; as, to watch with a man in a fever. 5. (Naut.)  To serve the purpose of a watchman by floating properly in its place; -- said of a buoy. To watch over, to be cautiously observant of; to inspect, superintend, and guard.  1. To give heed to; to observe the actions or motions of, for any purpose; to keep in view; not to lose from sight and observation; as, to watch the progress of a bill in the legislature. Saul also sent messengers unto David's house to watch him, and to slay him. 1 Sam. xix. 11 I must cool a little, and watch my opportunity. Landor. In lazy mood I watched the little circles die. Longfellow. 2. To tend; to guard; to have in keeping. And flaming ministers, to watch and tend Their earthy charge. Milton. Paris watched the flocks in the groves of Ida. Broome.
proper: 1. Belonging to one; one's own; individual. "His proper good" [i. e., his own possessions]. Chaucer. "My proper son." Shak. Now learn the difference, at your proper cost, Betwixt true valor and an empty boast. Dryden. 2. Belonging to the natural or essential constitution; peculiar; not common; particular; as, every animal has his proper instincts and appetites. Those high and peculiar attributes . . . which constitute our proper humanity. Coleridge. 3. Befitting one's nature, qualities, etc.; suitable in all respect; appropriate; right; fit; decent; as, water is the proper element for fish; a proper dress. The proper study of mankind is man. Pope. In Athens all was pleasure, mirth, and play, All proper to the spring, and sprightly May. Dryden. 4. Becoming in appearance; well formed; handsome. [Archaic] "Thou art a proper man." Chaucer. Moses . . . was hid three months of his parents, because they saw he was a proper child. Heb. xi. 23. 5. Pertaining to one of a species, but not common to the whole; not appellative; -- opposed to common; as, a proper name; Dublin is the proper name of a city. 6. Rightly so called; strictly considered; as, Greece proper; the garden proper. 7. (Her.)  Represented in its natural color; -- said of any object used as a charge. In proper, individually; privately. [Obs.] Jer. Taylor. -- Proper flower or corolla (Bot.), one of the single florets, or corollets, in an aggregate or compound flower. -- Proper fraction (Arith.) a fraction in which the numerator is less than the denominator. -- Proper nectary (Bot.), a nectary separate from the petals and other parts of the flower. -- Proper noun (Gram.), a name belonging to an individual, by which it is distinguished from others of the same class; -- opposed to Ant: common noun; as, John, Boston, America. -- Proper perianth or involucre (Bot.), that which incloses only a single flower. -- Proper receptacle (Bot.), a receptacle which supports only a single flower or fructification.  Properly; hence, to a great degree; very; as, proper good. [Colloq & Vulgar]
drop: 1. The quantity of fluid which falls in one small spherical mass; a liquid globule; a minim; hence, also, the smallest easily measured portion of a fluid; a small quantity; as, a drop of water. With minute drops from off the eaves. Milton. As dear to me as are the ruddy drops That visit my sad heart. Shak. That drop of peace divine. Keble. 2. That which resembles, or that which hangs like, a liquid drop; as a hanging diamond ornament, an earring, a glass pendant on a chandelier, a sugarplum (sometimes medicated), or a kind of shot or slug. 3. (Arch.) (a) Same as Gutta. (b) Any small pendent ornament. 4. Whatever is arranged to drop, hang, or fall from an elevated position; also, a contrivance for lowering something; as: (a) A door or platform opening downward; a trap door; that part of the gallows on which a culprit stands when he is to be hanged; hence, the gallows itself. (b) A machine for lowering heavy weights, as packages, coal wagons, etc., to a ship's deck. (c) A contrivance for temporarily lowering a gas jet. (d) A curtain which drops or falls in front of the stage of a theater, etc. (e) A drop press or drop hammer. (f) (Mach.) The distance of the axis of a shaft below the base of a hanger. 5. pl.  Any medicine the dose of which is measured by drops; as, lavender drops. 6. (Naut.)  The depth of a square sail; -- generally applied to the courses only. Ham. Nav. Encyc. 7. Act of dropping; sudden fall or descent. Ague drop, Black drop. See under Ague, Black. -- Drop by drop, in small successive quantities; in repeated portions. "Made to taste drop by drop more than the bitterness of death." Burke. -- Drop curtain. See Drop, n., 4. (d). -- Drop forging. (Mech.) (a) A forging made in dies by a drop hammer. (b) The process of making drop forgings. -- Drop hammer (Mech.), a hammer for forging, striking up metal, etc., the weight being raised by a strap or similar device, and then released to drop on the metal resting on an anvil or die. -- Drop kick (Football), a kick given to the ball as it rebounds after having been dropped from the hands. -- Drop lake, a pigment obtained from Brazil wood. Mollett. -- Drop letter, a letter to be delivered from the same office where posted. -- Drop press (Mech.), a drop hammer; sometimes, a dead-stroke hammer; -- also called drop. -- Drop scene, a drop curtain on which a scene is painted. See Drop, n., 4. (d). -- Drop seed. (Bot.) See the List under Glass. -- Drop serene. (Med.) See Amaurosis.  1. To pour or let fall in drops; to pour in small globules; to distill. "The trees drop balsam." Creech. The recording angel, as he wrote it down, dropped a tear upon the word and blotted it out forever. Sterne. 2. To cause to fall in one portion, or by one motion, like a drop; to let fall; as, to drop a line in fishing; to drop a courtesy. 3. To let go; to dismiss; to set aside; to have done with; to discontinue; to forsake; to give up; to omit. They suddenly drop't the pursuit. S. Sharp. That astonishing ease with which fine ladies drop you and pick you up again. Thackeray. The connection had been dropped many years. Sir W. Scott. Dropping the too rough H in Hell and Heaven. Tennyson. 4. To bestow or communicate by a suggestion; to let fall in an indirect, cautious, or gentle manner; as, to drop hint, a word of counsel, etc. 5. To lower, as a curtain, or the muzzle of a gun, etc. 6. To send, as a letter; as, please drop me a line, a letter, word. 7. To give birth to; as, to drop a lamb. 8. To cover with drops; to variegate; to bedrop. Show to the sun their waved coats dropped with gold. Milton. To drop a vessel (Naut.), to leave it astern in a race or a chase; to outsail it.  1. To fall in drops. The kindly dew drops from the higher tree, And wets the little plants that lowly dwell. Spenser. 2. To fall, in general, literally or figuratively; as, ripe fruit drops from a tree; wise words drop from the lips. Mutilations of which the meaning has dropped out of memory. H. Spencer. When the sound of dropping nuts is heard. Bryant. 3. To let drops fall; to discharge itself in drops. The heavens . . . dropped at the presence of God. Ps. lxviii. 8. 4. To fall dead, or to fall in death. Nothing, says Seneca, so soon reconciles us to the thoughts of our own death, as the prospect of one friend after another dropping round us. Digby. 5. To come to an end; to cease; to pass out of mind; as, the affair dropped. Pope. 6. To come unexpectedly; -- with in or into; as, my old friend dropped in a moment. Steele. Takes care to drop in when he thinks you are just seated. Spectator. 7. To fall or be depressed; to lower; as, the point of the spear dropped a little. 8. To fall short of a mark. [R.] Often it drops or overshoots by the disproportion of distance. Collier. 9. To be deep in extent; to descend perpendicularly; as, her main topsail drops seventeen yards. To drop astern (Naut.), to go astern of another vessel; to be left behind; to slacken the speed of a vessel so as to fall behind and to let another pass a head. -- To drop down (Naut.), to sail, row, or move down a river, or toward the sea. -- To drop off, to fall asleep gently; also, to die. [Colloq.]
laugh: 1. To show mirth, satisfaction, or derision, by peculiar movement of the muscles of the face, particularly of the mouth, causing a lighting up of the face and eyes, and usually accompanied by the emission of explosive or chuckling sounds from the chest and throat; to indulge in laughter. Queen Hecuba laughed that her eyes ran o'er. Shak. He laugheth that winneth. Heywood's Prov. 2. Fig.: To be or appear gay, cheerful, pleasant, mirthful, lively, or brilliant; to sparkle; to sport. Then laughs the childish year, with flowerets crowned. Dryden. In Folly's cup still laughs the bubble Joy. Pope. To laugh at, to make an object of laughter or ridicule; to make fun of; to deride. No wit to flatter left of all his store, No fool to laugh at, which he valued more. Pope. -- To laugh in the sleeve, to laugh secretly, or so as not to be observed, especially while apparently preserving a grave or serious demeanor toward the person or persons laughed at. -- To laugh out, to laugh in spite of some restraining influence; to laugh aloud. -- To laugh out of the other corner (or side) of the mouth, to weep or cry; to feel regret, vexation, or disappointment after hilarity or exaltation. [Slang]  1. To affect or influence by means of laughter or ridicule. Will you laugh me asleep, for I am very heavy Shak. I shall laugh myself to death. Shak. 2. To express by, or utter with, laughter; -- with out. From his deep chest laughs out a loud applause. Shak. To laugh away. (a) To drive away by laughter; as, to laugh away regret. (b) To waste in hilarity. "Pompey doth this day laugh away his fortune." Shak. -- To laugh down. (a) To cause to cease or desist by laughter; as, to laugh down a speaker. (b) To cause to be given up on account of ridicule; as, to laugh down a reform. -- To laugh one out of, to cause one by laughter or ridicule to abandon or give up; as, to laugh one out of a plan or purpose. -- To laugh to scorn, to deride; to treat with mockery, contempt, and scorn; to despise.  An expression of mirth peculiar to the human species; the sound heard in laughing; laughter. See Laugh, v. i. And the loud laugh that spoke the vacant mind. Goldsmith. That man is a bad man who has not within him the power of a hearty laugh. F. W. Robertson.
enemy: One hostile to another; one who hates, and desires or attempts the injury of, another; a foe; an adversary; as, an enemy of or to a person; an enemy to truth, or to falsehood. To all good he enemy was still. Spenser. I say unto you, Love your enemies. Matt. v. 44. The enemy (Mil.), the hostile force. In this sense it is construed with the verb and pronoun either in the singular or the plural, but more commonly in the singular; as, we have met the enemy and he is ours or they are ours. It was difficult in such a country to track the enemy. It was impossible to drive him to bay. Macaulay. Syn. -- Foe; antagonist; opponent. See Adversary.  Hostile; inimical. [Obs.] They . . . every day grow more enemy to God. Jer. Taylor.
the: See Thee. [Obs.] Chaucer. Milton.  A word placed before nouns to limit or individualize their meaning. Note: The was originally a demonstrative pronoun, being a weakened form of that. When placed before adjectives and participles, it converts them into abstract nouns; as, the sublime and the beautiful. Burke. The is used regularly before many proper names, as of rivers, oceans, ships, etc.; as, the Nile, the Atlantic, the Great Eastern, the West Indies, The Hague. The with an epithet or ordinal number often follows a proper name; as, Alexander the Great; Napoleon the Third. The may be employed to individualize a particular kind or species; as, the grasshopper shall be a burden. Eccl. xii. 5.  By that; by how much; by so much; on that account; -- used before comparatives; as, the longer we continue in sin, the more difficult it is to reform. "Yet not the more cease I." Milton. So much the rather thou, Celestial Light, Shine inward, and the mind through all her powers Irradiate. Milton.
three: One more than two; two and one. "I offer thee three things." 2 Sam. xxiv. 12. Three solemn aisles approach the shrine. Keble. Note: Three is often joined with other words, forming compounds signifying divided into, composed of, or containing, three parts, portions, organs, or the like; as, three-branched, three-capsuled, three-celled, three-cleft, three-edged, three-foot, three-footed, three-forked, three-grained, three-headed, three-legged, three- mouthed, three-nooked, three-petaled, three-pronged, three-ribbed, three-seeded, three-stringed, three-toed, and the like.  1. The number greater by a unit than two; three units or objects. 2. A symbol representing three units, as 3 or iii. Rule of three. (Arith.) See under Rule, n.
get: Jet, the mineral. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. Fashion; manner; custom. [Obs.] Chaucer. 2. Artifice; contrivance. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. To procure; to obtain; to gain possession of; to acquire; to earn; to obtain as a price or reward; to come by; to win, by almost any means; as, to get favor by kindness; to get wealth by industry and economy; to get favor by kindness; to get wealth by industry and economy; to get land by purchase, etc. 2. Hence, with have and had, to come into or be in possession of; to have. Johnson. Thou hast got the face of man. Herbert. 3. To beget; to procreate; to generate. I had rather to adopt a child than get it. Shak. 4. To obtain mental possession of; to learn; to commit to memory; to memorize; as to get a lesson; also with out; as, to get out one's Greek lesson. It being harder with him to get one sermon by heart, than to pen twenty. Bp. Fell. 5. To prevail on; to induce; to persuade. Get him to say his prayers. Shak. 6. To procure to be, or to cause to be in any state or condition; -- with a following participle. Those things I bid you do; get them dispatched. Shak. 7. To betake; to remove; -- in a reflexive use. Get thee out from this land. Gen. xxxi. 13. He . . . got himself . . . to the strong town of Mega. Knolles. Note: Get, as a transitive verb, is combined with adverbs implying motion, to express the causing to, or the effecting in, the object of the verb, of the kind of motion indicated by the preposition; thus, to get in, to cause to enter, to bring under shelter; as, to get in the hay; to get out, to make come forth, to extract; to get off, to take off, to remove; to get together, to cause to come together, to collect. To get by heart, to commit to memory. -- To get the better of, To get the best of, to obtain an advantage over; to surpass; to subdue. -- To get up, to cause to be established or to exit; to prepare; to arrange; to construct; to invent; as, to get up a celebration, a machine, a book, an agitation. Syn. -- To obtain; gain; win; acquire. See Obtain.  1. To make acquisition; to gain; to profit; to receive accessions; to be increased. We mourn, France smiles; we lose, they daily get. Shak. 2. To arrive at, or bring one's self into, a state, condition, or position; to come to be; to become; -- with a following adjective or past participle belonging to the subject of the verb; as, to get sober; to get awake; to get beaten; to get elected. To get rid of fools and scoundrels. Pope. His chariot wheels get hot by driving fast. Coleridge. Note: It [get] gives to the English language a middle voice, or a power of verbal expression which is neither active nor passive. Thus we say to get acquitted, beaten, confused, dressed. Earle. Note: Get, as an intransitive verb, is used with a following preposition, or adverb of motion, to indicate, on the part of the subject of the act, movement or action of the kind signified by the preposition or adverb; or, in the general sense, to move, to stir, to make one's way, to advance, to arrive, etc.; as, to get away, to leave to escape; to disengage one's self from; to get down, to descend, esp. with effort, as from a literal or figurative elevation; to get along, to make progress; hence, to prosper, succeed, or fare; to get in, to enter; to get out, to extricate one's self, to escape; to get through, to traverse; also, to finish, to be done; to get to, to arrive at, to reach; to get off, to alight, to descend from, to dismount; also, to escape, to come off clear; to get together, to assemble, to convene. To get ahead, to advance; to prosper. -- To get along, to proceed; to advance; to prosper. -- To get a mile (or other distance), to pass over it in traveling. -- To get among, to go or come into the company of; to become one of a number. -- To get asleep, to fall asleep. -- To get astray, to wander out of the right way. -- To get at, to reach; to make way to. To get away with, to carry off; to capture; hence, to get the better of; to defeat. -- To get back, to arrive at the place from which one departed; to return. -- To get before, to arrive in front, or more forward. -- To get behind, to fall in the rear; to lag. -- To get between, to arrive between. -- To get beyond, to pass or go further than; to exceed; to surpass. "Three score and ten is the age of man, a few get beyond it." Thackeray. -- To get clear, to disengage one's self; to be released, as from confinement, obligation, or burden; also, to be freed from danger or embarrassment. -- To get drunk, to become intoxicated. -- To get forward, to proceed; to advance; also, to prosper; to advance in wealth. -- To get home, to arrive at one's dwelling, goal, or aim. -- To get into. (a) To enter, as, "she prepared to get into the coach." Dickens. (b) To pass into, or reach; as, " as, " a language has got into the inflated state." Keary. -- To get loose or free, to disengage one's self; to be released from confinement. -- To get near, to approach within a small distance. -- To get on, to proceed; to advance; to prosper. -- To get over. (a) To pass over, surmount, or overcome, as an obstacle or difficulty. (b) To recover from, as an injury, a calamity. -- To get through. (a) To pass through something. (b) To finish what one was doing. -- To get up. (a) To rise; to arise, as from a bed, chair, etc. (b) To ascend; to climb, as a hill, a tree, a flight of stairs, etc.  Offspring; progeny; as, the get of a stallion.
day: 1. The time of light, or interval between one night and the next; the time between sunrise and sunset, or from dawn to darkness; hence, the light; sunshine. 2. The period of the earth's revolution on its axis. -- ordinarily divided into twenty-four hours. It is measured by the interval between two successive transits of a celestial body over the same meridian, and takes a specific name from that of the body. Thus, if this is the sun, the day (the interval between two successive transits of the sun's center over the same meridian) is called a solar day; if it is a star, a sidereal day; if it is the moon, a lunar day. See Civil day, Sidereal day, below. 3. Those hours, or the daily recurring period, allotted by usage or law for work. 4. A specified time or period; time, considered with reference to the existence or prominence of a person or thing; age; time. A man who was great among the Hellenes of his day. Jowett (Thucyd. ) If my debtors do not keep their day, . . . I must with patience all the terms attend. Dryden. 5. (Preceded by the) Some day in particular, as some day of contest, some anniversary, etc. The field of Agincourt, Fought on the day of Crispin Crispianus. Shak. His name struck fear, his conduct won the day. Roscommon. Note: Day is much used in self-explaining compounds; as, daybreak, daylight, workday, etc. Anniversary day. See Anniversary, n. -- Astronomical day, a period equal to the mean solar day, but beginning at noon instead of at midnight, its twenty-four hours being numbered from 1 to 24; also, the sidereal day, as that most used by astronomers. -- Born days. See under Born. -- Canicular days. See Dog day. -- Civil day, the mean solar day, used in the ordinary reckoning of time, and among most modern nations beginning at mean midnight; its hours are usually numbered in two series, each from 1 to 12. This is the period recognized by courts as constituting a day. The Babylonians and Hindoos began their day at sunrise, the Athenians and Jews at sunset, the ancient Egyptians and Romans at midnight. -- Day blindness. (Med.) See Nyctalopia. -- Day by day, or Day after day, daily; every day; continually; without intermission of a day. See under By. "Day by day we magnify thee." Book of Common Prayer. -- Days in bank (Eng. Law), certain stated days for the return of writs and the appearance of parties; -- so called because originally peculiar to the Court of Common Bench, or Bench (bank) as it was formerly termed. Burrill. -- Day in court, a day for the appearance of parties in a suit. -- Days of devotion (R. C. Ch.), certain festivals on which devotion leads the faithful to attend mass. Shipley. -- Days of grace. See Grace. -- Days of obligation (R. C. Ch.), festival days when it is obligatory on the faithful to attend Mass. Shipley. -- Day owl, (Zoöl.), an owl that flies by day. See Hawk owl. -- Day rule (Eng. Law), an order of court (now abolished) allowing a prisoner, under certain circumstances, to go beyond the prison limits for a single day. -- Day school, one which the pupils attend only in daytime, in distinction from a boarding school. -- Day sight. (Med.) See Hemeralopia. -- Day's work (Naut.), the account or reckoning of a ship's course for twenty-four hours, from noon to noon. -- From day to day, as time passes; in the course of time; as, he improves from day to day. -- Jewish day, the time between sunset and sunset. -- Mean solar day (Astron.), the mean or average of all the apparent solar days of the year. -- One day, One of these days, at an uncertain time, usually of the future, rarely of the past; sooner or later. "Well, niece, I hope to see you one day fitted with a husband." Shak. -- Only from day to day, without certainty of continuance; temporarily. Bacon. -- Sidereal day, the interval between two successive transits of the first point of Aries over the same meridian. The Sidereal day is 23 h. 56 m. 4.09 s. of mean solar time. -- To win the day, to gain the victory, to be successful. S. Butler. -- Week day, any day of the week except Sunday; a working day. -- Working day. (a) A day when work may be legally done, in distinction from Sundays and legal holidays. (b) The number of hours, determined by law or custom, during which a workman, hired at a stated price per day, must work to be entitled to a day's pay.
are: The present indicative plural of the substantive verb to be; but etymologically a different word from be, or was. Am, art, are, and is, all come from the root as.  The unit of superficial measure, being a square of which each side is ten meters in length; 100 square meters, or about 119.6 square yards.
good: 1. Possessing desirable qualities; adapted to answer the end designed; promoting success, welfare, or happiness; serviceable; useful; fit; excellent; admirable; commendable; not bad, corrupt, evil, noxious, offensive, or troublesome, etc. And God saw everything that he had made, and behold, it was very good. Gen. i. 31. Good company, good wine, good welcome. Shak. 2. Possessing moral excellence or virtue; virtuous; pious; religious; -- said of persons or actions. In all things showing thyself a pattern of good works. Tit. ii. 7. 3. Kind; benevolent; humane; merciful; gracious; polite; propitious; friendly; well-disposed; -- often followed by to or toward, also formerly by unto. The men were very good unto us. 1 Sam. xxv. 15. 4. Serviceable; suited; adapted; suitable; of use; to be relied upon; -- followed especially by for. All quality that is good for anything is founded originally in merit. Collier. 5. Clever; skillful; dexterous; ready; handy; -- followed especially by at. He . . . is a good workman; a very good tailor. Shak. Those are generally good at flattering who are good for nothing else. South. 6. Adequate; sufficient; competent; sound; not fallacious; valid; in a commercial sense, to be depended on for the discharge of obligations incurred; having pecuniary ability; of unimpaired credit. My reasons are both good and weighty. Shak. My meaning in saying he is a good man is . . . that he is sufficient . . . I think I may take his bond. Shak. 7. Real; actual; serious; as in the phrases in good earnest; in good sooth. Love no man in good earnest. Shak. 8. Not small, insignificant, or of no account; considerable; esp., in the phrases a good deal, a good way, a good degree, a good share or part, etc. 9. Not lacking or deficient; full; complete. Good measure, pressed down, and shaken together, and running over. Luke vi. 38. 10. Not blemished or impeached; fair; honorable; unsullied; as in the phrases a good name, a good report, good repute, etc. A good name is better than precious ointment. Eccl. vii. 1. As good as. See under As. -- For good, or For good and all, completely and finally; fully; truly. The good woman never died after this, till she came to die for good and all. L'Estrange. -- Good breeding, polite or polished manners, formed by education; a polite education. Distinguished by good humor and good breeding. Macaulay. -- Good cheap, literally, good bargain; reasonably cheap. -- Good consideration (Law). (a) A consideration of blood or of natural love and affection. Blackstone. (b) A valuable consideration, or one which will sustain a contract. -- Good fellow, a person of companionable qualities. [Familiar] -- Good folk, or Good people, fairies; brownies; pixies, etc. [Colloq. Eng. & Scot.] -- Good for nothing. (a) Of no value; useless; worthless. (b) Used substantively, an idle, worthless person. My father always said I was born to be a good for nothing. Ld. Lytton. -- Good Friday, the Friday of Holy Week, kept in some churches as a fast, in memoory of our Savior's passion or suffering; the anniversary of the crucifixion. -- Good humor, or Good-humor, a cheerful or pleasant temper or state of mind. -- Good nature, or Good-nature, habitual kindness or mildness of temper or disposition; amiability; state of being in good humor. The good nature and generosity which belonged to his character. Macaulay. The young count's good nature and easy persuadability were among his best characteristics. Hawthorne. -- Good people. See Good folk (above). -- Good speed, good luck; good success; godspeed; -- an old form of wishing success. See Speed. -- Good turn, an act of kidness; a favor. -- Good will. (a) Benevolence; well wishing; kindly feeling. (b) (Law) The custom of any trade or business; the tendency or inclination of persons, old customers and others, to resort to an established place of business; the advantage accruing from tendency or inclination. The good will of a trade is nothing more than the probability that the old customers will resort to the old place. Lord Eldon. -- In good time. (a) Promptly; punctually; opportunely; not too soon nor too late. (b) (Mus.) Correctly; in proper time. -- To hold good, to remain true or valid; to be operative; to remain in force or effect; as, his promise holds good; the condition still holds good. -- To make good, to fulfill; to establish; to maintain; to supply (a defect or deficiency); to indemmify; to prove or verify (an accusation); to prove to be blameless; to clear; to vindicate. Each word made good and true. Shak. Of no power to make his wishes good. Shak. I . . . would by combat make her good. Shak. Convenient numbers to make good the city. Shak. -- To think good, to approve; to be pleased or satisfied with; to consider expedient or proper. If ye think good, give me my price; and if not, forbear. Zech. xi. 12. Note: Good, in the sense of wishing well, is much used in greeting and leave-taking; as, good day, good night, good evening, good morning, etc.  1. That which possesses desirable qualities, promotes success, welfare, or happiness, is serviceable, fit, excellent, kind, benevolent, etc.; -- opposed to evil. There be many that say, Who will show us any good Ps. iv. 6. 2. Advancement of interest or happiness; welfare; prosperity; advantage; benefit; -- opposed to harm, etc. The good of the whole community can be promoted only by advancing the good of each of the members composing it. Jay. 3. pl.  Wares; commodities; chattels; -- formerly used in the singular in a collective sense. In law, a comprehensive name for almost all personal property as distinguished from land or real property. Wharton. He hath made us spend much good. Chaucer. Thy lands and goods Are, by the laws of Venice, confiscate Unto the state of Venice. Shak. Dress goods, Dry goods, etc. See in the Vocabulary. -- Goods engine, a freight locomotive. [Eng.] -- Goods train, a freight train. [Eng.] -- Goods wagon, a freight car [Eng.] See the Note under Car, n., 2.  Well, -- especially in the phrase as good, with a following as expressed or implied; equally well with as much advantage or as little harm as possible. As good almost kill a man as kill a good book. Milton. As good as, in effect; virtually; the same as. They who counsel ye to such a suppressing, do as good as bid ye suppress yourselves. Milton.  1. To make good; to turn to good. [Obs.] 2. To manure; to improve. [Obs.] Bp. Hall.
paint: 1. To cover with coloring matter; to apply paint to; as, to paint a house, a signboard, etc. Jezebel painted her face and tired her head. 2 Kings ix. 30. 2. Fig.: To color, stain, or tinge; to adorn or beautify with colors; to diversify with colors. Not painted with the crimson spots of blood. Shak. Cuckoo buds of yellow hue Do paint the meadows with delight. Shak. 3. To form in colors a figure or likeness of on a flat surface, as upon canvas; to represent by means of colors or hues; to exhibit in a tinted image; to portray with paints; as, to paint a portrait or a landscape. 4. Fig.: To represent or exhibit to the mind; to describe vividly; to delineate; to image; to depict. Disloyal The word is too good to paint out her wickedness. Shak. If folly grow romantic, I must paint it. Pope. Syn. -- To color; picture; depict; portray; delineate; sketch; draw; describe.  1. To practice the art of painting; as, the artist paints well. 2. To color one's face by way of beautifying it. Let her paint an inch thick. Shak.  1. (a) A pigment or coloring substance. (b) The same prepared with a vehicle, as oil, water with gum, or the like, for application to a surface. 2. A cosmetic; rouge. Praed.
low: , strong imp. of Laugh. Chaucer.  To make the calling sound of cows and other bovine animals; to moo. The lowing herd wind slowly o'er the lea. Gray.  The calling sound ordinarily made by cows and other bovine animals. Talking voices and the law of herds. Wordsworth.  A hill; a mound; a grave. [Obs. except in place names.] Skeat.  Fire; a flame; a light. [Scot. & Prov. Eng.]  To burn; to blaze. [Prov. Eng. & Scot.] Burns.  1. Occupying an inferior position or place; not high or elevated; depressed in comparison with something else; as, low ground; a low flight. 2. Not rising to the usual height; as, a man of low stature; a low fence. 3. Near the horizon; as, the sun is low at four o'clock in winter, and six in summer. 4. Sunk to the farthest ebb of the tide; as, low tide. 5. Beneath the usual or remunerative rate or amount, or the ordinary value; moderate; cheap; as, the low price of corn; low wages. 6. Not loud; as, a low voice; a low sound. 7. (Mus.)  Depressed in the scale of sounds; grave; as, a low pitch; a low note. 8. (Phon.)  Made, as a vowel, with a low position of part of the tongue in relation to the palate; as, . See Guide to Pronunciation, §§ 5, 10, 11. 9. Near, or not very distant from, the equator; as, in the low northern latitudes. 10. Numerically small; as, a low number. 11. Wanting strength or animation; depressed; dejected; as, low spirits; low in spirits. 12. Depressed in condition; humble in rank; as, men of low condition; the lower classes. Why but to keep ye low and ignorant Milton. 13. Mean; vulgar; base; dishonorable; as, a person of low mind; a low trick or stratagem. 14. Not elevated or sublime; not exalted or diction; as, a low comparison. In comparison of these divine writers, the noblest wits of the heathen world are low and dull. Felton. 15. Submissive; humble. "Low reverence." Milton. 16. Deficient in vital energy; feeble; weak; as, a low pulse; made low by sickness. 17. Moderate; not intense; not inflammatory; as, low heat; a low temperature; a low fever. 18. Smaller than is reasonable or probable; as, a low estimate. 19. Not rich, high seasoned, or nourishing; plain; simple; as, a low diet. Note: Low is often used in the formation of compounds which require no special explanation; as, low-arched, low- browed, low-crowned, low-heeled, low-lying, low-priced, low-roofed, low-toned, low-voiced, and the like. Low Church. See High Church, under High. -- Low Countries, the Netherlands. -- Low German, Low Latin, etc. See under German, Latin, etc. -- Low life, humble life. -- Low milling, a process of making flour from grain by a single grinding and by siftings. -- Low relief. See Bas-relief. -- Low side window (Arch.), a peculiar form of window common in mediæval churches, and of uncertain use. Windows of this sort are narrow, near the ground, and out of the line of the windows, and in many different situations in the building. -- Low spirits, despondency. -- Low steam, steam having a low pressure. -- Low steel, steel which contains only a small proportion of carbon, and can not be hardened greatly by sudden cooling. -- Low Sunday, the Sunday next after Easter; -- popularly so called. -- Low tide, the farthest ebb of the tide; the tide at its lowest point; low water. -- Low water. (a) The lowest point of the ebb tide; a low stage of the in a river, lake, etc. (b) (Steam Boiler) The condition of an insufficient quantity of water in the boiler. -- Low water alarm or indicator (Steam Boiler), a contrivance of various forms attached to a boiler for giving warning when the water is low. -- Low water mark, that part of the shore to which the waters recede when the tide is the lowest. Bouvier. -- Low wine, a liquor containing about 20 percent of alcohol, produced by the first distillation of wash; the first run of the still; -- often in the plural.  The lowest trump, usually the deuce; the lowest trump dealt or drawn.  1. In a low position or manner; not aloft; not on high; near the ground. 2. Under the usual price; at a moderate price; cheaply; as, he sold his wheat low. 3. In a low mean condition; humbly; meanly. 4. In time approaching our own. In that part of the world which was first inhabited, even as low down as Abraham's time, they wandered with their flocks and herds. Locke. 5. With a low voice or sound; not loudly; gently; as, to speak low. Addison. The . . . odorous wind Breathes low between the sunset and the moon. Tennyson. 6. With a low musical pitch or tone. Can sing both high and low. Shak. 7. In subjection, poverty, or disgrace; as, to be brought low by oppression, by want, or by vice. Spenser. 8. (Astron.)  In a path near the equator, so that the declination is small, or near the horizon, so that the altitude is small; -- said of the heavenly bodies with reference to the diurnal revolution; as, the moon runs low, that is, is comparatively near the horizon when on or near the meridian.  To depress; to lower. [Obs.] Swift.
exercise: 1. The act of exercising; a setting in action or practicing; employment in the proper mode of activity; exertion; application; use; habitual activity; occupation, in general; practice. exercise of the important function confided by the constitution to the legislature. Jefferson. O we will walk this world, Yoked in all exercise of noble end. Tennyson. 2. Exertion for the sake of training or improvement whether physical, intellectual, or moral; practice to acquire skill, knowledge, virtue, perfectness, grace, etc. "Desire of knightly exercise." Spenser. An exercise of the eyes and memory. Locke. 3. Bodily exertion for the sake of keeping the organs and functions in a healthy state; hygienic activity; as, to take exercise ob horseback. The wise for cure on exercise depend. Dryden. 4. The performance of an office, a ceremony, or a religious duty. Lewis refused even those of the church of England . . . the public exercise of their religion. Addison. To draw him from his holy exercise. Shak. 5. That which is done for the sake of exercising, practicing, training, or promoting skill, health, mental, improvement, moral discipline, etc.; that which is assigned or prescribed for such ebbs; hence, a disquisition; a lesson; a task; as, military or naval exercises; musical exercises; an exercise in composition. The clumsy exercises of the European tourney. Prescott. He seems to have taken a degree, and preformed public exercises in Cambridge, in 1565. Brydges. 6. That which gives practice; a trial; a test. Patience is more oft the exercise Of saints, the trial of their fortitude. Milton. Exercise bone (Med.), a deposit of bony matter in the soft tissues, produced by pressure or exertion.  1. To set in action; to cause to act, move, or make exertion; to give employment to; to put in action habitually or constantly; to school or train; to exert repeatedly; to busy. Herein do I Exercise myself, to have always a conscience void of offence. Acts xxiv. 16. 2. To exert for the sake of training or improvement; to practice in order to develop; hence, also, to improve by practice; to discipline, and to use or to for the purpose of training; as, to exercise arms; to exercise one's self in music; to exercise troops. About him exercised heroic games The unarmed youth. Milton. 3. To occupy the attention and effort of; to task; to tax, especially in a painful or vexatious manner; harass; to vex; to worry or make anxious; to affect; to discipline; as, exercised with pain. Where pain of unextinguishable fire Must exercise us without hope of end. Milton. 4. To put in practice; to carry out in action; to perform the duties of; to use; to employ; to practice; as, to exercise authority; to exercise an office. I am the Lord which exercise loving-kindness, judgment, and righteousness in the earth. Jer. ix. 24. The people of the land have used oppression and exercised robbery. Ezek. xxii. 29.  To exercise one's self, as under military training; to drill; to take exercise; to use action or exertion; to practice gymnastics; as, to exercise for health or amusement. I wear my trusty sword, When I do exercise. Cowper.
sharp: 1. Having a very thin edge or fine point; of a nature to cut or pierce easily; not blunt or dull; keen. He dies upon my scimeter's sharp point. Shak. 2. Terminating in a point or edge; not obtuse or rounded; somewhat pointed or edged; peaked or ridged; as, a sharp hill; sharp features. 3. Affecting the sense as if pointed or cutting, keen, penetrating, acute: to the taste or smell, pungent, acid, sour, as ammonia has a sharp taste and odor; to the hearing, piercing, shrill, as a sharp sound or voice; to the eye, instantaneously brilliant, dazzling, as a sharp flash. 4. (Mus.) (a) High in pitch; acute; as, a sharp note or tone. (b) Raised a semitone in pitch; as, C sharp (C#), which is a half step, or semitone, higher than C. (c) So high as to be out of tune, or above true pitch; as, the tone is sharp; that instrument is sharp. Opposed in all these senses to Ant: flat. 5. Very trying to the feelings; pierching; keen; severe; painful; distressing; as, sharp pain, weather; a sharp and frosty air. Sharp misery had worn him to the bones. Shak. The morning sharp and clear. Cowper. In sharpest perils faithful proved. Keble. 6. Cutting in language or import; biting; sarcastic; cruel; harsh; rigorous; severe; as, a sharp rebuke. "That sharp look." Tennyson. To that place the sharp Athenian law Can not pursue us. Shak. Be thy words severe, Sharp as merits but the sword forbear. Dryden. 7. Of keen perception; quick to discern or distinguish; having nice discrimination; acute; penetrating; sagacious; clever; as, a sharp eye; sharp sight, hearing, or judgment. Nothing makes men sharper . . . than want. Addison. Many other things belong to the material world, wherein the sharpest philosophers have never yeL. Watts. 8. Eager in pursuit; keen in quest; impatient for gratification; keen; as, a sharp appetite. 9. Fierce; ardent; fiery; violent; impetuous. "In sharp contest of battle." Milton. A sharp assault already is begun. Dryden. 10. Keenly or unduly attentive to one's own interest; close and exact in dealing; shrewd; as, a sharp dealer; a sharp customer. The necessity of being so sharp and exacting. Swift. 11. Composed of hard, angular grains; gritty; as, sharp sand. Moxon. 12. Steep; precipitous; abrupt; as, a sharp ascent or descent; a sharp turn or curve. 13. (Phonetics)  Uttered in a whisper, or with the breath alone, without voice, as certain consonants, such as p, k, t, f; surd; nonvocal; aspirated. Note: Sharp is often used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, sharp-cornered, sharp-edged, sharp-pointed, sharp- tasted, sharp-visaged, etc. Sharp practice, the getting of an advantage, or the attempt to do so, by a tricky expedient. -- To brace sharp, or To sharp up (Naut.), to turn the yards to the most oblique position possible, that the ship may lie well up to the wind. Syn. -- Keen; acute; piercing; penetrating; quick; sagacious; discerning; shrewd; witty; ingenious; sour; acid; tart; pungent; acrid; severe; poignant; biting; acrimonious; sarcastic; cutting; bitter; painful; afflictive; violent; harsh; fierce; ardent; fiery.  1. To a point or edge; piercingly; eagerly; sharply. M. Arnold. The head [of a spear] full sharp yground. Chaucer. You bite so sharp at reasons. Shak. 2. Precisely; exactly; as, we shall start at ten o'clock sharp. [Colloq.] Look sharp, attend; be alert. [Colloq.]  1. A sharp tool or weapon. [Obs.] If butchers had but the manners to go to sharps, gentlemen would be contented with a rubber at cuffs. Collier. 2. (Mus.) (a) The character [#] used to indicate that the note before which it is placed is to be raised a half step, or semitone, in pitch. (b) A sharp tone or note. Shak. 3. A portion of a stream where the water runs very rapidly. [Prov. Eng.] C. Kingsley. 4. A sewing needle having a very slender point; a needle of the most pointed of the three grades, blunts, betweens, and sharps. 5. pl.  Same as Middlings, 1. 6. An expert. [Slang]  1. To sharpen. [Obs.] Spenser. 2. (Mus.)  To raise above the proper pitch; to elevate the tone of; especially, to raise a half step, or semitone, above the natural tone.  1. To play tricks in bargaining; to act the sharper. L'Estrange. 2. (Mus.)  To sing above the proper pitch.
colony: 1. A company of people transplanted from their mother country to a remote province or country, and remaining subject to the jurisdiction of the parent state; as, the British colonies in America. The first settlers of New England were the best of Englishmen, well educated, devout Christians, and zealous lovers of liberty. There was never a colony formed of better materials. Ames. 2. The district or country colonized; a settlement. 3. A company of persons from the same country sojourning in a foreign city or land; as, the American colony in Paris. 4. (Nat. Hist.)  A number of animals or plants living or growing together, beyond their usual range.
done: p. p. from Do, and formerly the infinitive. 1. Performed; executed; finished. 2. It is done or agreed; let it be a match or bargain; -- used elliptically. Done brown, a phrase in cookery; applied figuratively to one who has been thoroughly deceived, cheated, or fooled. [Colloq.] -- Done for, tired out; used up; collapsed; destroyed; dead; killed. [Colloq.] -- Done up. (a) Wrapped up. (b) Worn out; exhausted. [Colloq.]  Given; executed; issued; made public; -- used chiefly in the clause giving the date of a proclamation or public act.
need: 1. A state that requires supply or relief; pressing occasion for something; necessity; urgent want. And the city had no need of the sun. Rev. xxi. 23. I have no need to beg. Shak. Be governed by your needs, not by your fancy. Jer. Taylor. 2. Want of the means of subsistence; poverty; indigence; destitution. Chaucer. Famine is in thy cheeks; Need and oppression starveth in thine eyes. Shak. 3. That which is needful; anything necessary to be done; (pl.) necessary things; business. [Obs.] Chaucer. 4. Situation of need; peril; danger. [Obs.] Chaucer. Syn. -- Exigency; emergency; strait; extremity; necessity; distress; destitution; poverty; indigence; want; penury. -- Need, Necessity. Necessity is stronger than need; it places us under positive compulsion. We are frequently under the necessity of going without that of which we stand very greatly in need. It is also with the corresponding adjectives; necessitous circumstances imply the direct pressure of suffering; needy circumstances, the want of aid or relief.  To be in want of; to have cause or occasion for; to lack; to require, as supply or relief. Other creatures all day long Rove idle, unemployed, and less need rest. Milton. Note: With another verb, need is used like an auxiliary, generally in a negative sentence expressing requirement or obligation, and in this use it undergoes no change of termination in the third person singular of the present tense. "And the lender need not fear he shall be injured." Anacharsis (Trans. ).  To be wanted; to be necessary. Chaucer. When we have done it, we have done all that is in our power, and all that needs. Locke.  Of necessity. See Needs. [Obs.] Chaucer.
duck: A pet; a darling. Shak.  1. A linen (or sometimes cotton) fabric, finer and lighter than canvas, -- used for the lighter sails of vessels, the sacking of beds, and sometimes for men's clothing. 2. (Naut.) pl.  The light clothes worn by sailors in hot climates. [Colloq.]  1. To thrust or plunge under water or other liquid and suddenly withdraw. Adams, after ducking the squire twice or thrice, leaped out of the tub. Fielding. 2. To plunge the head of under water, immediately withdrawing it; as, duck the boy. 3. To bow; to bob down; to move quickly with a downward motion. " Will duck his head aside. Swift.  1. To go under the surface of water and immediately reappear; to dive; to plunge the head in water or other liquid; to dip. In Tiber ducking thrice by break of day. Dryden. 2. To drop the head or person suddenly; to bow. The learned pate Ducks to the golden fool. Shak.  1. (Zool.)  Any bird of the subfamily Anatinæ, family Anatidæ. Note: The genera and species are numerous. They are divided into river ducks and sea ducks. Among the former are the common domestic duck (Anas boschas); the wood duck (Aix sponsa); the beautiful mandarin duck of China (Dendronessa galeriliculata); the Muscovy duck, originally of South America (Cairina moschata). Among the sea ducks are the eider, canvasback, scoter, etc. 2. A sudden inclination of the bead or dropping of the person, resembling the motion of a duck in water. Here be, without duck or nod, Other trippings to be trod. Milton. Bombay duck (Zoöl.), a fish. See Bummalo. -- Buffel duck, or Spirit duck. See Buffel duck. -- Duck ant (Zoöl.), a species of white ant in Jamaica which builds large nests in trees. -- Duck barnacle. (Zoöl.) See Goose barnacle. -- Duck hawk. (Zoöl.) (a) In the United States: The peregrine falcon. (b) In England: The marsh harrier or moor buzzard. -- Duck mole (Zoöl.), a small aquatic mammal of Australia, having webbed feet and a bill resembling that of a duck (Ornithorhynchus anatinus). It belongs the subclass Monotremata and is remarkable for laying eggs like a bird or reptile; -- called also duckbill, platypus, mallangong, mullingong, tambreet, and water mole. -- To make ducks and drakes, to throw a flat stone obliquely, so as to make it rebound repeatedly from the surface of the water, raising a succession of jets; hence: To play at ducks and drakes, with property, to throw it away heedlessly or squander it foolishly and unprofitably. -- Lame duck. See under Lame.
dollar: 1. (a) A silver coin of the United States containing 371.25 grains of silver and 41.25 grains of alloy, that is, having a total weight of 412.5 grains. (b) A gold coin of the United States containing 23.22 grains of gold and 2.58 grains of alloy, that is, having a total weight of 25.8 grains, nine-tenths fine. It is no longer coined. Note: Previous to 1837 the silver dollar had a larger amount of alloy, but only the same amount of silver as now, the total weight being 416 grains. The gold dollar as a distinct coin was first made in 1849. The eagles, half eagles, and quarter eagles coined before 1834 contained 24.75 grains of gold and 2.25 grains of alloy for each dollar. 2. A coin of the same general weight and value, though differing slightly in different countries, current in Mexico, Canada, parts of South America, also in Spain, and several other European countries. 3. The value of a dollar; the unit commonly employed in the United States in reckoning money values. Chop dollar. See under 9th Chop. -- Dollar fish (Zoöl.), a fish of the United States coast (Stromateus triacanthus), having a flat, roundish form and a bright silvery luster; -- called also butterfish, and Lafayette. See Butterfish. -- Trade dollar, a silver coin formerly made at the United States mint, intended for export, and not legal tender at home. It contained 378 grains of silver and 42 grains of alloy.
power: Same as Poor, the fish.  1. Ability to act, regarded as latent or inherent; the faculty of doing or performing something; capacity for action or performance; capability of producing an effect, whether physical or moral: potency; might; as, a man of great power; the power of capillary attraction; money gives power. "One next himself in power, and next in crime." Milton. 2. Ability, regarded as put forth or exerted; strength, force, or energy in action; as, the power of steam in moving an engine; the power of truth, or of argument, in producing conviction; the power of enthusiasm. "The power of fancy." Shak. 3. Capacity of undergoing or suffering; fitness to be acted upon; susceptibility; -- called also passive power; as, great power of endurance. Power, then, is active and passive; faculty is active power or capacity; capacity is passive power. Sir W. Hamilton. 4. The exercise of a faculty; the employment of strength; the exercise of any kind of control; influence; dominion; sway; command; government. Power is no blessing in itself but when it is employed to protect the innocent. Swift. 5. The agent exercising an ability to act; an individual invested with authority; an institution, or government, which exercises control; as, the great powers of Europe; hence, often, a superhuman agent; a spirit; a divinity. "The powers of darkness." Milton. And the powers of the heavens shall be shaken. Matt. xxiv. 29. 6. A military or naval force; an army or navy; a great host. Spenser. Never such a power . . . Was levied in the body of a land. Shak. 7. A large quantity; a great number; as, a power o. [Colloq.] Richardson. 8. (Mech.) (a) The rate at which mechanical energy is exerted or mechanical work performed, as by an engine or other machine, or an animal, working continuously; as, an engine of twenty horse power. Note: The English unit of power used most commonly is the horse power. See Horse power. (b) A mechanical agent; that from which useful mechanical energy is derived; as, water power; steam power; hand power, etc. (c) Applied force; force producing motion or pressure; as, the power applied at one and of a lever to lift a weight at the other end. Note: This use in mechanics, of power as a synonym for force, is improper and is becoming obsolete. (d) A machine acted upon by an animal, and serving as a motor to drive other machinery; as, a dog power. Note: Power is used adjectively, denoting, driven, or adapted to be driven, by machinery, and not actuated directly by the hand or foot; as, a power lathe; a power loom; a power press. 9. (Math.)  The product arising from the multiplication of a number into itself; as, a square is the second power, and a cube is third power, of a number. 10. ( (Metaph.)  Mental or moral ability to act; one of the faculties which are possessed by the mind or soul; as, the power of thinking, reasoning, judging, willing, fearing, hoping, etc. I. Watts. The guiltiness of my mind, the sudden surprise of my powers, drove the grossness . . . into a received belief. Shak. 11. (Optics)  The degree to which a lens, mirror, or any optical instrument, magnifies; in the telescope, and usually in the microscope, the number of times it multiplies, or augments, the apparent diameter of an object; sometimes, in microscopes, the number of times it multiplies the apparent surface. 12. (Law)  An authority enabling a person to dispose of an interest vested either in himself or in another person; ownership by appointment. Wharton. 13. Hence, vested authority to act in a given case; as, the business was referred to a committee with power. Note: Power may be predicated of inanimate agents, like the winds and waves, electricity and magnetism, gravitation, etc., or of animal and intelligent beings; and when predicated of these beings, it may indicate physical, mental, or moral ability or capacity. Mechanical powers. See under Mechanical. -- Power loom, or Power press. See Def. 8 (d), note. -- Power of attorney. See under Attorney. -- Power of a point (relative to a given curve) (Geom.), the result of substituting the coördinates of any point in that expression which being put equal to zero forms the equation of the curve; as, x2 + y2 - 100 is the power of the point x, y, relative to the circle x2 + y2 - 100 = 0.
observe: 1. To take notice of by appropriate conduct; to conform one's action or practice to; to keep; to heed; to obey; to comply with; as, to observe rules or commands; to observe civility. Ye shall observe the feast of unleavened bread. Ex. xii. 17. He wolde no such cursedness observe. Chaucer. Must I budge Must I observe you Shak. With solemn purpose to observe Immutably his sovereign will. Milton. 2. To be on the watch respecting; to pay attention to; to notice with care; to see; to perceive; to discover; as, to observe an eclipse; to observe the color or fashion of a dress; to observe the movements of an army. 3. To express as what has been noticed; to utter as a remark; to say in a casual or incidental way; to remark.  1. To take notice; to give attention to what one sees or hears; to attend. 2. To make a remark; to comment; -- generally with on or upon. I have barely quoted... without observing upon it. Pope. Syn. -- To remark. See Remark.
push: A pustule; a pimple. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.] Bacon.  1. To press against with force; to drive or impel by pressure; to endeavor to drive by steady pressure, without striking; -- opposed to draw. Sidelong had pushed a mountain from his seat. Milton. 2. To thrust the points of the horns against; to gore. If the ox shall push a manservant or maidservant, . . . the ox shall be stoned. Ex. xxi. 32. 3. To press or urge forward; to drive; to push an objection too far. " To push his fortune." Dryden. Ambition pushes the soul to such actions as are apt to procure honor to the actor. Spectator. We are pushed for an answer. Swift. 4. To bear hard upon; to perplex; to embarrass. 5. To importune; to press with solicitation; to tease. To push down, to overthrow by pushing or impulse.  1. To make a thrust; to shove; as, to push with the horns or with a sword. Shak. 2. To make an advance, attack, or effort; to be energetic; as, a man must push in order to succeed. At the time of the end shall the kind of the south push at him and the king of the north shall come against him. Dan. xi. 40. War seemed asleep for nine long years; at length Both sides resolved to push, we tried our strength. Dryden. 3. To burst pot, as a bud or shoot. To push on, to drive or urge forward; to hasten. The rider pushed on at a rapid pace. Sir W. Scott.  1. A thrust with a pointed instrument, or with the end of a thing. 2. Any thrust. pressure, impulse, or force, or force applied; a shove; as, to give the ball the first push. 3. An assault or attack; an effort; an attempt; hence, the time or occasion for action. Exact reformation is not perfected at the first push. Milton. hen it comes to the push, tic no more than talk. L' Estrange. 4. The faculty of overcoming obstacles; aggressive energy; as, he has push, or he has no push. [Colloq.] Syn. -- See Thrust.
with: See Withe.  With denotes or expresses some situation or relation of nearness, proximity, association, connection, or the like. It is used especially: -- 1. To denote a close or direct relation of opposition or hostility; - - equivalent to against. Thy servant will . . . fight with this Philistine. 1 Sam. xvii. 32. Note: In this sense, common in Old English, it is now obsolete except in a few compounds; as, withhold; withstand; and after the verbs fight, contend, struggle, and the like. 2. To denote association in respect of situation or environment; hence, among; in the company of. I will buy with you, talk with you, walk with you, and so following; but I will not eat with you, drink with you, nor pray with you. Shak. Pity your own, or pity our estate, Nor twist our fortunes with your sinking fate. Dryden. See where on earth the flowery glories lie; With her they flourished, and with her they die. Pope. There is no living with thee nor without thee. Tatler. Such arguments had invincible force with those pagan philosophers. Addison. 3. To denote a connection of friendship, support, alliance, assistance, countenance, etc.; hence, on the side of. Fear not, for I am with thee, and will bless thee. Gen. xxvi. 24. 4. To denote the accomplishment of cause, means, instrument, etc; -- sometimes equivalent to by. That with these fowls I be all to-rent. Chaucer. Thou wilt be like a lover presently, And tire the hearer with a book of words. Shak. [He] entertained a coffeehouse with the following narrative. Addison. With receiving your friends within and amusing them without, you lead a good, pleasant, bustling life of it. Goldsmith. 5. To denote association in thought, as for comparison or contrast. Can blazing carbuncles with her compare. Sandys. 6. To denote simultaneous happening, or immediate succession or consequence. With that she told me . . . that she would hide no truth from me. Sir P. Sidney. With her they flourished, and with her they die. Pope. With this he pointed to his face. Dryden. 7. To denote having as a possession or an appendage; as, the firmament with its stars; a bride with a large fortune. "A maid with clean hands." Shak. Note: With and by are closely allied in many of their uses, and it is not easy to lay down a rule by which to distinguish their uses. See the Note under By.
soon: 1. In a short time; shortly after any time specified or supposed; as, soon after sunrise. "Sooner said than done." Old Proverb. "As soon as it might be." Chaucer. She finished, and the subtle fiend his lore Soon learned. Milton. 2. Without the usual delay; before any time supposed; early. How is it that ye are come so soon to-day Ex. ii. 18. 3. Promptly; quickly; easily. Small lights are soon blown out, huge fires abide. Shak. 4. Readily; willingly; -- in this sense used with would, or some other word expressing will. I would as soon see a river winding through woods or in meadows, as when it is tossed up in so many whimsical figures at Versailles. Addison. As soon as, or So soon as, imediately at or after another event. "As soon as he came nigh unto the camp . . . he saw the calf, and the dancing." Ex. xxxii. 19. See So . . . as, under So. -- Soon at, as soon as; or, as soon as the time referred to arrives. [Obs.] "I shall be sent for soon at night." Shak. -- Sooner or later, at some uncertain time in the future; as, he will discover his mistake sooner or later. -- With the soonest, as soon as any; among the earliest; too soon. [Obs.] Holland.  Speedy; quick. [Obs.] Shak.
kept: of Keep. Kept mistress, a concubine; a woman supported by a man as his paramour.
track: 1. A mark left by something that has passed along; as, the track, or wake, of a ship; the track of a meteor; the track of a sled or a wheel. The bright track of his fiery car. Shak. 2. A mark or impression left by the foot, either of man or beast; trace; vestige; footprint. Far from track of men. Milton. 3. (Zoöl.)  The entire lower surface of the foot;-said of birds, ect. 4. A road; a beaten path. Behold Torquatus the same track pursue. Dryden. 5. Course; way; as, the track of a comet. 6. A path or course laid out for a race, for exercise, ect. 7. (Raolroad)  The permanent way; the rails. 8. Etym: [Perhaps a mistake for tract.]  A tract or area, as of land. [Obs.] "Small tracks of ground." Fuller. Track scale, a railway scale. See under Railway.  To follow the tracks or traces of; to pursue by following the marks of the feet; to trace; to trail; as, to track a deer in the snow. It was often found impossible to track the robbers to their retreats among the hills and morasses. Macaulay. 2. (Naut.)  To draw along continuously, as a vessel, by a line, men or animals on shore being the motive power; to tow.
voice: 1. Sound uttered by the mouth, especially that uttered by human beings in speech or song; sound thus uttered considered as possessing some special quality or character; as, the human voice; a pleasant voice; a low voice. He with a manly voice saith his message. Chaucer. Her voice was ever soft, Gentle, and low; an excellent thing in woman. Shak. Thy voice is music. Shak. Join thy voice unto the angel choir. Milton. 2. (Phon.)  Sound of the kind or quality heard in speech or song in the consonants b, v, d, etc., and in the vowels; sonant, or intonated, utterance; tone; -- distinguished from mere breath sound as heard in f, s, sh, etc., and also whisper. Note: Voice, in this sense, is produced by vibration of the so-called vocal cords in the larynx (see Illust. of Larynx) which act upon the air, not in the manner of the strings of a stringed instrument, but as a pair of membranous tongues, or reeds, which, being continually forced apart by the outgoing current of breath, and continually brought together again by their own elasticity and muscular tension, break the breath current into a series of puffs, or pulses, sufficiently rapid to cause the sensation of tone. The power, or loudness, of such a tone depends on the force of the separate pulses, and this is determined by the pressure of the expired air, together with the resistance on the part of the vocal cords which is continually overcome. Its pitch depends on the number of aërial pulses within a given time, that is, on the rapidity of their succession. See Guide to Pronunciation, §§ 5, 146, 155. 3. The tone or sound emitted by anything. After the fire a still small voice. 1 Kings xix. 12. Canst thou thunder with a voice like him Job xl. 9. The floods have lifted up their voice. Ps. xciii. 3. O Marcus, I am warm'd; my heart Leaps at the trumpet's voice. Addison. 4. The faculty or power of utterance; as, to cultivate the voice. 5. Language; words; speech; expression; signification of feeling or opinion. I desire to be present with you now, and to change my voice; for I stand in doubt of you. Gal. iv. 20. My voice is in my sword. Shak. Let us call on God in the voice of his church. Bp. Fell. 6. Opinion or choice expressed; judgment; a vote. Sic. How now, my masters! have you chose this man 1 Cit. He has our voices, sir. Shak. Some laws ordain, and some attend the choice Of holy senates, and elect by voice. Dryden. 7. Command; precept; -- now chiefly used in scriptural language. So shall ye perish; because ye would not be obedient unto the voice of the Lord your God. Deut. viii. 20. 8. One who speaks; a speaker. "A potent voice of Parliament." Tennyson. 9. (Gram.)  A particular mode of inflecting or conjugating verbs, or a particular form of a verb, by means of which is indicated the relation of the subject of the verb to the action which the verb expresses. Active voice (Gram.), that form of the verb by which its subject is represented as the agent or doer of the action expressed by it. -- Chest voice (Phon.), a kind of voice of a medium or low pitch and of a sonorous quality ascribed to resonance in the chest, or thorax; voice of the thick register. It is produced by vibration of the vocal cords through their entire width and thickness, and with convex surfaces presented to each other. -- Head voice (Phon.), a kind of voice of high pitch and of a thin quality ascribed to resonance in the head; voice of the thin register; falsetto. In producing it, the vibration of the cords is limited to their thin edges in the upper part, which are then presented to each other. -- Middle voice (Gram.), that form of the verb by which its subject is represented as both the agent, or doer, and the object of the action, that is, as performing some act to or upon himself, or for his own advantage. -- Passive voice. (Gram.) See under Passive, a. -- Voice glide (Pron.), the brief and obscure neutral vowel sound that sometimes occurs between two consonants in an unaccented syllable (represented by the apostrophe), as in able (a"b'l). See Glide, n., 2. -- Voice stop. See Voiced stop, under Voiced, a. -- With one voice, unanimously. "All with one voice . . . cried out, Great is Diana of the Ephesians." Acts xix. 34.  1. To give utterance or expression to; to utter; to publish; to announce; to divulge; as, to voice the sentiments of the nation. "Rather assume thy right in silence and . . . then voice it with claims and challenges." Bacon. It was voiced that the king purposed to put to death Edward Plantagenet. Bacon. 2. (Phon.)  To utter with sonant or vocal tone; to pronounce with a narrowed glottis and rapid vibrations of the vocal cords; to speak above a whisper. 3. To fit for producing the proper sounds; to regulate the tone of; as, to voice the pipes of an organ. 4. To vote; to elect; to appoint. [Obs.] Shak.  To clamor; to cry out. [Obs.] South.
early: Soon; in good season; seasonably; betimes; as, come early. Those that me early shall find me. Prov. viii. 17. You must wake and call me early. Tennyson.  1. In advance of the usual or appointed time; in good season; prior in time; among or near the first; -- opposed to Ant: late; as, the early bird; an early spring; early fruit. Early and provident fear is the mother of safety. Burke. The doorsteps and threshold with the early grass springing up about them. Hawthorne. 2. Coming in the first part of a period of time, or among the first of successive acts, events, etc. Seen in life's early morning sky. Keble. The forms of its earlier manhood. Longfellow. The earliest poem he composed was in his seventeenth summer. J. C. Shairp. Early English (Philol.) See the Note under English. -- Early English architecture, the first of the pointed or Gothic styles used in England, succeeding the Norman style in the 12th and 13th centuries. Syn. -- Forward; timely; not late; seasonable.
death: 1. The cessation of all vital phenomena without capability of resuscitation, either in animals or plants. Note: Local death is going on at times and in all parts of the living body, in which individual cells and elements are being cast off and replaced by new; a process essential to life. General death is of two kinds; death of the body as a whole (somatic or systemic death), and death of the tissues. By the former is implied the absolute cessation of the functions of the brain, the circulatory and the respiratory organs; by the latter the entire disappearance of the vital actions of the ultimate structural constituents of the body. When death takes place, the body as a whole dies first, the death of the tissues sometimes not occurring until after a considerable interval. Huxley. 2. Total privation or loss; extinction; cessation; as, the death of memory. The death of a language can not be exactly compared with the death of a plant. J. Peile. 3. Manner of dying; act or state of passing from life. A death that I abhor. Shak. Let me die the death of the righteous. Num. xxiii. 10. 4. Cause of loss of life. Swiftly flies the feathered death. Dryden. He caught his death the last county sessions. Addison. 5. Personified: The destroyer of life, -- conventionally represented as a skeleton with a scythe. Death! great proprietor of all. Young. And I looked, and behold a pale horse; and his name that at on him was Death. Rev. vi. 8. 6. Danger of death. "In deaths oft." 2 Cor. xi. 23. 7. Murder; murderous character. Not to suffer a man of death to live. Bacon. 8. (Theol.)  Loss of spiritual life. To be death. Rom. viii. 6. 9. Anything so dreadful as to be like death. It was death to them to think of entertaining such doctrines. Atterbury. And urged him, so that his soul was vexed unto death. Judg. xvi. 16. Note: Death is much used adjectively and as the first part of a compound, meaning, in general, of or pertaining to death, causing or presaging death; as, deathbed or death bed; deathblow or death blow, etc. Black death. See Black death, in the Vocabulary. -- Civil death, the separation of a man from civil society, or the debarring him from the enjoyment of civil rights, as by banishment, attainder, abjuration of the realm, entering a monastery, etc. Blackstone. -- Death adder. (Zoöl.) (a) A kind of viper found in South Africa (Acanthophis tortor); -- so called from the virulence of its venom. (b) A venomous Australian snake of the family Elapidæ, of several species, as the Hoplocephalus superbus and Acanthopis antarctica. -- Death bell, a bell that announces a death. The death bell thrice was heard to ring. Mickle. -- Death candle, a light like that of a candle, viewed by the superstitious as presaging death. -- Death damp, a cold sweat at the coming on of death. -- Death fire, a kind of ignis fatuus supposed to forebode death. And round about in reel and rout, The death fires danced at night. Coleridge. -- Death grapple, a grapple or struggle for life. -- Death in life, a condition but little removed from death; a living death. [Poetic] "Lay lingering out a five years' death in life." Tennyson. -- Death knell, a stroke or tolling of a bell, announcing a death. -- Death rate, the relation or ratio of the number of deaths to the population. At all ages the death rate is higher in towns than in rural districts. Darwin. -- Death rattle, a rattling or gurgling in the throat of a dying person. -- Death's door, the boundary of life; the partition dividing life from death. -- Death stroke, a stroke causing death. -- Death throe, the spasm of death. -- Death token, the signal of approaching death. -- Death warrant. (a) (Law) An order from the proper authority for the execution of a criminal. (b) That which puts an end to expectation, hope, or joy. -- Death wound. (a) A fatal wound or injury. (b) (Naut.) The springing of a fatal leak. -- Spiritual death (Scripture), the corruption and perversion of the soul by sin, with the loss of the favor of God. -- The gates of death, the grave. Have the gates of death been opened unto thee Job xxxviii. 17. -- The second death, condemnation to eternal separation from God. Rev. ii. 11. -- To be the death of, to be the cause of death to; to make die. "It was one who should be the death of both his parents." Milton. Syn. -- Death, Decrase, Departure, Release. Death applies to the termination of every form of existence, both animal and vegetable; the other words only to the human race. Decease is the term used in law for the removal of a human being out of life in the ordinary course of nature. Demise was formerly confined to decease of princes, but is now sometimes used of distinguished men in general; as, the demise of Mr. Pitt. Departure and release are peculiarly terms of Christian affection and hope. A violent death is not usually called a decease. Departure implies a friendly taking leave of life. Release implies a deliverance from a life of suffering or sorrow.
white: 1. Reflecting to the eye all the rays of the spectrum combined; not tinted with any of the proper colors or their mixtures; having the color of pure snow; snowy; -- the opposite of Ant: black or dark; as, white paper; a white skin. "Pearls white." Chaucer. White as the whitest lily on a stream. Longfellow. 2. Destitute of color, as in the cheeks, or of the tinge of blood color; pale; pallid; as, white with fear. Or whispering with white lips, "The foe! They come! they come!" Byron. 3. Having the color of purity; free from spot or blemish, or from guilt or pollution; innocent; pure. White as thy fame, and as thy honor clear. Dryden. No whiter page than Addison's remains. Pope. 4. Gray, as from age; having silvery hair; hoary. Your high engendered battles 'gainst a head So old and white as this. Shak. 5. Characterized by freedom from that which disturbs, and the like; fortunate; happy; favorable. On the whole, however, the dominie reckoned this as one of the white days of his life. Sir W. Scott. 6. Regarded with especial favor; favorite; darling. Come forth, my white spouse. Chaucer. I am his white boy, and will not be gullet. Ford. Note: White is used in many self-explaining compounds, as white- backed, white-bearded, white-footed. White alder. (Bot.) See Sweet pepper bush, under Pepper. -- White ant (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of social pseudoneuropterous insects of the genus Termes. These insects are very abundant in tropical countries, and form large and complex communities consisting of numerous asexual workers of one or more kinds, of large-headed asexual individuals called soldiers, of one or more queens (or fertile females) often having the body enormously distended by the eggs, and, at certain seasons of numerous winged males, together with the larvæ and pupæ of each kind in various stages of development. Many of the species construct large and complicated nests, sometimes in the form of domelike structures rising several feet above the ground and connected with extensive subterranean galleries and chambers. In their social habits they closely resemble the true ants. They feed upon animal and vegetable substances of various kinds, including timber, and are often very destructive to buildings and furniture. -- White arsenic (Chem.), arsenious oxide, As2O3, a substance of a white color, and vitreous adamantine luster, having an astringent, sweetish taste. It is a deadly poison. -- White bass (Zoöl.), a fresh-water North American bass (Roccus chrysops) found in the Great Likes. -- White bear (Zoöl.), the polar bear. See under Polar. -- White blood cell. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte. -- White brand (Zoöl.), the snow goose. -- White brass, a white alloy of copper; white copper. -- White campion. (Bot.) (a) A kind of catchfly (Silene stellata) with white flowers. (b) A white-flowered Lychnis (Lychnis vespertina). -- White canon (R. C. Ch.), a Premonstratensian. -- White caps, the members of a secret organization in various of the United States, who attempt to drive away or reform obnoxious persons by lynch-law methods. They appear masked in white. -- White cedar (Bot.), an evergreen tree of North America (Thuja occidentalis), also the related Cupressus thyoides, or Chamæcyparis sphæroidea, a slender evergreen conifer which grows in the so-called cedar swamps of the Northern and Atlantic States. Both are much valued for their durable timber. In California the name is given to the Libocedrus decurrens, the timber of which is also useful, though often subject to dry rot. Goodale. The white cedar of Demerara, Guiana, etc., is a lofty tree (Icica, or Bursera, altissima) whose fragrant wood is used for canoes and cabinetwork, as it is not attacked by insect. -- White cell. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte. -- White cell-blood (Med.), leucocythæmia. -- White clover (Bot.), a species of small perennial clover bearing white flowers. It furnishes excellent food for cattle and horses, as well as for the honeybee. See also under Clover. -- White copper, a whitish alloy of copper. See German silver, under German. -- White copperas (Min.), a native hydrous sulphate of iron; coquimbite. -- White coral (Zoöl.), an ornamental branched coral (Amphihelia oculata) native of the Mediterranean. -- White corpuscle. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte. -- White cricket (Zoöl.), the tree cricket. -- White crop, a crop of grain which loses its green color, or becomes white, in ripening, as wheat, rye, barley, and oats, as distinguished from a green crop, or a root crop. -- White currant (Bot.), a variety of the common red currant, having white berries. -- White daisy (Bot.), the oxeye daisy. See under Daisy. -- White damp, a kind of poisonous gas encountered in coal mines. Raymond. -- White elephant (Zoöl.), a whitish, or albino, variety of the Asiatic elephant. -- White elm (Bot.), a majestic tree of North America (Ulmus Americana), the timber of which is much used for hubs of wheels, and for other purposes. -- White ensign. See Saint George's ensign, under Saint. -- White feather, a mark or symbol of cowardice. See To show the white feather, under Feather, n. -- White fir (Bot.), a name given to several coniferous trees of the Pacific States, as Abies grandis, and A. concolor. -- White flesher (Zoöl.), the ruffed grouse. See under Ruffed. [Canada] -- White frost. See Hoarfrost. -- White game (Zoöl.), the white ptarmigan. -- White garnet (Min.), leucite. -- White grass (Bot.), an American grass (Leersia Virginica) with greenish-white paleæ. -- White grouse. (Zoöl.) (a) The white ptarmigan. (b) The prairie chicken. [Local, U. S.] -- White grub (Zoöl.), the larva of the June bug and other allied species. These grubs eat the roots of grasses and other plants, and often do much damage. -- White hake (Zoöl.), the squirrel hake. See under Squirrel. -- White hawk, or kite (Zoöl.), the hen harrier. -- White heat, the temperature at which bodies become incandescent, and appear white from the bright light which they emit. -- White hellebore (Bot.), a plant of the genus Veratrum (V. album) See Hellebore, 2. -- White herring, a fresh, or unsmoked, herring, as distinguished from a red, or cured, herring. [R.] Shak. -- White hoolet (Zoöl.), the barn owl. [Prov. Eng.] -- White horses (Naut.), white-topped waves; whitecaps. -- The White House. See under House. -- White ibis (Zoöl.), an American ibis (Guara alba) having the plumage pure white, except the tips of the wings, which are black. It inhabits tropical America and the Southern United States. Called also Spanish curlew. -- White iron. (a) Thin sheets of iron coated with tin; tinned iron. (b) A hard, silvery-white cast iron containing a large proportion of combined carbon. -- White iron pyrites (Min.), marcasite. -- White land, a tough clayey soil, of a whitish hue when dry, but blackish after rain. [Eng.] -- White lark (Zoöl.), the snow bunting. -- White lead. (a) A carbonate of lead much used in painting, and for other purposes; ceruse. (b) (Min.) Native lead carbonate; cerusite. -- White leather, buff leather; leather tanned with alum and salt. -- White leg (Med.), milk leg. See under Milk. -- White lettuce (Bot.), rattlesnake root. See under Rattlesnake. -- White lie. See under Lie. -- White light. (a) (Physics) Light having the different colors in the same proportion as in the light coming directly from the sun, without having been decomposed, as by passing through a prism. See the Note under Color, n., 1. (b) A kind of firework which gives a brilliant white illumination for signals, etc. -- White lime, a solution or preparation of lime for whitewashing; whitewash. -- White line (Print.), a void space of the breadth of a line, on a printed page; a blank line. -- White meat. (a) Any light-colored flesh, especially of poultry. (b) Food made from milk or eggs, as butter, cheese, etc. Driving their cattle continually with them, and feeding only upon their milk and white meats. Spenser. -- White merganser (Zoöl.), the smew. -- White metal. (a) Any one of several white alloys, as pewter, britannia, etc. (b) (Metal.) A fine grade of copper sulphide obtained at a certain stage in copper smelting. -- White miller. (Zoöl.) (a) The common clothes moth. (b) A common American bombycid moth (Spilosoma Virginica) which is pure white with a few small black spots; -- called also ermine moth, and virgin moth. See Woolly bear, under Woolly. -- White money, silver money. -- White mouse (Zoöl.), the albino variety of the common mouse. -- White mullet (Zoöl.), a silvery mullet (Mugil curema) ranging from the coast of the United States to Brazil; -- called also blue- back mullet, and liza. -- White nun (Zoöl.), the smew; -- so called from the white crest and the band of black feathers on the back of its head, which give the appearance of a hood. -- White oak. (Bot.) See under Oak. -- White owl. (Zoöl.) (a) The snowy owl. (b) The barn owl. -- White partridge (Zoöl.), the white ptarmigan. -- White perch. (Zoöl.) (a) A North American fresh-water bass (Morone Americana) valued as a food fish. (b) The croaker, or fresh- water drum. (c) Any California surf fish. -- White pine. (Bot.) See the Note under Pine. -- White poplar (Bot.), a European tree (Populus alba) often cultivated as a shade tree in America; abele. -- White poppy (Bot.), the opium-yielding poppy. See Poppy. -- White powder, a kind of gunpowder formerly believed to exist, and to have the power of exploding without noise. [Obs.] A pistol charged with white powder. Beau. & Fl. -- White precipitate. (Old Chem.) See under Precipitate. -- White rabbit. (Zoöl.) (a) The American northern hare in its winter pelage. (b) An albino rabbit. -- White rent, (a) (Eng. Law) Formerly, rent payable in silver; -- opposed to black rent. See Blackmail, n., 3. (b) A rent, or duty, of eight pence, payable yearly by every tinner in Devon and Cornwall to the Duke of Cornwall, as lord of the soil. [Prov. Eng.] -- White rhinoceros. (Zoöl.) (a) The one-horned, or Indian, rhinoceros (Rhinoceros Indicus). See Rhinoceros. (b) The umhofo. -- White ribbon, the distinctive badge of certain organizations for the promotion of temperance or of moral purity; as, the White-ribbon Army. -- White rope (Naut.), untarred hemp rope. -- White rot. (Bot.) (a) Either of several plants, as marsh pennywort and butterwort, which were thought to produce the disease called rot in sheep. (b) A disease of grapes. See White rot, under Rot. -- White sage (Bot.), a white, woolly undershrub (Eurotia lanata) of Western North America; -- called also winter fat. -- White salmon (Zoöl.), the silver salmon. -- White salt, salt dried and calcined; decrepitated salt. -- White scale (Zoöl.), a scale insect (Aspidiotus Nerii) injurious to the orange tree. See Orange scale, under Orange. -- White shark (Zoöl.), a species of man-eating shark. See under Shark. -- White softening. (Med.) See Softening of the brain, under Softening. -- White spruce. (Bot.) See Spruce, n., 1. -- White squall (Naut.), a sudden gust of wind, or furious blow, which comes up without being marked in its approach otherwise than by whitecaps, or white, broken water, on the surface of the sea. -- White staff, the badge of the lord high treasurer of England. Macaulay. -- White stork (Zoöl.), the common European stork. -- White sturgeon. (Zoöl.) See Shovelnose (d). -- White sucker. (Zoöl.) (a) The common sucker. (b) The common red horse (Moxostoma macrolepidotum). -- White swelling (Med.), a chronic swelling of the knee, produced by a strumous inflammation of the synovial membranes of the kneejoint and of the cancellar texture of the end of the bone forming the kneejoint; -- applied also to a lingering chronic swelling of almost any kind. -- White tombac. See Tombac. -- White trout (Zoöl.), the white weakfish, or silver squeteague (Cynoscion nothus), of the Southern United States. -- White vitriol (Chem.), hydrous sulphate of zinc. See White vitriol, under Vitriol. -- White wagtail (Zoöl.), the common, or pied, wagtail. -- White wax, beeswax rendered white by bleaching. -- White whale (Zoöl.), the beluga. -- White widgeon (Zoöl.), the smew. -- White wine. any wine of a clear, transparent color, bordering on white, as Madeira, sherry, Lisbon, etc.; -- distinguished from wines of a deep red color, as port and Burgundy. "White wine of Lepe." Chaucer. -- White witch, a witch or wizard whose supernatural powers are supposed to be exercised for good and beneficent purposes. Addison. Cotton Mather. -- White wolf. (Zoöl.) (a) A light-colored wolf (Canis laniger) native of Thibet; -- called also chanco, golden wolf, and Thibetan wolf. (b) The albino variety of the gray wolf. -- White wren (Zoöl.), the willow warbler; -- so called from the color of the under parts.  1. The color of pure snow; one of the natural colors of bodies, yet not strictly a color, but a composition of all colors; the opposite of black; whiteness. See the Note under Color, n., 1. Finely attired in a of white. Shak. 2. Something having the color of snow; something white, or nearly so; as, the white of the eye. 3. Specifically, the central part of the butt in archery, which was formerly painted white; the center of a mark at which a missile is shot. 'T was I won the wager, though you hit the white. Shak. 4. A person with a white skin; a member of the white, or Caucasian, races of men. 5. A white pigment; as, Venice white. 6. (Zoöl.)  Any one of numerous species of butterflies belonging to Pieris, and allied genera in which the color is usually white. See Cabbage butterfly, under Cabbage. Black and white. See under Black. -- Flake white, Paris white, etc. See under Flack, Paris, etc. -- White of a seed (Bot.), the albumen. See Albumen, 2. -- White of egg, the viscous pellucid fluid which surrounds the yolk in an egg, particularly in the egg of a fowl. In a hen's egg it is alkaline, and contains about 86 per cent of water and 14 per cent of solid matter, the greater portion of which is egg albumin. It likewise contains a small amount of globulin, and traces of fats and sugar, with some inorganic matter. Heated above 60º C. it coagulates to a solid mass, owing to the albumin which it contains. Parr. -- White of the eye (Anat.), the white part of the ball of the eye surrounding the transparent cornea.  To make white; to whiten; to whitewash; to bleach. Whited sepulchers, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are within full of . . . uncleanness. Matt. xxiii. 27. So as no fuller on earth can white them. Mark. ix. 3.
sky: 1. A cloud. [Obs.] [A wind] that blew so hideously and high, That it ne lefte not a sky In all the welkin long and broad. Chaucer. 2. Hence, a shadow. [Obs.] She passeth as it were a sky. Gower. 3. The apparent arch, or vault, of heaven, which in a clear day is of a blue color; the heavens; the firmament; -- sometimes in the plural. The Norweyan banners flout the sky. Shak. 4. The wheather; the climate. Thou wert better in thy grave than to answer with thy uncovered body this extremity of the skies. Shak. Note: Sky is often used adjectively or in the formation of self- explaining compounds; as, sky color, skylight, sky-aspiring, sky- born, sky-pointing, sky-roofed, etc. Sky blue, an azure color. -- Sky scraper (Naut.), a skysail of a triangular form. Totten. -- Under open sky, out of doors. "Under open sky adored." Milton.  1. To hang (a picture on exhibition) near the top of a wall, where it can not be well seen. [Colloq.] Brother Academicians who skied his pictures. The Century. 2. To throw towards the sky; as, to sky a ball at cricket. [Colloq.]
equal: 1. Agreeing in quantity, size, quality, degree, value, etc.; having the same magnitude, the same value, the same degree, etc.; -- applied to number, degree, quantity, and intensity, and to any subject which admits of them; neither inferior nor superior, greater nor less, better nor worse; corresponding; alike; as, equal quantities of land, water, etc. ; houses of equal size; persons of equal stature or talents; commodities of equal value. 2. Bearing a suitable relation; of just proportion; having competent power, abilities, or means; adequate; as, he is not equal to the task. The Scots trusted not their own numbers as equal to fight with the English. Clarendon. It is not permitted to me to make my commendations equal to your merit. Dryden. Whose voice an equal messenger Conveyed thy meaning mild. Emerson. 3. Not variable; equable; uniform; even; as, an equal movement. "An equal temper." Dryden. 4. Evenly balanced; not unduly inclining to either side; characterized by fairness; unbiased; impartial; equitable; just. Are not my ways equal Ezek. xviii. 29. Thee, O Jove, no equal judge I deem. Spenser. Nor think it equal to answer deliberate reason with sudden heat and noise. Milton. 5. Of the same interest or concern; indifferent. They who are not disposed to receive them may let them alone or reject them; it is equal to me. Cheyne. 6. (Mus.)  Intended for voices of one kind only, either all male or all female; -- opposed to mixed. [R.] 7. (Math.)  Exactly agreeing with respect to quantity. Equal temperament. (Mus.) See Temperament. Syn. -- Even; equable; uniform; adequate; proportionate; commensurate; fair; just; equitable.  1. One not inferior or superior to another; one having the same or a similar age, rank, station, office, talents, strength, or other quality or condition; an equal quantity or number; as, "If equals be taken from equals the remainders are equal." Those who were once his equals envy and defame him. Addison. 2. State of being equal; equality. [Obs.] Spenser.  1. To be or become equal to; to have the same quantity, the same value, the same degree or rank, or the like, with; to be commen On me whose all not equals Edward's moiety. Shak. 2. To make equal return to; to recompense fully. Who answered all her cares, and equaled all her love. Dryden. 3. To make equal or equal to; to equalize; hence, to compare or regard as equals; to put on equality. He would not equal the mind that he found in himself to the infinite and incomprehensible. Berkeley.
major: 1. Greater in number, quantity, or extent; as, the major part of the assembly; the major part of the revenue; the major part of the territory. 2. Of greater dignity; more important. Shak. 3. Of full legal age. [Obs.] 4. (Mus.)  Greater by a semitone, either in interval or in difference of pitch from another tone. Major axis (Geom.), the greater axis. See Focus, n., 2. -- Major key (Mus.), a key in which one and two, two and three, four and five, five and six and seven, make major seconds, and three and four, and seven and eight, make minor seconds. -- Major offense (Law), an offense of a greater degree which contains a lesser offense, as murder and robbery include assault. -- Major premise (Logic), that premise of a syllogism which contains the major term. -- Major scale (Mus.), the natural diatonic scale, which has semitones between the third and fourth, and seventh and fourth, and seventh and eighth degrees; the scale of the major mode, of which the third is major. See Scale, and Diatonic. -- Major second (Mus.), a second between whose tones is a difference in pitch of a step. -- Major sixth (Mus.), a sixth of four steps and a half step. In major keys the third and sixth from the key tone are major. Major keys and intervals, as distinguished from minors, are more cheerful. -- Major term (Logic), that term of a syllogism which forms the predicate of the conclusion. -- Major third (Mus.), a third of two steps.  1. (Mil.)  An officer next in rank above a captain and next below a lieutenant colonel; the lowest field officer. 2. (Law)  A person of full age. 3. (Logic)  That premise which contains the major term. It its the first proposition of a regular syllogism; as: No unholy person is qualified for happiness in heaven [the major]. Every man in his natural state is unholy [minor]. Therefore, no man in his natural state is qualified for happiness in heaven [conclusion or inference]. Note: In hypothetical syllogisms, the hypothetical premise is called the major. 4. Etym: [LL. See Major.]  A mayor. [Obs.] Bacon.
sound: The air bladder of a fish; as, cod sounds are an esteemed article of food.  A cuttlefish. [Obs.] Ainsworth.  1. Whole; unbroken; unharmed; free from flaw, defect, or decay; perfect of the kind; as, sound timber; sound fruit; a sound tooth; a sound ship. 2. Healthy; not diseased; not being in a morbid state; -- said of body or mind; as, a sound body; a sound constitution; a sound understanding. 3. Firm; strong; safe. The brasswork here, how rich it is in beams, And how, besides, it makes the whole house sound. Chapman. 4. Free from error; correct; right; honest; true; faithful; orthodox; -- said of persons; as, a sound lawyer; a sound thinker. Do not I know you a favorer Of this new seat Ye are nor sound. Shak. 5. Founded in truth or right; supported by justice; not to be overthrown on refuted; not fallacious; as, sound argument or reasoning; a sound objection; sound doctrine; sound principles. Hold fast the form of sound words, which thou hast heard of me. 2 Tim. i. 13. 6. heavy; laid on with force; as, a sound beating. 7. Undisturbed; deep; profound; as, sound sleep. 8. Founded in law; legal; valid; not defective; as, a sound title to land. Note: Sound is sometimes used in the formation of self-explaining compounds; as, sound-headed, sound-hearted, sound-timbered, etc. Sound currency (Com.), a currency whose actual value is the same as its nominal value; a currency which does not deteriorate or depreciate or fluctuate in comparision with the standard of values.  Soundly. So sound he slept that naught might him awake. Spenser.  A narrow passage of water, or a strait between the mainland and an island; also, a strait connecting two seas, or connecting a sea or lake with the ocean; as, the Sound between the Baltic and the german Ocean; Long Island Sound. The Sound of Denmark, where ships pay toll. Camden. Sound dues, tolls formerly imposed by Denmark on vessels passing through the Baltic Sound.  1. To measure the depth of; to fathom; especially, to ascertain the depth of by means of a line and plummet. 2. Fig.: To ascertain, or try to ascertain, the thoughts, motives, and purposes of (a person); to examine; to try; to test; to probe. I was in jest, And by that offer meant to sound your breast. Dryden. I've sounded my Numidians man by man. Addison. 3. (Med.)  To explore, as the bladder or urethra, with a sound; to examine with a sound; also, to examine by auscultation or percussion; as, to sound a patient.  To ascertain the depth of water with a sounding line or other device. I sound as a shipman soundeth in the sea with his plummet to know the depth of sea. Palsgrave.  Any elongated instrument or probe, usually metallic, by which cavities of the body are sounded or explored, especially the bladder for stone, or the urethra for a stricture.  1. The peceived object occasioned by the impulse or vibration of a material substance affecting the ear; a sensation or perception of the mind received through the ear, and produced by the impulse or vibration of the air or other medium with which the ear is in contact; the effect of an impression made on the organs of hearing by an impulse or vibration of the air caused by a collision of bodies, or by other means; noise; report; as, the sound of a drum; the sound of the human voice; a horrid sound; a charming sound; a sharp, high, or shrill sound. The warlike sound Of trumpets loud and clarions. Milton. 2. The occasion of sound; the impulse or vibration which would occasion sound to a percipient if present with unimpaired; hence, the theory of vibrations in elastic media such cause sound; as, a treatise on sound. Note: In this sense, sounds are spoken of as audible and inaudible. 3. Noise without signification; empty noise; noise and nothing else. Sense and not sound . . . must be the principle. Locke. Sound boarding, boards for holding pugging, placed in partitions of under floors in order to deaden sounds. -- Sound bow, in a series of transverse sections of a bell, that segment against which the clapper strikes, being the part which is most efficacious in producing the sound. See Illust. of Bell. -- Sound post. (Mus.) See Sounding post, under Sounding.  1. To make a noise; to utter a voice; to make an impulse of the air that shall strike the organs of hearing with a perceptible effect. "And first taught speaking trumpets how to sound." Dryden. How silver-sweet sound lovers' tongues! Shak. 2. To be conveyed in sound; to be spread or published; to convey intelligence by sound. From you sounded out the word of the Lord. 1 Thess. i. 8. 3. To make or convey a certain impression, or to have a certain import, when heard; hence, to seem; to appear; as, this reproof sounds harsh; the story sounds like an invention. Good sir, why do you start, and seem to fear Things that do sound so fair Shak. To sound in or into, to tend to; to partake of the nature of; to be consonant with. [Obs., except in the phrase To sound in damages, below.] Soun[d]ing in moral virtue was his speech. Chaucer. -- To sound in damages (Law), to have the essential quality of damages. This is said of an action brought, not for the recovery of a specific thing, as replevin, etc., but for damages only, as trespass, and the like.  1. To causse to make a noise; to play on; as, to sound a trumpet or a horn. A bagpipe well could he play and soun[d]. Chaucer. 2. To cause to exit as a sound; as, to sound a note with the voice, or on an instrument. 3. To order, direct, indicate, or proclain by a sound, or sounds; to give a signal for by a certain sound; as, to sound a retreat; to sound a parley. The clock sounded the hour of noon. G. H. Lewes. 4. To celebrate or honor by sounds; to cause to be reported; to publish or proclaim; as, to sound the praises of fame of a great man or a great exploit. 5. To examine the condition of (anything) by causing the same to emit sounds and noting their character; as, to sound a piece of timber; to sound a vase; to sound the lungs of a patient. 6. To signify; to import; to denote. [Obs.] Milton. Soun[d]ing alway the increase of his winning. Chaucer.
rose: imp. of Rise.  1. A flower and shrub of any species of the genus Rosa, of which there are many species, mostly found in the morthern hemispere Note: Roses are shrubs with pinnate leaves and usually prickly stems. The flowers are large, and in the wild state have five petals of a color varying from deep pink to white, or sometimes yellow. By cultivation and hybridizing the number of petals is greatly increased and the natural perfume enhanced. In this way many distinct classes of roses have been formed, as the Banksia, Baurbon, Boursalt, China, Noisette, hybrid perpetual, etc., with multitudes of varieties in nearly every class. 2. A knot of ribbon formed like a rose; a rose knot; a rosette, esp. one worn on a shoe. Sha. 3. (Arch.)  A rose window. See Rose window, below. 4. A perforated nozzle, as of a pipe, spout, etc., for delivering water in fine jets; a rosehead; also, a strainer at the foot of a pump. 5. (Med.)  The erysipelas. Dunglison. 6. The card of the mariner's compass; also, a circular card with radiating lines, used in other instruments. 7. The color of a rose; rose-red; pink. 8. A diamond. See Rose diamond, below. Cabbage rose, China rose, etc. See under Cabbage, China, etc. -- Corn rose (Bot.) See Corn poppy, under Corn. -- Infantile rose (Med.), a variety of roseola. -- Jamaica rose. (Bot.) See under Jamaica. -- Rose acacia (Bot.), a low American leguminous shrub (Robinia hispida) with handsome clusters of rose-colored blossoms. -- Rose aniline. (Chem.) Same as Rosaniline. -- Rose apple (Bot.), the fruit of the tropical myrtaceous tree Eugenia Jambos. It is an edible berry an inch or more in diameter, and is said to have a very strong roselike perfume. -- Rose beetle. (Zoöl.) (a) A small yellowish or buff longlegged beetle (Macrodactylus subspinosus), which eats the leaves of various plants, and is often very injurious to rosebushes, apple trees, grapevines, etc. Called also rose bug, and rose chafer. (b) The European chafer. -- Rose bug. (Zoöl.) same as Rose beetle, Rose chafer. -- Rose burner, a kind of gas-burner producing a rose-shaped flame. -- Rose camphor (Chem.), a solid odorless substance which separates from rose oil. -- Rose campion. (Bot.) See under Campion. -- Rose catarrh (Med.), rose cold. -- Rose chafer. (Zoöl.) (a) A common European beetle (Cetonia aurata) which is often very injurious to rosebushes; -- called also rose beetle, and rose fly. (b) The rose beetle (a). -- Rose cold (Med.), a variety of hay fever, sometimes attributed to the inhalation of the effluvia of roses. See Hay fever, under Hay. -- Rose color, the color of a rose; pink; hence, a beautiful hue or appearance; fancied beauty, attractiveness, or promise. -- Rose de Pompadour, Rose du Barry, names succesively given to a delicate rose color used on Sèvres porcelain. -- Rose diamond, a diamond, one side of which is flat, and the other cut into twenty-four triangular facets in two ranges which form a convex face pointed at the top. Cf. Brilliant, n. -- Rose ear. See under Ear. -- Rose elder (Bot.), the Guelder-rose. -- Rose engine, a machine, or an appendage to a turning lathe, by which a surface or wood, metal, etc., is engraved with a variety of curved lines. Craig. -- Rose family (Bot.) the Roseceæ. See Rosaceous. -- Rose fever (Med.), rose cold. -- Rose fly (Zoöl.), a rose betle, or rose chafer. -- Rose gall (Zoöl.), any gall found on rosebushes. See Bedeguar. -- Rose knot, a ribbon, or other pliade band plaited so as to resemble a rose; a rosette. -- Rose lake, Rose madder, a rich tint prepared from lac and madder precipitated on an earthy basis. Fairholt. -- Rose mallow. (Bot.) (a) A name of several malvaceous plants of the genus Hibiscus, with large rose-colored flowers. (b) the hollyhock. -- Rose nail, a nail with a convex, faceted head. -- Rose noble, an ancient English gold coin, stamped with the figure of a rose, first struck in the reign of Edward III., and current at 6s. 8d. Sir W. Scott. -- Rose of China. (Bot.) See China rose (b), under China. -- Rose of Jericho (Bot.), a Syrian cruciferous plant (Anastatica Hierochuntica) which rolls up when dry, and expands again when moistened; -- called also resurrection plant. -- Rose of Sharon (Bot.), an ornamental malvaceous shrub (Hibiscus Syriacus). In the Bible the name is used for some flower not yet identified, perhaps a Narcissus, or possibly the great lotus flower. -- Rose oil (Chem.), the yellow essential oil extracted from various species of rose blossoms, and forming the chief part of attar of roses. -- Rose pink, a pigment of a rose color, made by dyeing chalk or whiting with a decoction of Brazil wood and alum; also, the color of the pigment. -- Rose quartz (Min.), a variety of quartz which is rose-red. -- Rose rash. (Med.) Same as Roseola. -- Rose slug (Zoöl.), the small green larva of a black sawfly (Selandria rosæ). These larvæ feed in groups on the parenchyma of the leaves of rosebushes, and are often abundant and very destructive. -- Rose window (Arch.), a circular window filled with ornamental tracery. Called also Catherine wheel, and marigold window. Cf. wheel window, under Wheel. -- Summer rose (Med.), a variety of roseola. See Roseola. -- Under the rose Etym: [a translation of L. sub rosa], in secret; privately; in a manner that forbids disclosure; -- the rose being among the ancients the symbol of secrecy, and hung up at entertainments as a token that nothing there said was to be divulged. -- Wars of the Roses (Eng. Hist.), feuds between the Houses of York and Lancaster, the white rose being the badge of the House of York, and the red rose of the House of Lancaster.  1. To render rose-colored; to redden; to flush. [Poetic] "A maid yet rosed over with the virgin crimson of modesty." Shak. 2. To perfume, as with roses. [Poetic] Tennyson.
chief: 1. The head or leader of any body of men; a commander, as of an army; a head man, as of a tribe, clan, or family; a person in authority who directs the work of others; the pricipal actio or agent. 2. The principal part; the most valuable portion. The chief of the things which should be utterly destroyed.1. Sam. xv. 21 3. (Her.)  The upper third part of the field. It is supposed to be composed of the dexter, sinister, and middle chiefs. In chief. (a) At the head; as, a commander in chief. (b) (Eng. Law) From the king, or sovereign; as, tenure in chief, tenure directly from the king. Syn. -- Chieftain; captain; general; commander; leader; head; principal; sachem; sagamore; sheik. -- Chief, chieftain, Commander, Leader. These words fluctuate somewhat in their meaning according to circumstances, but agree in the general idea of rule and authority. The term chief is now more usually applied to one who is a head man, leader, or commander in civil or military affairs, or holds a hereditary or acquired rank in a tribe or clan; as, the chief of police; the chief of an Indian tribe. A chieftain is the chief of a clan or tribe , or a military leader. A commander directs the movements of or has control over a body of men, as a military or naval force. A leader is one whom men follow, as in a political party, a legislative body, a military or scientific expedition, etc., one who takes the command and gives direction in particular enterprises.  1. Highest in office or rank; principal; head. "Chief rulers." John. xii. 42. 2. Principal or most eminent in any quality or action; most distinguished; having most influence; taking the lead; most important; as, the chief topic of conversation; the chief interest of man. 3. Very intimate, near, or close. [Obs.] A whisperer separateth chief friends. Prov. xvi. 28. Syn. -- Principal; head; leading; main; paramount; supreme; prime; vital; especial; great; grand; eminent; master.
tail: Limitation; abridgment. Burrill. Estate in tail, a limited, abridged, or reduced fee; an estate limited to certain heirs, and from which the other heirs are precluded; -- called also estate tail. Blackstone.  Limited; abridged; reduced; curtailed; as, estate tail.  1. (Zoöl.)  The terminal, and usually flexible, posterior appendage of an animal. Note: The tail of mammals and reptiles contains a series of movable vertebræ, and is covered with flesh and hairs or scales like those of other parts of the body. The tail of existing birds consists of several more or less consolidated vertebræ which supports a fanlike group of quills to which the term tail is more particularly applied. The tail of fishes consists of the tapering hind portion of the body ending in a caudal fin. The term tail is sometimes applied to the entire abdomen of a crustacean or insect, and sometimes to the terminal piece or pygidium alone. 2. Any long, flexible terminal appendage; whatever resembles, in shape or position, the tail of an animal, as a catkin. Doretus writes a great praise of the distilled waters of those tails that hang on willow trees. Harvey. 3. Hence, the back, last, lower, or inferior part of anything, -- as opposed to the Ant: head, or the superior part. The Lord will make thee the head, and not the tail. Deut. xxviii. 13. 4. A train or company of attendants; a retinue. "Ah," said he, "if you saw but the chief with his tail on." Sir W. Scott. 5. The side of a coin opposite to that which bears the head, effigy, or date; the reverse; -- rarely used except in the expression "heads or tails," employed when a coin is thrown up for the purpose of deciding some point by its fall. 6. (Anat.)  The distal tendon of a muscle. 7. (Bot.)  A downy or feathery appendage to certain achens. It is formed of the permanent elongated style. 8. (Surg.) (a) A portion of an incision, at its beginning or end, which does not go through the whole thickness of the skin, and is more painful than a complete incision; -- called also tailing. (b) One of the strips at the end of a bandage formed by splitting the bandage one or more times. 9. (Naut.)  A rope spliced to the strap of a block, by which it may be lashed to anything. 10. (Mus.)  The part of a note which runs perpendicularly upward or downward from the head; the stem. Moore (Encyc. of Music). 11. pl.  Same as Tailing, 4. 12. (Arch.)  The bottom or lower portion of a member or part, as a slate or tile. 13. pl. (Mining)  See Tailing, n., 5. Tail beam. (Arch.) Same as Tailpiece. -- Tail coverts (Zoöl.), the feathers which cover the bases of the tail quills. They are sometimes much longer than the quills, and form elegant plumes. Those above the quills are called the upper tail coverts, and those below, the under tail coverts. -- Tail end, the latter end; the termination; as, the tail end of a contest. [Colloq.] -- Tail joist. (Arch.) Same as Tailpiece. -- Tail of a comet (Astron.), a luminous train extending from the nucleus or body, often to a great distance, and usually in a direction opposite to the sun. -- Tail of a gale (Naut.), the latter part of it, when the wind has greatly abated. Totten. -- Tail of a lock (on a canal), the lower end, or entrance into the lower pond. -- Tail of the trenches (Fort.), the post where the besiegers begin to break ground, and cover themselves from the fire of the place, in advancing the lines of approach. -- Tail spindle, the spindle of the tailstock of a turning lathe; -- called also dead spindle. -- To turn tail, to run away; to flee. Would she turn tail to the heron, and fly quite out another way; but all was to return in a higher pitch. Sir P. Sidney.  1. To follow or hang to, like a tail; to be attached closely to, as that which can not be evaded. [Obs.] Nevertheless his bond of two thousand pounds, wherewith he was tailed, continued uncanceled, and was called on the next Parliament. Fuller. 2. To pull or draw by the tail. [R.] Hudibras. To tail in or on (Arch.), to fasten by one of the ends into a wall or some other support; as, to tail in a timber.  1. (Arch.)  To hold by the end; -- said of a timber when it rests upon a wall or other support; -- with in or into. 2. (Naut.)  To swing with the stern in a certain direction; -- said of a vessel at anchor; as, this vessel tails down stream. Tail on. (Naut.) See Tally on, under Tally.
crease: See Creese. Tennison.  1. A line or mark made by folding or doubling any pliable substance; hence, a similar mark, howewer produced. 2. (Cricket)  One of the lines serving to define the limits of the bowler and the striker. Bowling crease (Cricket), a line extending three feet four inches on each side of the central strings at right angles to the line between the wickets. -- Return crease (Cricket), a short line at each end of the bowling crease and at right angles to it, extending toward the bowler. -- Popping crease (Cricket),, a line drawn in front of the wicket, four feet distant from it, parallel to the bowling crease and at least as long as the latter. J. H. Walsh (Encyc. of Rural Sports).  To make a crease or mark in, as by folding or doubling. Creased, like dog's ears in a folio. Gray.
thin: 1. Having little thickness or extent from one surface to its opposite; as, a thin plate of metal; thin paper; a thin board; a thin covering. 2. Rare; not dense or thick; -- applied to fluids or soft mixtures; as, thin blood; thin broth; thin air. Shak. In the day, when the air is more thin. Bacon. Satan, bowing low His gray dissimulation, disappeared, Into thin air diffused. Milton. 3. Not close; not crowded; not filling the space; not having the individuals of which the thing is composed in a close or compact state; hence, not abundant; as, the trees of a forest are thin; the corn or grass is thin. Ferrara is very large, but extremely thin of people. Addison. 4. Not full or well grown; wanting in plumpness. Seven thin ears . . . blasted with the east wind. Gen. xli. 6. 5. Not stout; slim; slender; lean; gaunt; as, a person becomes thin by disease. 6. Wanting in body or volume; small; feeble; not full. Thin, hollow sounds, and lamentable screams. Dryden. 7. Slight; small; slender; flimsy; wanting substance or depth or force; superficial; inadequate; not sufficient for a covering; as, a thin disguise. My tale is done, for my wit is but thin. Chaucer. Note: Thin is used in the formation of compounds which are mostly self-explaining; as, thin-faced, thin-lipped, thin-peopled, thin- shelled, and the like. Thin section. See under Section.  Not thickly or closely; in a seattered state; as, seed sown thin. Spain is thin sown of people. Bacon.  To make thin (in any of the senses of the adjective).  To grow or become thin; -- used with some adverbs, as out, away, etc.; as, geological strata thin out, i. e., gradually diminish in thickness until they disappear.
yellow: Being of a bright saffronlike color; of the color of gold or brass; having the hue of that part of the rainbow, or of the solar spectrum, which is between the orange and the green. Her yellow hair was browded [braided] in a tress. Chaucer. A sweaty reaper from his tillage brought First fruits, the green ear and the yellow sheaf. Milton. The line of yellow light dies fast away. Keble. Yellow atrophy (Med.), a fatal affection of the liver, in which it undergoes fatty degeneration, and becomes rapidly smaller and of a deep yellow tinge. The marked symptoms are black vomit, delirium, convulsions, coma, and jaundice. -- Yellow bark, calisaya bark. -- Yellow bass (Zoöl.), a North American fresh-water bass (Morone interrupta) native of the lower parts of the Mississippi and its tributaries. It is yellow, with several more or less broken black stripes or bars. Called also barfish. -- Yellow berry. (Bot.) Same as Persian berry, under Persian. -- Yellow boy, a gold coin, as a guinea. [Slang] Arbuthnot. -- Yellow brier. (Bot.) See under Brier. -- Yellow bugle (Bot.), a European labiate plant (Ajuga Chamæpitys). -- Yellow bunting (Zoöl.), the European yellow-hammer. -- Yellow cat (Zoöl.), a yellow catfish; especially, the bashaw. -- Yellow copperas (Min.), a hydrous sulphate of iron; -- called also copiapite. -- Yellow copper ore, a sulphide of copper and iron; copper pyrites. See Chalcopyrite. -- Yellow cress (Bot.), a yellow-flowered, cruciferous plant (Barbarea præcox), sometimes grown as a salad plant. -- Yellow dock. (Bot.) See the Note under Dock. -- Yellow earth, a yellowish clay, colored by iron, sometimes used as a yellow pigment. -- Yellow fever (Med.), a malignant, contagious, febrile disease of warm climates, attended with jaundice, producing a yellow color of the skin, and with the black vomit. See Black vomit, in the Vocabulary. -- Yellow flag, the quarantine flag. See under Quarantine, and 3d Flag. -- Yellow jack. (a) The yellow fever. See under 2d Jack. (b) The quarantine flag. See under Quarantine. -- Yellow jacket (Zoöl.), any one of several species of American social wasps of the genus Vespa, in which the color of the body is partly bright yellow. These wasps are noted for their irritability, and for their painful stings. -- Yellow lead ore (Min.), wulfenite. -- Yellow lemur (Zoöl.), the kinkajou. -- Yellow macauco (Zoöl.), the kinkajou. -- Yellow mackerel (Zoöl.), the jurel. -- Yellow metal. Same as Muntz metal, under Metal. -- Yellow ocher (Min.), an impure, earthy variety of brown iron ore, which is used as a pigment. -- Yellow oxeye (Bot.), a yellow-flowered plant (Chrysanthemum segetum) closely related to the oxeye daisy. -- Yellow perch (Zoöl.), the common American perch. See Perch. -- Yellow pike (Zoöl.), the wall-eye. -- Yellow pine (Bot.), any of several kinds of pine; also, their yellowish and generally durable timber. Among the most common are valuable species are Pinus mitis and P. palustris of the Eastern and Southern States, and P. ponderosa and P. Arizonica of the Rocky Mountains and Pacific States. -- Yellow plover (Zoöl.), the golden plover. -- Yellow precipitate (Med. Chem.), an oxide of mercury which is thrown down as an amorphous yellow powder on adding corrosive sublimate to limewater. -- Yellow puccoon. (Bot.) Same as Orangeroot. -- Yellow rail (Zoöl.), a small American rail (Porzana Noveboracensis) in which the lower parts are dull yellow, darkest on the breast. The back is streaked with brownish yellow and with black, and spotted with white. Called also yellow crake. -- Yellow rattle, Yellow rocket. (Bot.) See under Rattle, and Rocket. -- Yellow Sally (Zoöl.), a greenish or yellowish European stone fly of the genus Chloroperla; -- so called by anglers. -- Yellow sculpin (Zoöl.), the dragonet. -- Yellow snake (Zoöl.), a West Indian boa (Chilobothrus inornatus) common in Jamaica. It becomes from eight to ten long. The body is yellowish or yellowish green, mixed with black, and anteriorly with black lines. -- Yellow spot. (a) (Anat.) A small yellowish spot with a central pit, the fovea centralis, in the center of the retina where vision is most accurate. See Eye. (b) (Zoöl.) A small American butterfly (Polites Peckius) of the Skipper family. Its wings are brownish, with a large, irregular, bright yellow spot on each of the hind wings, most conspicuous beneath. Called also Peck's skipper. See Illust. under Skipper, n., 5. -- Yellow tit (Zoöl.), any one of several species of crested titmice of the genus Machlolophus, native of India. The predominating colors of the plumage are yellow and green. -- Yellow viper (Zoöl.), the fer-de-lance. -- Yellow warbler (Zoöl.), any one of several species of American warblers of the genus Dendroica in which the predominant color is yellow, especially D. æstiva, which is a very abundant and familiar species; -- called also garden warbler, golden warbler, summer yellowbird, summer warbler, and yellow-poll warbler. -- Yellow wash (Pharm.), yellow oxide of mercury suspended in water, -- a mixture prepared by adding corrosive sublimate to limewater. -- Yellow wren (Zoöl.) (a) The European willow warbler. (b) The European wood warbler.  1. A bright golden color, reflecting more light than any other except white; the color of that part of the spectrum which is between the orange and green. "A long motley coat guarded with yellow." Shak. 2. A yellow pigment. Cadmium yellow, Chrome yellow, Indigo yellow, King's yellow, etc. See under Cadmium, Chrome, etc. -- Naples yellow, a yellow amorphous pigment, used in oil, porcelain, and enamel painting, consisting of a basic lead metantimonate, obtained by fusing together tartar emetic lead nitrate, and common salt. -- Patent yellow (Old Chem.), a yellow pigment consisting essentially of a lead oxychloride; -- called also Turner's yellow.  To make yellow; to cause to have a yellow tinge or color; to dye yellow.  To become yellow or yellower.
never: 1. Not ever; not at any time; at no time, whether past, present, or future. Shak. Death still draws nearer, never seeming near. Pope. 2. In no degree; not in the least; not. Whosoever has a friend to guide him, may carry his eyes in another man's head, and yet see never the worse. South. And he answered him to never a word. Matt. xxvii. 14. Note: Never is much used in composition with present participles to form adjectives, as in never-ceasing, never-dying, never-ending, never-fading, never-failing, etc., retaining its usual signification. Never a deal, not a bit. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Never so, as never before; more than at any other time, or in any other circumstances; especially; particularly; -- now often expressed or replaced by ever so. Ask me never so much dower and gift. Gen. xxxiv. 12. A fear of battery, ... though never so well grounded, is no duress. Blackstone.
spot: 1. A mark on a substance or body made by foreign matter; a blot; a place discolored. Out, damned spot! Out, I say! Shak. 2. A stain on character or reputation; something that soils purity; disgrace; reproach; fault; blemish. Yet Chloe, sure, was formed without a spot. Pope. 3. A small part of a different color from the main part, or from the ground upon which it is; as, the spots of a leopard; the spots on a playing card. 4. A small extent of space; a place; any particular place. "Fixed to one spot." Otway. That spot to which I point is Paradise. Milton. "A jolly place," said he, "in times of old! But something ails it now: the spot is cursed." Wordsworth. 5. (Zoöl.)  A variety of the common domestic pigeon, so called from a spot on its head just above its beak. 6. (Zoöl.) (a) A sciænoid food fish (Liostomus xanthurus) of the Atlantic coast of the United States. It has a black spot behind the shoulders and fifteen oblique dark bars on the sides. Called also goody, Lafayette, masooka, and old wife. (b) The southern redfish, or red horse, which has a spot on each side at the base of the tail. See Redfish. 7. pl.  Commodities, as merchandise and cotton, sold for immediate delivery. [Broker's Cant] Crescent spot (Zoöl.), any butterfly of the family Melitæidæ having crescent-shaped white spots along the margins of the red or brown wings. -- Spot lens (Microscopy), a condensing lens in which the light is confined to an annular pencil by means of a small, round diaphragm (the spot), and used in dark-field ilumination; -- called also spotted lens. -- Spot rump (Zoöl.), the Hudsonian godwit (Limosa hæmastica). -- Spots on the sun. (Astron.) See Sun spot, ander Sun. -- On, or Upon, the spot, immediately; before moving; without changing place. It was determined upon the spot. Swift. Syn. -- Stain; flaw; speck; blot; disgrace; reproach; fault; blemish; place; site; locality.  1. To make visible marks upon with some foreign matter; to discolor in or with spots; to stain; to cover with spots or figures; as, to spot a garnment; to spot paper. 2. To mark or note so as to insure recognition; to recognize; to detect; as, to spot a criminal. [Cant] 3. To stain; to blemish; to taint; to disgrace; to tarnish, as reputation; to asperse. My virgin life no spotted thoughts shall stain. Sir P. Sidney. If ever I shall close these eyes but once, May I live spotted for my perjury. Beau. & Fl. To spot timber, to cut or chip it, in preparation for hewing.  To become stained with spots.
us: The persons speaking, regarded as an object; ourselves; -- the objective case of we. See We. "Tell us a tale." Chaucer. Give us this day our daily bread. Matt. vi. 11.
now: 1. At the present time; at this moment; at the time of speaking; instantly; as, I will write now. I have a patient now living, at an advanced age, who discharged blood from his lungs thirty years ago. Arbuthnot. 2. Very lately; not long ago. They that but now, for honor and for plate, Made the sea blush with blood, resign their hate. Waller. 3. At a time contemporaneous with something spoken of or contemplated; at a particular time referred to. The ship was now in the midst of the sea. Matt. xiv. 24. 4. In present circumstances; things being as they are; -- hence, used as a connective particle, to introduce an inference or an explanation. How shall any man distinguish now betwixt a parasite and a man of honor L'Estrange. Why should he live, now nature bankrupt is Shak. Then cried they all again, saying, Not this man, but Barabbas. Now, Barabbas was a robber. John xviii. 40. The other great and undoing mischief which befalls men is, by their being misrepresented. Now, by calling evil good, a man is misrepresented to others in the way of slander. South. Now and again, now and then; occasionally. -- Now and now, again and again; repeatedly. [Obs.] Chaucer. -- Now and then, at one time and another; indefinitely; occasionally; not often; at intervals. "A mead here, there a heath, and now and then a wood." Drayton. -- Now now, at this very instant; precisely now. [Obs.] "Why, even now now, at holding up of this finger, and before the turning down of this." J. Webster (1607). -- Now . . . now, alternately; at one time . . . at another time. "Now high, now low, now master up, now miss." Pope.  Existing at the present time; present. [R.] "Our now happiness." Glanvill.  The present time or moment; the present. Nothing is there to come, and nothing past; But an eternal now does ever last. Cowley.
from: Out of the neighborhood of; lessening or losing proximity to; leaving behind; by reason of; out of; by aid of; -- used whenever departure, setting out, commencement of action, being, state, occurrence, etc., or procedure, emanation, absence, separation, etc., are to be expressed. It is construed with, and indicates, the point of space or time at which the action, state, etc., are regarded as setting out or beginning; also, less frequently, the source, the cause, the occasion, out of which anything proceeds; -- the aritithesis and correlative of to; as, it, is one hundred miles from Boston to Springfield; he took his sword from his side; light proceeds from the sun; separate the coarse wool from the fine; men have all sprung from Adam, and often go from good to bad, and from bad to worse; the merit of an action depends on the principle from which it proceeds; men judge of facts from personal knowledge, or from testimony. Experience from the time past to the time present. Bacon. The song began from Jove. Drpden. From high Mæonia's rocky shores I came. Addison. If the wind blow any way from shore. Shak. Note: From sometimes denotes away from, remote from, inconsistent with. "Anything so overdone is from the purpose of playing." Shak. From, when joined with another preposition or an adverb, gives an opportunity for abbreviating the sentence. "There followed him great multitudes of people . . . from [the land] beyond Jordan." Math. iv. 25. In certain constructions, as from forth, from out, etc., the ordinary and more obvious arrangment is inverted, the sense being more distinctly forth from, out from -- from being virtually the governing preposition, and the word the adverb. See From off, under Off, adv., and From afar, under Afar, adv. Sudden partings such as press The life from out young hearts. Byron.
note: To butt; to push with the horns. [Prov. Eng.]  Know not; knows not. [Obs.]  Nut. [Obs.] Chaucer.  Need; needful business. [Obs.] Chaucer.  1. A mark or token by which a thing may be known; a visible sign; a character; a distinctive mark or feature; a characteristic quality. Whosoever appertain to the visible body of the church, they have also the notes of external profession. Hooker. She [the Anglican church] has the note of possession, the note of freedom from party titles,the note of life -- a tough life and a vigorous. J. H. Newman. What a note of youth, of imagination, of impulsive eagerness, there was through it all ! Mrs. Humphry Ward. 2. A mark, or sign, made to call attention, to point out something to notice, or the like; a sign, or token, proving or giving evidence. 3. A brief remark; a marginal comment or explanation; hence, an annotation on a text or author; a comment; a critical, explanatory, or illustrative observation. The best writers have been perplexed with notes, and obscured with illustrations. Felton. 4. A brief writing intended to assist the memory; a memorandum; a minute. 5. pl.  Hence, a writing intended to be used in speaking; memoranda to assist a speaker, being either a synopsis, or the full text of what is to be said; as, to preach from notes; also, a reporter's memoranda; the original report of a speech or of proceedings. 6. A short informal letter; a billet. 7. A diplomatic missive or written communication. 8. A written or printed paper acknowledging a debt, and promising payment; as, a promissory note; a note of hand; a negotiable note. 9. A list of items or of charges; an account. [Obs.] Here is now the smith's note for shoeing. Shak. 10. (Mus.) (a) A character, variously formed, to indicate the length of a tone, and variously placed upon the staff to indicate its pitch. Hence: (b) A musical sound; a tone; an utterance; a tune. (c) A key of the piano or organ. The wakeful bird . . . tunes her nocturnal note. Milton. That note of revolt against the eighteenth century, which we detect in Goethe, was struck by Winckelmann. W. Pater. 11. Observation; notice; heed. Give orders to my servants that they take No note at all of our being absent hence. Shak. 12. Notification; information; intelligence. [Obs.] The king . . . shall have note of this. Shak. 13. State of being under observation. [Obs.] Small matters . . . continually in use and in note. Bacon. 14. Reputation; distinction; as, a poet of note. There was scarce a family of note which had not poured out its blood on the field or the scaffold. Prescott. 15. Stigma; brand; reproach. [Obs.] Shak. Note of hand, a promissory note.  1. To notice with care; to observe; to remark; to heed; to attend to. Pope. No more of that; I have noted it well. Shak. 2. To record in writing; to make a memorandum of. Every unguarded word . . . was noted down. Maccaulay. 3. To charge, as with crime (with of or for before the thing charged); to brand. [Obs.] They were both noted of incontinency. Dryden. 4. To denote; to designate. Johnson. 5. To annotate. [R.] W. H. Dixon. 6. To set down in musical characters. To note a bill or draft, to record on the back of it a refusal of acceptance, as the ground of a protest, which is done officially by a notary.
tie: 1. A knot; a fastening. 2. A bond; an obligation, moral or legal; as, the sacred ties of friendship or of duty; the ties of allegiance. No distance breaks the tie of blood. Young. 3. A knot of hair, as at the back of a wig. Young. 4. An equality in numbers, as of votes, scores, etc., which prevents either party from being victorious; equality in any contest, as a race. 5. (Arch. & Engin.)  A beam or rod for holding two parts together; in railways, one of the transverse timbers which support the track and keep it in place. 6. (Mus.)  A line, usually straight, drawn across the stems of notes, or a curved line written over or under the notes, signifying that they are to be slurred, or closely united in the performance, or that two notes of the same pitch are to be sounded as one; a bind; a ligature. 7. pl.  Low shoes fastened with lacings. Bale tie, a fastening for the ends of a hoop for a bale.  1. To fasten with a band or cord and knot; to bind. "Tie the kine to the cart." 1 Sam. vi. 7. My son, keep thy father's commandment, and forsake not the law of thy mother: bind them continually upon thine heart, and tie them about thy neck. Prov. vi. 20,21. 2. To form, as a knot, by interlacing or complicating a cord; also, to interlace, or form a knot in; as, to tie a cord to a tree; to knit; to knot. "We do not tie this knot with an intention to puzzle the argument." Bp. Burnet. 3. To unite firmly; to fasten; to hold. In bond of virtuous love together tied. Fairfax. 4. To hold or constrain by authority or moral influence, as by knotted cords; to oblige; to constrain; to restrain; to confine. Not tied to rules of policy, you find Revenge less sweet than a forgiving mind. Dryden. 5. (Mus.)  To unite, as notes, by a cross line, or by a curved line, or slur, drawn over or under them. 6. To make an equal score with, in a contest; to be even with. To ride and tie. See under Ride. -- To tie down. (a) To fasten so as to prevent from rising. (b) To restrain; to confine; to hinder from action. -- To tie up, to confine; to restrain; to hinder from motion or action.  To make a tie; to make an equal score.
caught: f Catch.
read: Rennet. See 3d Reed. [Prov. Eng.]  1. To advise; to counsel. [Obs.] See Rede. Therefore, I read thee, get to God's word, and thereby try all doctrine. Tyndale. 2. To interpret; to explain; as, to read a riddle. 3. To tell; to declare; to recite. [Obs.] But read how art thou named, and of what kin. Spenser. 4. To go over, as characters or words, and utter aloud, or recite to one's self inaudibly; to take in the sense of, as of language, by interpreting the characters with which it is expressed; to peruse; as, to read a discourse; to read the letters of an alphabet; to read figures; to read the notes of music, or to read music; to read a book. Redeth [read ye] the great poet of Itaille. Chaucer. Well could he rede a lesson or a story. Chaucer. 5. Hence, to know fully; to comprehend. Who is't can read a woman Shak. 6. To discover or understand by characters, marks, features, etc.; to learn by observation. An armed corse did lie, In whose dead face he read great magnanimity. Spenser. Those about her From her shall read the perfect ways of honor. Shak. 7. To make a special study of, as by perusing textbooks; as, to read theology or law. To read one's self in, to read about the Thirty-nine Articles and the Declaration of Assent, -- required of a clergyman of the Church of England when he first officiates in a new benefice.  1. To give advice or counsel. [Obs.] 2. To tell; to declare. [Obs.] Spenser. 3. To perform the act of reading; to peruse, or to go over and utter aloud, the words of a book or other like document. So they read in the book of the law of God distinctly, and gave the sense. Neh. viii. 8. 4. To study by reading; as, he read for the bar. 5. To learn by reading. I have read of an Eastern king who put a judge to death for an iniquitous sentence. Swift. 6. To appear in writing or print; to be expressed by, or consist of, certain words or characters; as, the passage reads thus in the early manuscripts. 7. To produce a certain effect when read; as, that sentence reads queerly. To read between the lines, to infer something different from what is plainly indicated; to detect the real meaning as distinguished from the apparent meaning.  1. Saying; sentence; maxim; hence, word; advice; counsel. See Rede. [Obs.] 2. Etym: [Read, v.]  Reading. [Colloq.] Hume. One newswoman here lets magazines for a penny a read. Furnivall.  imp. & p. p. of Read, v. t. & i.  Instructed or knowing by reading; versed in books; learned. A poet . . . well read in Longinus. Addison.
vowel: A vocal, or sometimes a whispered, sound modified by resonance in the oral passage, the peculiar resonance in each case giving to each several vowel its distinctive character or quality as a sound of speech; -- distinguished from a consonant in that the latter, whether made with or without vocality, derives its character in every case from some kind of obstructive action by the mouth organs. Also, a letter or character which represents such a sound. See Guide to Pronunciation, §§ 5, 146-149. Note: In the English language, the written vowels are a, e, i, o, u, and sometimes w and y. The spoken vowels are much more numerous. Close vowel. See under Close, a. -- Vowel point. See under Point, n.  Of or pertaining to a vowel; vocal.
complete: 1. Filled up; with no part or element lacking; free from deficienty; entire; perfect; consummate. "Complete perfections." Milton. Ye are complete in him. Col. ii. 10. That thou, dead corse, again in complete steel Revesit'st thus the glimpses of the moon. Shak. 2. Finished; ended; concluded; completed; as, the edifice is complete. This course of vanity almost complete. Prior. 3. (Bot.)  Having all the parts or organs which belong to it or to the typical form; having calyx, corolla, stamens, and pistil. Syn. -- See Whole.  To bring to a state in which there is no deficiency; to perfect; to consummate; to accomplish; to fulfill; to finish; as, to complete a task, or a poem; to complete a course of education. Bred only and completed to the taste Of lustful appetence. Milton. And, to complete her bliss, a fool for mate. Pope. Syn. -- To perform; execute; terminate; conclude; finish; end; fill up; achieve; realize; effect; consummate; accomplish; effectuate; fulfill; bring to pass.
nine: Eight and one more; one less than ten; as, nine miles. Nine men's morris. See Morris. -- Nine points circle (Geom.), a circle so related to any given triangle as to pass through the three points in which the perpendiculars from the angles of the triangle upon the opposite sides (or the sides produced) meet the sides. It also passes through the three middle points of the sides of the triangle and through the three middle points of those parts of the perpendiculars that are between their common point of meeting and the angles of the triangle. The circle is hence called the nine points or six points circle.  1. The number greater than eight by a unit; nine units or objects. 2. A symbol representing nine units, as 9 or ix. The Nine, the nine Muses.
choose: 1. To make choice of; to select; to take by way of preference from two or more objects offered; to elect; as, to choose the least of two evils. Choose me for a humble friend. Pope. 2. To wish; to desire; to prefer. [Colloq.] The landlady now returned to know if we did not choose a more genteel apartment. Goldsmith. To choose sides. See under Side. Syn. - To select; prefer; elect; adopt; follow. -- To Choose, Prefer, Elect. To choose is the generic term, and denotes to take or fix upon by an act of the will, especially in accordance with a decision of the judgment. To prefer is to choose or favor one thing as compared with, and more desirable than, another, or more in accordance with one's tastes and feelings. To elect is to choose or select for some office, employment, use, privilege, etc., especially by the concurrent vote or voice of a sufficient number of electors. To choose a profession; to prefer private life to a public one; to elect members of Congress.  1. To make a selection; to decide. They had only to choose between implicit obedience and open rebellion. Prescott. 2. To do otherwise. "Can I choose but smile" Pope. Can not choose but, must necessarily. Thou canst not choose but know who I am. Shak.
gentle: 1. Well-born; of a good family or respectable birth, though not noble. British society is divided into nobility, gentry, and yeomanry, and families are either noble, gentle, or simple. Johnson's Cyc. The studies wherein our noble and gentle youth ought to bestow their time. Milton. 2. Quiet and refined in manners; not rough, harsh, or stern; mild; meek; bland; amiable; tender; as, a gentle nature, temper, or disposition; a gentle manner; a gentle address; a gentle voice. 3. A compellative of respect, consideration, or conciliation; as, gentle reader. "Gentle sirs." "Gentle Jew." "Gentle servant." Shak. 4. Not wild, turbulent, or refractory; quiet and docile; tame; peaceable; as, a gentle horse. 5. Soft; not violent or rough; not strong, loud, or disturbing; easy; soothing; pacific; as, a gentle touch; a gentle gallop. "Gentle music." Sir J. Davies. O sleep! it is a gentle thing. Coleridge. The gentle craft, the art or trade of shoemaking. Syn. -- Mild; meek; placid; dovelike; quiet; peaceful; pacific; bland; soft; tame; tractable; docile. -- Gentle, Tame, Mild, Meek. Gentle describes the natural disposition; tame, that which is subdued by training; mild implies a temper which is, by nature, not easily provoked; meek, a spirit which has been schooled to mildness by discipline or suffering. The lamb is gentle; the domestic fowl is tame; John, the Apostle, was mild; Moses was meek.  1. One well born; a gentleman. [Obs.] Gentles, methinks you frown. Shak. 2. A trained falcon. See Falcon-gentil. 3. (Zoöl.)  A dipterous larva used as fish bait.  1. To make genteel; to raise from the vulgar; to ennoble. [Obs.] Shak. 2. To make smooth, cozy, or agreeable. [R. or Poet.] To gentle life's descent, We shut our eyes, and think it is a plain. Young. 3. To make kind and docile, as a horse. [Colloq.]
song: 1. That which is sung or uttered with musical modulations of the voice, whether of a human being or of a bird, insect, etc. "That most ethereal of all sounds, the song of crickets." Hawthorne. 2. A lyrical poem adapted to vocal music; a ballad. 3. More generally, any poetical strain; a poem. The bard that first adorned our native tongue Tuned to his British lyre this ancient song. Dryden. 4. Poetical composition; poetry; verse. This subject for heroic song. Milton. 5. An object of derision; a laughingstock. And now am I their song. yea, I am their byword. Job xxx. 9. 6. A trifle. "The soldier's pay is a song." Silliman. Old song, a trifle; nothing of value. "I do not intend to be thus put off with an old song." Dr. H. More. -- Song bird (Zoöl.), any singing bird; one of the Oscines. -- Song sparrow (Zoöl.), a very common North American sparrow (Melospiza fasciata, or M. melodia) noted for the sweetness of its song in early spring. Its breast is covered with dusky brown streaks which form a blotch in the center. -- Song thrush (Zoöl.), a common European thrush (Turdus musicus), noted for its melodius song; -- called also mavis, throsite, and thrasher. Syn. -- Sonnet; ballad; canticle; carol; canzonet; ditty; hymn; descant; lay; strain; poesy; verse.
quart: The fourth part; a quarter; hence, a region of the earth. [Obs.] Camber did possess the western quart. Spenser.  1. A measure of capacity, both in dry and in liquid measure; the fourth part of a gallon; the eighth part of a peck; two pints. Note: In imperial measure, a quart is forty English fluid ounces; in wine measure, it is thirty-two American fluid ounces. The United States dry quart contains 67.20 cubic inches, the fluid quart 57.75. The English quart contains 69.32 cubic inches. 2. A vessel or measure containing a quart.  In cards, four successive cards of the same suit. Cf. Tierce, 4. Hoyle.
milk: 1. (Physiol.)  A white fluid secreted by the mammary glands of female mammals for the nourishment of their young, consisting of minute globules of fat suspended in a solution of casein, albumin, milk sugar, and inorganic salts. "White as morne milk." Chaucer. 2. (Bot.)  A kind of juice or sap, usually white in color, found in certain plants; latex. See Latex. 3. An emulsion made by bruising seeds; as, the milk of almonds, produced by pounding almonds with sugar and water. 4. (Zoöl.)  The ripe, undischarged spat of an oyster. Condensed milk. See under Condense, v. t. -- Milk crust (Med.), vesicular eczema occurring on the face and scalp of nursing infants. See Eczema. -- Milk fever. (a) (Med.) A fever which accompanies or precedes the first lactation. It is usually transitory. (b) (Vet. Surg.) A form puerperal peritonitis in cattle; also, a variety of meningitis occurring in cows after calving. -- Milk glass, glass having a milky appearance. -- Milk knot (Med.), a hard lump forming in the breast of a nursing woman, due to obstruction to the flow of milk and congestion of the mammary glands. -- Milk leg (Med.), a swollen condition of the leg, usually in puerperal women, caused by an inflammation of veins, and characterized by a white appearance occasioned by an accumulation of serum and sometimes of pus in the cellular tissue. -- Milk meats, food made from milk, as butter and cheese. [Obs.] Bailey. -- Milk mirror. Same as Escutcheon, 2. -- Milk molar (Anat.), one of the deciduous molar teeth which are shed and replaced by the premolars. -- Milk of lime (Chem.), a watery emulsion of calcium hydrate, produced by macerating quicklime in water. -- Milk parsley (Bot.), an umbelliferous plant (Peucedanum palustre) of Europe and Asia, having a milky juice. -- Milk pea (Bot.), a genus (Galactia) of leguminous and, usually, twining plants. -- Milk sickness (Med.), a peculiar malignant disease, occurring in some parts of the Western United States, and affecting certain kinds of farm stock (esp. cows), and persons who make use of the meat or dairy products of infected cattle. Its chief symptoms in man are uncontrollable vomiting, obstinate constipation, pain, and muscular tremors. Its origin in cattle has been variously ascribed to the presence of certain plants in their food, and to polluted drinking water. -- Milk snake (Zoöl.), a harmless American snake (Ophibolus triangulus, or O. eximius). It is variously marked with white, gray, and red. Called also milk adder, chicken snake, house snake, etc. -- Milk sugar. (Physiol. Chem.) See Lactose, and Sugar of milk (below). -- Milk thistle (Bot.), an esculent European thistle (Silybum marianum), having the veins of its leaves of a milky whiteness. -- Milk thrush. (Med.) See Thrush. -- Milk tooth (Anat.), one of the temporary first set of teeth in young mammals; in man there are twenty. -- Milk tree (Bot.), a tree yielding a milky juice, as the cow tree of South America (Brosimum Galactodendron), and the Euphorbia balsamifera of the Canaries, the milk of both of which is wholesome food. -- Milk vessel (Bot.), a special cell in the inner bark of a plant, or a series of cells, in which the milky juice is contained. See Latex. -- Rock milk. See Agaric mineral, under Agaric. -- Sugar of milk. The sugar characteristic of milk; a hard white crystalline slightly sweet substance obtained by evaporation of the whey of milk. It is used in pellets and powder as a vehicle for homeopathic medicines, and as an article of diet. See Lactose.  1. To draw or press milk from the breasts or udder of, by the hand or mouth; to withdraw the milk of. "Milking the kine." Gay. I have given suck, and know How tender 't is to love the babe that milks me. Shak. 2. To draw from the breasts or udder; to extract, as milk; as, to milk wholesome milk from healthy cows. 3. To draw anything from, as if by milking; to compel to yield profit or advantage; to plunder. Tyndale. They [the lawyers] milk an unfortunate estate as regularly as a dairyman does his stock. London Spectator. To milk the street, to squeeze the smaller operators in stocks and extract a profit from them, by alternately raising and depressing prices within a short range; -- said of the large dealers. [Cant] -- To milk a telegram, to use for one's own advantage the contents of a telegram belonging to another person. [Cant]  To draw or to yield milk.
box: A tree or shrub, flourishing in different parts of the world. The common box (Buxus sempervirens) has two varieties, one of which, the dwaft box (B.suffruticosa), is much used for borders in gardens. The wood of the tree varieties, being very hard and smooth, is extensively used in the arts, as by turners, engravers, mathematical instrument makers, etc. Box elder, the ash-leaved maple (Negundo aceroides), of North America. -- Box holly, the butcher's broom (Russus aculeatus). -- Box thorn, a shrub (Lycium barbarum). -- Box tree, the tree variety of the common box.  1. A receptacle or case of any firm material and of various shapes. 2. The quantity that a box contain. 3. A space with a few seats partitioned off in a theater, or other place of public amusement. Laughed at by the pit, box, galleries, nay, stage. Dorset. The boxes and the pit are sovereign judges. Dryden. 4. A chest or any receptacle for the deposit of money; as, a poor box; a contribution box. Yet since his neighbors give, the churl unlocks, Damning the poor, his tripple-bolted box. J. Warton. 5. A small country house. "A shooting box." Wilson. Tight boxes neatly sashed. Cowper. 6. A boxlike shed for shelter; as, a sentry box. 7. (Mach) (a) An axle box, journal box, journal bearing, or bushing. (b) A chamber or section of tube in which a valve works; the bucket of a lifting pump. 8. The driver's seat on a carriage or coach. 9. A present in a box; a present; esp. a Christmas box or gift. "A Christmas box." Dickens. 10. (Baseball)  The square in which the pitcher stands. 11. (Zoöl.)  A Mediterranean food fish; the bogue. Note: Box is much used adjectively or in composition; as box lid, box maker, box circle, etc.; also with modifying substantives; as money box, letter box, bandbox, hatbox or hat box, snuff box or snuffbox. Box beam (Arch.), a beam made of metal plates so as to have the form of a long box. -- Box car (Railroads), a freight car covered with a roof and inclosed on the sides to protect its contents. -- Box chronometer, a ship's chronometer, mounted in gimbals, to preserve its proper position. -- Box coat, a thick overcoat for driving; sometimes with a heavy cape to carry off the rain. -- Box coupling, a metal collar uniting the ends of shafts or other parts in machinery. -- Box crab (Zoöl.), a crab of the genus Calappa, which, when at rest with the legs retracted, resembles a box. -- Box drain (Arch.), a drain constructed with upright sides, and with flat top and bottom. -- Box girder (Arch.), a box beam. -- Box groove (Metal Working), a closed groove between two rolls, formed by a collar on one roll fitting between collars on another. R. W. Raymond. -- Box metal, an alloy of copper and tin, or of zinc, lead, and antimony, for the bearings of journals, etc. -- Box plait, a plait that doubles both to the rigth and the left. -- Box turtle or Box tortoise (Zoöl.), a land tortoise or turtle of the genera Cistudo and Emys; -- so named because it can withdraw entirely within its shell, which can be closed by hinged joints in the lower shell. Also, humorously, an exceedingly reticent person. Emerson. -- In a box, in a perplexity or an embarrassing position; in difficulty. (Colloq.) -- In the wrong box, out of one's place; out of one's element; awkwardly situated. (Colloq.) Ridley (1554)  1. To inclose in a box. 2. To furnish with boxes, as a wheel. 3. (Arch.)  To inclose with boarding, lathing, etc., so as to bring to a required form. To box a tree, to make an incision or hole in a tree for the purpose of procuring the sap. -- To box off, to divide into tight compartments. -- To box up. (a) To put into a box in order to save; as, he had boxed up twelve score pounds. (b) To confine; as, to be boxed up in narrow quarters.  A blow on the head or ear with the hand. A good-humored box on the ear. W. Irving.  To fight with the fist; to combat with, or as with, the hand or fist; to spar.  To strike with the hand or fist, especially to strike on the ear, or on the side of the head.  To boxhaul. To box off (Naut.), to turn the head of a vessel either way by bracing the headyards aback. -- To box the compass (Naut.), to name the thirty-two points of the compass in their order.
boat: 1. A small open vessel, or water craft, usually moved by cars or paddles, but often by a sail. Note: Different kinds of boats have different names; as, canoe, yawl, wherry, pinnace, punt, etc. 2. Hence, any vessel; usually with some epithet descriptive of its use or mode of propulsion; as, pilot boat, packet boat, passage boat, advice boat, etc. The term is sometimes applied to steam vessels, even of the largest class; as, the Cunard boats. 3. A vehicle, utensil, or dish, somewhat resembling a boat in shape; as, a stone boat; a gravy boat. Note: Boat is much used either adjectively or in combination; as, boat builder or boatbuilder; boat building or boatbuilding; boat hook or boathook; boathouse; boat keeper or boatkeeper; boat load; boat race; boat racing; boat rowing; boat song; boatlike; boat-shaped. Advice boat. See under Advice. -- Boat hook (Naut.), an iron hook with a point on the back, fixed to a long pole, to pull or push a boat, raft, log, etc. Totten. -- Boat rope, a rope for fastening a boat; -- usually called a painter. -- In the same boat, in the same situation or predicament. [Colloq.] F. W. Newman.  1. To transport in a boat; as, to boat goods. 2. To place in a boat; as, to boat oars. To boat the oars. See under Oar.  To go or row in a boat. I boated over, ran my craft aground. Tennyson.
climb: 1. To ascend or mount laboriously, esp. by use of the hands and feet. 2. To ascend as if with effort; to rise to a higher point. Black vapors climb aloft, and cloud the day. Dryden. 3. (Bot.)  To ascend or creep upward by twining about a support, or by attaching itself by tendrills, rootlets, etc., to a support or upright surface.  To ascend, as by means of the hands and feet, or laboriously or slowly; to mount.  The act of one who climbs; ascent by climbing. Warburton.
very: True; real; actual; veritable. Whether thou be my very son Esau or not. Gen. xxvii. 21. He that covereth a transgression seeketh love; but he that repeateth a matter separateth very friends. Prov. xvii. 9. The very essence of truth is plainness and brightness. Milton. I looked on the consideration of public service or public ornament to be real and very justice. Burke. Note: Very is sometimes used to make the word with which it is connected emphatic, and may then be paraphrased by same, self-same, itself, and the like. "The very hand, the very words." Shak. "The very rats instinctively have quit it." Shak. "Yea, there where very desolation dwells." Milton. Very is used occasionally in the comparative degree, and more frequently in the superlative. "Was not my lord the verier wag of the two" Shak. "The veriest hermit in the nation." Pope. "He had spoken the very truth, and transformed it into the veriest falsehood." Hawthorne. Very Reverend. See the Note under Reverend.  In a high degree; to no small extent; exceedingly; excessively; extremely; as, a very great mountain; a very bright sum; a very cold day; the river flows very rapidly; he was very much hurt. VERY'S NIGHT SIGNALS; VERY NIGHT SIGNALS; VERY'S LIGHT SIGNALS; VERY
invent: 1. To come or light upon; to meet; to find. [Obs.] And vowed never to return again, Till him alive or dead she did invent. Spenser. 2. To discover, as by study or inquiry; to find out; to devise; to contrive or produce for the first time; -- applied commonly to the discovery of some serviceable mode, instrument, or machine. Thus first Necessity invented stools. Cowper. 3. To frame by the imagination; to fabricate mentally; to forge; -- in a good or a bad sense; as, to invent the machinery of a poem; to invent a falsehood. Whate'er his cruel malice could invent. Milton. He had invented some circumstances, and put the worst possible construction on others. Sir W. Scott. Syn. -- To discover; contrive; devise; frame; design; fabricate; concoct; elaborate. See Discover.
suggest: 1. To introduce indirectly to the thoughts; to cause to be thought of, usually by the agency of other objects. Some ideas . . . are suggested to the mind by all the ways of sensation and reflection. Locke. 2. To propose with difference or modesty; to hint; to intimate; as, to suggest a difficulty. 3. To seduce; to prompt to evil; to tempt. [Obs.] Knowing that tender youth is soon suggested. Shak. 4. To inform secretly. [Obs.] Syn. -- To hint; allude to; refer to; insinuate.  To make suggestions; to tempt. [Obs.] And ever weaker grows through acted crime, Or seeming-genial, venial fault, Recurring and suggesting still. Tennyson.
step: 1. To move the foot in walking; to advance or recede by raising and moving one of the feet to another resting place, or by moving both feet in succession. 2. To walk; to go on foot; esp., to walk a little distance; as, to step to one of the neighbors. 3. To walk slowly, gravely, or resolutely. Home the swain retreats, His flock before him stepping to the fold. Thomson. 4. Fig.: To move mentally; to go in imagination. They are stepping almost three thousand years back into the remotest antiquity. Pope. To step aside, to walk a little distance from the rest; to retire from company. -- To step forth, to move or come forth. -- To step in or into. (a) To walk or advance into a place or state, or to advance suddenly in. Whosoever then first, after the troubling of the water, stepped in, was made whole of whatsoever disease he had. John v. 4. (b) To enter for a short time; as, I just stepped into the house. (c) To obtain possession without trouble; to enter upon easily or suddenly; as, to step into an estate. -- To step out. (a) (Mil.) To increase the length, but not the rapidity, of the step, extending it to thirty-tree inches. (b) To go out for a short distance or a short time. -- To step short (Mil.), to diminish the length or rapidity of the step according to the established rules.  1. To set, as the foot. 2. (Naut.)  To fix the foot of (a mast) in its step; to erect. To step off, to measure by steps, or paces; hence, to divide, as a space, or to form a series of marks, by successive measurements, as with dividers.  1. An advance or movement made by one removal of the foot; a pace. 2. A rest, or one of a set of rests, for the foot in ascending or descending, as a stair, or a round of a ladder. The breadth of every single step or stair should be never less than one foot. Sir H. Wotton. 3. The space passed over by one movement of the foot in walking or running; as, one step is generally about three feet, but may be more or less. Used also figuratively of any kind of progress; as, he improved step by step, or by steps. To derive two or three general principles of motion from phenomena, and afterwards to tell us how the properties and actions of all corporeal things follow from those manifest principles, would be a very great step in philosophy. Sir I. Newton. 4. A small space or distance; as, it is but a step. 5. A print of the foot; a footstep; a footprint; track. 6. Gait; manner of walking; as, the approach of a man is often known by his step. 7. Proceeding; measure; action; an act. The reputation of a man depends on the first steps he makes in the world. Pope. Beware of desperate steps. The darkest day, Live till to-morrow, will have passed away. Cowper. I have lately taken steps . . . to relieve the old gentleman's distresses. G. W. Cable. 8. pl.  Walk; passage. Conduct my steps to find the fatal tree. Dryden. 9. pl.  A portable framework of stairs, much used indoors in reaching to a high position. 10. (Naut.)  In general, a framing in wood or iron which is intended to receive an upright shaft; specif., a block of wood, or a solid platform upon the keelson, supporting the heel of the mast. 11. (Mach.) (a) One of a series of offsets, or parts, resembling the steps of stairs, as one of the series of parts of a cone pulley on which the belt runs. (b) A bearing in which the lower extremity of a spindle or a vertical shaft revolves. 12. (Mus.)  The intervak between two contiguous degrees of the csale. Note: The word tone is often used as the name of this interval; but there is evident incongruity in using tone for indicating the interval between tones. As the word scale is derived from the Italian scala, a ladder, the intervals may well be called steps. 13. (Kinematics)  A change of position effected by a motion of translation. W. K. Clifford. Back step, Half step, etc. See under Back, Half, etc. -- Step grate, a form of grate for holding fuel, in which the bars rise above one another in the manner of steps. -- To take steps, to take action; to move in a matter.
branch: 1. (Bot.)  A shoot or secondary stem growing from the main stem, or from a principal limb or bough of a tree or other plant. 2. Any division extending like a branch; any arm or part connected with the main body of thing; ramification; as, the branch of an antler; the branch of a chandelier; a branch of a river; a branch of a railway. Most of the branches , or streams, were dried up. W. Irving. 3. Any member or part of a body or system; a distinct article; a section or subdivision; a department. "Branches of knowledge." Prescott. It is a branch and parcel of mine oath. Shak. 4. (Geom.)  One of the portions of a curve that extends outwards to an indefinitely great distance; as, the branches of an hyperbola. 5. A line of family descent, in distinction from some other line or lines from the same stock; any descendant in such a line; as, the English branch of a family. His father, a younger branch of the ancient stock. Carew. 6. (Naut.)  A warrant or commission given to a pilot, authorizing him to pilot vessels in certain waters. Branches of a bridle, two pieces of bent iron, which bear the bit, the cross chains, and the curb. -- Branch herring. See Alewife. -- Root and branch , totally, wholly. Syn. -- Bough; limb; shoot; offshoot; twig; sprig.  Diverging from, or tributary to, a main stock, line, way, theme, etc.; as, a branch vein; a branch road or line; a branch topic; a branch store.  1. To shoot or spread in branches; to separate into branches; to ramify. 2. To divide into separate parts or subdivision. To branch off, to form a branch or a separate part; to diverge. -- To branch out, to speak diffusively; to extend one's discourse to other topics than the main one; also, to enlarge the scope of one's business, etc. To branch out into a long disputation. Spectator.  1. To divide as into branches; to make subordinate division in. 2. To adorn with needlework representing branches, flowers, or twigs. The train whereof loose far behind her strayed, Branched with gold and pearl, most richly wrought. Spenser.
allow: 1. To praise; to approve of; hence, to sanction. [Obs. or Archaic] Ye allow the deeds of your fathers. Luke xi. 48. We commend his pains, condemn his pride, allow his life, approve his learning. Fuller. 2. To like; to be suited or pleased with. [Obs.] How allow you the model of these clothes Massinger. 3. To sanction; to invest; to intrust. [Obs.] Thou shalt be . . . allowed with absolute power. Shak. 4. To grant, give, admit, accord, afford, or yield; to let one have; as, to allow a servant his liberty; to allow a free passage; to allow one day for rest. He was allowed about three hundred pounds a year. Macaulay. 5. To own or acknowledge; to accept as true; to concede; to accede to an opinion; as, to allow a right; to allow a claim; to allow the truth of a proposition. I allow, with Mrs. Grundy and most moralists, that Miss Newcome's conduct . . . was highly reprehensible. Thackeray. 6. To grant (something) as a deduction or an addition; esp. to abate or deduct; as, to allow a sum for leakage. 7. To grant license to; to permit; to consent to; as, to allow a son to be absent. Syn. -- To allot; assign; bestow; concede; admit; permit; suffer; tolerate. See Permit.  To admit; to concede; to make allowance or abatement. Allowing still for the different ways of making it. Addison. To allow of, to permit; to admit. Shak.
perhaps: By chance; peradventure; perchance; it may be. And pray God, if perhaps the thought of thine heart may be forgiven thee. Acts viii. 22.
were: To wear. See 3d Wear. [Obs.] Chaucer.  A weir. See Weir. [Obs.] Chaucer. Sir P. Sidney.  To guard; to protect. [Obs.] Chaucer.  The imperfect indicative plural, and imperfect subjunctive singular and plural, of the verb be. See Be.  1. A man. [Obs.] 2. A fine for slaying a man; the money value set upon a man's life; weregild. [Obs.] Every man was valued at a certain sum, which was called his were. Bosworth.
